United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:22:32:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-sales-manager-sales-owner-operator-job-fitchburg-ma-us-151144955.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b90e82e93bfa4295bc3583092bb7fc45
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:22:32:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Martinsville,Part Time Employee,"Martinsville, IN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-martinsville-in-us-169627950.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ecd740f80cc451d1025e2f50a0549ea3
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:22:40:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.Be passionate. Be confident. Have fun. It""s time to do something you love, work with a purpose, and take on a challenge like never before. Meet T-Mobile, America""s Un-carrier, serving 50 million wireless subscribers and growing. When you join our team, you can make an incredible difference to your customers, and your co-workers. We""re looking for boldness, enthusiasm, and a whole lot of passion. In exchange, we offer real career growth opportunities in a place where awesome work is rewarded. Retail Sales Associate Welcome to the big leagues. Here, you""re more than a sales person. You""re the face of our company for thousands of potential customers. You""ve got to know your gear inside and out-from the latest phones to the most competitive pricing plans. And you""ve got to bring fierceness and enthusiasm to every sale. It""s a big responsibility, but the rewards are simply amazing. Here""s a closer look at the job: Customer service or sales experience will make a huge difference in your ability to take on this challenge When it comes to communication skills, you""re off the charts, with the ability to carefully listen and make every customer feel valued and welcomed Tech savvy people wanted-and that includes the ability to smoothly find your way around a computer If you""re a born problem-solver, even better A high school degree or GED is essential If you""ve read this far and feel like this is the challenge you were meant to take on, then it""s time to talk rewards for all your outstanding work. We offer: Competitive base pay plus outstanding commission potential Benefits for part-time and full-time associates Medical, dental and vision benefits Matching 401(k) Generous paid time-off programs Phone service discounts Education reimbursement Serious growth potential for your career This is the opportunity to do something special, and be part of a company revolutionizing the wireless industry. And we couldn""t do it without someone like you. So what do you say? Isn""t it time you explored what could become the career move of a lifetime? We invite you to apply today! Customers pay a visit to your retail store location-some may be browsing, and some may be ready to buy You approach with confidence and a smile, and go to work, assessing their needs and concerns as you build a genuine relationship with them Every question that""s raised is an opportunity for you to build trust, educate your customer, and offer solutions that pave the way for a potential T-Mobile sale When it""s time to make the sale, you""re an expert at finding just the right plan for your customer, and then making sure they""re primed for success throughout the customer on-boarding process We""ll also count on you to support your team, keep the store looking its best, and make sure your knowledge of T-Mobile technology is up to date As you can see, this isn""t your ordinary job. You""ve got to bring you""re A game if you""re going to be a success. So what are we looking for?We Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Retail Sales Associate Job in Covington,,"Covington, WA 98042",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-associate-job-covington-wa-us-169626456.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=17,,,122dcea75c1a6a5c4b9d20a1b72ee0f0
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:22:41:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Alcohol Brand Ambassador Part Time   Are you a beer wine and spirit enthusiast?  We are hiring vibrant and energetic individuals to represent the top brands of beer, wine and spirits in the market today! If you are a friendly person who loves meeting new people, then this part time Alcohol Brand Ambassador job is the perfect fit for you. Join this exciting and growing industry and be part of a team that is best in class for alcohol promotions.  Your responsibilities include engaging and educating consumers on our client’s products while increasing retail sales during in-store events. Advantage Solutions jobs offer competitive pay rates, training and support which are a few of the benefits provided by the leading sales and marketing company in North America.     Responsibilities:   The event specialist conducts consumer facing activities . Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers. Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products.  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or previous experience as server, bartender or have worked with alcohol in past. Must be 21 or over; must be willing to conduct Adult Beverage (alcohol) demonstrations; Company will provide training and certification course upon hire. RASC a plus but we are willing to train and pay for certification of qualified candidates. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access. Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Position Summary                                                    The Event Specialist generates excitement, brand awareness, and increases product sales through event sampling and promotions.  The Event Specialist is responsible for reading all program materials, set up and breakdown of their working area, and preparing and sampling products on scheduled event days.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct Demo Event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Engage the consumer by creating brand awareness and enthusiasm Dynamically and aggressively sell product to consumers Sample product to consumers (may include cooking) Move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart and engage them in a professional manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event May be required to expediently escort customers from cart location to other locations within store to obtain product Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing 52-74 lbs. distance of 150-300 feet (from storage area to event execution area) Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet and up to 10 feet overhead Purchase product and supplies (requires lifting up to 40 lbs. and reaching up to 10 feet; carrying up to 40 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart; Construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials- insert price signs, display product information and hoist sign with assistance up to 5 lbs. Set up/display product/materials on cart Break down/clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up/Sanitize Cart Disassemble Cart  Push cart weighing 52-74 lbs. distance of 150-300 feet (from event execution area to storage area) Return appliances/equipment (requires carrying/lifting up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet and reaching up to 10 feet overhead) Wash Utensils/Cookware Administrative Work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports and timesheets Attend trainings;  products/ materials Check voice mails, emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed Supervisory Responsibilities   Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job      Minimum Qualifications The following are the minimum job-related qualifications which an individual needs in order to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities of the job Education Level: (Required) High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience                      Field of Study/Area of Experience:  Click here to enter text. -Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Excellent customer service orientation Ability to work effectively with management Good interpersonal skills Good written communication and verbal communication skills Basic computer skills including familiarity with Word, Excel, and Internet usage Must pass online Food Safety training exam (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Compliance with all food safety requirements and regulations   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Reps Requirements Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law. Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Alcohol Brand Ambassador Part Time Job in Laurinburg,Part Time Employee,"Laurinburg, NC",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/alcohol-brand-ambassador-part-time-job-laurinburg-nc-us-169627849.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=1,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b572520f3983c9438d3130206fc18678
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:23:34:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in West Jordan,Part Time Employee,"West Jordan, UT",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-west-jordan-ut-us-169627621.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=4,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,637cf0099abd8f557e7d7af7d9b5367a
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:23:46:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Job Window has an exciting opening for a Marketing Assistant in our client’s Customer Service Division.  This firm is a marketing and advertising firm looking for a candidate with potential and an ambitious drive, rather than experience, to aggressively expand in the Philadelphia area. Our client has an aggressive expansion plan laid out and is looking to find a Marketing Assistant who would love to work in a, fun, competitive, positive-minded environment. About our client:Our client is an outsourcing customer acquisition firm. That means the firm’s corporate clientele hire them to provide a personal touch with customers that they can’t do themselves and don’t trust anyone else to do. Because our client’s personal, customer service based approach has proved to be so successful, they are rapidly expanding and are in immediate need of a Marketing Assistant to help bring in new customers and assist in the expansion efforts.Responsibilities of the Marketing Assistant:Interact face-to-face with consumers at on-site marketing campaigns to act as primary point of contact between clients and consumers.Resolve customer service issues that may be slowing down the business and manage all customer service related issues and questions.Assist in the daily growth and development of assigned marketing campaigns.Drive sales through promotional marketing campaigns.Publicize campaign and work with Marketing Manager to raise awareness and drive high levels of attendance and participation by targeted audience.RequirementsRequirements of the Marketing Assistant:1-2 years’ experience or training in sales, marketing, customer service, customer acquisition and retention, sales management, marketing management, territory management, or communications preferred. Demonstrate great people skills and excellent work ethic.Must have a positive, professional attitude like the rest of our client’s enthusiastic staff.Must be willing to train in an entry level position. You must be confident you'll be successful and looking for a career opportunity where you can prove yourself. To schedule an interview this week with our client’s hiring manager, reply to this ad with a copy of your resume!Key Words: Entry Level, Brand/Product Marketing, Account Management, Business Development, Sales / Marketing Strategizing, Product Management, Direct Marketing (CRM), Sales Executive, Marketing Assistant, Account Sales",Marketing Assistant Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19102",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-assistant-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169397032.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=18,,Marketing/Product,e15249f37cdc20a31336f8a004d6c47d
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:23:46:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"MarketingBusiness Development OpeningsBusiness Management Trainee Openings**FULL TRAINING PROVIDED**KT Marketing Inc., is actively seeking entry level business professionals to join our business development team. We consider ourselves to be an up and coming leader in the marketing and sales industries: therefore, we are looking for up and coming talent to match our drive. Candidates must be competitive minded, high energy, and thrive in a fast paced environment. Recent expansion has allowed KT Marketing Inc. to accept applications for our competitive management trainee program. All positions start entry level, and qualified candidates will have the opportunity to grow into management and executive roles within our company. All candidates are cross trained in areas of team management, leadership training, marketing, sales, customer service, and promotional events. Experience gained through KT Marketing Inc. is unparalleled due to our unique management training program. Expectations for our business development team members include:·         Meeting or exceeding weekly standards·         Build and manage relationships with potential customers and clients·         Work strategically with the marketing team in a capacity of business development and lead generation·         Manage and oversee a campaign and team of representatives Job RequirementsRequirements·         4 year degree preferred ·         1-2 years of experience in related fields·         Ability to develop strong business relationships with others·         Ability to foster positive company brand image·         Leadership and team management ability·         Effective interpersonal and communication skills (written and verbal) ",Account Manager Job in Newark,Full Time Employee,"Company:KT Marketing, Inc.",Telecommunications ServicesRestaurant/Food ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-job-newark-de-us-169255791.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,,Marketing/Product,49e8e53fe4ed0d5c94393c7afc02c25e
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:00:27:23,No,jobs.monster.com,".This position is responsible to lead efforts to continuously improve product and process quality through process control, continuous improvement, and corrective action. Coordinates the certification of food press systems and ensures compliance to ASME, CE, and ISO requirements. Manage process with our customers to address field complaints and takes ownership for reporting, monitoring, and reducing cost of poor quality. In this role you will:Create, implement ASME, ISO, and plant quality programs.Liaise with authorities with respect to fulfillment of regulatory requirements.Establish quality and reliability standards by studying product and consumer requirements.Plan and perform audits of internal processes and external suppliers.Implement corrective action, improve process control, and reduce variation. Establish product quality documentation system to meet internal needs and external requirements.Maintain professional and technical knowledge, review professional publications, and participate in professional societies.Prepare reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing data. Present essential KPIs and make recommendations.Respond to all customer quality concerns. Identity root causes of problems and implement corrective actions.Be a proactive member of Middletown staff. Actively demonstrate the shared values of the site and support the creation of a winning plant culture. Perform other duties as assigned by Management. MUST PASS DRUG, AND BACKGROUND SCREENING TO BECOME A CANDIDATE, AND PROVIDE WORK REFERENCES DOCUMENTING HANDS ON EXPERIENCE IN EXPERIENCE WITH ASME AUDITS, IMPROVING, AND ORGANIZING ALL DATA AND PROCESSES TO MEET ASME DEMANDS ..PRIOR PROCESS AND OR CHEMICAL PROCESS BACKGROUND IS A PLUSTHIS IS A HANDS ON AND NOT A OFFICE QUALITY MANAGEMENT POSITIONBring your integrity, customer oriented mindset and your passion for continuous improvement, as well as: B.S. Degree in Engineering or related discipline required.3+ years working as Quality Engineer required.Experience using structured problem solving methodologies & tools required.Experience with ASME Section VIII Pressure Vessel Code strongly preferred.Experience with CE Certification strongly preferred Strong organizational, verbal & written communication skills required.Ability to read and understand technical documents requiredAbility to travel on occasion. Apply Online",Quality Engineer Job in Middletown,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Middletown, OH 45044",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Middletown-OH-US-165228035.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=13,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),f25d80df8e54d279327002f31f610209
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:00:43:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quality Control ManagerResponsibilities • Create an attitude of Safety, contribute to the safe operation of the department; maintain a safe, clean work area • Responsible for ensuring the proper mix design, scale weights and water demand of mix designs at batch plants. • Performs physical tests on ready mix concrete at plant, such as slump, entrained air, unit weight and yield. • At point of delivery, spot checks same physical properties as above and discusses necessary adjustments in batch weights with Manager, plus observes workability, finish ability, and contractor's use or misuse of product. • Performs physical tests on ready mix concrete aggregates, such as gradations, decants, sand equivalency, specific gravity and density, absorption. • Prepares and performs physical tests on laboratory mix concrete batches such as slump, entrained air, unit weight and yield, time of setting and compressive strength. • Performs on site surveys of fleets and facilities producing products so as to be able to identify delivery problems and recommend solutions. • Develops and maintains appropriate working relationship so that individuals will be able to inform Distribution, Production and/or Sales of conditions that could adversely affect good, efficient delivery service, and, when possible, take necessary action to correct the condition. • Keeps a written daily log of activities and observations. • Investigates and reports complaints pertaining to quantity, quality, or performance. • Writes job inspection reports when required. • Maintains QA/QC database(s) current. • Other duties as assigned. Qualifications• Bachelor's degree preferred. • Minimum 3 years directly related experience. • ACI Field Grade I Testing Technician • ACI Aggregate or Laboratory Certification; NRMCA Certification is a plus• Experience in the collection, testing and reporting of concrete and/or aggregate samples. • Knowledge of the aggregate and concrete manufacturing process. • Working knowledge of ACI, ASTM, DOT and Regional standards and specifications. Physical Requirements The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. • Able to stand, walk, use hands and fingers to manipulate objects, talk and hear. • Vision abilities (with correction) include close, distance, peripheral, depth, and the ability to adjust focus. • The employee is frequently required to sit and use hands. • The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk and bend. • Job hazards include exposure to dust, noise, fumes, and all weather conditions. Potential for serious injury exists if equipment is misused or safety precautions are not followed. Work Environment• Tempo is fast-paced with deadlines. • The noise level in some areas of the work environment may be moderate. Email resume to iljobs2016@gmail.com (2117078)",Quality Control Manager Job in St. Louis,Full Time,"St. Louis, MO 63101",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Quality-Control-Manager-Job-St.-Louis-MO-US-165651215.aspx?ch=stlouis&mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=4,,,4140c10729e64336f3e92ba183c31aed
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:00:43:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Quality Assurance Manager JOB SUMMARY: The Quality Assurance Manager is responsible for developing, maintaining and enforcing systems to assure that all products manufactured or purchased by the company meet or exceed customer specifications with regard to safety, appearance and performance.  ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Develops and implements a quality production program to ensure conformity of purchased material and final products to quality standards.Provides direction and establishes project priorities for the Quality Systems Engineer and the Senior Quality Engineer.Meets with vendors, customers, quality representatives and company personnel to discuss and resolve quality problems as required. Prepares for and represents the company for all quality related audits.Oversees the document control system and ensures it’s integrityAchieves quality assurance operational objectives by contributing information and analysis to strategic plans and reviews; preparing and completing action plans; implementing production, productivity, quality and customer-service standards; identifying and resolving problems; completing audits; determining system improvements; implementing change.Develops quality assurance plans by conducting hazard analysis; identifying critical control points and preventive measures; establishing critical limits, monitoring procedures, corrective action and verification procedures.Prepares quality documentation and reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information and trends including failed processes, stability studies, recalls, corrective actions and re-validations. SECONDARY DUTIES:Otherduties as assigned. NATURE AND SCOPE:Reports to Director of Engineering and Operational Excellence KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS and ABILITIES:•         Working knowledge of computer software (Windows, Office, Word, Excel)•         Excellent project management skills•         Strong organization and time management skills.•         Strong team building / facilitating skills.•         Excellent written and oral communication skills required with demonstrated ability to effectively interact withindividuals at all levels in the organization.•         Must have the ability to manage operational, organizational and financial elements.•         Must have excellent interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills.•         Must have ability to plan, strong analytical skills, organize, and manage multiple and conflicting priorities.•         Must be a self- starter, motivator, problem solver and coach.•         Must be a strategic thinker, self-motivated, driven,and engaged team player.WORKING CONDITIONS•         A normal, inside, factory work environment, variable heating, cooling, drafts, operating machinery/equipment noises.  Some outside work required in tank farm and assisting with measurements/data collection.  Exposed to variable intensities of heat from equipment/melted waxes, odors from candle scents.   PHYSICAL ACTIVITIY and DEMANDS:•         Stands and/or walks 80-90% on a concrete floor, sits 10-20% of the work time. Exercises considerable visual acuity during the manufacturing process.  •         Must be able to move about the plant freely to include navigating steps. •         Must be able to lift 30 pounds without assistance and 75 pounds with assistance •         Must have precise coordinated movements of the fingers of both hands to grasp and manipulate small objects•         Must make fast, simple, repeated movements of the fingers, hands, and wrists •         Must be able to bend, stoop, stretch, twist, and reach out with the body, arms, and/or legs  EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE: Four-year college degree preferred in Engineering or Chemistry.LEAN/Six Sigma certification is preferred.  At a minimum, formal education in courses related to statistical analysis andprocess capability are recommended.•         Minimum of 5-8 years of relevant work experience, preferably in chemical processing.•         Familiarity with MIL-SDS, ISO and ANSI standards    Equal Employment Organization Employer F/M/Disabled/Vets         ",Quality Assurance Manager Job in Leesburg,Full Time,"Leesburg, OH 45135",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Manager-Job-Leesburg-OH-US-165630763.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=7,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),6332cd072af595d851c3dfe27d3bc48c
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:01:07:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:The primary role of the Quality Control & Regulatory Manager is to oversee the Quality Control and Regulatory requirements across various categories of the Company.  This individual will be focused on setting overall procedures and working in conjunction with various departments such as Product Development and Purchasing & Production to ensure our products meet all quality standards, as well as overall business deliverables such as timing and costs. The Quality Control & Regulatory Manager must be a detail oriented problem solver, adept at managing risks and setting clear expectations with vendors and manufacturers to facilitate production and ensure products are upheld by the highest standards and have experience in beauty, fragrance or related luxury goods company.       Overall Responsibilities:Direct, coordinate, plan and monitor the day-to-day quality control activities across .Set overall company QC procedures and expectations, as well as SOPs for all major fill vendors and strategic raw material suppliers.Oversee all social compliancy and QC audits as requested by key clients and retailers.Trouble-shoot any/all QC issues as they arise across raw materials and finished goods.  Manage and oversee root causes, costs, and corrective action plans to help ensure product supply.Prepare purchase orders for outside service provides and resolve issues with problem products from suppliers by working through Purchasing and the supplier/vendor.Review all batch samples from labs for fragrances and bulk.Research and assess all independent QC and regulatory labs as required for various projects.  Serve as the single point of contact for these labs.Serve as the single point of contact for all micro testing, pilot batch approvals, package compatibility testing, stability testing, and product testing.  Keep meticulous records of all testing protocols, results, timelines, and any deviations from approved standards.Set up range boards for culling, red tag samples and product standards for the Company.Provide industry standard regulatory and compliancy guidelines for all packaging materials across various categories for both domestic and overseas marketsProvide support to Sales and Marketing functions by providing technical feedback when QC issues arise.Provide formal reports, range boards, etc. to clients as needed.Develop master shippers for all programs/ship test as required.Set up templates with appropriate technical responses for addressing consumer complaints.Help create design briefs from a technical/regulatory standpoint. Job Requirements / Qualifications:Bachelor’s Degree with a minimum of 3 years of work experience in Manufacturing and/or  Supply Chain.Related experience within the beauty, home, fragrance or luxury industry preferred.Strong understanding of quality control standards, inspection processes, and how to execute corrective action plans.Strong leadership skills with the ability to problem solve through unexpected situations.Able to work independently as well as cross functionally.Detail oriented with the ability to set up standard procedures/best practices for meeting Company deliverables.Outstanding communication and negotiation skills, as well as the ability to act with tact, discretion and diplomacy.A proactive team player who thrives in a goal-oriented, dynamic, ever-changing, fast-paced work environment while juggling multiple priorities with a sense of urgency.Proficiency in MS Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Outlook, and web-based applications. Ability to learn to work with new software and hardware.Knowledge of CRM and ERP principles and software.",Quality Control & Regulatory Manager Job in New York,Full Time,"New York, NY",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Regulatory-Manager-Job-New-York-NY-US-165414650.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b36116830dda5aa933841c8f5c13d105
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:01:41:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Integrated Merchandising Systems (IMS) is a leading merchandising solutions company delivering strategic process management to world class clients.  IMS’ primary focus is in Print/Point-of-Sale Management (in-store promotional signage and displays), Promotional Products (apparel, gifts, and promotional incentive items), and Warehousing/Fulfillment activities.  Visit us at: www.imsfastpak.com  IMS is wholly owned by Omnicom Group (NYSE: OMC), an inter-connected global network of leading marketing communication companies offering a diverse, comprehensive range of marketing solutions to drive bottom line results for its clients (www.omnicomgroup.com). Position Description: Compliance Manager IMS is currently seeking a social and product safety Compliance Manager to work in our Morton Grove, IL facility to oversee audit quality and auditor performance, manage the corrective action plan process, and perform factory evaluations to determine Code of Conduct compliance as well as track and maintain product safety testing records.This position will report to the Director of Production and work closely with the production buyers. Primary Responsibilities Include: Assess and address risk around responsible sourcing for the supply baseExecute, integrate and advance the strategy of Responsible Sourcing while realizing supplier accountability “risk” and “opportunities” are executed through processes managed by the production functionInitiate and manage a portfolio of Responsible Sourcing and product safety testing projects to drive progress in line with company and customer sustainability goals through engagement, development and coordination with vendors and buyersUnderstand, communicate, leverage and drive platforms such as SEDEX to address riskBe able to manage and resolve questions with suppliers and other functional team membersAccountable point contact for driving the process of responsible sourcing, audit compliance and product safety testingAbility to work with suppliers on audits and the correction of non-conformancesExpert within IMS that can answer questions and resolve problems around audits and/or self-assessment questionnairesAct as the resource to the business on current events, attend related meetings, and identify issues and trends in areas related to responsible sourcing and product safety testingRegularly report on progress of the functions to the Production DirectorsEnsure Sed Ex memberships and SAQ’s are current for IMS and vendor partnersWork with IMS vendors to oversee all factory corrective action plansInterpret complex documentation to ensure quality standards and factory compliance Experience/Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree in a related field including supply chain, sustainability or responsible sourcing/procurement5 + years of experience in a responsible sourcing and product safety testing role5 + year of experience in a similar industry with knowledge of B2B and B2C relationships5 + year of specific experience managing SEDEX and/or Eco Vadis platforms and product safety testingProficient in Microsoft excelStrong written and verbal communication skillsKnowledge of “AIM Progress”   Email or send resume (SUBJECT: CSDMG0316) to: Recruiter@IMSfastpak.com  IMSAttn: Human Resources 8338 Austin Avenue Morton Grove, IL 60053 Please include salary requirements.  IMS offers a comprehensive compensation and benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, Profit Sharing and 401(k), generous paid time off policy and more!",Compliance Manager Job in Morton Grove,Full Time,"Morton Grove, IL 60053",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Compliance-Manager-Job-Morton-Grove-IL-US-165825745.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=11,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),cfa17babab9ff0b9c6688508d0674c50
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:01:42:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:The New Product Development Coordinator will lead and manage a group of projects though all phases of technical product development from concept to commercialization.  ·         He/she will work with the customer and evaluate technical viability of concept, manage product development, and successfully bring that product to commercialization by partnering with our suppliers, co-manufacturers and internal team.·         You will perform consultations onsite, where you can observe and evaluate customer processes as they relate to yield, throughput and shelf life, as well as color, flavor and tenderness. ·         In this role you will develop novel ingredient formulations and modify existing formulations to suit specific goals and challenges in the food industry  Desired Skills and Experience·         Chemistry or Food Science Degree or related discipline with a min of 2 years of experience in the food industry preferred to include working knowledge of HACCP, GMP, ISO·         Preservatives/ additives experience is a plus·         Strong knowledge of food science, Meat science a plus, food manufacturing processes, microbiology and quality assurance. ·         Maintains and documents all product development information for bench and plant trials, to efficiently scale up for commercialization/full production. ·         Liaise with Sales team and interact directly with customers to answer questions and provide solutions or ideas on ingredients, product capabilities, product specifications, product trends and food knowledge as needed. ·         Coordinate with Sales, Operations, Food Safety Department, Quality Assurance and Meat Lab on new product concepts and formulations for our Customers. ·         Aptitude for problem solving and entrepreneurial zeal. ·         Must interact with Customers to understand their needs. Team player, enjoys collaborative work environment, maintains open communication channels. ·         Experience with Patents is a PLUS·         Self-motivated. Hands-on and results-oriented. ·         Has a calm demeanor and adapts to fast paced and tight deadline environment. ·         Excellent written and oral communication skills ·         Comfortable in a fast paced, changing environment ·         Must be flexible and able to work well in a team environment. ·         Must have strong leadership skills ·         Proficient in Internet navigation, Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook.Key Words: Chemist, Chemistry, Chemical Engineer, Food Science, Food Safety, GMP, ISO, Additives, Preservatives, Patents, Ingredient Formulation, Poultry, Meat, Seafood, Food Industry, Pathogens SUBMIT RESUMES TO ZWAITS@ISG-RESOURCES.COM",New Product Development Manager Job in Athens,Full Time,"Athens, GA 30607",,http://jobview.monster.com/New-Product-Development-Manager-Job-Athens-GA-US-165912921.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f25bf25b3174ffb9c24ac22250effcee
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:01:57:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"This Scientist (Dish) plans and performs laboratory assignments in the development of new product formulations, integration of novel technologies into product offerings and the measurement of performance. The individual leads technical exploration as part of an integrated cross functional team.Responsibilities:Contribute to R&D projects concerned with unique problems involving exploration of subject area, definition of scope, selection of problems for investigation, and generation of novel propositionsCollaboratively lead generative consumer learningCreatively explore and design DemosResponsible for following all applicable Federal, State, and Local health, safety, and environmental regulations, as per corporate health, safety and environmental policiesRuns standard and non-standard chemical, physical, or application tests to obtain data to evaluate performance of new technologies.Contributes to the solution of assigned problems through development and modifications of test procedures.Independently develop experimental designs and work plans in the development of new products to meet desired performance metrics.Leads technical exploration as part of an integrated, cross functional project team. This includes working to identify consumer/customer needs and translating these needs into technical specifications.Plans and schedules project tasks internal and external related to learning experiments and consumer trials.Responsible for planning, interpretation, quality and presentation of data.Reports project status to team members and management as required. Requirements: Four year college chemistry degree with 2-5 years of experience preferredFormulating experience in consumer packaged goodsStrong communication skills are required, as the position involves working in multi-functional project teams.Spirit of innovation and curiosity.Basic personal computer skills including word processing, spreadsheets, and databases are required.Self-motivated, work semi independentlyHave problem solving and critical thinking skills#LI-DF1PI93182748Apply Here",Scientist (Dish) Job in Salt Lake City,"Full Time , Employee","Salt Lake City, UT 84104",,http://jobview.monster.com/Scientist-Dish-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-165081526.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=9,,Biotech/R&D/Science,e09b3a062cdc84389bca72609930f330
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:01:57:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"A world renowned Medical Device and Pharmaceutical company in northern Illinois is looking for a full-time Supplier Quality Specialist to add to their medical device QA group.Their global portfolio includes medicines and vaccines, as well as many of the world's best-known consumer healthcare products. The organization works across developed and emerging markets to advance wellness, prevention, treatments and cures.The Supplier Quality Specialist will be responsible for drafting, coordinating, and tracking supplier quality agreements in support of the Device Supplier Quality Lifecycle program along with work collaboratively and cross-functionally to drive closure of supplier audit-related CAPA, departmental CAPA, regulatory commitments. Responsibilities support commitments made to regulatory and notified bodies, maintaining supplier records in supplier quality systems, and collection of data for trending and reporting. The primary functions of this position are to work collaboratively and cross-functionally to drive closure of supplier audit-related CAPA, departmental CAPA, and regulatory commitments, ensuring deadlines are met.This individual will also be responsible for supporting regulatory inspections through preparation and ownership of proof books, managing access to supplier quality records in the TrackWise GEMS, TrackWise SQM, SAP DMS, and SharePoint systems.The hiring manager is looking for someone who can lead cross functional teams or meetings as well as demonstrated organization skills through successful project management as well as commitment and willingness to go above and beyond. Leadership with demonstrated results driving action under limited direction is also crucial for success within this role.Candidate Requirements:B.S. DegreeMinimum 5 years of experience in the medical device industryDirect hands-on experience with negotiating quality contracts or agreements with suppliers or third partiesPrior experience owning CAPA investigationsExperience with actual authoring/synthesis/negotiation of Quality AgreementsAbility to draft the agreement and understanding the quality systems view as to what is negotiableKnowledge of global cGMP regulations; 21 CFR Parts 210, 211 and 820, ICH* IPEC Guidelines, and ISO Standards (ISO 9001, 13485).Advanced knowledge of Quality systems, control Systems, and problem solving methodology (5 Whys, DMAIC, etc.).This organization employs over 90,000 employees worldwide and has an industry-leading pipeline of new products and medicines. This is an incredible opportunity to work for one of the most successful Life Science's organizations in the world and make an impact within a global organization.If this sounds like an interesting opportunity and you meet the requirements above, please apply on-line for consideration.",Supplier Quality Specialist Job in Lake Forest,"Full Time, Employee","Lake Forest, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Supplier-Quality-Specialist-Job-Lake-Forest-IL-US-165647114.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=5,,,107aa1b6a9e4c1235211f79c071c5690
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:01:57:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Posting Information       Open Date:                              March 11, 2016       Job Title:                                 Manager, Scientific       Division/Department:              Xcenda, LLC       Job Type:                                Full Time    # of Openings:                         1  Career Level:                           See description below  Education Required:                Please refer to job description  Category:                                 JLC-7Job Code:                                100088Shift/Hours:                             First Shift (Day)      Job Description & Requirements       Work Location:                       Palm Harbor, FL    Primary Duties and Responsibilities:        Under general direction of senior leadership, provide clinical and statistical programming expertise to health economics and outcomes research studies to support pharmaceutical, biotechnology, and device technologies.  Design and conduct observational and epidemiological studies using varied data sources. Manage and extract information from large healthcare databases using SAS and STATA. Serve as the primary content developer for the implementation and reporting of burden of illness studies, comparative effectiveness studies, prospective or retrospective observational epidemiologic or health resource utilization and cost studies and other database analysis with the Applied Data Analytics department. Serve as the analyst-researcher for health economics and outcomes studies, perform data validation and analytic file creation utilizing SAS, conduct statistical analyses utilizing SAS, Stat, or other relevant software, and develop content for study protocols, study reports, abstracts, posters, publications, and presentation of scientific findings. Contribute to the development and implementation of SAS macros and other programming standards and conventions to ensure consistency and efficiency across the development.  Support and conduct data queries and analyses for other Xcenda service lines.  Experience and Education Requirements:       Ph.D., or foreign equivalent, in Health Economics, Pharmacy Administration, Biostatistics, Health Services Research, Epidemiology, or related field plus one year of experience designing epidemiological and observational studies, and utilizing advanced biostatistics to analyze observational data. Must include experience working with SAS programming, econometrics, and medical writing.  In lieu of a Ph.D. and one year of experience, employer will accept a Master’s degree, or foreign equivalent, plus four years of experience designing epidemiological and observational studies, and utilizing advanced biostatistics to analyze observational data. Experience can be gained through graduate research or employment.                                                 Additional Information:",Manager,Full Time Employee,"Palm Harbor, FL 34685",,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-Scientific-Job-Palm-Harbor-FL-US-164746542.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=14,,Biotech/R&D/Science,a8e8a6b01f2711d2530575c64a068fb0
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:02:43:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Research Support needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in Johnston, IA. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Expertise in supporting research initiatives including insect control, seed treatments, and agronomic trait development - Experience utilizing statistical software such as R, ASREML and other packages as needed for research applications - Knowledge of current and new statistical concepts and methodologies, especially mixed models and the ability to solve complex problems by determining and using appropriate statistical techniques What You'll Be Doing: - Exercises scientific judgment regarding advanced statistical methodologies in order to provide statistical support in experimental design, data analysis and reporting for various experiments - Utilizes statistical software such as R, ASREML and other packages as needed for research applications - Learning, selecting, and/or developing advanced statistical procedures to address complex biological questions and applying these procedures to product development - Decide how to implement statistical methodology in appropriate statistical programming language What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Graduate student, majoring in statistics, or commensurate experience in statistical support - Expertise in supporting research initiatives including insect control, seed treatments, and agronomic trait development - Experience utilizing statistical software such as R, ASREML and other packages as needed for research applications - Knowledge of current and new statistical concepts and methodologies, especially mixed models and the ability to solve complex problems by determining and using appropriate statistical techniques Bonus Points! Otherwise Known As Preferred Qualifications: - Strong consulting/interpersonal skills and ability to work well as part of a scientific team What's In It For You? - This is your chance to shine while supporting our client that cares about your development and help you lead where you want to be. Get Hired, Apply Now! Recruiter: Jestoni Garcia Phone Number: 570.309.6492 Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: CLINICAL; J2W: SCIENTIFIC; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WBRSTL Ref: 1071960 Nearest Major Market: Carbondale Job Segment: Agronomy, Agricultural, Clinical Research, Medical Research, Agriculture, Research, Healthcare #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Research Support Job Job in Johnston City,Full Time Employee,"Johnston City, IL",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Research-Support-Job-Job-Johnston-City-IL-US-165833853.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=5,,Biotech/R&D/Science,66884e2951bd230bbd45edf64e0ed273
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:02:44:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"SOUTHWORTHARE you looking for a work environment that is growing and thriving? Do you want a career in which you can grow both personally and professionally? Are success and personal growth on your list of must-haves in a company of choice? If you answered yes to these questions, then apply to join the team at Southworth Products – the world’s largest manufacturer of ergonomic materials handling equipment.Southworth is currently accepting resumes for the following position:QUALITY MANAGERPOSITION MINIMUM REQUIREMENTSFOUR YEAR DEGREE OR EQUIVELENT EXPERIENCE REQUIREDAT LEAST THREE YEARS IN DIRECTLY RELATED FIELDWITH AT LEAST TWO YEARS OF SUPERVISORY EXPERIENCE IS A MUSTWORKING KNOWLEDGE OF STATISTICAL PROCESS CONTROL (SPC) REQUIRED.TOTAL QUALITY MANAGEMENT (TQM) TRAINING AND EXPERIENCE REQUIRED.WORKING FAMILIARITY WITH MS OFFICE PRODUCTS REQUIRED.PROJECT MANAGEMENT SKILL AND EXPERIENCE REQUIRED.DECISION QUALITY: DEMONSTRATED SKILL IN JUDGMENT AND SOUND DECISION-MAKING REQUIRED. SIX SIGMA TRAINING A PLUS. EXCELLENT COMMUNICATION SKILLS REQUIRED, INCLUDING ACTIVE LISTENING AND EFFECTIVE SPEAKING SKILLS. TO APPLY:PLEASE SEND RESUME TO:HUMAN RESOURCESATTN: SHELLY BARLEY, HR MANAGERP.O. BOX 1310MANILA, AR 72442OR BY FAX:207-317-4393BY EMAIL:sbarley@southworthproducts.com",Quality Manager Job in Monette,Full Time,"Monette, ME 72447",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Quality-Manager-Job-Monette-ME-US-165073212.aspx?ch=jonesboro&mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=17,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),32f43240e6fc6389d618b3d79b5b2027
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:03:44:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Validation Lead III in Bridgewater, NJ. Duties: Support validation activities for GxP Production Applications Tracking, execution, review and archival of documents Investigation and closure of anomalies encountered during testing Coordination with business users and developers to ensure business and regulatory requirements are adequately satisfied by software solutions Develop validation deliverables including but not limited to:Validation Plans: User Acceptance Test Designs User Acceptance Test Scripts User Acceptance Test Reports Traceability Matrices AFU/Validation ReportsREQUIREMENTS: Pharmacovigilance knowledge and experience a plusSkills: Pharmacovigilance and GxP knowledge and Expertise Knowledge of Oracle AERS, SharePoint, BPM (Business Process Management)Strong validation skills including the following: College degree or equivalent in business experience required Minimum of 3 years' validation experience Experience in user acceptance testing of regulated computer systems Experience in user acceptance script writing Experience in test script execution Good Documentation practices Knowledge of SDLC Experienced in computer validation methodology Ability to prioritize work in a fast-paced, deliverables oriented department Excellent interpersonal skills with ability to work cross-functionally both within and outside the department, including outside vendors as well as internationally Demonstrate proactive initiative and ability to adapt to changing priorities Excellent attention to detail",Validation Lead III Job in Bridgewater,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Bridgewater, NJ 08807",,http://jobview.monster.com/Validation-Lead-III-Job-Bridgewater-NJ-US-165851857.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),60e7fb29b379e6268685fdb4ce73095c
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:03:45:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are TOP group, an international recruiting company in NYC, Chicago, Atlanta, Texas, Los Angeles, San Francisco, Canada, and Mexico. Our clients are from all business sectors and we work to source the highest qualified candidates available. An International Automotive Parts Manufacturer is searching for a Quality Engineer due to company expansion and a growing need for increased production in their facilities just North of Nashville, TN.  Any candidates with strong backgrounds in quality, quality control, quality inspection, quality assurance, or metrology within the automotive manufacturing industry are welcome.Qualifications for the Quality Engineer - Automotive: NO VISA SPONSORSHIP FOR THIS POSITIONBachelor’s Degree, in an Engineering disciplineMinimum 3 Years’ mass production experience within a quality function, preferably automotivePPAP and APQP knowledgeDetailed knowledge of Word, Excel, Power PointKnowledge of ISO 9000, ISO 14001, TS 16949Good Communication skillsAble to work individually as well as in a teamGood Time Management skillsMust be Detail Oriented Responsibilities of the Quality Engineer - Automotive: Process monitoring, supplier evaluation, product warranty claim analysis, field product return evaluation, metric analysis & reporting.Use the results of evaluations to develop, recommend, and implement action plans to improve product quality, the quality system, and supplier performance.Conduct extensive data analysis to identify root cause and related improvement actions: Rework, TRM, RMA, Deviations, Finished Goods Audits, Warranty Claims, and Field Quality Complaints.Generate Routine Reports: Warranty Claims, Internal Process Performance (Tree Evaporator, etc.), Receiving Inspection (Supplier Product Assurance).Conduct root cause analyses and implement corrective actions regarding quality issuesWork with customers in solving quality issues, concerns or questionsInstrument & Gage Calibration, Gage R&R Analysis, SPC Analysis.Manage customer and supplier APQP and PAPP processes and documentationGenerate and submit monthly quality reportsAssure compliance with ISO standards and TS 16949 certificationsPerform other duties, as assigned by management Compensation: Salary – Up to $70K (DOE)-North of Nashville, TN- - While performing the duties of this job you may be required to intermittently sit, stand, walk, lift up to 25 pounds, lift in excess of 25 pounds with a lift assist, climb stairs, use hands to handle or feel parts/equipment, reach with hands and arms, stoop, kneel, crouch, bend at the waist, talk and hear. You may also be required to use close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and peripheral vision- This position is required to work in a manufacturing environment facility. When in the plant, the worker is frequently exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually loud. Hard hats, steel toe safety shoes, and safety glasses are required in all production areas. We screen ALL Candidates to verify the validity of each applicant with criminal background / Social Security verification. Upon submitting your resume, we will contact only those candidates that we deem qualified for our client. If we do not contact you, we do not see the fit for the position. If we are unable to reach you in a reasonable timeframe, you will be eliminated from the pool of potential candidates“*Direct applicants only.”*“We do not accept any resumes from any third party organizations or other recruiters.” ",Quality Engineer – tier- Automotive Parts Manufacturer (TN/RD#//) Job in Nashville,Full Time,"Nashville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-%E2%80%93-tier-1-Automotive-Parts-Manufacturer-TN-RD-17733-18612-18429-Job-Nashville-TN-US-165825948.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,"50,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /yearDOE",,8fe5a76c664b4df3bc127ec337120320
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:04:02:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking Quality Assurance Analyst in Boston, Massachusetts (MA).Summary:The candidate should be prepared to make an immediate impact within the QA Team and contribute to building awareness of testing value. In addition to developing test scripts, the candidate will need to interface with managers, analysts, developers and key stakeholders throughout the organization. The Quality Assurance department is responsible for ensuring the integrity of new software, as well as the integrity of enhancements to existing software.Responsibilities: Define the testing objectives, the scope of the testing effort and the testing approach Identify the key milestone dates, define the business processes and identify the systems functionality to be tested Write detailed QA Test Plans or test scripts and create data required for positive and negative testing Responsible for the testing of Functional/Business Requirements and multiple applications to ensure the full and correct linkage and integrity of data and functionality between separate components Create and maintain Bug/Issues Logs, suggest improvements and re-test fixes Perform regression testing to prevent adverse effects on existing functionality; execute testing under stress conditions, assist the Training Department and help with User Acceptance testing, if needed Post implementation, the Quality Assurance department is expected to support any project in any way needed Define the testing objectives Define the scope of the testing effort Define the testing approach Identify the key milestone dates Organize the testing effort and lead team members (when needed) Define testing roles and responsibilities within the team (when needed) Define testing documentation Define the business processes to be tested Identify the systems functionality to be testedREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree or equivalent A minimum of 5 years' experience in Software Quality Assurance Familiar with both Waterfall and Agile Methodologies Knowledge of Windows, Web based and MS Access applications Experience with Data/Messaging Exchange between systems Basic understanding of SQL and Database Management Proficient with Microsoft Office applications and working knowledge of Industry Tool Sets, such as: Defect Management Applications, Modeling and automated testing tools Knowledge of the Software Development Lifecycle with an emphasis on Software Test Procedures, Techniques and Best Practices Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with an ability to interact in a collaborative environment with all project members and stakeholders Ability to perform and achieve objectives in a fast paced environment QA Certification is a plus",Quality Assurance Analyst Job in Boston,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Boston, MA 02116",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Analyst-Job-Boston-MA-US-165774026.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),61290fb9e25d67aae799da57873fb2f1
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:04:10:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"QA Tester JobW-2 6 month CTH Modis has an exciting new job opportunity for a QA Tester.  This is a great job opportunity for someone looking to further their career with a global leader of next-generation information technology (IT) services and solutions Fortune 500 company. We are looking for an innovative and hard-working tester who can identify and implement solutions based on the client’s needs.   Requirements & Responsibilities:•Has experience with performance testing, mobile testing, and/or tandem testing.•Performs complex testing tasks to assure that developed products meet design specifications and are within total quality management limits and standards. •Tests, debugs, documents, validates and installs basic hardware and software testing tasks in accordance with industry best practices and specific internal procedures and standards. •Creates/Reviews complex test plans, test case data, procedures and testing scripts based upon functional specifications to meet business needs. •Utilizes software testing tools and assists in developing test software for use in automated test activities.•Develops project plans, maintains metrics, and interfaces with various engineering, operations groups and vendors to achieve desired improvement goals. •Documents and shares all test results.•Responds to developers' questions about the results to communicate status and ensure understanding. •Provides work training and mentoring to less experienced personnel.  •Strong analytical and problem solving skills.  •Strong communication and leadership skills. If you think the job of a QA Tester is for you then please submit your resume for the position.  Thank You! ",QA Tester Job in Portland,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Portland, ME 04101",,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Tester-Job-Portland-ME-US-165254215.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=17,,Quality Assurance/Safety,79baf4d3e294fac0699b6d75a8890a30
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:04:13:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for a Test Lead in New York, NY.Key Activities: Responsible for leading teams to deliver project(s) that span across one or more business units; manage resources, schedule, financials, and adhere to stage gate quality and SDLC control guidelines throughout the full systems development life cycle; this also includes managing issues, risks and project change requests to ensure successful and on-time project delivery Work in coordination with the Test Manager, Solution Delivery Executive (SDE), Application and Technical Architects, team leads and members and third party vendor to successfully manage and complete project deliverables; contribute to process improvement initiatives as it relates to improving project delivery Has the authority to run the testing phases of project on a day-to-day basis on within established constraints; always retain ownership from a Project Management perspective Verify that the project produces the required deliverables of quality, within the specified constraints of time and cost, and to achieve the potential benefits defined in the business case Accountable for definition, communication, and execution for unit, string, integration, user acceptance, and regression test; accountable to execute and report on the status of the progress and must demonstrate exceptional leadership capabilitiesProject Management: Accountable for delivery of the Testing phase of multiple, simultaneous projects ensuring scope, schedule, and quality objects are attained Define and communicate the Test Approach, standards, and tools for unit, process, integration, user acceptance, compare, and regression tests Determine all testing environment requirements and tools; drive test approach and test tool reviews with the Operations EngineersREQUIREMENTS: At least 7 years of demonstrated experience managing a portfolio of complex initiatives that spans multiple lines of business 5+ years of strong Project Delivery experience with strong knowledge in ERP Enterprise solutions (preferred), technologies and process integration 3+ years of experience in a Major Consulting firm is strongly preferred Demonstrated ability to liaise with Steering committees, VPs, Directors, project sponsors and strategic partners Proven success in an Executive leadership role, managing large projects approximately ($1-2 million), with a fortune 500 consulting company Demonstrated ability to manage all aspects of multiple related projects to ensure the overall program is aligned to and directly supports business and IT strategic objectives Demonstrated ability in leading/driving project teams; 25+ on/off shore resources Proven success in providing on site leadership for project team by building and motivating team members to meet project goals, adhering to their responsibilities and project milestones Performance Reviews and Staff Development; monitor the performance of staff Proven full Project Lifecycle ownership and solid previous experience in developing and deploying templates for medium to large size implementations to ensure predictability and consistency across the Portfolio Established practices, templates, policies, tools and partnerships to expend and mature these capabilities for the organization Excellent experience in SDLC Methodologies, Agile, Scrum, SDLC / Waterfall, especially Testing Methodology and best practices Established track record in defining success criteria, metrics, test and deployment management methodologies Possess strong leadership, diplomatic and motivational skills including the ability to lead up, across, and down multiple business and technology organizations Proven ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment demons",Test Lead Job in New York,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","New York, NY 10001",,http://jobview.monster.com/Test-Lead-Job-New-York-NY-US-165939234.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5a5d8dd665c05382362142f793caa628
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:04:31:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"NEVADA STATE CONTRACTORS BOARD IS SEEKING APPLICATIONS FOR THE FOLLOWING JOB TITLE:                Compliance Investigator – Henderson, Nevada Conducts investigations of commercial and residential projects constructed by licensed contractors in response to complaints of non-compliance with trade and/or industry standards for materials and/or workmanship. Performs related activities to facilitate resolution of matter, either informally, by contractor corrective action, or formally through Board disciplinary action. Responds to complaint inquiries, and assists complainants. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Reviews plans and specifications for building related construction involving installation, remodeling, replacement, and repair, for use in the performance of investigations. Coordinates possible resolution of complaint by conducting meetings and discussions with contending parties, addressing all alleged complaint items. Performs follow-up on complaints, closure of records, and case dispositions. Properly apply legal office terminology, forms, documents, and procedures in the course of completing work; prepare, read, and understand legal and court documents and extract relevant information. Must be able to immediately recognize possible life/safety hazards that exist in building and project sites, and notify the appropriate jurisdictional agency and contractor involved for immediate action to correct the problem. QUALIFICATIONS, EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Be at least 21 years of age, a citizen of the United States and possess a Nevada driver’s license and be insurable as a driver under a motor vehicle liability policy obtained by the Board. A valid certificate in construction skills issued by a nationally recognized organization. A high school diploma and four years of progressively responsible experience performing field investigations or a high school diploma and at least 4 years of experience in the construction industry as a contractor, journeyman, foreman or supervising employee, or the equivalent thereof as determined by the Board.  A bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university with a major in pre-engineering, construction inspection or construction technology, or a related area of study as determined by the Board, and have at least three (3) years of experience in the construction industry as a contractor, journeyman, foreman or supervising employee, or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the Board OR and sufficient combination of education and experience as determined by the Board. Demonstrate knowledge of the provisions of NRS 624 and the building codes for use in Nevada. Be of good moral character, not have been convicted of or plead nolo contender to a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude or the illegal use or possession of a dangerous weapon or drug. Pass the Construction Management Examination not later than 1 year after beginning employment by the Board Complete annually at least 16 hours of training related to construction.  Comply with the Code of Ethical Standards as prescribed in NRS 281A.400 and submit to the Board a completed set of fingerprints and written permission authorizing the Board to submit those fingerprints to the Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.  PHYSICAL DEMANDS The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Must be able to move safely about construction work sites. Mobility to work in a typical office setting, use standard office equipment, operate a motor vehicle to attend meetings and inspect properties; strength and stamina to inspect various residential, commercial, and industrial properties or other facilities; vision to read printed materials and computer screen; and hearing and speech to communicate in person or over the telephone. Frequently required to talk or hear; stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle or feel; reach with hands and arms; regularly lift and/or carry up to 10 pounds; frequently life and/or move up to 25  pounds, and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job included close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus. SALARY AND BENEFITS Starting Salary to be determined based on experience.  Benefit package includes Medical, Dental, Vision, Long Term Disability, 401 and 457 pension plans. The Board is a quasi State agency and employees are not participants in the P.E.R.S. retirement program.  HOW TO APPLY To apply, send a resume to recruit2@nscb.state.nv.us .  Resumes must be received no later than April 15, 2016.  ",Compliance Investigator Job in Henderson,Full Time,"Henderson, NV 89074",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/Compliance-Investigator-Job-Henderson-NV-US-165188470.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=6,Salary based on experience of applicant,Entry Level,12706e8fd61bd73e70f26da3ddcaa56a
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:04:40:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview PRINCIPAL STATISTICIAN The Principal Statistician position is for a skilled scientist with training and significant experience in statistics, drug development, and clinical research. This position will provide leadership opportunities for clinical trials and drug development programs. The Principal Statistician needs to be knowledgeable about statistical principles and appropriate software and tools to perform his or her tasks. He or she is expected to work collegially and closely with clinical research staff to determine appropriate study designs, sample size estimates, and write appropriate sections of study protocols. The position is also responsible for writing statistical analysis plans, analyzing data, writing manuscripts, and writing sections of clinical study reports and registration documents. The Senior/Principal Statistician is expected to attend regulatory and project meetings as appropriate to support respiratory activities. He or she must have excellent written and oral communication skills. Responsibilities Responsibilities Responsible for statistical aspects of the design, implementation, and analysis of clinical studies to support global regulatory submissions. Works with multi-functional areas of organization to determine necessity and type of research required. Works with statistical programmers, clinical research, and other statisticians to plan, analyze, and report clinical study data. Communicates results to relevant audiences. Provides study design input and consultation for clinical research protocols and drug development plans Provides consultation on clinical endpoint assessments and sample size planning for clinical studies. Prepares statistical sections of clinical protocols in collaboration with clinical research. Works with Data Management and Clinical Research personnel to provide statistical input for CRF design. Ensures that data sets and their associated define files are prepared correctly and on time to support FDA submissions. Qualifications Requirements Ph.D. in Statistics/Biostatistics (or related field) with a minimum of 4 years of related experience or MA with 7 years of experience is required (Principal Statistician). Good presentation and written communications skills. Ability to communicate with non-statisticians to interpret statistical findings Good organizational and problem-solving skills. Ability to program using SAS Knowledge of CDISC SDTM and ADaM Knowledge of relevant FDA and CHMP guidelines Experience with regulatory submissions in the US desirable Experience with regulatory submissions outside the US desirable Knowledge and understanding of device regulatory guidelines and perspective is preferred. Knowledge of techniques for demonstrating non-inferiority and bioequivalence highly desirable Demonstrated ability to deliver quality products with efficiency as well as having relevant technical and scientific publications is preferred. #LINKEDIN",Principal Statistician Job in West Chester,Full Time,"West Chester, PA 19380",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Principal-Statistician-Job-West-Chester-PA-US-165918141.aspx?mescoid=1500152001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9d5568b5e5200ce7d74486ce0abd45df
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:04:41:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Global Labeling LeadEmployment Type: Contract or Full timeReporting to: ManagerLocation: Princeton, NJ CANDIDATES CAN WORK REMOTELY IN THIS ROLE.About iMedGlobaliMEDGlobal is an innovation driven company providing platforms, services and solutions to global life sciences clients addressing their critical business and scientific needs. Our platforms, services and solutions include Pharmacovigilance, Regulatory Affairs and Clinical Research.  iMEDGlobal’s corporate office is based out of Princeton, NJ and has offices in Philippines & India. Led by a strong management team, with decades of experience and thought leadership with leading pharmaceutical, biotech, medical devices, consumer healthcare and technology enterprises, iMEDGlobal is designed to deliver high quality and cost effective solutions and services for our clients in the Americas, Europe, Asia and Australia.  Job Description ·         Accountability for the initial creation and relevant updates to labeling documents for their assigned products.   ·         This includes guiding the Labeling Team to develop and maintain Core Data Sheets (CDS), United States Package Inserts (USPI), Summary of Product Characteristics (SPC) for products registered in the EU via the Centralized, Mutual Recognition or Decentralized Procedures, and their associated Patient Labeling Documents. ·         This may also include Regulatory Authority driven documents such as the Core Safety Profile.  ·         Guide and advise the labeling team on important factors during labeling revision. ·         Knowledge about labelling guidelines·         Impact assessment on labels·         Labeling project management, ADR frequency assessment, Clinical overview creation,  review and approval·         Primary point of contact for Labeling Teams ·         Interaction with Hub Labeling Managers and affiliates colleagues to support timely and quality submissions globally.·         Knowledge on tools, technologies and processes to support efficient global label development and worldwide submissions and approvals. Required skills/background ·         Significant ‘hands on’ registration experience associated with development, maintenance and commercialization activities within Regulatory Affairs (Human Medicinal Products);  ·         Perspective from HQ,  Country office and/or Regional Regulatory Strategy (at a global/multi-national pharmaceutical environment) necessary. ·         Proven understanding of the dynamics and purpose of company Core Data Sheets (CDS); experiences of review and implications of the CDS an advantage.  ·         Proven ability to successfully understand regulatory implications of product strategy with regards to the product label, assessment and practical management of associated impacts.   ·         Demonstrated ability to interpret and apply global and local regulatory guidance around labeling and associated supportive documentation, both in the pre-approval and post approval (maintenance) stages.  Demonstrated ability to develop strong and positive working relationships across multiple cultures and locations.  ·         Understanding of regulatory authority philosophy and expectations.  Knowledge of global/regional regulatory guidelines and requirements important.  ·         Excellent written and verbal communication skills essential.  Complete Fluency in English Language.  ·         Proven strength in logical, analytical and writing ability essential.  Demonstrated project management skills and attention to detail required.  ·         Proven ability to negotiate, influence and problem solve. Educational skills: Life sciences, pharmacy graduate or equivalent.Advanced academic qualifications/degree such as PhD an advantage but not essential.2 to 5 years of relevant experience. iMEDGlobal is an Equal Opportunity Employer / Committed to Diversity",Global Labeling Lead - Remote Job in Princeton Township,Full Time,"Princeton Township, NJ 08540",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Global-Labeling-Lead-Remote-Job-Princeton-Township-NJ-US-165167354.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),561f011a09f272ca536a8400bd9b9eb6
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:05:22:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing plant is in need of QC Lead Technicians for the upcoming season! Great opportunity for QC Technicians who have supervised a team previously, full time hours with OT. $15/hr to start and Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus.Job Requirements and Duties:The QC Technician will carry out with limited supervision, quality analysis and control for production of product. The Quality Control Technician will work within the laboratory and the processing facility to perform analytical analysis, food safety/quality audits and micro audits/sampling. Daily audits of production procedures including verification of code dates, scales, water levels, plant GMP?s, and documentation ? Line audits against established guidelines and frequency ? Conduct daily audits and work with QC Supervisor and production personnel in addressing items that are out of compliance ? Sample collection, operation of lab equipment, data analysis and entry, shipment of sample ? Obtain and examine product retain shelf life samples ? Calibrates and maintain laboratory equipment ? Performs analytical analysis of all in-process and finished goods produced within the APEX facility ? Performs pre-operational, in-process and post operation food safety and plant sanitation audits ? Performs microbiological/ATP swabbing of plant equipment and facilities ? Places product on hold if deviations from standards occur ? Completes corrective actions for deviations from standards ? Enforces plant QA, hygiene and GMP policies ? Obtains product retain samples for further evaluation ? Completes all quality paperwork in both hard copy and electronic format REQUIRED SKILLS AND ABILITIES:? Must be self-motivated and has the ability to perform multiple tasks ? Ability to communicate in English including writing, speaking and reading, reasonable Spanish desired but not mandatory MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: ? High School Diploma or equivalent; or three to six months of related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience ? Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite: Microsoft Excel, Word and Access ? Valid California Drive License ? Must be able to work with minimal supervision PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS: ? 1-2 years? experience in food manufacturing or food production preferred ? Bachelor?s degree in Food Science or related experience and or/training; or equivalent combination of education and experience PHYSICAL DEMANDS: ? The work environment for this position will be typical of the manufacturing facility. There are portions of the job that will require working in cold environments and in warm environments, loud environments, in proximity of chemicals as well as the laboratory environment. For short periods of time there is work in a frozen environment. ? Must be able to work in a wet, cold or hot environment ***Please apply with resume and cover letter*** We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Quality Control Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939200.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=11,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),5918f03220438763cae454ce6ccb54ee
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:05:44:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Preferred Meals is currently looking for an experienced QA manager to oversee all aspects of quality assurance, food safety, and regulatory compliance, including the management of Quality Assurance staff in our production facility in near Scranton, PA. Relocation Assistance ProvidedEssential Duties and Responsibilities:Ensure that the facility is in full compliance with all relevant USDA, FDA, and regulatory guidelines established for food manufacturing.Enforce current good manufacturing practices (GMP’s) and all relevant company policies and food safety regulations.Maintain and develop Quality Assurance and Quality Control programs for the facility.Revise employee sanitation guidelines and training programs (food hygiene) as necessary.Maintain the facility’s HACCP plans and all associated documentation.Develop preventative QA programs to catch problems before they develop.Train all employees on all procedures and guidelines. Implement follow-up training on basic food handling procedures for existing and new employees.Instill a quality approach in all new employees.Hire, train mentor and develop QC technicians, leads and supervisors. Competencies:Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing, collect and present data effectively, write regulatory compliance programs, and conduct training programs.Skill in communications (both written and verbal) in order to document findings, write reports, summaries, Standard Operating Procedures (SOP’s), protocols, etc.Ability to analyze problems, develop alternatives, and effectively present recommendations, both orally and in writing.Education AND Experience Requirements :Bachelor’s degree in related field; and Three (3) to Five (5) years related experience and/or training.MUST HAVE FOOD EXPERIENCE - USDA/SQF EXPERIENCEBe a Part of Something Meaningful. Is there anything more rewarding than contributing to the health and well-being of others? At Preferred Meals, we are making a daily impact in the lives of students, seniors, and travelers through highly nutritious meals that meet and exceed USDA guidelines.  We reward our team members for their valuable contributions through competitive salaries and comprehensive benefits that include medical/dental/vision/life insurance, 401(k), flex spending accounts, and an Employee Assistance Program—all in an environment that encourages personal and professional growth and rewards innovative thought. To be a part of something meaningful at Preferred, submit your resume. Preferred Meals is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.",Quality Assurance Manager-Food Job in Moosic,Full Time,"Moosic, PA 18507",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Manager-Food-Job-Moosic-PA-US-165413771.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=14,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),be783a8e0eacd2164c3799967c042b63
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:05:44:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing facility in Oxnard is seeking Production Leads for the upcoming season. We are coming into our busy season for processing and need qualified Leads to assist in overseeing production. Full time hours with OT hours, $15/hr. Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus. Job Requirements and Duties:?Efficiently utilize the employees for the production room and rotate personnel to proper positions throughout the shift.?Responsible to room set up at the start of shift rinsing the room before production starts and cleaning at the end of production according to SOP.?Monitor production to ensure all assigned procedures for quality, Safety and regulatory requirements are understood and being followed.?Set up date coders with correct date for boxes, correct date and Country of Origin on bags, as shown on scheduled production paperwork.?Inspect equipment in room daily to ensure it is in working order and functioning properly.?Monitor quality of raw materials and packaging materials to ensure packed product meets standards.?Complete daily paperwork required for each item packed ensuring number of finished goods and raw materials match warehouse numbers.?Release finished goods for distribution.?Communicate with Production Supervisor and Quality as needed.?Able to run all 3 rooms to provide backup as needed.?Reports all injuries immediately to production supervisor.?Follows all company safety policies and procedures and Good Manufacturing Procedure. Education and/or ExperienceHigh school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education.Language SkillsMust be able to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. Must be able to write simple correspondence. Must be able to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. Bilingual English/Spanish helpful.Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms. Working surfaces may be uneven and often wet.The employee must regularly lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.Work EnvironmentThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job the employee is regularly exposed to wet and/or humid conditions and moving mechanical parts. The employee is occasionally exposed to vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Gloves, hearing protection, beardnets, hairnets and eye protection***Please apply with resume and cover letter today* We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Production Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939205.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),991ce5538c2ca4fb681b9eb5e79d70f6
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:05:55:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director, Quality General SummaryThis position is responsible for leading and managing the Quality function for Southern Research at all locations.  The incumbent will develop, maintain and ensure that the performance and quality of services conform to established standards, specifications and external regulatory guidelines. The incumbent is responsible for planning and coordinating the activities necessary to provide management with confidence that the organization’s products, services and locations satisfy relevant quality and regulatory requirements and for reporting the status of such compliance to management on a periodic basis. Key ResponsibilitiesEstablishes the functional Quality strategy for the organization.Develops Quality operating policies and procedures that affect subordinate organizational units.Reviews Quality methods on a periodic basis to ensure compliance with applicable regulations and standards.Serves as a key contact for regulatory and standards inspections; provides input for responses to those inspections.Establish metrics for Quality; measures, monitors and reportsReviews and disseminates Quality regulatory reference information that may affect the operation of the Institute. Position SpecificDirects the Institute ISO Quality program and its personnel, including the establishment of goals, schedules, priorities, staffing, training, and budgets.Manages the Quality Assurance program for life sciences function and ensures that a highly efficient team of Quality Auditors is in place to support the Maryland and Birmingham studies.Ensures that all validation, quality assurance and document control systems are in place to facilitate Institute Good Laboratory Practices (GLP) compliance.Serves as an internal consultant for system validation projectsPerforms audits of subcontractors who provide support for regulated workPromotes a culture of QualitySupports the proposal process by ensuring project costing estimate input is provided in a timely manner.Effectively communicates with Institute personnel, clients, subcontractors, regulatory inspectors, and third party organizations.Hires, reviews, motivates, and disciplines, as appropriate the staff under the direction of this position.Ensures that budgets are realistically established and attained for functional areas. Requirements/Minimum QualificationsBachelor’s degree or higher in a relevant discipline15 years’ experience with regulations and/or standardsStrong background/experience implementing GLP regulationsDemonstrated knowledge of ISO Quality systemsProven ability to develop training and quality programsAbility to lead, motivate and discipline staffAbility to successfully implement business processesAbility to observe appropriate safety and study requirements.Must be able to receive all necessary vaccines to enter the BSL-3 and must not be a ""restricted person"" under the requirements necessary for Possession, Use and Transfer of Select Agents and Toxins.Must be able to pass the medical surveillance physical and obtain select agent clearance through CDC and the FBI. Preferred QualificationsCertification through SQA GLP Program or ASQ Certification ProgramCertification as an ISO Auditor",Director,Full Time,"Birmingham, AL",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-Quality-Job-Birmingham-AL-US-165468897.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=1,,,febb73d33cb8cddf370d61ff3a6bbef2
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:05:57:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Clinical Studies SpecialistOur client is a global leader in Research and Development and a world-renowned manufacturer of Pharmaceuticals. We have been retained to identify top tier candidates to fill an urgent Clinical Studies Specialist position.RequirementsBachelor's degree in Science related fieldIndustry experience within any of the clinical study phasesFamiliarity with ICH guidelinesAt least 1 year of experienceResponsibilitiesConducting phase I-IV studies adhering to Federal Regulations and ICH GuidelinesWork directly with the clinical team in managing data queries, drug inventory, and clinical documentationAssist the CRAs with investigator meetingsGREAT opportunity for career advancement, growth, stability and the chance to work with a global organization with HUGE market share. Please forward a current professional resume for immediate consideration.",Clinical Studies Specialist Job in Chicago,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Chicago, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Studies-Specialist-Job-Chicago-IL-US-165895121.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=12,,,3acbbf09d6f0af272cfd614de870be7b
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:06:44:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Leader in staffing and workforce solutions for the modern day business, the Surge Staffing is a professional staffing and solutions firm specializing in temporary staffing, permanent placement and workforce management. We are currently seeking a Quality Engineer to work in Alabama location. Responsibilities for Quality Engineer: Maintains continuous communication to discuss quality issues, concerns, and problems.Establishes professional relationships with appropriate personnel, as well as within the organization.Assists and coordinates employee trainingMay assist and represent the company during related audits.Prepares all necessary reportsArranges to have appropriate quality records prepared and maintained.Assists with the process to approve sample submissions of new products and engineering changes such as Production Parts Approval Process(PPAP) and Advanced Product Quality Planning(APQP)Prepares for and represents the company during all related audits.Meets with quality representatives and company personnel to discuss and resolve quality problems as required.Interacts directly with production supervisors in the event of defective product and improvement objectives in the manufacturing process (Root Cause Analysis).Establishes effective lines of communication and feedback with Production Supervisors, Quality Personnel and other to ensure prompt attention and resolution of conditions that adversely affect quality or throughput.Responsible for the participation as required by the Advanced Product Quality Planning, and Control Plan, multi-disciplinary activities and reporting of, in the customer prescribed format.Maintains adherence to company policies, safety standards and good housekeeping practices. Requirements: B.S. Degree in EngineeringPrefer formal education in the following courses:  Statistical Analysis, Precision Measurement and Process Capability Studies.Must have strong knowledge & experience with PPAP & 8D.Minimum of 3 years of on the job experience as a Quality EngineerBackground in Automotive Industry with a history of meeting with the customer and negotiating correction of issues and agreements.Posses and demonstrate knowledge and in depth understanding of quality assurance practices.High energy level, comfortable performing multifaceted projects in conjunction with normal activities.Satisfactory communication skills, written and verbal.Results- and profit oriented with the ability to balance other business considerations.If interested please apply. *Come work for a company that has the motto “I love what I do” and see what makes us one of the fastest growing staffing agencies in more than 15 states.    ",Quality Engineer Job in Albertville,Full Time,"Albertville, AL",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Albertville-AL-US-165302827.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d9c13876ef369c0f752e4fddcc7f4212
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:06:44:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mastech is a growing company dedicated to innovation and teamwork. We are currently seeking a Test Engineer for our client in the Information Technology domain. We value our professionals, providing comprehensive benefits, exciting challenges, and the opportunity for growth. This is a Fulltime - Salaried position and the client is looking for someone to start immediately.Duration: Permanent Location: Orlando, FLCompensation: $75,000.00/SalariedRole: Test EngineerRole Description: The Test Engineer would need to have at least 5 years of experience. This requires Active Security Clearance.Part of a team testing new software baselines, as well as supporting installation of software and hardware (integration) to maintain Logistics and Fleet Management information as part of a Fixed Wing Platform?s Logistics Information System. Essential Job Functions: - Supports the design and creation of software test cases, scenarios, and procedures that incorporate the use of a variety of software applications and tools. - Performs unit testing, configuration item and system level tests, and support verification/validation testing as required. - Develops test plans and test reports for all levels of testing performed. - Works closely with the customer, development staff and systems engineers to thoroughly understand the system requirements and software implementation. Required Skills: - Conduct testing utilizing MS Windows 7/Server 2012 based systems with an Oracle backend database. The tools used to develop test procedures will be MS Excel, SQL Developer (for troubleshooting DB issues), MS Hypervisor/VMWare (for virtual machine access), JIRA (for defect tracking), Crucible (for peer reviews), and Confluence (for process how-to?s). Required Education/Experience: - Bachelor?s degree in a technical discipline such as electrical engineering, computer science, information technology, systems or software engineering from an accredited college or university. May substitute relevant military or work experience in lieu of degree. - Minimum of five (5) years of experience in a Systems Engineering and/or Test Engineer position testing new software baselines, as well as supporting installation of software and hardware at remote sites. Other Requirements: - Ability to obtain a Secret to Top Secret security clearance.Education: Bachelor?s degree Experience: Minimum 5+ yearsRelocation: No, this position will not cover relocation expensesTravel: NoLocal Preferred: YesRecruiter Name: Tom McCannEOE",Test Engineer Job in Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL 32817",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Test-Engineer-Job-Orlando-FL-US-165474956.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2ea28678a98eedd605b7ff447a448406
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:07:44:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Special Testing Laboratories, Inc. is an independent full service testing and inspection, quality assurance organization with a solid reputation for reliability, integrity, and excellence in our field.  Our highly respected and dedicated team has been delivering quality projects, safely and on time since 1992. With our experience, our depth of talented people, and substantial resources focused in the Northeast, we have the capabilities to rival larger companies, but the commitment and knowledge of a local contractor in the states where we perform.STL is currently looking for a Certified Welding Inspector (CWI) to provide scheduled Steel Inspection services on various construction job sites.  As an inspector, you will work closely with project superintendents to inspect the different phases of steel construction and to identify any discrepancies as necessary.  This will include (but is not limited to) assessment and inspection of both field and shop welding, metal decking, bolting, shear studs, ultrasonic, and column plumb.  You will also be required to provide daily inspection reports and work closely with office staff on scheduling and reporting.Job Requirements:-Minimum education of a high-school diploma, college a plus-Experience in the industry required-AWS-CWI Certification-OSHA Certification a plus-Good written and oral communication skills-Ability to work well with staff and clients in a professional manner-Ability to handle multiple tasks-A valid driver's license and have daily access to a reliable vehicle-Candidate must reside in the Connecticut/New York (Westchester, NYC) areaImmediate Availability",Steel Inspector Job in Bethel,Full Time,"Bethel, CT 06801",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Steel-Inspector-Job-Bethel-CT-US-162914804.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=17,Competitive Salary and Benefits,,4e6c238dd520cd3e2d3101645d04a01e
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:07:45:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors. With pro-forma 2014 annualized scope revenues of £5.5 billion and over 40,000 people in more than 55 countries, the company operates across the whole of the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and close to 5,300 employees worldwide. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/commercial, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We offer competitive salaries along with a complete benefits package including: medical, vision, & dental coverage, 401K Matching, Educational Reimbursement, and a variety of Training and Development Programs to help you develop the skills you need to succeed in your chosen career path. Additional information can be obtained from our website at www.amecfw.com.  Overview / Responsibilities Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure is seeking a Mid-Level Human Health Risk Assessor to execute and/or direct human health risk assessment projects and provide senior technical leadership for human health risk assessment projects and proposals.                         Key Responsibilities:·         Support the preparation of human health risk assessment reports under various regulatory programs (Massachusetts Contingency Plan, CERCLA, RCRA, and other state/provincial regulatory programs) as directed by the Senior Risk Assessor·         Interact with Amec Foster Wheeler's project managers and external clients to understand and develop details of risk assessment objectives, detailed scope, and budgets·         Identify, on a project-specific basis, the project team (data manager, entry-level and junior risk assessment staff, GIS professional, senior technical reviewer) needed to complete the assignment; Direct and coordinate activities of the project team to complete the required technical scope and to meet the identified schedule and budget; Interact with senior technical reviewer to complete risk assessment reports·         Serve as support author of risk assessment reports and in some cases will serve as primary author·         Contribute to preparation of proposals to win new work for large comprehensive projects that include a risk assessment component; Evaluate options and make recommendations to support risk-based closure strategies·         Manage smaller projects with limited oversight from senior and principal scientist·         Mentor and direct junior staff assisting on project execution·         Maintain up-to-date technical expertise in risk assessment and follow regulatory developments·         Assist client account managers in maintaining positive client relationship, continued sales and growth·         Interact with regulatory agencies as required          Skills / Qualifications Required·         Degree in Toxicology, Biology, Public Health or related scientific discipline·         Eight to ten years of consulting risk assessment experience with at least three years’ experience directing risk assessment projects and serving as the primary author of risk assessment reports  ·         Excellent knowledge of the principles and standards of scientific study, field investigation and sampling, experimentation, research, and documentation·         Excellent understanding of and experience applying human health risk assessment principles and procedures as well as MCP and CERCLA risk assessment guidance and policy·         Computer literate (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access)·         Strong technical writing skills and experience·         Ability to communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing·         Ability to work effectively with team members as well as independently·         Ability and experience in developing compliance strategies and site closure strategies based on detailed understanding of regulations, policies and guidancePreferred ·         Human Health Risk Assessment experience with some minor experience in Ecological Risk Assessment preferred·         Master’s Degree is preferred academic training·         Strong background providing environmental consulting services to clients in the industrial/commercial, transportation, energy and government sectors If you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Mid-Level Human Health Risk Assessor Job in Chelmsford,Full Time,"Chelmsford, MA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Mid-Level-Human-Health-Risk-Assessor-Job-Chelmsford-MA-US-165714105.aspx?mescoid=1300104001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),25288cb25f0014dc804bd48c50c4c0e4
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:07:50:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"At STERIS, WE HELP OUR CUSTOMERS CREATE A HEALTHIER AND SAFER WORLD by providing innovative healthcare and  life science product and service solutions around the globe. Our mission is a strong statement of who we are and what we do –  Join STERIS in its vision to see the world free from Infection and Contamination as a QS/RC Technician I Summary Assists Quality System/Regulatory Compliance (QS/RC) and Analyst(s) to ensure external and internal Customer requirements are met according to documented and communicated policies and procedures. Essential Job Functions 1. Based on established procedures, is responsible for the review and approval of processing files prior to product processing. The review ensures accurate product codes for numbers, case count, and cycle specifications. 2. Based on established procedures, is responsible for the review of processing files after product processing, and prior to product release, in order to ensure processing parameters have been met. 3. Assists with the review of operating logs (spectrophotometer, gamma dose computational software log, pre-conditioning, aeration and maintenance) to ensure timely and accurate record keeping processes. 4. Based on established procedures, assists with the review and maintenance of calibration records to ensure calibration is performed properly and in a timely manner. 5. Assists in the establishment of appropriate policies and procedures, as well as revision and maintenance of the My Isomedix System. 6. Assists with writing deviations and documenting Customer concerns based on established Customer specifications and  QS/RC policies and procedures. 7. With direction from the QS/RC Manager or Analyst, assists with corrective actions as required by process deviations, procedure deviations, complaints, regulatory audits, Customer audits, and internal audits. 8. With direction from the QS/RC Manager, prepares the monthly internal assessment report. 9. Contributes in a team effort by performing according to the guidelines outlined in the STERIS Code of Business Conduct, the GMP and other directives; supporting the directives and decisions of higher level management; accomplishing other duties as assigned. 10. Contributes to maintaining a safe and clean working environment by performing routine area housekeeping and reporting any unsafe conditions to facility management. 11. Supports the STERIS AST business imperatives of Business Growth, Operational Excellence, Leadership Excellence and Customer Focus, by acting with integrity, treating everyone with mutual respect, exhibiting a genuine commitment to the success of all employees, and delivering satisfaction to our Customers through teamwork, innovation and continuous improvement; this will be accomplished while acting safely and is defined as ""The STERIS Way."" 12. Exhibits a commitment to the STERIS AST shared values of Customer Satisfaction and Continuous Improvement through ensuring defect-free workmanship, assisting others to meet the customer’s needs, searching for efficient and effective ways to reduce waste, being active and accountable for customer satisfaction, and satisfying the customer’s needs with a sense of urgency. Education/License Requirements Associate’s Degree or equivalent training and experience. Experience Requirements (Skills, Knowledge and Abilities) Requires: 1. One or two (1-2) years performing Quality Technician level responsibilities and/or one to two (1-2) years of sterilization experience. 2. Ability to effectively read, write and verbally communicate in English. 3. Ability to work independently under general guidelines and supervision. 4. Computer skills and work processing, spreadsheet and software capabilities. 5. Above average organizing, analyzing and a minimum of Level 3 math skills (ratios, proportions basic algebra) to determine organizational Customer and regulatory problems to formulate corrective action plans. 6. Ability to adapt to changing duties and responsibilities. 7. Requires effective interpersonal skills as demonstrated through prior experience. 8. Normal hearing range sufficient to hear alarms, bells, horns, etc. Working Conditions Position requires sitting, walking, bending, stooping, climbing, grasping, and talking in a processing and office environment. Nature of work requires depth perception, close and far vision, normal color distinction, potential for eyestrain and normal finger dexterity. The work environment includes working in proximity to contained controlled ionizing radiation and/or controlled and contained toxic flammable gas (ethylene oxide) and other treatment/process chemicals of which further information is available through the facility’s Hazardous Communication Standard (Right to Know). There is potential for exposure to sub-protection levels of noise, heat and humidity. Hours of work exceed normal business hours. Will require use of personal protection items as needed. May require occasional day and overnight trips. STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.  STERIS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department by phone at 440-392-7047 or 800-548-4873, extension 27047 for assistance.   STERIS Corporation is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants.  Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.",QS & RC Technician I Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Employee,"Minneapolis, MN 55433",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/QS-amp-RC-Technician-I-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-165811520.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=6,,Quality Assurance/Safety,0cdf920c3e87f88a0edc2236b7bd3fdc
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:08:13:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Gorilla Safety is a technology business delivering cutting edge technology to the trucking business.  Our suite of solutions is the first of it’s kind to bring all of the management and loss prevention tools a fleet needs to the palm of your hand.  Our company is fast growing, exciting and high intensity!  We are disrupting the marketplace and need more people to help make the transportation world a safer place to operate. The right person for this position is:- Very driven- Able to communicate well with clients- Self-motivated- Unafraid to follow up with potential Leads The Duties of this role are: 1.     Support the sales process with on-boarding and assuring the clients are using the systems2.     Follow up on referrals and appointments set by CFC3.     Conduct over-the-phone pre-sales calls to ensure the client fully understands the process4.     Social Media postings5.     Trade Association participation If you think you are the right candidate, please forward your resume and a cover letter over right away. ",Account Executive Job in Spring,Full Time,"Spring, TX 77389",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Account-Executive-Job-Spring-TX-US-163534490.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,,1aa042cb8cffafe265115ab1b5835c5c
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:08:17:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Quality Assurance Tester in Columbus, Ohio (OH).This position will function as a highly skilled Quality Assurance Specialist with specific responsibilities that include: Proactively engage in the end-to-end software testing cycle as it pertains to the project Work closely with and follow direction from QA Manager Contribute to the establishment of and meet quality goals and objectives for the project Contribute to all aspects of quality assurance for the project including establishing relevant metrics, applying industry best practices, and developing new tools and processes to ensure quality goals are met With input from QA Manager and team, develop and execute test cases, scripts, plans and procedures (manual and automated) Work with the project team to test updates, patches, and repairs to the application software components in the development, test, and QA environments; develop software changes for promotion to production following best practice and standards as defined by the ITO Take corrective action, subject to the Management approval, to resolve all issues and problems encountered with testing to ensure the applications perform as required Design, execute and maintain automated test scriptsREQUIREMENTS: 7 years in testing IT products and applications 5 years' automation experience using MS Visual Studio Coded UI, Team Foundation Server and Microsoft Test Manager 5 years Development/scripting skills in C# 5 years in End to End Test Automation experience 5 years demonstrated experience in converting existing manual test cases to automation scripts 5 years conducting test case reviews to ensure scenarios accurately capture business functionality At least 1 year of Quality Assurance experience in a technical capacity with a large organization; experience must encompass the writing of test strategies, test scenarios, test plans and test scripts Must have at least 1 year of experience working on Agile/Scrum IT projects Must have experience working with Microsoft Test Manager on at least one project Able to contribute to continuous process improvements to increase the efficiency of QA and development Excellent communication skills both written and oral",Quality Assurance Tester Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Columbus, OH 43215",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Tester-Job-Columbus-OH-US-165713880.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b0b3760b0f2f3ad4cd88d00e66356031
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:08:24:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Arbor Research Collaborative for Health seeks experienced Research Analysts interested in building upon their analytic skills, while developing project leadership, planning, and oversight skills, to join the analytic team as part of the Manager Development Program (MDP). This program providesparticipants within the analytic area the opportunity to develop and demonstrate the proficiencies required by the managing analyst position. The managing analyst is responsible for managing the project level analytic activities as well as the analytic team members working on the project(s), all while contributing to the scientific and technical direction of the project work in an analytic capacity. Specifically, this position is responsible for managing and coordinating the prioritization and execution of analysis and statistical methods to address questions posed by study investigators, funders, and stakeholders; and for working with investigators and project managers to identify analytic goals and strategies to accomplish project deliverables. The current opportunity is within the Scientific and Data Coordinating Centers (SDCC) program area. Arbor Research Collaborative for Health, a not-for-profit organization located in Ann Arbor, MI, strives to improve clinical practices, patient outcomes, and health-related public policy through research projects in the United States and internationally. Our multidisciplinary teams of clinicians, biostatisticians, policy analysts, data and project managers, programmers, and other professionals share a passion for high-quality, evidence-based research and take pride in collective achievement. We seek to grow our diverse and dynamic staff to help us address the pressing health-care challenges of today and tomorrow. More information about this opportunity and the benefit program at Arbor Research is available on the careers page at www.ArborResearch.org. PROGRAM FRAMEWORKOnce accepted, program participants will be placed in a research analyst position, commensurate with the participant’s demonstrated analytic competency. In addition to the duties and responsibilities outlined in the research analyst job description, the participant will serve as ananalytic lead on an assigned project. The participant will work closely with the Managing Senior Analyst, receiving regular direction and guidance to foster the development of the participant. Additional development activities, such as training courses facilitated by Human Resources, may also be utilized. Proficiency DevelopmentParticipants must successfully develop and demonstrate proficiency in threecompetency areas: analytic competency, project leadership, and project planning and oversight. Participantproficiency will be assessed at day ninety (90), six (6) months, and one (1) year, according to the program schedule.  After successful demonstration of proficiency in the three competency areas, participants will be promoted to the managing analyst position. Trainees may not be promoted prior to the 90 day assessment. RESEARCH ANALYST CORE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESWork with the Managing Analyst and Lead Investigators as needed, to coordinate research development and to ensure completion of assignments in a timely mannerConsistently adhere to strategies and utilize tools in place to ensure accuracy, programming, and documentation standards (e.g., analytical checklist, code reviews, etc.), while displaying a professional and exemplary work and research ethic in both attitude and accomplishmentSuccessfully and independently accomplish a wide variety of analytical requests, including writing papers for journals, performing simple quick-turnaround data requests for funding sources and the general public, and perform analyses for investigators or committeesDevelop and demonstrate mentorship abilitiesCollaborate with Principal Investigators to lead analytic approachesDevelop SAS code for completing analyses and verify accuracy of coding  REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS Master’s degree in quantitative field (Statistics, Biostatistics, Epidemiology, Economics, Public Health, Public Policy, etc.) or equivalent combination of education and experienceAt least 3 years professional statistical programming experience and/or courseworkAt least 2 years professional experience with statistical software, SAS preferred (i.e., conducting survival analysis)Excellent understanding of statistical concepts and fluency in analytical approaches for health careStrong oral/written communication skills with a wide variety of audiencesProficiency in Microsoft Office applications Visit http://www.arborresearch.org/Careers.aspx to apply.  Job Applicants must submit a personalized cover letter, resume, and salary requirements. No Recruiters or Staffing Firms please EEO/AA EMPLOYER/VET/DISABLED  Arbor Research Collaborative for Health is an equal opportunity employer.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. Arbor Research Collaborative for Health provides reasonable accommodation upon request, in accordance with State and Federal laws. E-VERIFY  E-Verify is an Internet based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) in partnership with the Social Security Administration (SSA) that allows participating employers to electronically verify the employment eligibility of their newly hired employees in the United States.Page 1",Manager Development Program,Full Time,"Ann Arbor, MI 48104",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-Development-Program-Managing-Analyst-Job-Ann-Arbor-MI-US-165017435.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c82baecb755cb4f3cf9a0313e038be1c
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:08:46:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Validation Engineer will support Manufacturing (MFG) process, system, and equipment qualification activities.  Responsibilities include: Author, review, and approval of relevant technical documentation, protocols, and reports. This includes but is not limited to Process Risk Assessment, Process Validation protocol, Validation Master Plan, Change Controls, IOP/Q protocols, etc.Support process validation and post approval change process modifications.Lead and/or participate in the design and installation of new, or modifications to existing, process or utility systems.Participate in equipment / system User Requirement Specifications (URS) and factory Acceptance Test (FAT) activitiesIn cooperation with the Validation group, develop validation documentation including test protocols, and implement validation plans on new process and utility systems and changes to existing systems in order to maintain the validated status of existing systems.Actively participate in the value stream team environment to ensure appropriate engineering input and integration of local and corporate engineering specifications.Complies with all aspects of CGMPs, including following SOPs, initiating new SOPs.Review engineering drawings and capital installation from process prospective.Support commissioning / validation & start up of new processes / systems / equipment.Manage changes having GXP impact including process, equipment, and facility changes through WuXi’s Change Control process.Interacts with Metrology, Validation, Facilities, and Manufacturing.Review operation, safety and maintenance procedures for MFG equipment and utility systems and analyze repairs and maintenance requirements in order to proactively address system weaknesses.Desired Skills and ExperienceBachelor’s degree and 5 years of experience Minimum of 5 years technical hands on process engineering experience Written and verbal command of the English languageGood time management skillsMS Office Suite; Minitab, JMP or similar statistical software for analysis of data.Experience in establishing process flow, PFMEA, process validations, etc In-depth knowledge of Manufacturing Process and Techniques Ability to interact and work with cross-functional teams (MFG/Operations/PD/Vendors)About Us...WuXi AppTec is a leading global pharmaceutical, biopharmaceutical, and medical device outsourcing company with operations in China and the United States. Our vision is to build an open-access technology and capability platform that enables anyone and any company to discover and develop therapeutic products to benefit patients. As an innovation-driven and customer-focused company, WuXi AppTec provides a broad and integrated portfolio of services throughout the research, development, manufacturing, and regulatory process. Our services are designed to help our customers worldwide, by shortening discovery and development time and lowering the expense of R&D through cost-effective and efficient outsourcing solutions. Evolving from four founders and a single laboratory in December 2000 to over 10,000 employees and 5 million square feet of facility space across 21 campuses in the U.S. and China today, WuXi AppTec is building an alternative R&D engine to serve the worldwide life-science industry, and providing our clients with unprecedented access to global and emerging markets. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Validation Engineer Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19112",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Validation-Engineer-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165074928.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b187c3de35490cf0020edf931c4f24f5
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:08:46:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client located in Mount Prospect, IL. seeks a Temporary to Hire Quality Control Technician for their 2nd Shift for $16 p/h  A Qualified Candidate for this position would be able to do the following:Conduct regular quality line audits of in-process and finished goods against pre-defined characteristics to validate that all process and product requirements have beensatisfied.Perform Burst and Dissolution on in-process material to ensure that product meetsintended performancerequirements.Perform Lot Codevalidations.Monitor the performance of check-weighing and metal detectionequipment.Visual verification of raw material and packaging material to validate material is in spec to artwork and functionality requirements and is used for its intended purpose on the correctproduct.Execute the plant non-conforming materials procedure when out-of-specification conditionsare observed.Follow SOP’s, GMP’s, safety rules, and good housekeepingprocedures.Individual may be asked to work in Production (temporarily) during the plant’s slowtimes.Perform testing related to pH, pH Density, and ViscosityPerform Inspections when needed  A Qualified Candidate for this position would have:   Minimum of 2-5 years of relevantexperience.                   Knowledge of Good Manufacturing Practices isdesired.Basic math skills including the ability to calculatepercentages.Flexibility in work hours if overtime isneeded.Good written and verbal communicationskills.Basic knowledge of Microsoft Office, specifically in ExcelBilingual in Spanish is preferred, but not required. Ability to work 2nd Shift Monday – Thursday from 5:30 a.m.- 3:30 p.m. or in the event of overtime, 7:00 a.m.-7 p.m. Should you or anyone you know be interested in this position, please have them send their resume to brankin@labpersonnel.com",Quality Control Technician for their nd Shift Job in Mount Prospect,Full Time,"Mount Prospect, IL 60056",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Control-Technician-for-their-2nd-Shift-Job-Mount-Prospect-IL-US-165916150.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=19,16.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb48d617119f648241dec3b7ede208e8
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:09:40:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Alcoa Fastening Systems & RingsA global leader in the Aerospace Fastener industry located in Simi Valley is looking to fill a position for aQUALITY ANALYSTWill perform dimensional and visual inspection on resale product, packaging and accompanying documentation at Receiving, Inventory, and Final Inspection Stages. Identifies and reacts to quality-related problems. Support Quality Dept. functions. Makes necessary recommendations, incorporates action and/or change to assure compliance to requirements. Proficiency in computer applications required. Minimum of 3 years exp in Quality, Manufacturing or Production. Ability to use calibration equipment and to read and interpret drawings required. Ability to work holidays/weekends as needed. Competitive salary and excellent benefits. EOE.Apply online at: alcoacareers.com",QUALITY ANALYST Job in Simi Valley,Full Time,"Simi Valley, CA 93065",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/QUALITY-ANALYST-Job-Simi-Valley-CA-US-165314331.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2319e68db8297adae5c90064eb9a8f19
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:09:41:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryAs a Senior Software Test Engineer, you will enjoy working in a team environment to qualify and deploy new and exciting features for our automated continuous integration system. This web-based distributed system serves to build, test and release the MathWorks family of products. You will work closely on a cross-functional team with members from the Software Engineering, Quality Engineering, Release Engineering, Usability and Documentation. This position requires a strong quality mindset, expert debugging and technical skills, a great attitude and passion to continuously improve our tools and processes.ResponsibilitiesAs a senior individual contributor on the Quality Engineering team, this person will play an important role in testing and trouble-shooting of the continuous integration system.Specific tasks will include: Developing performance and scalability test suite Debugging and fixing system issues Define test plans Developing and executing automated and interactive tests Participating in design reviews Managing and enhancing test environment Reporting defects and verifying fixes Defining software processesMinimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 7 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree and 5 years of professional work experience, or a PhD degree) is required.Additional Qualifications Professional working experience with Software Engineering, Software Quality Engineering or Software Development Solid knowledge of computer architecture, UNIX and Windows operating systems Strong debugging and trouble shooting skills Experience with Perl, Python or other scripting languages Experience with Java programing, JUnit and Java EE technologies (JMS, EJB, JPA, Servlet, etc.) Good knowledge with SQL and database testing In-depth technical knowledge of Software Configuration Management tools (CVS, Perforce, GIT, Subversion, etc.) Experience with build scripts (such as ANT, make, Maven) Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Senior Software Test Engineer -Continuous Integration System Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Software-Test-Engineer-Continuous-Integration-System-Job-Natick-MA-US-165370660.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e2d018a38beab09b8b67ef6b3932e95f
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:09:41:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryCome join our energetic and quality-focused team responsible for testing the MATLAB Coder product. MATLAB Coder generates standalone C and C++ code from MATLAB code. For more details about the MATLAB Coder product, click here: http://www.mathworks.com/products/matlab-coder/ As a member of a growing development team, the engineer will participate in every phase of software development; from feature inception to its final release.  This includes influencing requirements specification, driving software design for testability, developing test procedures and implementing automated test suites in MATLAB and C++.Responsibilities Designing test plans and test procedures        Developing automated test infrastructure and test suites        Designing and running sweep testing using various techniques such as Feature Based Testing and Randomized Testing       Creating test tools and enhancing existing ones  Reporting bugs and qualifying bug fixes     Providing feedback to development throughout the development processMinimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 3 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree) is required. MATLABAdditional Qualifications Excellent problem-solving and good algorithm skills Knowledge of C/C++ and experience with object oriented programming Pluses: Knowledge of software quality industry standard processes and testing methodologies                   Experience with scripting languages such as Perl, Python Experience working on Linux Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",MATLAB Coder Software Engineer in Test Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/MATLAB-Coder-Software-Engineer-in-Test-Job-Natick-MA-US-165370863.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),66c7e7590da9090e4e462e17f978f620
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:23:47:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Accessibility Testing Consultant  Location: Columbus, OH/ NYC.Duration: Long Term  Job Description: In depth experience on ADA compliance for Digital assetsWCAG 2.0, VPAT, Section 508 SMEBroad-based understanding of UI technologies like .Net, Java Scripts, HTML, CSSHas run large programs for large firms on ADA legal remediationMay have worked with federal agencies/offices on accessibility  Thanks and Regards, Devesh AroraPh: 201 957 1000 Ext. 413",Accessibility Testing Consultant Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10017",,http://jobview.monster.com/Accessibility-Testing-Consultant-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165773207.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=15,,,3e8349f465ea6944fa36fb4b6bf6b5bd
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:23:46:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This individual will coordinate and assist in the formulation and introduction of new or modified products and processes FEMAs, advanced quality planning, dimensional and process control plans for production.  They will oversee internal audits to identify corrective actions as well as using statistical methods to support production and solve quality issues use problems solving-root cause analysis to improve customer satisfaction and testing through the PPAP process. Qualifications:Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering or Technical areaExperience using tools like SPC, PPAP, ROOT Cause and FEMAs Well versed in gage design, APQP, work instructions and control plans to identify statistical trends.Experience working in ISO",Supplier Quality Engineer Job in Chillicothe,Full Time Employee,"Chillicothe, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/Supplier-Quality-Engineer-Job-Chillicothe-MO-US-163988741.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=13," 64,000.00 - 78,000.00 $ /year",Quality Assurance/Safety,ad1c48c93a6395a933d6002a15a8c00d
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:22:40:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryAs a C++ Software Engineer in Test you will have an opportunity to influence the design of the MATLAB Language.In this role you will be responsible for creating automated test tools, test-suites and conducting hands-on testing for MATLAB Language features. You will participate in a project from its early design stages and play a critical role in driving it to final product release. Candidates with creative problem solving skills will thrive in this position. These features range from core foundation infrastructure to MATLAB Language’s compiler and compiler based infrastructure to language features like OOP infrastructure. You will be engaged with the following technologies, but not limited to: OOP programming Compilers Boost libraries Memory management Cross language development (e.g. C++ and JAVA)Responsibilities Roles and Responsibilities: Participating in feature definitions Writing test plans and procedures Designing and implementing the necessary infrastructure, in MATLAB and C++, to automate testing Developing automated test suites in MATLAB and C++ As an individual contributor in the Quality Engineering department, you will work closely with Development, User Experience, and Customer support teams.Minimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 3 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree) is required.Additional Qualifications Additional Qualifications: Knowledge of MATLAB is a plus. Experience in profiling and/or testing for performance is a plus. Experience in Software Development or Quality Engineering is a plus. Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",C++ Software Engineer in Test Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/C-Software-Engineer-in-Test-Job-Natick-MA-US-165370663.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8647f0297ebb07241ab11ad45fcf012a
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:22:39:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under the supervision of the Environmental Services  supervisor, Environmental Services is responsible for environmental cleaning and disinfecting. This individual performs a variety of routine cleaning functions in assigned area to maintain a sanitary, attractive and orderly condition.BENEFITSOur competitive salary and benefits package includes medical and dental insurance, 401(k), paid time off and life insurance.Required SkillsCompletion of high school education or equivalent preferred. Must be able to read, write and follow instructions.At least two to six months of experience as an Environment Attendant. Hospital experience preferred.Possess the ability to follow established cleaning methods in performing daily tasks.Possess the ability to perform routine repetitive cleaning of assigned patient rooms, offices, rest rooms and other areas.Must be able to keep all equipment in good working condition.Possess the ability to perform periodic or situational duties as assigned by immediate supervisor.Apply today!",Environmental Services Job in Dakota Dunes,Full Time,"Dakota Dunes, SD 57049",,http://jobview.monster.com/Environmental-Services-Job-Dakota-Dunes-SD-US-165774314.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),318f12941382a94a163d441dfde893d7
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:21:42:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Software Test Engineer in San Jose, California (CA).Role & Responsibilities:In this highly visible role, you will: Learn UCS technologies and automate features to drive high quality of products over multiple releases Participate in developing solid automation infrastructure in Python Participate in QA automation, and testingREQUIREMENTS: BS CS/EE degree and 7 to 10 years of strong hands-on automated testing experience in server, storage, networking areas Experience developing automation frameworks Strong background and experience in software testing methodology, test development and test execution Strong experience in Virtualization, testing different OSes (Windows, Linux, ESX), and servers Experience of working on/ testing networking and/or storage protocols Proficient programming in at least one scripting language (Python, Perl, Ruby, iTCL, TCL etc.) Python is preferred Object Oriented Programming Desired Skills: Automation of server related testing Experience in SAN technologies Good understanding of data center operations",Software Test Engineer Job in San Jose,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Jose, CA 95101",,http://jobview.monster.com/Software-Test-Engineer-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165705332.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ac333933f770f8cd13409a59dac791d9
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:21:42:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities for QA Technician:Collect, submit, and record all necessary data per customer specificationsPerform lab testing as directed by QC ManagerOperate/maintain lab equipment such as Titrators, Scales, etc. as instructed and trainedPerform sediment and particle size/density testing, sensory evaluations, etc. as instructed Requirements for QA Technician:High School Diploma or equivalent1-3 years experience Previous experience in quality control or chemical analysisComputer knowledge essential **Shifts:  1st shift Monday-Thursday 7am-5pm; 2nd shift Monday-Thursday, 5pm - 3am",QA Technician - st and nd shift openings Job in Braintree,Full Time Employee,"Braintree, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-Technician-1st-2nd-shift-openings-Job-Braintree-MA-US-164587419.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=12,,Quality Assurance/Safety,1d56ffd445ec395b57c0f9845ce8dad1
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:20:43:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Want to be part of a company whose goal is to be the best in the world and the best for the world?                       Join GENEWIZ for our Job Fair in April!                    When: Wednesday, April 25th, 2016                             Time: 2:00pm to 6:00pmWhere: 111 Corporate Blvd, South Plainfield, NJ 07080 We seek talented, enthusiastic and innovative individuals for Entry-Level Laboratory Technician positions in our Genetic Analysis department at our South Plainfield, New Jersey headquarters.  The minimum requirement for this position is a High School Diploma.  Check out our Careers Page for more detailed information. To attend the job fair, submit your resume to HR@GENEWIZ.com and specify JOB FAIR in the subject line of the email.  If you would like to confirm receipt of your application for the job fair or have any questions, please send an email to Melissa.Rodriguez@GENEWIZ.com  We offer various health and financial benefits, learning opportunities, competitive compensation, rewarding bonus programs, and a wide range of work/life benefits designed to make your life easier. To view our open position and apply, visit www.GENEWIZ.com/careersConnect with us on Linkedin, Facebook and Twitter@GENEWIZ GENEWIZ is a leading global genomics service company and trusted provider for DNA sequencing, gene synthesis, molecular biology, next generation sequencing, bioinformatics, and GLP regulatory services.",GENEWIZ JOB FAIR/Laboratory Technician Job in South Plainfield,Full Time,"South Plainfield, NJ 07080",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/GENEWIZ-JOB-FAIR-Laboratory-Technician-Job-South-Plainfield-NJ-US-165917998.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=6,"DOE, Medical, Dental, Vision, 401K, Annual Bonus",Entry Level,df54ba037e2f14e602ca1f68754d6646
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:20:42:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Package Development Engineering Contractor is responsible for supporting the Packaging Systems team member on Research and Development projects, Lifecycle Engineering projects or portions of major Packaging Systems development projects. The candidate must demonstrate the following capabilities: • Be able to apply knowledge of engineering principles and practices within assignment areas.• Plan, execute and controlling major sections of new package development projects. • Provide consultation and leadership on Package Engineering issues for operations and packaging strategies. • Be able to assess new packaging techniques and overall operations packaging capabilities, planning, and development, coordinating and directing package engineering projects concerned with unique problems which have an important effect on major company programs.• Direct the package development sub-team members to accomplish packaging and non-packaging related projects. Key Job Responsibilities: • Work in conjunction with the label development group to deliver packaging components in a timely manner for Research and Development and Packaging Systems projects. • Conduct assignments encompassing complete projects or portions of major projects requiring advanced knowledge of a specialized field. • Make decisions independently on engineering problems and methods. • Plan, conduct and direct major sections of new package development projects. • Determine methods and techniques to be used or adapts standard methods to meet variations. • Utilize technical competency, relevant work experience, and comprehensive and diverse package engineering knowledge to generate valid creative solutions. • Coordinate and direct the activities of technical support staff (both in-house and outside) in order to achieve objectives. • Design, develop, validate, and oversee manufacture, installation, and operation of package components and packaging processes for sterile surgical devices. • Plans, develops, coordinates and directs a number projects of major scope and importance. • Has full technical responsibility for interpreting, organizing, executing and coordinating assignments. • Develop general packaging guidelines and standards for processes and functional requirements. • No direct reports • Overnight travel may be required of up to10%. • Other responsibilities may be assigned and not all responsibilities listed may be assigned. Qualifications: A minimum of a Bachelor's degree in engineering is required. Package Engineering degree preferred. Minimum of three years of experience working in industry required with one year of experience in packaging development. Regulated industry experience is an asset for this role along with medical device experience. • Experience with project management is preferred. • Experience in packaging design preferred • Design verification and validation is preferred. • The ability to effectively communicate, written and verbally, technical information and its implications to non-technical staff is preferred. • The ability to apply Six Sigma and/or lean tools is an asset. • Professional judgment to generate valid solutions to technical assignments is preferred. • The ability to function independently on specific assignment objectives requiring investigation of a limited number of variables and to function effectively with limited supervision is preferred.• Having the professional judgment required to resolve technical, package design, development and/ or processing issues, identifying the timing, and understand the interrelationships of key activities are all highly preferred. • Knowledge of packaging graphics, process development validation, testing, equipment and supplier processes are preferred. • Materials testing, documentation and ISO 11607 are also preferred for this role. • Personal computer skills should include the ability to effectively use Windows word processing, project planning, presentation, e-mail and spreadsheet software is required. • The ability to create packaging documentation using CADD (Computer-Aided Drafting and Design) software is preferred. • Education (degree preferred or required): B.S., Packaging Science preferred • Years of Experience Needed/Preferred: 1.5 needed, 2+ preferred • Technical Experience (ex: Word, Excel, etc.): MS Office, WORD, EXCEL, PROJECT – required. CAD skills an asset. Package Lab Experience an asset.",Packaging Engineer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45242",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Packaging-Engineer-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-165864381.aspx?mescoid=2700407001001&jobPosition=9,,,83f20ce121f5e2888212660f9f39cb5f
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:19:42:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:We're changing the way health care works for the better. That means consulting with our members, partnering with our physicians, and delivering drugs in the most efficient and effective way. Join us and start doing your life's best work.(sm)  The Support Administration - Project Coordinator has the primary responsibility for working with assigned project teams and third parties to support operational aspects of Epidemiology studies. Primary Responsibilities:Organize and coordinate data collection aspects of assigned chart abstraction or survey activitiesCoordinate the efforts and performance of all project consultants and vendors to execute project activities according to project milestones including contracting, invoicing and data managementOrganize, maintain, handle, and archive sensitive and protected informationSubmit studies for approval including internal health plan, Institutional Review Board, Privacy Board, Compliance, National Death IndexAssist in development of informed consent forms, data collection materials, and third party vendor/consultant training materialsSupport Epidemiologists and Project Managers with additional related tasks as needed (i.e. formatting deliverables, meeting minutes, archiving)Perform quality checks on materials received from third party vendors and consultants including status reports, data collection instruments, training materials, Institutional Review Board and Privacy Board submissions, and subject recruitment materialsQualifications:Required Qualifications:Bachelor’s DegreeProficiency in MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, MS Word, AdobeMust have prior experience in an Administrative Support or Project Coordination roleMust have a strong attention to detail Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world’s large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment. Keywords: Project Coordinator, MS Office, administrative support, Adobe, Word, Excel, coordinate, Boston, MA, MassachusettsTravel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Project Mgmt - Pharma ResearchBusinessSegment: OptumInsight Division: LS - Epidemiology DeliveryModel: Gold ContestNumber: 652439 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Exempt",Support Administration - Project Coordinator - Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Support-Administration-Project-Coordinator-Boston-MA-Job-Boston-MA-US-165833208.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),57d6aefd9f543da8db7aaf8d33f146d9
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:19:41:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"QC ASSOCIATE contract opportunity at a highly regarded pharmaceutical firm in Devens, MA. Projected 6+ month assignment. Quality Control-Technical Support Stability Specialist will be responsible for trend evaluations, making decisions, and writing protocols. Preferred BS Degree and experience in a GMP QC lab or equivalent experience in a related bio-pharmaceutical GLP or GMP lab environment. Please apply today for consideration!Responsibilities for the QA/QC TechnicianProvide support for the Quality Control - Technical Support team in maintaining a commercial stability program.Requesting and organizing enrollments for stability batches.Writing/revising stability protocols and technical reports.Requirements for the QA/QC TechnicianB.S. degree in science, engineering, biochemistry, or a related discipline.Experience with maintaining a commercial stability program including protocol initiation, trend evaluation and periodic report issuance.BenefitsIndustry Leading Contractor Benefits.Pay rate in range shown based on qualifications, experience, and education.Contract opportunity at a well regarded manufacturing firm.This Job is located in Devens, MA -> United States",QA/QC Technician - Bioassay Lab/Manufacturing/Trend Evaluations Job in Devens,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Devens, MA 01432",,http://jobview.monster.com/QA-QC-Technician-Bioassay-Lab-Manufacturing-Trend-Evaluations-Job-Devens-MA-US-165235477.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=12,27.15 - 36.42 $ /hour,,3914653f8c2128d61161d77942e41c0b
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:19:20:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Basic Function: Duties include field sampling and testing of hops and hop products. Responsible for lab equipment calibration and standardization. Also responsible for maintaining sample inventory and sample shipping. Provide technical support to field managers and clients. Maintains a clean and orderly lab and office area. Performs other duties as assigned.Responsibilities:Collect field samples and preparing samples for testingPerform laboratory testingGenerate data and record results into lab notebooksShipping samplesMaintain sample inventoryRequirements:Bachelor’s Degree in a scientific discipline preferredPrefer prior lab experience and knowledge of common lab instrumentation used in analytical testing environmentsAttention to detail, adherence to lab protocols, follows safety standards and testing procedures",Quality Assurance Laboratory Technician Job in Toppenish,Full Time,"Toppenish, WA 98948",Agriculture/Forestry/Fishing,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Laboratory-Technician-Job-Toppenish-WA-US-165187354.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=3,"38,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /year",Entry Level,1d12c77651f239384ea65175b1b9f90b
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:19:20:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"AltiGen is a growing company and a leader in business communication platform. We are seeking talented people to join our growing company and to contribute to our strategic success and expansion in the global marketplace. The best candidate will have extensive VoIP product testing experience, solid networking knowledge, and SDLC experience. This position plays a vital role in the development process at AltiGen. We are seeking an experienced QA Lead to be a member of our team focused on testing AltiGen’s unified communication platform products and services at our San Jose, California headquarters. We're looking for someone that's a team players, self-motivated and can apply his/her skills in key areas including leading and participating in testing efforts, automated testing tool development, and test plan design to ensure our products operate per specification and provide an excellent user experience.  Key Responsibilities:Lead, coordinate and participate in all aspects of testing AltiGen’s MaxCS Cloud and Premise based Unified Communications products and servicesCreation, augmentation, documentation and execution of black/gray box, system, regression, scalability and performance test cases by translating high-level requirements into detailed workable test casesCapture, analyze, and summarize test results and provide detailed project status reports. Explore QA practices and processes and develop improvements in these areasLead in the design of QA lab test bedsAssist in the develop automated test toolsRecord and track defects through the defect tracking system and drive to closureProvide technical analysis and data-driven reports to stakeholders Requirements:BS or MS in CS/CE or related major   10+ year experience among which 5+ yearsin testing PBX/Call Center and/or VoIP based productsPrior team lead experience including all planning, scheduling, and tracking of projectsExtensive IP networking and/or SIP hands-on and troubleshooting experienceExperience with Windows network and VMware and/or Hyper-V is a plusPrior software development experience preferredExcellent verbal and written English communications skills Location:Position based in San Jose, CA EXCELLENT BENEFIT PACKAGE!If you meet these qualifications and are interested in this position, please respond by sending an email with your resume to hr@altigen.com with the position title in the subject line. We are an Equal Opportunity/AA Employer. Only qualified applicants will receive a response. ",Quality Assurance (QA) Lead Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95134",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-QA-Lead-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-164551541.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=9,,,2a47eb2ae4c49e058ad7357de2fa2ba0
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:18:42:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leading in vitro diagnostics company is looking for a Senior Scientist to develop new assays for a variety of analyzer systems. The Senior Scientist will function as a key technical leader on development projects. S/he will define and maintain best practices in the IVD assay and system design.Requirements:- Bachelor's Degree in Analytical/Clinical/Organic/Physical Chemistry or Biochemistry. - 3+ years' experience in industry- Experience in experimental design and analytical analysis- Strongly preferred: Experience in the IVD industry with GMP/QSR, ISO and related regulations- Preferred: Experience in identifying and resolving problems for IVD Medical Devices",Senior Scientist - IVD / Immunoassay Job in Rochester,Full Time,"Rochester, NY 14605",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Scientist-IVD-Immunoassay-Job-Rochester-NY-US-165914413.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=12,"85,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /yearBonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),cbea6cf4ef798de0d3d795530b387648
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:18:42:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Local food manufacturer is looking to expand their quality department.   Employee will be responsible for supporting senior staff scientist to perform basic food testing on variety of raw materials, ingredients, intermediates and finished pilot scale samples.   Basic laboratory analysis to include:  physical property inspections, weighing samples, analytical measurements and making sample batches for evaluation (taste, smell, appearance, etc).   Must enter all test data and laboratory findings using proper documentation into company approved computer system.  Will assist in bake offs, ingredient qualification, and shelf life studies to also include basic lab maintenance, equipment cleaning/calibration.    Job Requirements Bachelor of Science Degree in Food Science with at least one year of experience within the food industry preferred to include working knowledge of HACCP, GMP, ISO.   Must have intermediate computer skills including Microsoft Word and Excel and able to lift, push and pour containers that can weigh up to 50 lbs. ",Food Scientist Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Dallas, TX",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Scientist-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165824279.aspx?mescoid=1900238001001&jobPosition=19,,Biotech/R&D/Science,a1e0d274a65928383246e193e08a9269
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:18:13:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Controls Engineer - East Lansing, MI - $65-90k - An OEM Machine Builder serving the automotive industry is looking for a Controls Engineer in the East Lansing area. This individual will be responsible for programming and developing Allen Bradley and Siemens PLC's. They will also help with run-off and commissioning at the client site.Responsibilities for the Controls EngineerDevelopment and writing of programs with product software, Siemens and Allen BradleyMachine debugging & troubleshooting of programs & softwareElectrical troubleshootingRequirements for the Controls Engineer2+ years of Electrical Controls Experience in Automation Machine Building EnvironmentExperience programming PLC's, preferably Allen BradleyAssociates Degree or equivalent experienceBenefits for the Controls EngineerHealth, dental, 401k.This Job is located in East Lansing, MI -> United States",Controls Engineer - Allen Bradley/Machine Builder/PLCs Job in East Lansing,Full Time Employee,"East Lansing, MI 48823",,http://jobview.monster.com/Controls-Engineer-Allen-Bradley-Machine-Builder-PLCs-Job-East-Lansing-MI-US-165295694.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=5,"65,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",,12b4a7966d1c15917c9019aa27e031da
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:17:45:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Alliance Inspection ManagementJob Description Title: Auto Damage Field InspectorReports to: Area Manager I. SummaryThis is an exciting, challenging and highly visible position. The AiM Auto Damage Field Inspector conducts mobile, used vehicle inspections within a designated geographical area. The field inspector will perform a variety of different inspections ranging from off‐lease vehicles at a lessee’s home or business to major damage vehicles on behalf of an insurance provider. The field inspector will also be cross-trained to perform dealer floor plan audits on behalf of automobile finance companies. The field inspector must maintain high ethical/company standards and policies when conducting inspections and audits on behalf of AiM. All field inspectors are provided with a company vehicle, equipped with GPS technology, subject to satisfactorily meeting all AiM standards/requirements upon being offered a position. II. Essential Duties and Responsibilities •          Vehicleinspections - The field inspector drives tolocations such ashomes, offices, and other fixed sites to perform used vehicle inspections.A field inspector must accurately assess vehicle condition, estimate value of required repairs (using damage estimating software), document findings in a condition report, and transmit completed reports after each inspection.•          Dealer Floor Plan Audits -The field inspectors will be cross-trained to perform dealer floor plan audits based on geographical area and need. The field inspectors will be responsible for a physical count of vehicles, in addition to an audit of dealer’s records including the sale, disposition and proceeds of the vehicles in question. The field inspectors will be responsible for reconciling dealer and AiM customer physical counts, and in some cases, facilitating payment from dealer to the finance company.•          Performance Expectations - Document and record vehicle damages, utilizing proprietary inspection and damage estimating software with laptop computer and digital camera. The field inspectors will be expected to electronically report status of his/ her assignments during the day using AiM’s proprietary scheduling and routing software in order to maintain high productivity each work day. •          Customer Engagement - The field inspectors will be the front line in regards to face-to-face interaction with AiM’s clients including their dealers and lessees. This position will require an increased level of customer service skills combined with a heightened sense of professionalism.•          Other - Perform additional duties as required by the Company. Make continuous recommendations to improve quality and efficiency.•          Regular Attendance and Availability III. Supervisory ResponsibilitiesOn occasion, field inspectors may be asked to train new hire field inspectors and supervise group dealer audits.   RequirementsIV. Required Skills The ideal candidate should display the following skills:•          Teamwork-Balance individual and team responsibilities. •          Highly Motivated - Ambitious and open to working in fast paced environment. •          Attention to Detail - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality.•          Good Communication Skills - Both oral and written •          Management- Ability to manage individual workday and work independently from home with minimal supervision. Ability to exercise independent judgment and discretion, and to conclude as to inspection and audit findings. •          Advanced Computer Skills - Knowledge of basic hardware, operating systems, software and overall functionality with a computer (i.e. email, media download/upload, internet, etc…) V. Qualifications  Education •          High school or GED equivalent required •          Some college level courses and/or technical courses (particularly in the automotive industry) preferred, but not necessary.  Experience•          Minimum 4 years of consistent, full-time work experience•          General knowledge of automotive components preferred. AiM will train the ideal candidate.•          Automotive Estimating/ Repair a plus•          Experience working independently or with limited supervision  VI. Essential Physical RequirementsWork ConditionsMust meet all physical aspects to be able to successfully complete the vehicle inspection routine including; •          Bending/ Kneeling•          Walking •          Standing•          Lifting (up to 25 lbs.)•          Climbing•          Getting in/out of vehicles•          Must be able to work outside in all weather conditions (heat, rain, cold, snow, etc.) Must be able to work extended hours including weekends and holidays if needed Must be able to safely operate a Motor Vehicle •          Possess a valid state issued driver’s license •          Good driving record with no more than one moving violation in the last three years•          Must be 21 years or over due to car rental regulations   VII. Pre-Employment Screening•          Motor Vehicle Report (MVR) review (driving record from state DMV)•          Criminal background screening•          Drug Test•          All candidates considered for employment must satisfactorily pass all elements of the pre- employment screening before a formal offer can be made.  VIII. Travel •          The position requires occasional overnight travel to assist with special projects or increased volumes.  VIV. ClassificationThis position is non-exempt (hourly) and eligible for overtime. Full Time Auction Inspectors (30 or more hours per week) are eligible to participate in AIM’s benefit plans, including medical, dental and 401k (upon completion of the first 60 days of employment, beginning on the first of the next month).   AiM provides equal employment opportunity without regard to an applicant’s race, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation,age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, religion, or veteran status. Applicants with disabilities may be entitled to reasonable accommodation under the terms of the Americans with Disabilities Act and certain state or local laws. A reasonable accommodation is a change in the way things are normally done which will ensure an equal employment opportunity without imposing undue hardship on AiM. Please inform us if you need assistance completing any forms or to otherwise participate in the application process.",Auto Damage Field Inspector Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA","AllAutomotive and Parts MfgTravel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Auto-Damage-Field-Inspector-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-165468055.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=7,14.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,f8b12e99d4175917ddc4756f22a78591
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:17:44:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a UAT Analyst / Tester in Charlotte, North Carolina (NC).Responsibilities:UAT testing - create test scripts: Conduct pre-UAT testing before turning over UAT to the user community Perform the UAT cycles and provide technical support to users throughout the UAT testing cycles Participate in daily checkpoint meetings with UAT participants during execution; meetings will entail discussion of defects found, responding to test concerns and demonstrating key functions of the release Using the organization's application manage and track defects found in UAT testing and ensure defect traceability to requirementsAdditional Responsibilities: Responsible for handling the most complex quality assurance and test environment problems and issues Acts as a lead in the creation, preparation, and conduct of quality assurance reviews and the development and execution of test plans and test scripts Works with client to establish and maintain a consistent test methodology and to resolve questions during the testing process May serve as a coordinator for all testing activities on a project Analyzes, tests, and certifies application-specific software and performs ambiguity reviews of business requirements and functional specification documents Uses advanced knowledge of applications to provide technical assistance in identifying, evaluating, and resolving highly complex test problems Researches new products and industry methodologies and facilitates the development of new concepts, techniques, and standards Plans and directs quality assurance schedules and assignments, and monitors project status in comparison to cost/time projections Logs, tracks, and verifies resolution of software and specification defects Documents all phases of QA process Directs and serves as a mentor to less experienced staffREQUIREMENTS: 7+ years IT quality assurance and systems / application testing experience Any relevant education and / or training will be considered a plus",UAT Analyst / Tester Job in Charlotte,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Charlotte, NC 28262",,http://jobview.monster.com/UAT-Analyst-Tester-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165417815.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),afa13bdd5a488a18046d77e80b87aaa3
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:17:04:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client, located in Wilmington, Delaware, is seeking a UAT Lead Tester. The Lead is primarily responsible for managing and coordinating UAT planning (strategies, timelines, scripts), execution (prioritization, monitoring), and defect management & reporting activities to ensure consistency and controlSeeking a UAT Lead Tester to perform the following duties: Lead required to work cross functionally executing tests, reporting on progress for test teams, managing testing of releases internally and with vendors Participates in cross-functional discussions to review the impact of application changes from both internal and external interfaces on the quality of their applications Works with application development teams to participate in solution design to ensure testability of functions and applications Identifies areas for improving efficiency, shortening of test cycles, and automation of test scripts Facilitates implementation of automated test scripts Has significant interaction with internal customersResponsibilities include but are not limited to: Creation and execution of detailed test plans as well as cross-functional assessments Progress reporting, defect tracking and risk assessments Participation in internal process and procedures improvement projects Assess risk to quality based on results of verification and validation and making appropriate recommendations Coordination with other UATs, QA Leads, Project Managers, Development Managers, and Business SME Creation and execution of End-to-End business process scenariosREQUIREMENTS: Excellent planning, testing, test leadership, communication, Quality Center, and collaboration skills required Lead required to work cross functionally executing tests, reporting on progress for test teams, managing testing of releases internally and with vendors Has deep knowledge of multiple complex applications and provides subject matter expertise to set direction and create test strategies and test plans for one or more releases of an application",UAT Lead Tester Job in Wilmington,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Wilmington, DE 19801",,http://jobview.monster.com/UAT-Lead-Tester-Job-Wilmington-DE-US-165764054.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),644acc705cec83d1ae1da6c303bc9466
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:17:04:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work with the Quality Manager to ensure all quality system activities and quality of the product is in accordance with customer and PPI standard.  Help facilitate other activities like Problems Solving, Scrap reduction Continual Improvement, Etc.  Essential Duties and Responsibilities·         Drive continual quality improvements throughout the organization with team training.·         Interface with the customer and other internal sites in representing and developing quality. ·         Work with the Quality Auditors and inspection team to ensure conformance to customer and internal standards.·         Responsible for incoming inspection, process audits, APQP quality documentation.·         Complete knowledge of process flows and controls.·         Responsible for Document Control, Lab Management, PPAP Process (Familiarity with automotive customers) and inspector development.·         Assign Corrective Actions for customer and manufacturing quality issues·         Must have trouble shooing/problem solving and Error Proofing skills (CAR, 8D, 5 why, etc.).·         Drive continual improvement of all PPI processes and standards Decision Making Authority·         Primary customer contact regarding quality issues·         Disposition of product to customer specifications.·         Document controlRequired Competencies, Skills and Experience·         Experience with plating on plastics, injection molding and a Q.A. background.·         Experience with certified Quality System ISO-TS16949. ·         Must be a self-starter and also have initiative, drive and passion  ·         Knowledge of Components and Assembly Preferred Skills Excellent oral and written communication skills. Demonstrate mentoring skills.  Education and Job Experience RequirementsB.S. in engineering or equivalent in working experience.  Automotive and plastics background a plus. Must be computer proficient.",Quality Engineer Job in Ormond Beach,Full Time,"Ormond Beach, FL 32174",EG Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Ormond-Beach-FL-US-163079718.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6c418f06444d6a5f604a43bb52555d95
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:16:43:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fire Suppression Inspector -  (Fire Suppression / Extinguisher Technician) We are a well-established company headquartered in the Philadelphia area.  We are seeking an experienced Fire Suppression/Extinguisher Technician for our Lehigh Valley Office. A Fire Suppression license is preferred. Required skills:-excellent customer service skills-action orientated and attention to detail-well organized and dependable-ability to drive a vehicle-ability to learn and adapt to new information-possess physical capability to perform essential job duties-will be required to work on callClean driver’s license, drug screen and physical required. Required experience:Fire Suppression/Extinguisher: 1 yearSuppression License Preferred, plus proven knowledge in:-  Fire Sprinkler Suppression Systems  -  Pre-Engineered Systems  -  Conducting semi-annual inspections on all pertinent Fire Suppression Systems.  -  Conducting Inspections in compliance with NFPA and all County / City codes.    A General Overview of Responsibilities is as follows:You will be conducting all required Inspections on a “pass / fail” basis that coincides with NFPA and all City/County Safety codes.Perform semi-annual Inspections as scheduled along with providing any Emergency Services that are needed.Inspect, Recharge Extinguisher and Kitchen Suppression Systems (Fire Sprinkler Suppression Systems)Process paperwork that calls to repair, replace or install failed aspects of inspected systems in order to bring them back to working order.    ",Fire Suppression Inspector - Fire Suppression / Extinguisher Technican Job in Wind Gap,Full Time,"Wind Gap, PA 18091",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Fire-Suppression-Inspector-Fire-Suppression-Extinguisher-Technican-Job-Wind-Gap-PA-US-165371752.aspx?mescoid=3300575001001&jobPosition=19,salary comm. with experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),e80b9c1bbb1d7ecba85db9480c79a047
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:16:43:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) are for profit companies classified as Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO)-owned. The Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) includes Ke`aki Technologies, Laulima Government Solutions, Kūpono Government Services, and Kāpili Services.  Alaka`ina is the parent 501(c)3 of the Alaka`ina Foundation whose activities principally benefit the youth of Hawaii. A portion of the profits generated by the FOCs helps support Alaka`ina 501(c)3 charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship. Laulima Government Solutions is looking for qualified Laboratory Technicians 4 to support the Diagnostic Systems Division (DSD) at the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases (USAMRIID). The position will be located at Frederick, MD.   The mission of the Diagnostic Systems Division (DSD) is to conduct research to develop diagnostic strategies, procedures, capabilities, products, information and training.  DSD also supports advanced development of diagnostic capabilities for regulatory approval and provides operational and confirmatory testing capability for the DoD and the Nation. DUTIES INCLUDE: ·         Performs laboratory procedures, testing, research activities, and other tasks in fields such as biochemistry, immunology, microbiology, virology, bacteriology, molecular or cell biology, veterinary medicine, toxicology, or other scientific discipline. ·         Perform required lab work in a BSL-2, BSL-3, and/or BSL-4 environment.·         Perform next generation sequencing, Nanostring immunological and inflammatory panels, Luminex-based platforms, miRNA quantification, as well as other molecular diagnostic techniques; Perform virus material characterization and evaluation for utility in specific assays at the appropriate biological containment level and antibody characterization using basic and novel methods such as ELISA, Western blot, surface plasma resonance, and others; OR Perform manual, semi-automated and automated experiments and procedures in support of the GLP PCR and PCR-like work, including PCR, immunoassays, sample preparation and DNA/RNA extraction and purifications as well as common microbiology techniques in BSL2 and BSL3 environments.·         Support the Special Pathogens Laboratory to include, generating and collecting data, reports, findings, providing feedback when requested.·         Ensure all experiments are performed and documented IAW applicable regulations dictated by study protocol (i.e. GLP, FDA Animal Rule, CLIP, COLA).·         Desires experience with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures. ·         Follows instructions and guidelines to perform the functions of the job, including but not limited to relevant Standard Operating Procedures, national standards of research technical accuracy, and/or other written guidelines provided. ·         Plans and accomplish goals, participates in development of research work plans, proposals, budgets, and agreements.  ·         Reads, understands, and executes techniques and procedures within the quality standards and timelines prescribed by the research plan. ·         Records all laboratory procedures and research project data, data analyses, and analytical conclusions of analyses in government-authorized notebooks and electronic systems in accordance with applicable regulations and procedures. ·         Performs a variety of scientific and administrative tasks. Specialized skills may be required, including but not limited to, electron or confocal microscopy, histopathology, quality assurance, and good laboratory practice. ·         May participate in oversight of laboratory biosafety requirements, in coordination with laboratory supervisor, director, Investigators, or other relevant staff.      REQUIREMENTS: ·         Required Education:o   Bachelor’s Degree in a related scientific field.·         Required Experience:o   A minimum of 4 years of experience.o   Must have Good Laboratory Practices (GLP) training and experience.o   Enrollment in the Biological Personnel Reliability Program (BPRP) for handling select agents - he or she must maintain enrollment.   Applicants must meet eligibility requirements as regulated by Army Regulation 50-1 (AR 50-1)-   http://www.fas.org/irp/doddir/army/ar50-1.pdf  CLEARANCE: The position requires the following: ·         U.S. Citizenship·         Applicants will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.  The selected individual must submit for and receive a favorable Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI) security clearance background check.  Laulima Government Solutions is a fast growing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 10 paid holidays. Laulima Government Solutions is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. For additional information on Laulima Government Solutions, please visit www.laulimags.com. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer of individuals with disabilities and veterans. We are proud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin or disability status. If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees.",Laboratory Technician  Job in Frederick,"Full Time, Employee","Frederick, MD 21701",,http://jobview.monster.com/Laboratory-Technician-4-Job-Frederick-MD-US-165864709.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=6,,Biotech/R&D/Science,042970fcac3e9a76cf9deffb92aa6c97
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:15:42:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Precipart, in Farmingdale, New York, has an immediate opening for a Quality Engineer. The successful candidate will support the maintenance and continuous improvement of our Quality Management System, ensuring our precision custom mechanical components meet the customer’s required standards and specifications. This position is a perfect fit for the individual who shares our steadfast commitment to quality.Responsibilities:Maintain the quality management system and relevant ISO certificationsPrepare and execute internal process audits, supplier audits and support on-site customer auditsAssist in quality investigations to resolve product concerns; manage the corrective action processProvide technical support to our sales and engineering teams for a broad range of medical and industrial applications (ie: customer surveys, regulatory compliance, sample submissions)Requirements:Bachelor’s degree in Engineering field or equivalent work experienceMinimum 1 year work experience in quality or medical fieldStrong problem solving and analytical skillsDetail oriented, highly organized; able to multitask and prioritize workloadInterpersonal effectiveness with internal team members, customers and suppliersProficient in Microsoft Office applications (Outlook, Word, Excel, Access and PowerPoint)Some travel is requiredCompany Benefits: We look for long term employee satisfaction and offer a competitive compensation and benefit package, which includes:Base salary plus bonus programPaid time offMedical and dental insurance, life insurance and long term disability insuranceProfit sharing plan About PrecipartPrecipart is a global company engaged in the engineering, design and manufacture of high precision custom solutions. We provide gears, mechanical components, assemblies, and motion control solutions to the most recognized names in the medical and industrial markets. With offices in the United States, Switzerland, United Kingdom and India, we have over 250 employees dedicated to enhancing lives through innovative solutions. ",Quality Engineer Job in Farmingdale,Full Time,"Farmingdale, NY 11735",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Engineer-Job-Farmingdale-NY-US-165892562.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=14,,,2f9948570fe0291680f366c27b84bdb7
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:15:41:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Lead Quality EngineerThis is a initially a 6 month consulting engagement but could be extended longerAs a Lead Quality Engineer, you will create and execute test strategies against software and cloud-based frameworks using automated and manual tests. You will run security, performance and functionality tests against cloud-based web services and applications and establish testing goals and identify critical scenarios based on design requirements and customer usage.Key Responsibilities:• Design, develop test frameworks and testing tools for UI and backend testing• Evolve current automated test infrastructure• Promote and help implement Continuous Integration and Delivery methodologies• Troubleshoot issues discovered on test environments and by customers in order to identify potential root causes and reproducible steps.• Analyze stories, create manual and automated test cases that cover a broad range of client configurations.• Provide feedback on user experience in order to ensure the best possible experience for our customers.• Participate in the design reviews to understand design, contribute quality requirements and ensure testability.• Work with development team to understand new product features for the purpose of designing and developing test cases.• Assist in hiring and mentoring. Provide technical guidance to other Quality Engineers.• Stay up-to-date with new technologies, automated testing tools, etc.Skills and Experience:• 6+ years of Quality Assurance experience• 3+ years broad experience with multiple automated tools spanning over UI and Server Sideo Automated UI testing experienceo Automated testing RESTful services• Experience working on products dealing with large data sets• Experience working with and querying backend DBs like Cassandra, MySql• Experience in a UNIX/Linux backend environment• Proven ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, iterative development environment• Able to understand and convey complex product requirements or technical concepts to technical and non-technical audiences• Ability to effectively communicate with teams in multiple locations.• Strong analytical, troubleshooting and problem solving skills.Great to have:• Performance testing experience",Lead Quality Engineer Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02210",,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Quality-Engineer-Job-Boston-MA-US-165912918.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=12,,Quality Assurance/Safety,6d8a8be50a4d3f3de9656157cec560ff
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:14:43:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of the largest global insurers is seeking a Senior Research Scientist - Atmospheric Perils to join the Cat Management and Analytics Center of Excellence in Philadelphia. The interested individual will join a dynamic research and development team comprised of people with diverse backgrounds, such as natural hazards, atmospheric sciences, engineering, flood modeling, etc. This position will be responsible for conducting research and developing cutting edge underwriting and portfolio management solutions for risk assessment from atmosphere/weather related perils - tropical and extra-tropical cyclones, tornado/hail, winter storms, etc. Individual should also have a strong research and development experience with catastrophe risk models for atmosphere/weather-related perils. This position will report to the Director of Research and Development, AIG Global Property and Specialty and Cat Management and Analytics Center of Excellence.Responsibilities include:Develop cutting edge underwriting and portfolio management tools for risk assessment from tropical/extra-tropical cyclones, winter storms, tornado/hail.Conduct research and integrate scientifically derived trends, teleconnections and the impact of seasonal and long-term climate factors into the modeling framework.Ability to analyze large datasets (climate, hazard, claims, etc.) to develop solutions for underwriting profitability and risk management strategies. Responsible for developing, tuning and updating internal natural hazard related datasets/models and risk management tools.Perform in-depth validation of hazard and vulnerability components of tropical/extra-tropical cyclones, tornado/hail, winter storms catastrophe models from RMS and AIRRequirements: Ph.D./Masters in Engineering, Atmospheric Sciences, Meteorology, or a related disciplineStrong background in probability and statisticsMinimum 4 years experience in catastrophe risk modelingStrong computer skills, including R, Matlab, C++, GIS and SQLExcellent analytical, writing, communication, and organizational skills About AIGAmerican International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Senior Research Scientist Job in Philadelphia,,"Philadelphia, PA",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Research-Scientist-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165860665.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=15,,Biotech/R&D/Science,5a52fa417052eb249ad9c4aec707bace
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:14:43:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Please do not respond via the monster message center, please email me directly if it is not too much trouble - joseph8601@sbcglobal.net Please feel free to call 860 889 4141, until 9 PM Eastern, 7 days a week, including most weekends and holidays, after you email a word doc resume directly to me from your own email, and I will help you - joseph8601@sbcglobal.net Biosample Therapeutic Area LeaderThe Biosample Therapeutic Area Leader: •is accountable for strategic and operational oversight of biosample collection and management within one or more therapeutic areas •is accountable for ensuring all biosamples in programs are collected, processed and reported in accordance with and adherence to relevant clinical, laboratory, regulatory and ethical standards (eg GCP/GLP) •innovates and drives best practices in all operational aspects of biosampling in clinical development •In addition the Biosample Therapeutic Area Leader may have line management responsibilities. Primary Responsibilities and Accountabilities: •To provide expert operational input to the development of sampling strategies and assume accountability for implementation within the therapeutic areas (TA), including development of biosample sourcing strategies and support of forecasting biosampling-related costs. •To be a single point of contact within Biosample Operations for all biosampling matters across a TA and act as a point of escalation for issues that cannot be resolved at the study or project level. •To identify and drive functional process and system improvements to ensure operational excellence. •To actively develop and maintain effective partnerships with internal and external stakeholders. •To partner across the organization to improve the efficiency of biosample collection and storage, as well as the utility of biomarker data and samples to inform future research. •Drive internal standards to meet or exceed industry standards and practices through pro-active understanding of cutting edge methodology and process and fostering a culture of innovation. •To proactively manage, lead and develop Clinical Development Expert Resource staff to maximize their capability and contribution to deliver high quality clinical programs and studies through ongoing performance management (as appropriate). •To allocate and manage the resource needs within the TAs ensuring timely and accurate forecasting of functional resources. •To contribute to creating a positive and motivating work environment that encourage mutual respect, innovation and accountability at all levels through role modeling of Roche values and effective leadership behaviors. Education / Qualifications: •Life sciences degree and/or higher/professional level qualification •8-12 years of experience in the bio/pharmaceutical industry providing Biosample support for a significant number of clinical programs including Safety and PK samples as well as biomarker collection and processing Desirable Experience, Skills, Knowledge•Extensive experience in leading and managing biosample operational activities in global clinical projects •Demonstrated expertise and experience in Infectious Disease is preferred •Clinical or biological laboratory experience with evidence of involvement in the processing and/or analysis of biological samples •Demonstrated success within a leadership role, managing external vendors and internal partners •Ability to maintain currency in expertise through networking and educational activities •Proven ability to successfully achieve results within a multi-cultural and geographically diverse matrix environment •Previous line and/or matrix management experience •Demonstrated experience in resource and budget management •Knowledge of regulatory environment in specific global regions; ability to facilitate sample collection and management in compliance with global and regional requirements. •Demonstrated abilities in strategic planning and leadership skills •Demonstrated ability to influence, motive and command respect from broad stakeholder population. •Proven ability to support innovation even if taken outside of his/her comfort zoneHigh Performance Competencies•effective communication skills •leadership through line management and influence •ability to design and drive improvements in business process •ability to coach and mentor others to support high performanceCompensationBase Salary - $140,000 to $160,000Benefits - FullRelocation Assistance Available - YesBonus Eligible - Yes7+ to 10 years experienceMinimum Education - Bachelor's DegreeWillingness to Travel - OccasionallyAlso, please understand this may take time for both of us working together to help advance your career. I will do my best for you and never charge you anything for our time and effortsIn all cases we always have several jobs not yet published on the WWW, listed on linkedin or posted to our company websiteMany full job descriptions and base salaries in your field of experience can be viewed in various sections on - http://www.anewbeginning-genesis2.com A New Beginning-Genesis 2 Regards, SHALOM, ciao, Namaste, Peace,JoeJoseph Anthony Vaccariellojoseph8601@sbcglobal.net",Biosample Therapeutic Area Leader Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Multiple locations,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Biosample-Therapeutic-Area-Leader-Job-US-165853142.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=6,"0.00 - 160,000.00 $ /yearBENNIES, ETC, PERKS,",Experienced (Non-Manager),29323ea018c8e8dbfdbd5c9054e2bb04
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:13:50:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"REMOTE QA Tester JobW-2 6 month CTH Modis has an exciting new job opportunity for a QA Tester.  This is a great job opportunity for someone looking to further their career with a global leader of next-generation information technology (IT) services and solutions Fortune 500 company. We are looking for an innovative and hard-working tester who can identify and implement solutions based on the client’s needs.   Requirements & Responsibilities:•Has experience with performance testing, mobile testing, and/or tandem testing.•Performs complex testing tasks to assure that developed products meet design specifications and are within total quality management limits and standards. •Tests, debugs, documents, validates and installs basic hardware and software testing tasks in accordance with industry best practices and specific internal procedures and standards. •Creates/Reviews complex test plans, test case data, procedures and testing scripts based upon functional specifications to meet business needs. •Utilizes software testing tools and assists in developing test software for use in automated test activities.•Develops project plans, maintains metrics, and interfaces with various engineering, operations groups and vendors to achieve desired improvement goals. •Documents and shares all test results.•Responds to developers' questions about the results to communicate status and ensure understanding. •Provides work training and mentoring to less experienced personnel.  •Strong analytical and problem solving skills.  •Strong communication and leadership skills. If you think the job of a REMOTE QA Tester is for you then please submit your resume for the position.  Thank You! ",REMOTE QA Tester Job in Madison,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Madison, TN 37115",,http://jobview.monster.com/REMOTE-QA-Tester-Job-Madison-TN-US-165254152.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=18,,Quality Assurance/Safety,7807a43ae977bbd67253b38e482d41b3
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:13:42:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our food processing facility in Oxnard is seeking Production Leads for the upcoming season. We are coming into our busy season for processing and need qualified Leads to assist in overseeing production. Full time hours with OT hours, $15/hr. Bilingual in English/Spanish a Plus. Job Requirements and Duties:?Efficiently utilize the employees for the production room and rotate personnel to proper positions throughout the shift.?Responsible to room set up at the start of shift rinsing the room before production starts and cleaning at the end of production according to SOP.?Monitor production to ensure all assigned procedures for quality, Safety and regulatory requirements are understood and being followed.?Set up date coders with correct date for boxes, correct date and Country of Origin on bags, as shown on scheduled production paperwork.?Inspect equipment in room daily to ensure it is in working order and functioning properly.?Monitor quality of raw materials and packaging materials to ensure packed product meets standards.?Complete daily paperwork required for each item packed ensuring number of finished goods and raw materials match warehouse numbers.?Release finished goods for distribution.?Communicate with Production Supervisor and Quality as needed.?Able to run all 3 rooms to provide backup as needed.?Reports all injuries immediately to production supervisor.?Follows all company safety policies and procedures and Good Manufacturing Procedure. Education and/or ExperienceHigh school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education.Language SkillsMust be able to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. Must be able to write simple correspondence. Must be able to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. Bilingual English/Spanish helpful.Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms. Working surfaces may be uneven and often wet.The employee must regularly lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.Work EnvironmentThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job the employee is regularly exposed to wet and/or humid conditions and moving mechanical parts. The employee is occasionally exposed to vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Gloves, hearing protection, beardnets, hairnets and eye protection***Please apply with resume and cover letter today* We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.",Production Lead Job in Oxnard,,"Oxnard, CA 93030",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Lead-Job-Oxnard-CA-US-165939209.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=5,Up to $15.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),9c2a9a3873fa93710c6f6f1a493854f5
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:13:42:05,No,jobs.monster.com," HazTek, Inc., a premium provider of Safety Management Services, is currently expanding and seeking new talent to assist with our growth. Specializing in safety, HazTek is a full-service, objective safety partner that protects people, property and the bottom line from the high cost of workplace accidents. HazTek is currently seeking outstanding performers to join our national team of professionals. HazTek is seeking a Safety Professional for the Albany, GA area.  No Per Diem or Lodging provided Basic Overview of Job ResponsibilitiesMust have solid safety skillsHigh Voltage experience preferred – LOTO, etc.Complete accident reports and conduct accident investigationsEnsure all personnel wear their personal protective equipment (PPE)Daily safety audits and inspectionsOversee all subcontractors and contractorsInspect power tools and heavy equipment Qualifications include:Minimum 5+ year’s direct construction or safety experience requiredOSHA 10 or 30 hour in Construction certificationOSHA 500 a plusFirst Aid/CPR certifiedExpert in construction safety standards  Please apply to:  https://haztekinc.clearcompany.com/careers/jobs/9fa7c9f0-0862-e0fb-a67f-89f365d2e704/apply?source=369076-CS-14424 HazTek, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity, Drug-Free Employer Committed to Diversity in the Workplace M/W/D/V. EOE",Safety Professional - Georgia Job in Albany,Full Time,"Albany, GA",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Safety-Professional-Georgia-Job-Albany-GA-US-164864629.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5b2449e26e9eb783dd45beebf0f665cf
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:12:45:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you can benefit from greater respect, pay, benefits, autonomy, and recognition by joining an innovative, well-established industry leading company look no further. Due to company growth,our clientis looking for a Quality Assurance Director to join their team at their Pittsburgh, PA location. Make an impact at a growing company where your opinion will be heard, your skills will be valued, and your experience and expertise will be rewarded. In this exciting, newly created position, you will provide a sense of guidance and direction for their Quality assurance group and will be in charge of a team of 20-30 QA Engineers. Make a difference in the lives of you team members by acting as a mentor and enjoy having an impact on the company as a whole as you manage their cost of service and improve their corporate bottom line. Rest assured that the work you are doing is important. Be an integral member of the team at a company that is involved in connecting inmates with the people and services that help with their rehabilitation. Experience greater job satisfaction today! In this upper level, highly visible position you won’t have to worry about being micromanaged.  You will be provided with the freedom and autonomy to make your own decisions and judgement calls. In this role, you will also enjoy having a flexible schedule. The time has come to work for a company that trusts you and treats you with the respect you deserve. You do not want to let this opportunity pass you by.Some of the benefits to you:·         Competitive compensation based on your experience PLUS potential merit increases and bonuses·         An exceptional benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, short and long-term disability, tuition reimbursement, 401k with employer matching, a communication reimbursement package, and 20 % discount with AT&T·         Any training necessary is paid for by the CompanyIf you have the following, they want to hear from you:·         A BA/BS degree in Computer Engineering, related technical field or equivalent practical experience.·         Proven experience in a Quality Assurance roleDon’t let this opportunity pass you by!Email your resume to: gtl@workrocket.com Please include 'WR 8209 - Quality Assurance Director' in the subject line, or your resume may be overlooked.About the company: For nearly 25 years, our client has been the trusted, one-stop source for integrated technology solutions for the corrections market. They started as a provider of correctional telecommunications services, offering facilities both control and a steady source of income to help augment budgets. Over time, they have expanded their vision and capabilities by identifying emerging trends in commerce (electronic debit, payment services, kiosks, etc.), control (facility management, investigative technologies, etc.), and communication (video visitation and visitation management).All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual's race, color, sex, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. ",Quality Assurance Director Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time Employee,"Pittsburgh, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Director-Job-Pittsburgh-PA-US-165454991.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=8,,Quality Assurance/Safety,6a9692322da17ddfa99e37baf7e79e4c
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:12:44:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client a leading manufacturer of global solution provider of skid-mounted, modular liquid and gas process systems is looking to recruit for a QC Manager.Reporting directly into the president of the company the Quality Manager is responsible for managing the quality department, direct personnel, indirect personnel, and overall ISO 9001 compliance.Client DetailsOur client a leading manufacturer of global solution provider of skid-mounted, modular liquid and gas process systems is looking to recruit for a QC Manager.Reporting directly into the president of the company the Quality Manager is responsible for managing the quality department, direct personnel, indirect personnel, and overall ISO 9001 compliance.DescriptionThe QC Manager will be responsible for develops, implements, maintains and facilitates the company's quality programs to assure compliance.Reporting into the VP of Operations, the QC Manager will be responsible for:Management Representative ensuring that the quality management system through ISO 9001 isestablished implemented and maintained reporting to top management the performance of the QMS and any need for improvement.Maintains/schedules third party quality audits from ASME, UL, IEC, ATEX, etc.Knowledge of ASME sec. V, VIII, VIIII and B31.3 pipe coding legislationManages resources and budgeting while ensuring raw materials and finished products meet customerspecifications and manufacturing standards.Oversees daily QA and QC inspections to ensure all products meet customer regulatory requirements.Coordinates the investigations of customer complaints.Writes, revises, and maintains Quality Manual.Recommends staffing levels based on quality requirements.Provides training and cross training of staff to assure departmental objectives are met.Effectively manages employees as necessary to ensure successful performance by the department.ProfileBachelor's degree or equivalent in Engineering or Quality related disciplineA minimum of five years in a manufacturing quality management system.Expert knowledge with testing equipment, calibration, and interpretation of testing results.Heavy emphasis on leadership ability and strong internal/external communications.Computer skills in Windows based software systems.Good knowledge of governmental regulatory guidelines relating to the manufacturing industryJob OfferOur client is looking to offer an exceptional base salary in addition to benefits and 401k",QC Manager - Oil and Gas Job in Houston,"Full Time , Employee","Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/QC-Manager-Oil-Gas-Job-Houston-TX-US-165424206.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=11,"100,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",,174f72e405c6072e689fd2c388df83f5
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:11:59:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:   Asst with:  Plans, coordinates, and directs quality program designed to ensure quality control and quality assurance of the production of products consistent with established standards by performing the following duties personally or through subordinate supervisors. The quality manager will be responsibility for APQP, PPAP, and daily product quality for all customers and customer complaints. Essential Duties and Responsibilities:  Include the following but not limited to other duties that may be assigned. Formulates and maintains quality objectives complementary to corporate policies and goals. Interprets quality philosophy to key personnel in the organization Develops and initiates standards and methods for inspection, testing, and evaluation. Plans and oversees the analysis, inspection, design, test, and/or integration to assure the quality of assigned product or component. Performs quality engineering reviews of design documentation for compliance with stated requirements, including vendor quality manuals and company quality records. Applies statistical process control (SPC) methods for analyzing data to evaluate the current process and process changes. Decides whether to accept a product or continue business with a vendor based on a review by the quality assurance engineer. Reviews all data obtained during all quality control and quality assurance activities to ensure consistency with company policies and procedures. Develops new approaches to solve problems identified during quality activities. Keeps management team abreast of significant issues or developments identified during quality activities and actions being taken to improve the situation. Prepares and presents technical and program information to the management team. Directs workers engaged in inspection and testing activities to ensure continuous control over materials, facilities, and products. Maintains a working knowledge of government and industry quality codes and standards. Plays active role on quality management teams within the organization. Designs and implements quality training programs to key personnel in conjunction with other managers in the company. Investigate, adjusts and reports for customer complaints regarding quality. This position has the authority and responsibility for the process of QMS, EMS, OH&S policies and procedures to ensure activities affecting conformity to product requirements. AuthorityIs responsible for the overall direction, coordination, and evaluation of TBK America Quality Department, in the absence of the Quality Manager. Directly supervises Quality Inspectors. Carries out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization’s policies and applicable laws, responsibilities include interviewing, hiring, and training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems. The Quality Manager has the right to stop production and shipping when a part or product has a quality defect.   CompetenciesTo perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies: Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; gathers and analyzes information skillfully; develops alternative solutions; works well in group problem solving situations; uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics. Project Management – Develops project plans; coordinates projects; communicates changes and progress; completes on time and budget; manages project team activities. Technical Skills- Assesses own strengths and weaknesses; pursues training and development opportunities; strives to continuously build knowledge and skills; shares expertise with others. Oral Communication – Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions; demonstrates group presentation skills; participates in meetings. Written Communication – Writes clearly and informatively; edits work for spelling and grammar; varies writing style to meet needs; presents numerical data effectively; able to read and interpret written information.",Assistant Quality Control Manager Job in Richmond,Full Time,"Richmond, IN 47374",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Quality-Control-Manager-Job-Richmond-IN-US-163534128.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),bc849cae8ff8a976c4835aac32c04425
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:11:45:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIAL DUITES:   Responsible for cleaning building and equipment following a Master Sanitation Schedule (MSS).  Disassembling and assembling of equipment as instructed to perform clean-out and disinfecting.  Able to perform PH test using test strip and correctly interpret results.  Able to perform Quat-Test concentration and verification results.  Know and take steps to correct sanitizer’s concentrating above 200 PPM.  Recognize soil types and use proper chemicals for removal.  Understand and follow dry and wet cleaning procedures.  Able to correctly monitor and clean rodent traps. Must record in proper report form.  Insect control devices: maintaining and recording of activity. (Insect-o- cutter)  Able to properly use all sanitation equipment with safety.  Must be able to work as a member of a team.  Recognize and differentiate PH levels for adjusting and neutralizing solutions.  The above items are not inclusive and may be changed according to business needs.  Food Safety Responsibilities:Must protect product from contaminations while completing assigned tasks.Ensure cleaning is done correctly.Inspect equipment before and after cleaning for any possible contamination.Report any acts or conditions that may place our product at risk.  Safety Responsibilities:Responsible for learning safety rules.Responsible for following safety rules.Ensuring that technicians follow safety rules.Follow LOTO Procedures when necessary.  All other duties as assigned. EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE: Experience in Sanitation in a food-manufacturing environment preferred. KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:   No specific academic level required; Able to read & write.  Mechanical aptitude with the capability to learn and follow instructions for dis-assembly and re-assemble of food processing equipment.  The employee must demonstrate excellent safety work habits at all time.  The employee must work harmoniously with other employees as a team effort.  Bilingual (Spanish / English) preferred ",SANITATION TECHNICIAN,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75236",,http://jobview.monster.com/SANITATION-TECHNICIAN-Job-DALLAS-TX-US-165369657.aspx?mescoid=5101019001001&jobPosition=8,12.51 - 12.51 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,6684c8b14c1abc876e93cd6cee641c6a
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:11:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Opportunity: Crompco is currently searching for highly motivated personal interested in being taught a trade in the UST compliance testing industry. Advancement within the company is available at the end of the training period for qualified trainees.Description: Field Technicians perform a variety of services within but not limited to the Gasoline Service Station Industry. These include but are not limited to: precision underground tank and line tightness testing, leak detector testing, ATG certification, stage I & II vapor recovery testing, cathodic protection testing, secondary containment testing, meter calibration and 3rd party facility operations inspections for gas stations. Technicians also perform containment sump repair services, gasoline and diesel fuel tank cleaning, and minor maintenance on these systems. Duties: Major responsibilities will include prepping the site for testing, setting up testing and safety equipment, removal of manhole lids for underground storage tank access and driving a DOT regulated commercial motor vehicle.  Eventually working toward advancement within the company to become a foreman and managing a work crew.Requirements: Willing to work overtime.  Available to travel overnight when needed. Able to lift up to 10-50 lbs. (1 technician), up to 100 lbs.(2 technicians). Must be capable of climbing ladders to install and retrieve equipment. Job requires frequent kneeling, bending, handling, reaching and standing. Driving a DOT registered vehicle comprises approximately 25% of weekly activities.Qualifications: Mechanical Background along with a history of working with hand tools a plus.Need clean driving record and be able to pass DOT physical and drug screen.  DOT physical required every 2 years; drug/alcohol screening done randomly (annually); motor vehicle check semi-annually. ",Environmental Field Technician Job in Bethlehem,Full Time,"Bethlehem, PA 18018",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/Environmental-Field-Technician-Job-Bethlehem-PA-US-165014696.aspx?mescoid=1900302001001&jobPosition=15,"41,000.00 - 41,000.00 $ /yearFull benefits package, yearly profit sharing bonus, 401k match and paid overnights",Entry Level,45ca1adb028d42cce41cdcbd70aa9979
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:10:40:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details: Perform analytical testing and review raw data generated in accordance with GMP and GLP guidelines. Responsible for: •    Perform and trouble-shoot USP, EP, BP, and in-house methods using wet chemistry and advanced analytical techniques/equipment, such as HPLC, GC, FTIR Spectroscopy, TOC analysis, etc. for release testing of in-process, finished product and stability. •    Suggest and implement continuous laboratory improvements. •    Review of analytical data for applicable test articles and follow-up on corrective actions. •    Revise analytical laboratory SOPs and chemical specifications. •    Provide timely completion of duties to meet departmental and company goals. •    Other duties not included above, but are required to support the growth and viability of the company, will be performed as assigned. •    Support LASER and WISE OWLS initiatives. All other duties as assigned. Qualifications:    •    Expert in pharmaceutical analytical techniques and test methods. •    Must be able to work and problem solve independently and as part of a team. •    Experience in HPLC, GC, FT/IR, UV/VIS and specialty equipment operation/technical troubleshooting. •    LIMS, Documentum, Empower are positives. •    Computer literate and is able to use Microsoft Office software (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.) Shift: The position will be variable hours  - either Tue-Sat 2nd shift or a Sun-Thu approx. 430pm-1230am.  Training will be conducted on first shift Notes: For this level position, they need a person with HPLC experience (preferable in the pharma industry) and if they have experience with Waters equipment and Empower software that would be even better.  For this level, they would not likely choose a candidate without some type of QC experience.  If the candidate did have specific raw material testing experience in the pharma industry, they might want to talk to that person as they could potentially swap some resources around. Location: Tampa, FL Type: CT Pay rate: $18/hour on W2",QC Chem Tech Job in Tampa,Full Time,"Tampa, FL 33602",,http://jobview.monster.com/QC-Chem-Tech-Job-Tampa-FL-US-165906078.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=2,17.00 - 18.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),ec30229590af728a19d6c76023bfb58a
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:10:39:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Microbiology Analyst is responsible for performing microbiological tests that support the release of intermediates and finished products. These include routine and non-routine microbiological tests on in-process and final container products, as well as environmental monitoring samples. This position also contributes to the completion of routine technical tasks. Responsible for overall execution testing of Microbiology department Provide results to Supervisor and any atypical problems that will affect timelines from Production / R&D/QA/QC for various activities related to microbiology. Communicate and interact with different departments in case of OOT and OOS observations related to microbiology. Ensure your training of SOP's and STP's are completed and implement cGMP practices related to microbiology throughout the facility Ensure your day to day activities are performed with quality and integrity to support preparation of Microbiology Laboratory for internal and external audits. Ensuring compliance to system and procedures in the department and documentation. Execute documentation in microbiology laboratory for testing of environmental monitoring and Microbial Limits. Read, understand and follow SOP's as per Good Microbiology Laboratory practices and pharmacopeia. Perform testing according to Specification and standard test procedure of the microbiology section. Assist in the procurement of consumables and other materials. To ensure all equipment used for release testing are within preventative maintenance schedule (if any) and calibration or performance qualification prior to use of laboratory instruments. Execute in a timely manner for sampling, analysis and release of environmental and water samples. Execute in a timely manner analysis and release of Raw material, finish products and packing materials. Maintain compliance with changes from responses for internal and external audit observation as well as implementation of CAPA in micro lab. Be able to communicate to Supervisor information regarding all aspects of the Microbiological Laboratory for Quality Control. Be cost effective and vigilant of laboratory reagents, glassware, etcetera to ensure department is within the Revenue and Capex Budget as per spent analysis project. Provide feedback to management with laboratory standard hours for financial prudence in resource planning, allocation and Client to ensure within approved budgets while building best in class quality processes and systems at site. Execute and maintain quality system controls to ensure no critical and major market complaints. Take appropriate steps to reduce wastages and losses in the analysis process and build improved efficiency Provide feedback for new Training of manufacturing and laboratory staff w.r.t. aseptic practices and microbiological effectiveness. Requirements Bachelor's degree in Microbiology, or closely related scientific discipline. Degree in Microbiology is highly preferred. Laboratory experience is preferred. Pharmaceutical & FDA/GLP industry experience is preferred over academic laboratory experience. Microbiology laboratory skills and knowledge, such as aseptic techniques, is required. Basic understanding of cGMPs, cGLPs, FDA regulations, and industry guidelines, as well as international regulatory guidelines. Ability to keep neat, accurate and complete records and logs.",Microbiology Analyst Job in Monroe,"Full Time , Employee","Monroe, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Microbiology-Analyst-Job-Monroe-NC-US-164805167.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Biotech/R&D/Science,c22bcc171d8bac968f9d4bea2a7f45e4
United States of America,US,07/Jul/2016:09:42:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"ManpowerGroup Public Sector is a wholly owned subsidiary of ManpowerGroup [NYSE: MAN], a Fortune 500 company, and a leading translation and localization services provider located in Falls Church, VA. Our office is metro accessible, and we offer our employees an unlimited supply of coffee and soda. ManpowerGroup Public Sector provides a full range of language translation solutions for documentation, software, web, and multimedia applications in 150+ language combinations. We have multiple openings as follows: Korean Translators (Science and Technology, Patents) Internet Researchers (Science and Technology, Patents) All openings are located at our Falls Church, VA location. This is a contract based assignment with a US government client. JOB DESCRIPTION - Korean Translators: Translate and post-edit Korean-to-English S&T (science and technology, patents) translations using human language technology in a computer-aided translation and machine translation environment. - S&T Internet Researchers: Conduct internet research and compile S&T (science and technology, patents) reports in client-designated formats. REQUIREMENTS - US Citizenship - Native Korean skills (minimum of 4 to 6 years of K-12 education in Korea) - A four-year college degree (a science or engineering degree preferred) - Minimum of two years of relevant work experience - Near-native English language proficiency - Accurate keyboarding / typing skills (minimum 45 wpm) in Korean and English - Excellent knowledge of English and Korean grammar - Strong attention to detail and ability to focus and follow instructions Preferred for the Korean Translator openings: - 5+ years of experience in ENGKOR translation - Background in science and technology fields and familiarity with science and technology terms in both Korean and English - Experience with SDL Trados Studio or other computer-assisted translation (CAT) tools is a plus Preferred for the S&T Internet Researcher openings: - 2+ years of experience in ENGKOR translation To apply, send your resume to: govlanguage@experis.com In your email message, state your desired salary and address all the requirements as listed above. If not, your resume will not be considered.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Korean Science & Technology Translator,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Korean Science & Technology Translator, Researcher","New York, NY",http://jobview.monster.com/Korean-Science-Technology-Translator-Researcher-Job-New-York-NY-US-165874964.aspx?mescoid=2700444001001&jobPosition=4,,Biotech/R&D/Science,1c3c63d3871db5459a3ba12f55e88a7a
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:00:43:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Processor – Brentwood, TNLocation: Brentwood, TNJoin Our Legacy Team! Legacy Mutual Mortgage is an outstanding full service residential mortgage lender originating, underwriting and closing conventional, jumbo, FHA, VA and USDA mortgage loans.  In business since 2005, we are dedicated to meeting the home loan needs of individual homebuyers while working with our real estate partners in Texas (San Antonio, Austin, College Station, Houston, Fort Worth, Boerne, New Braunfels & Denton), Tennessee (Brentwood) and Colorado (Westminster/Denver). Our team members are the key to Legacy’s success, and we are looking for highly motivated, qualified individuals to join our talented team.We are currently seeking a Processor for our Brentwood, TN location.Location:210 Westwood Place, Ste. 140, Brentwood, TN 37027Position Type: Full-TimeSchedule:Monday – Friday, 8:00 – 5:00, Days and/or hours may vary and/or subject to change based on client need.Job Description: The Loan Processor will process loans in a timely and efficient manner to ensure a clean approval and timely closing. Loan Processor will work directly with Production Associate to facilitate documents as needed for loan submission into underwriting and then to closing. Position requires frequent communication with the Client, Production Associate, Loan Officer, Underwriting and Closing. Essential Functions Include:Reviews new loan submissions within 48 hours of receipt.Verifies loan is complete using a checklist and accompanying disclosures, documents, and other pertinent reference material.Returns any incomplete loans back to Production Associate with explanation of any incomplete or incorrect information.Contacts Client directly to request documentation and information needed for loan submission to Underwriting.Compiles and processes all documents as received to meet projected close date.Inputs final and validated information and reruns Automatic Underwriting System as applicable for final loan submission.Submits complete loan file to Underwriting to obtain loan approval.  Clears any conditions that require communication to the Client, title companies, appraiser, employers, surveyors, etc.Submits all documents needed to draw closing documents to the Closer.Maintains up-to-date pipeline.Must maintain regular attendance.May perform other duties as assigned.Desired Skills and Experience:·         High school diploma or equivalent with a minimum of two years’ experience in the mortgage industry.·         Mortgage industry experience preferred.  Must have working knowledge with FHA/VA/USDA/Conventional loans.Must be proficient in Encompass, Word, Excel and Outlook applicationsMust be able to work 40 hours a week during normal business hours.Must be results oriented with a strong sense of urgency.Must be organized and detail oriented.Must have a positive attitude and maintain professionalism.Must be dependable, self-motivated and require minimal supervision.We offer competitive and outstanding benefits for our full-time employees that include the following: paid medical/dental premiums for employees, paid Short and Long Term Disability for employees, Vision, Life, Supplemental insurance, 401(k) with company match and paid time off.Legacy Mutual Mortgage is a drug-free workplace and requires pre-employment drug testing. Please note Legacy Mutual Mortgage does not hire tobacco or nicotine users. Currently Legacy Mutual Mortgage does not provide sponsorship for new hires. Only qualified candidates will be contacted. No telephone calls please. For more information about our Company, please visit our website at www.legacymutual.com.Only those candidates who meet the minimum requirements need apply.To apply, please go to:https://s1.esignforms.com/CrockettNationalBank/Launch/OnlineApplicationLegacy Mutual Mortgage is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans Legacy Mutual Mortgage is a Best Place to Work Winner! Our employees want everyone to know what it’s like to work at Legacy Mutual Mortgage.  That’s why our employees voted us as one of the San Antonio Business Journal’s Best Place to Work in 2015.  Come join this award winning team to see what makes Legacy Mutual Mortgage a great place to work!",Mortgage Loan Processor Job in Brentwood,Full Time,"Brentwood, TN 37027",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Mortgage-Loan-Processor-Job-Brentwood-TN-US-167444020.aspx?mescoid=4300722001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2c3d9ecc4841974a68f4af50bcea4235
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:00:44:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sanford Rose Associates – Rhonemus Group  Banking Recruiter / Sales Account Executive Rhonemus Group ( http://sanfordrose.net/rhonemusgroup/ ) is a successful and growing executive search firm located in Columbus, OH. We're building our team and we are looking for our next Top Producer. We Are: Rhonemus Group is one of the Midwest’s leading executive search consulting firms. Founded by a 30 year veteran of the financial services and recruitment industries, we deliver talent management, career management, and succession planning services to clients and candidates.  CEO, Brian Rhonemus has built a reputation both within the search industry and the banking market as a true market specialist. The Rhonemus client base consists of credit unions, national banks, and community banking institutions; with asset sizes ranging from $50M-$14B. Brian’s keen understanding of mortgage banking, commercial lending and credit administration allows him to identify top candidates who will become successful, stellar performers for his client companies.  You Are:  ·         You are hungry for uncapped earning potential and you have a hunter mentality. ·         You possess direct sales skills; Ability to overcome objections and provide solutions; You are Competitive and Persistent.·         You are tired of the corporate ladder and want to flex your entrepreneurial muscles.·         You have a proven track record of success in your role but don’t feel that your compensation matches the value that you bring to the table. ·         You are personable and can easily build rapport with others.·         You have excellent verbal and written communication skills.·         You are excited by the opportunity to leverage your previous Banking industry knowledge in an environment where the most tenacious and driven individuals experience the most success.  A “Day-In-The-Life” of an Executive Recruiter:·         Researching and identifying the key players in your market through creative sourcing.·         Cold-calling and communicating with mid to senior level executives and discussing new career opportunities·         Preparingcandidates for their interviews to help them land that best next position·         Conducting business development calls to secure new clients Recruiting is a sales business – so individuals with a proven track record of success have assorted backgrounds in Management and Executive Management, Banking and Finance, B2B & inside sales, Executive Search and/or full cycle recruitment. If you are ready for the challenge and commitment required, we are ready to give you an opportunity that does not exist elsewhere within the search industry.    ",Banking Recruiter / Sales Account Executive Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Banking Recruiter / Sales Account Executive Job in Columbus 43085, Ohio US",BankingStaffing/Employment AgenciesFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Banking-Recruiter-Sales-Account-Executive-Job-Columbus-OH-US-167591884.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,94aa8d1ea333be43432079ccd79d77fa
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:01:04:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"StreetLinks Lender Solutions offers an innovative and differentiated suite of valuation solutions and appraisal services for mortgage industry professionals nationwide. Our commitment to quality and service, combined with our unique partnership approach to clients and appraisers, sets us apart as the nation’s premier appraisal management company (AMC).  At StreetLinks, we believe in producing valuation solutions that are number one in quality and service. Today, with the full support of Assurant, we continue to expand and enhance our appraisal services to maintain the highest level of quality available on the market while serving as a true solution partner to our clients and appraisers. Our companies strive to bring innovation and positive change to the industry, working together to deliver a comprehensive suite of valuation solutions that covers the loan cycle from origination to final collateral disposition.    The Account Executive I operate within a service center directly with our business partner, building business to business relationships by consulting and advising both businesses of systematic solutions to improve processes and procedures. The Account Executive I create and maintain open lines of communication with the objective of receiving feedback to implement changes and ensuring growth of the partner’s account. The Account Executive I is responsible for making decisions to resolve issues that will benefit both StreetLinks and the partner.   Primary Job Accountabilities/Responsibilities:    Work as a liaison between business partner and all StreetLinks departments to ensure that the specific partner’s needs are understood and met at every level of operations. Work directly with designated StreetLinks Sales Director and executive leadership. Utilize independent judgment to find resolutions to highly sensitive issues which require immediate action. Conduct monthly review calls with both companies. Respond to and route all heightened issues to the appropriate parties. Develop and deliver reports to help the business partner manage their account. Have knowledge of all departments within StreetLinks to better assist business partner with inquiries regarding specific files or general StreetLinks processes. Site visits to Dallas are required on a quarterly basis.  Basic Qualifications Required - Experience, Skills, and Knowledge:   Bachelor's Degree or 3 years of operational experience in an Appraisal Management company with 1 year of client management experience in Appraisal Management.  5 years customer service or client management experience in a professional call center environment. 2  years using Microsoft Outlook, Word and Excel. 3 year mortgage industry knowledge or knowledge of the valuation process.Preferred Experience, Skills, and Knowledge:   Ability to speak clearly and persuasively; listens and gets clarification. Communicates effectively both orally and written. Ability to handle multiple priorities and meet deadlines. Strong relationship-building and relationship management skills. Ability to process confidential information and consistently perform with a high level of customer service. Proven problem solving skills. Ability to lead by example and drive tasks through to completion. Commitment to quality work product and prompt attention to detail. Must demonstrate success and experience operating multiple software applications. Additional Information:",Account Executive I Job in Jacksonville,Full Time Employee,"Jacksonville, FL 32099",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Account-Executive-I-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-167056270.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,955c4d1ac46010d446d45efe434ca517
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:01:22:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"***Looking for candidates with experience in Utah*** RedVision® combines innovative technology with skilled professionals to be the premier nationwide provider of real property title data, search examination and curative-ready solutions.  That’s fancy talk for “we hire the best people and offer our customers the complete package.” Here is what might interest you most about RedVision:Positions available all across the nation; office locations and telecommuting opportunitiesCompetitive compensation plan based on your skills, experience and trainingFamily-centric culture, promoting work-life balance, flexibility and recognitionComprehensive benefit package for all full-time positionsWeb-based training programs for professional growthNamed by INC. Magazine’s BUILD 100 index for a record five-year job growth in 2014, which means potential opportunitiesMultiple awards for a Top Job-Creating Company and Innovative TechnologyExponential growth and expanded coverage to nationwide since 2001  Does this sound like the right company for you?POSITION SUMMARY:This position is responsible for examining titles ranging in complexity, to determine status of title or establish chain of title. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Abstract and examine deeds, deeds of trust/mortgages, easements, judgments, liens, tax assessments, mineral reservations, and other applicable instruments.Verify vesting and encumbrances to title.Prepare title reports.Review of files that may be too complicated to be completed by other departments.Provide service to RedVision customers.Aid other departments with their workload if time permits.Perform other duties and responsibilities as assigned. The duties and responsibilities listed above are representative of the nature and levels of work assigned and are not necessarily all-inclusive. EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE Required:High School Diploma or GED 1-2 years of experience performing title examinations in the state of UtahComputer skills including Microsoft Office and Internet Explorer SKILLS/COMPETENCIESRequired:Ability to work in an accurate, detail-oriented and highly productive mannerWorking knowledge of legal documents affecting title to real property and methods by which they are recorded, liens, encumbrances and circumstances that affect title to real propertyKnowledge of local filing requirements, recording fees, and abstracting proceduresKnowledge of surveys and plotting metes & boundsFamiliarity with all procedures performed in commitment production- including abstracts, examinations, document retrieval, survey, plat maps, tax data, etc.PC proficiency in Title SoftwareAbility to perform basic mathematical calculations and tasks requiring detail, concentration and accuracyAbility to communicate professionally, both verbally and in writingAbility to work both independently and contribute in every aspect to a team environment Equal Opportunity EmployerRedVision Systems, Inc. is committed to providing equal employment opportunity (EEO) and diversity that helps us to offer not only an ideal place to work, but also to supply an environment where our employees and our customers can achieve their goals and unite with each other. We take affirmative action to ensure that applicants and employees are treated fairly, without regard to their age, race, creed, color, ancestry, national origin, marital status, disability or history of disability, veteran status, nationality, or sex/gender.  ",Full Time - Real Estate Title Examiner - Utah,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT 84110",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Real-Estate-Title-Examiner-Utah-US-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-167648002.aspx?mescoid=2300334001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b00145e02840f688f7bbf93ebe79e017
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:01:42:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ensure the physical security of bank locations at all times, including after hours and during emergency situations. Conduct daily surveillance of video feed for branches, ensure surveillance equipment is working property and respond to service issues. Assist AVP, Director of Security with issuing alarm codes and fob access to new employees and checking ATMs for tampering on a regular basis. Conduct security training for new hires and all employees and respond to emergency situations and after hours alarm calls as needed. ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES On a daily basis, conduct random surveillance audits on retail branch locations by reviewing live and history feed from security video cameras. Ensure equipment is working correctly, verify clock time is correct and make adjustments if needed. Respond to branch robberies by pulling security video and providing to law enforcement agencies and insurance companies involved in investigation. Conduct branch visit on behalf of AVP, Director of Security if necessary, write up incident and send copy of write up to appropriate internal and external contacts, including the branch manager of the office robbed. Respond to general inquiries from law enforcement and insurance companies, as needed. Respond to service issues from the branches such as video, alarm equipment (burg and fire), card access and dye packs. Either contact service vendor or visit location to resolve and document service call for internal tracking. Assist AVP, Director of Security administer card/fob access and alarm users on system. Attend new employee orientation and conduct presentation on bank security. Provide new employees with fob and alarm access if needed, depending on region and document for internal tracking. Attend retail teller training and conduct presentation on robbery procedures. Review monthly reports from branch and conduct branch audit for each location using audit form. Conduct annual security inspection of all locations by reviewing all items related to security from equipment to branch layout to ensure there are no security issues that need to be addressed. Conduct remote ATM visits to check for any type of tampering weekly or as needed. If needed, for employee termination be on site to escort employee out of building and off bank property. QUALIFICATIONS High school diploma or equivalent. 1 to 3 years experience in physical security, law enforcement, or loss prevention, preferably in banking or financial services or equivalent in related coursework, training, or experience. Strong verbal and written communication skills and ability to effectively communicate with all level employees, external customers, and when necessary law enforcement/court personnel. DEGREE OF INDEPENDENT ACTION Functions independently, makes decisions within bank policies and procedures, refers to supervisor for guidance on complex or sensitive situations that can have great impact on bank operations or security such as emergency situations or after hour calls. East Boston Savings Bank is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that recruits and hires qualified candidates without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability, or protected veteran status.",Assistant Security Manager () Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA 02127",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Security-Manager-2016007-Job-Boston-MA-US-167082354.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=20,,,aaca2ee80f995baaf527ed8b4a773bec
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:01:43:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SummarySupport Production and Operations to ensure proper pipeline monitoring of ECOA / Reg-B regulation to meet requirements for timely, accurate ECOA action and delivery of ""Withdrawn"" applications. Provide a high level of customer service and partnership with Single Family Production, Operations Fulfillment, and Compliance.Job DetailsPRIMARY FUNCTIONS:Monitor and Prepare ECOA/Reg-B Notifications as assigned to ensure that ECOA delivery is met and compliant on all Withdrawn applications.Maintain and monitor personal caseload as assigned to ensure timeliness of delivery.Maintain knowledge of HomeStreet Bank's operations, organization and process/procedure in order to support the ECOA process.Understand applicable elements, process/procedure and compliance requirements specifically for ECOA/Reg-B ""Withdrawn"" Applications.Monitor reports and pipelines to ensure loan flow is optimal and Service Level Objectives are met.Work to create and maintain excellent partnership with Production, Operations, Compliance and other departments.Perform other duties as requested and assigned.Participate in departmental projects as assigned.QUALIFICATIONS:Minimum of 1 years of experience in mortgage disclosures, processing and/or mortgage compliance is preferred.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Strong desire and ability to work with employees in a co-operative, professional and friendly manner.Ability to use required software and learn new programs as necessary.Must be a self-starter, dependable, accurate in completing responsibilities with strong attention to detail, strong organizational skills and accuracy.Ability to work independently, set priorities and handle multiple tasks.Ability to handle stress and to deal with extreme changes in work volume.Ability to use good judgment, accept responsibility and handle confidential customer information.Ability to work as part of a team and with people of diverse backgrounds.Willingness to assume additional duties/projects as required.Ability to accept and help to facilitate change.PHYSICAL CONSIDERATIONS:Willing and able to travelWORK ENVIRONMENT:Normal office environmentThis Position Description may not be limited to the Functions and Requirements as outlined, now or in the future. For example, changes in corporate needs, position demands, or individual performance may result in changes to the Functions or Requirements of this position.AreaResidential (Corporate)HomeStreet Bank is an Equal Opportunity/ Affirmative Action Employer. Minorities, females, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply.",ECOA/Reg-B Specialist I Job in Federal Way,Full Time Employee,"Federal Way, WA 98003",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/ECOA-Reg-B-Specialist-I-Job-Federal-Way-WA-US-167654690.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=6,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,9493a3a7a18bc35d3030d5396b5d88bf
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:02:18:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description SummaryThe Senior Residential Collateral Risk Analyst position is primarily responsible for evaluating complex residential appraisals for investment grade loans to ensure the reasonableness of the collateral in terms of risk, valuation and long-term safety and soundness. Specifically, this position includes performing full technical and/or limited scope appraisal assessments that identify deficiencies and document corrective action and ensure timely completion of assignments to meet or exceed established service level agreements (SLAs). The position also requires a high level of interaction with independent fee appraisers, i.e., problem solving, mentoring, and coaching. Duties may also include training and monitoring the quality and completeness of appraisals performed by HSB Staff Appraisers and trainees. Additionally, duties may include performing in-house appraisal functions.Job DetailsESSENTIAL/PRIMARY FUNCTIONS:Perform efficient and effective risk assessment and mitigation of complex residential appraisals within the assigned geographic areas of responsibility,Identify deficiencies within the appraisals and document corrective action and ensure timely completion of assignments to meet or exceed established service level agreements (SLAs) and production requirements,Determine the completeness, accuracy and compliance with the minimum appraisal standards of Title XI of FIRREA, USPAP and other various lending programs (FNMA, FHA, VA, etc.),Advise, train, counsel and mentor the staff and/or fee panel appraisers to solve complex problems, work within regulatory guidelines, address Reconsiderations of Value (ROVs), etc.,Working with Single Family Appraisal Department personnel including Managers, Collateral Risk Assistants, and Coordinators, to successfully manage and prioritize assignment/file volume to ensure meeting of production service level agreements and standards and turn-time goals,Work closely with Single Family Operations to ensure transparent and accurate reporting and tracking,Develop and advance communication and relations by interacting with Underwriting, Operations, and Production on as ""as needed"" basis to resolve conflicts/problem solve, prioritize workflow, and assist in the refinement of process flows,Be proactive in consistent process improvement and streamlining. Adapt to, and implement frequent changes in processes and assume additional responsibilities as they arise. These responsibilities may include performing in-house appraisal production, specialized duties on a part or full-time basis, etc.QUALIFICATIONS/REQUIREMENTS:Have an active Certified Residential or General Certified Real Estate Appraiser credential in one or more of the states in HomeStreet Bank's lending footprint.Have at least seven years of residential appraisal experience, including a minimum of three years of single-family review experience, including complex property types (high-value, waterfront, rural, acreage, proposed custom construction and 2-4 unit properties).Have a 4-year college degreeHave a strong ability, desire and enjoyment in working with others in a collaborative, cooperative, professional and friendly spirit.Possess excellent communication skills, both verbal and written, and the ability to effectively interact with both internal HSB personnel and external vendors, Realtors, borrowers, etc.Work cooperatively with and maintain effective communication and working relationships with co-workers and managers. Must be able to work independently and with a strong sense of urgency.Possess strong computer skills, including Microsoft Word and Microsoft Excel, familiarity with multiple listing service database(s) and internet search skills.Must be a self-starter, dependable, work well under pressure and be flexible in doing assorted tasks. Have a willingness to perform to meet department goals and deadlines.Have strong attention to detail, organizational skills, accuracy and problem solving.Be adaptable to change, be it internal, market or regulatory.Possess good judgment, ability to accept responsibility and handle confidential information.Have awareness of regional economies and general market trends in assigned areas.Have a valid driver's license, vehicle and liability insurance.Some travel may be required.This Position Description may not be limited to the Functions and Requirements as outlined, now or in the future. For example, changes in corporate needs, position demands, or individual performance may result in changes to the Functions or Requirements of this position.AreaAppraisal (Sales)HomeStreet Bank is an Equal Opportunity/ Affirmative Action Employer. Minorities, females, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply.",Senior Collateral Risk Analyst Job in Pasco,Full Time Employee,"Pasco, WA 99301",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Collateral-Risk-Analyst-Job-Pasco-WA-US-167729815.aspx?mescoid=1300107001001&jobPosition=16,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,4758404249648914e72b8b84cb6b846f
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:02:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Calling all Residential Staff Appraisers!    Join an established team built by Appraisers and help us grow our valuation services.  We have opportunities across the US and working remotely from home!    Enjoy the flexibility of the appraisal industry and the benefits of a Fortune 500 company.        StreetLinks is a wholly owned subsidiary of Assurant (Fortune 500 company with $30 billion in assets and $8 billion in annual revenue) and the benefits include matching 401K program, employee stock ownership, tuition reimbursement, employee referral bonuses and paid time off.  We offer a competitive salary with an attractive incentive plan. We reward performance that yields high levels of customer service, and quality. StreetLinks Lender Solutions offers an innovative and differentiated suite of valuation solutions and appraisal services for the mortgage industry nationwide. At StreetLinks, we believe in producing valuation solutions that are number one in quality and service setting us apart as the nation’s premier appraisal management company (AMC). Today, backed by Assurant, we continue to expand and enhance our valuation services.       As a Staff Appraiser, you will be responsible for the timely and accurate completion of various forms of Real Estate Valuations and reviews for associated lending transactions.   Key responsibilities include:   Completion of Field Appraisals with associated duties Communication of process milestones Participate in regular meetings with Leadership to identify regional trends, discuss opportunities and develop objectives based on direction Identify and escalate critical service related client concerns and/or outdated/incomplete order information to Client Advocate   Basic Qualifications: Actively Certified Residential Appraiser meeting the qualifications of all State level Appraisal Management Company Registration Acts. No current or pending Disciplinary Action for any state No revocation without reinstatement for any state No prior disciplinary that resulted in suspension, denial, revocation, that has not been subsequently be reinstated – appraisal, real estate, or lending related licenses   Preferred Qualifications: 5 years appraising experience Mortgage Lending Experience/Knowledge National Desktop Appraisal Review Experience Geographic Competency of all Real Estate related trends associated with the Appraisal/Valuation Process. Must demonstrate strong evaluation and analysis skills, excellent attention to details, team player, high energy, and self-starter Demonstrate strong analytical ability required to review quantitative and qualitative data and render professional judgments based upon USPAP and client guidelines Ability to communicate both orally and written, speak clearly and persuasively; listens and gets clarification; Ability to handle multiple priorities and meet deadlines in a fast paced environment Proficient with Industry Standardized Appraisal Software Ability to process confidential information and consistently perform with a high level of customer service Proficient in operating a computer and other office equipment, such as multi-line telephone, computer printer, copy machines, fax machines, etc. Occasional holiday shifts may be required based on business needs. Airplane and automobile travel may also be necessary, sometimes with short notice. Must adhere to all safety rules and regulations Can operate office equipment and cameras  Regular schedules will be provided by manager. (Weekends required based on business needs.)      Apply now and let us tell you more about this opportunity! . Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 5%",Staff Appraisers- opportunities across the US and working remotely from home! Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"Las Vegas, NV 89101",AllAccounting and Auditing ServicesConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Appraisers-opportunities-across-the-US-working-remotely-from-home!-Job-Las-Vegas-NV-US-167646589.aspx?mescoid=1300104001001&jobPosition=18,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,95093402e540711273d8353d1b52262e
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:02:44:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an exciting opening for a well qualified, experienced Residential Loan Underwriter who is seeking an amazing opportunity!This position is responsible to ensure loans meet all program and product specifications. Examine loan documentation for accuracy and completeness to determine credit worthiness. Works with the production staff to secure all required documentation. May be involved in several types of mortgage lending (Conventional, Portfolio, etc.).  The qualified individual will have a Bachelor’s degree (B.A.) from four-year college or university; and two or more years of direct Mortgage Underwriting experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.   We are looking to add talented team members who desire to be on a winning team with opportunities for career advancement.HERE ARE JUST SOME OF THE BENEFITS YOU’LL ENJOY: ·        Full Benefits; Dental, Medical, Vision plus paid time off and holidays ·        401K Plan with Match ·        Innovation in Products, Programs, ServicesFor more information and to apply for this position candidates should apply online.EOE Minorities/Women/Disabled/VetsVEVRAA Federal Contractor",Residential Underwriter Job in Southfield,Full Time Employee,"Southfield, MI 48076",,http://jobview.monster.com/Residential-Underwriter-Job-Southfield-MI-US-167721553.aspx?mescoid=1300110001001&jobPosition=6,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,f6240c5dd7dd246e16fa223fead5200f
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:03:44:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mortgage Company seeking DE underwriter with a minimum of 5 years experience to underwrite various loan programs to include, but not limited to, FHA/VA/Conv/USDA/Bond Programs for the Mid Atlantic Region.  Region is well established with production team currently closing a high percentage of purchase volume.Candidate must be detail oriented, very organized and have the ability to work independently as well as a team player.  Competitive compensation with company benefits to include medical, dental, vision, 401K,sick and vacation time. Please forward resume with salary history and requirements.EOE",Mortgage Underwriter Job in Columbia,Full Time,"Columbia, MD 21045",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Mortgage-Underwriter-Job-Columbia-MD-US-167540423.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),af69caed88b3ae1abee5fc6dc9b9c04d
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:03:44:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Mortgage Re-Underwriter to join their team in San Antonio, Texas (TX).Duties: Engages primarily in the re-underwriting, review and classification of residential mortgage loans corresponding to that of a typical regulatory or due diligence review; Will evaluate the underwriting and credit administration practices (i.e., applicable Underwriting Guidelines) Evaluate financial institution's management performance on correcting issues identified in formal and informal actions related to the lending function; Assesses adequacy of compliance with loan policies Determine if loans were made within the financial institution's policy and compliance and with governing regulations when applicable Prepare a list of Technical Exceptions (documentation deficiencies) Discusses findings with Senior Underwriters, Project Manager and/or Department Directors; Makes recommendations regarding loan portfolio deficiencies Reviews unusual or complex loan files; Analyzes financial information, file documentation, and prepares questions for Senior Underwriters regarding the credit reviewedREQUIREMENTS: A BS degree or equivalent experience in a directly related underwriting or due diligence position Three years of Mortgage Underwriting experience required; Five or more years of mortgage underwriting experience preferred; Please do not apply if you do not have at least three years of experience as an underwriter Strong analytical, written and verbal communication skills Knowledge of FNMA, Freddie Mac and /or FHA underwriting guidelines Proficiency in Windows-based computer application including Word and Excel Ability to function independently with minimal supervision and high production environment education and experience Able to analyze cash flow from tax returns and financial statements Able to handle more complex, higher risk accounts with some guidance and direction from underwriters",Mortgage Re-Underwriter Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Antonio, TX 78230",,http://jobview.monster.com/Mortgage-Re-Underwriter-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-167763296.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e896b1a6ba7aa13974375bffddc6ba70
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:04:40:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Banking Operations/Payments - Senior RepresentativeHave you ever wondered if it were possible to work for a company where you could combine your Christian worldview with meaningful and challenging work opportunities?  ECCU offers just this opportunity to those desiring to integrate their faith with other Christians who are passionate about serving the Lord. Who are we looking for?In addition to identifying and agreeing with our Statement of Faith, the candidate selected for this role has an opportunity to increase the effectiveness of the team members located in our Electronic Processing team.   This candidate is one who demonstrates a servant’s heart and a can-do attitude while serving the commercial banking needs of our membership with excellence.What's distinctive about this position? This role gives the candidate the opportunity to deliver service to members over multiple types of electronic payment products including Automated Clearing House (ACH) file origination and receiving, foreign and domestic wire transfers, check inclearing, and other related tasks.  The ideal candidate should possess the ability to understand and apply current banking laws and NACHA rules to everyday processing situations.What are some responsibilities of this position?Ensures timely delivery of service such that all requests processed in the department are completed within the Service Standards or established time limits.  Appropriately escalates all requests that fall outside of the established standards.Adheres to internal security controls implemented by the Credit Union, and external regulations such as those documented by NACHA and the Federal Government, to reduce and/or eliminate fraudulent activity and to ensure compliance.  What are some requirements of this position?Strong attention to detail combined with good analytical and problem solving skillsTechnically adept; able to learn and utilize a range of processing programsKnowledge of Uniform Commercial Code, NACHA, and other applicable laws and regulations pertaining to checks, ACH, wires, and the banking system, including Regulation E, Regulation CC, Regulation J, Regulation DD and BSAGeneral knowledge of the wire, ACH and check payment systems What’s distinctive about ECCU?ECCU provides a comprehensive and competitive total rewards package that, when combined with the opportunity for daily Kingdom impact, creates an immensely gratifying and unparalleled work/life experience.",Banking Operations/Payments - Senior Representative Job in Brea,Full Time,"Brea, CA 92821",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Banking-Operations-Payments-Senior-Representative-Job-Brea-CA-US-167642838.aspx?mescoid=4300698001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,bca2d5d57216810ff9fe4b3a98c50ea7
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:04:41:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"About CBRE (NYSE: CBG): At CBRE, you are empowered to take your career path into your own hands. Enjoy workplace flexibility in a global organization with tremendous scale. Work in an inclusive and collaborative environment with supportive teammates. Come experience the employee advantage at CBRE. CBRE has a long-standing commitment to providing equal employment opportunity to all qualified applicants regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, veteran status, political belief, or any other basis protected by applicable law. As a Fortune 500 worldwide leader in real estate services, CBRE’s more than 70,000 professionals provide exceptional outcomes for clients in 60+ countries. When it comes to real estate, CBRE sees potential everywhere. We turn scale into strength, expense into performance, and property into prosperity. Visit CBRE.com. Debt Structured Finance- Capital Markets located in Charlotte, NC   Responsible for generating fee income through the placement of debt and equity instruments in the capital markets. Must understand and articulate the fundamental concepts, practices and procedures associated with commercial real estate finance, including commercial appraising, market analysis and investment analysis. Seasoned loan producer with fees of at least $710,325 a year for five of last seven years. Threshold origination fees may change from year-to-year. Creates, cultivates and maintains a local and national client base for the generation of fee income from debt and equity placements. Coordinates marketing efforts that include print, electronic and personal contacts. Provides advisory services to clients with an ultimate goal to obtain “trusted advisor status”. Create an ongoing and expanding relationship with CBRE personnel to collaboratively make business pitches and provide ancillary finance support information. Works and coordinates with IP/IG/PCG sales professionals to improve overall client relationship and transaction. Actively involved and/or member in local and national commercial real estate organizations such as NAIOP, ULI, MBA, CCIM, etc. committees. Works in tandem with analysts in the preparation of loan submission reports for review by capital providers. Provides a team approach with professionals in the local office; available for continuous training and/or mentoring of analysts. Works within and fosters CBRE RISE principles. Other duties as assigned. Provides formal supervision to individual employees within single functional or operational area. Recommends staff recruitment, selection, promotion, advancement, corrective action and termination. Plans and monitors appropriate staffing levels and utilization of labor, including overtime. Prepares and delivers performance appraisal for staff. Mentors and coaches team members to further develop competencies. Leads by example and models behaviors that are consistent with the company's values.  Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university; Master's degree or MBA preferred. Seven (7) to ten (10)  years of Capital Markets and  mortgage banking experience. Real Estate Salesperson license or willingness to obtain. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Strong organizational and analytical skills. Ability to provide efficient, timely, reliable and courteous service to customers. Ability to effectively present information. Ability to respond effectively to sensitive issues. Requires advanced knowledge of financial terms and principles. Ability to calculate intermediate figures such as percentages, discounts, and commissions. Conducts advanced financial analysis. Ability to comprehend, analyze, and interpret complex documents. Ability to solve problems involving several options in situations. Requires advanced analytical and quantitative skills. Proficient in Microsoft Suite products including: Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, Excel, etc. Knowledge of ARGUS preferred. Decisions made with thorough understanding of procedures, company policies, and business practices to achieve general results and deadlines. Responsible for setting work unit and/or project deadlines. Errors in judgment may cause short-term impact to department.  CBRE was voted #15 Best Company to Work for in 2016 in Forbes Magazine To learn more about CBRE, please view our video at the link below: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vMGR3yeTyVw Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",LP - Senior Vice President Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC 28201",,http://jobview.monster.com/LP-Senior-Vice-President-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-167547383.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,d31500dd450b8d712deeccf8529e13db
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:05:38:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Northpointe Bank – Personal Banker Position Description  The POWER of a CAREER! Northpointe Bank is seeking a detail oriented, customer service minded individual to join our Banking Office Team as a Personal Banker. This position requires an individual who has the desire to make a difference within the organization. An exceptional ability to grasp new concepts and learn while providing excellent service is critical for this position. If you have been looking for an opportunity in the mortgage industry, have the desire to work hard, are dedicated to your individual success, and take pride in the achievement and growth within a team, then we want to hear from you!!! This position will focus on providing outstanding banking services and developing and retaining relationships with deposit customers.Responsibilities:Provide a welcoming environment to all Northpointe Bank clients.Provide outstanding customer service by assisting customers with deposits, payments, cashing checks, opening new customer accounts, answering rate questions, and assisting customers with bank account inquiries.Update customer account files as needed (i.e., name, address, and rate changes). Assist in review of customer account changes for accuracy and adherence to bank policies.Sell deposit products and services offered by Northpointe Bank.Research and resolve more complex customer problems regarding deposit accounts including research of bank statements and cancelled checks. Assist with preparation and retention of standard account verification, garnishments, and levies documentation and correspondence.  Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent.Working knowledge of traditional banking products.At least three years of customer service experience within a financial institution.Professional demeanor and interaction with all customers (internal and external).Effective interpersonal and communication (written and verbal) skills.Ability to work effectively in a team-oriented environment as well as independently.Ability to develop strong working relationships and perform effectively within a team-oriented environment as well as independently.Ability to pay attention to detail while handling a high volume of work with multiple interruptions.Proficient computer skills (i.e., Microsoft Word, Excel, Outlook, any other mortgage/banking software, etc.).Our Hiring Philosophy:Northpointe Bank recognizes that the quality of our people is the foundation for our success. Attracting individuals who value a challenging work environment that rewards the contributions of its people is the cornerstone of our hiring philosophy.It is the policy of Northpointe Bank and its subsidiaries to provide equal employment opportunities(EEO) to all persons regardless of age, race, sex, religion, national origin, handicap, marital status, or other attributes not pertinent to the job requirements. This policy reflects our practice of making all employment decisions, from recruitment to promotions, based on an individual's qualifications without discrimination on any basis.Benefit Information:MedicalDentalVisionLife, LTD, & AD&DDependent Care Spending Plan (DCSA)Employer Stock Ownership Plan with 401(k) feature and company matchComplimentary Banking ServicesTuition AssistanceAA - EOE",Personal Banker Job in Grand Rapids,Full Time,"Grand Rapids, MI 49546",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/Personal-Banker-Job-Grand-Rapids-MI-US-167537740.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,720f811318f241534b10dfd11b44af94
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:05:42:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Project Manager with healthcare experience, please read on. We are a growing firm in a real niche market. With multiple FL offices, we are looking for project managers who can help us manage healthcare construction projects in the sub $5M space. Because we are a smaller firm, as the PM you will have full responsibility of the entire project.What You Will Be Doing- You will be directly responsible for working with the design team throughout the various pre-construction phases- Provide estimates, budgets, analyzing constructability, offering alternate/optional information to help the design team stay within the budget. - Prepare bid packages, facilitate the bid process, review proposals, negotiate contracts, write contracts, award contracts, and administer construction contracts. - Responsible for setting up budgets, schedules, cash flows, review monthly contractor requisitions, prepare owner requisitions, conduct owner/subcontractor meetings, manage changes, coordinate with the project executive, monitor the construction team, close-out procedures, schedule of values, and forecast/update on weekly basis.What You Need for this Position- Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Construction Management, or related field- Minimum of 6 years experience of stable, progressively responsible general contracting experience, including at least 2 years of project management experience in healthcare, or similar sector construction projects with most of your projects being in the $250-$3M range- A proven track record of excellent client and subcontractor relationships - Ability to take a project from concept through completion.So, if you are a Project Manager with construction experience, preferably in the healthcare space, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Project Manager - Construction with healthcare experience | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Tony Zerio,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-construction-with-healthcare-experience-job-fort-myers-fl-us-174916195.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=6,,,c14927c51fac2d34c3c4ed981bac688d
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:05:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782807 Job Views: 65 Location: ROSEBORO, North Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 28382 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Roseboro,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782807 Job Views: 65 Location: ROSEBORO, North Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 28382 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-roseboro-nc-us-175420772.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,44a9f4a04bc2c77a93e5177ed0c0d001
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:05:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job My client is an association of construction and real estate development companies. Though its residential wing is a young enterprise, it has grown and flourished rapidly and continues to do so with several projects underway in King, Pierce and Kitsap counties.They are now hiring experienced project managers with experience estimating new jobs. Responsibilities will include preparing and coordinating full project estimates and managing construction process through completion.Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Flat org structure2. Competitive salary and great benefits3. A chance to work with the brightest minds in the industryWhat You Will Be Doing- Know and understand how to read construction drawings- Oversee and direct construction projects from conception to completion- Create, review and manage project in-depth to schedule deliverables and estimate costs- Oversee all onsite and offsite construction to monitor compliance with building and safety regulations- Find, coordinate and maintain relationships with all subcontractors- Create and maintain realistic construction schedules and budgets- Track and fulfill projects within or under the approved budgets- Meet contractual conditions of performance- Review the work progress on daily basis- Prepare internal and external reports pertaining to job status- Plan ahead to prevent problems and resolve any emerging ones- Negotiate terms of agreements, draft contracts and obtain permits and licenses- Analyze, manage and mitigate risks- Ensure quality construction standards and the use of proper construction techniques- Prepare detailed project schedules before start of every job- Track schedules weekly and complete projects on or before schedule- Managing multiple concurrent projects in various stages of completion- Develop and maintain relationships will clientsWhat You Need for this Position- Degree in Construction Management or at least five years of progressively responsible construction experience in the project management role.- Experience in ground up construction- Safety standards and practices- Capable of developing scope of work, budget, schedule and other documents necessary to successfully manage construction projects.- Knowledge of all construction codes, laws and regulations- Decision making skills- Communication skills- Team work oriented- Proficient in computer programs (MICROSOFT PROJECT IS A PLUS)Required education:- Bachelor's degreeRequired experience:- Estimating: 1 year- Construction Estimating: 2 yearsRequired license or certification:- Driver's LicenseWhat's In It for YouWe offer competitive pay, health insurance, paid time off, job training, leadership opportunities and advancement.So, if you are a Construction Project Manager/Estimator with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager/Estimator - Estimating,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Justin Kim,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-estimator-estimating-bidding-co-job-redmond-wa-us-175351510.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=15,,,b33f1c717494dc342d8b31bd39711684
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:06:41:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Manager / Senior Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill be the owner’s representative on site for transportation construction projectsReport project status, needs and issues to the client engineer dailyProvide oversight and construction inspection on DOT / CFLHD and related transportation projectsPerforms inspection of civil engineering projects in regard to compliance to project plans and specificationsProvides review for RFI, COC’s, CTR’s and submittals for projects and makes recommendations regarding suitabilityUnderstand and interpret plans and specificationsReviews contractor change order requestsReviews / audits contractor health and safety plans, contractor payroll, traffic control and erosion control measures on projectsVerifies quantities for contractor paymentIndentifies non-conformance issues with construction work and helps develop potential resolution of non-conformance issuesDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experienceLicensed Professional Engineer (PE) preferred10+ years transportation construction related experienceRelevant certifications are a plusDemonstrated understanding and experience with DOT and / or CFLHD related infrastructure projectsProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerExperience related to materials testing and inspection of general earthwork and site grading, utilities, retaining walls, structural concrete, bridges, utilities and pipelines, paving (asphalt and concrete) and pedestrian facilitiesThorough knowledge and understanding of federal documentation requirements and contract requirementsStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within project team environment to help deliver successful projectsAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable. Report",Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Amec Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure has several transportation Construction Manager / Senior Inspector opportunities in the Western US. We are currently accepting resumes for upcoming projects in various locations. Our ideal candidate has superb technical capabilities, a commitment to delivering a quality product and the ability to provide expert service to key clientele throughout the Western US. Work LocationsLocations may include Arizona, Colorado, California, Nevada, New Mexico, Texas, Utah, Wyoming or other western states. Key ResponsibilitiesWill be the owner’s representative on site for transportation construction projectsReport project status, needs and issues to the client engineer dailyProvide oversight and construction inspection on DOT / CFLHD and related transportation projectsPerforms inspection of civil engineering projects in regard to compliance to project plans and specificationsProvides review for RFI, COC’s, CTR’s and submittals for projects and makes recommendations regarding suitabilityUnderstand and interpret plans and specificationsReviews contractor change order requestsReviews / audits contractor health and safety plans, contractor payroll, traffic control and erosion control measures on projectsVerifies quantities for contractor paymentIndentifies non-conformance issues with construction work and helps develop potential resolution of non-conformance issuesDevelops and completes project documentation using a computer. Will work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerWill travel and work at construction sites within the Western United States. Travel, hotel and per diem provided for field assignmentsSkills / QualificationsBS in Civil Engineering, Construction Management or related degree or extensive field experienceLicensed Professional Engineer (PE) preferred10+ years transportation construction related experienceRelevant certifications are a plusDemonstrated understanding and experience with DOT and / or CFLHD related infrastructure projectsProficient computer skills required. Must be able to work with client specific software such as One Note and AASHTOWare Project SiteManagerExperience related to materials testing and inspection of general earthwork and site grading, utilities, retaining walls, structural concrete, bridges, utilities and pipelines, paving (asphalt and concrete) and pedestrian facilitiesThorough knowledge and understanding of federal documentation requirements and contract requirementsStrong written and verbal communication skillsAbility to work within project team environment to help deliver successful projectsAbility and willingness to travel and work at construction sites within the Western United StatesAbility to lift up to 40 poundsAbility to walk on uneven ground and work in variable outside conditionsAbility to work various shifts depending upon construction schedulesMust pass drug test, physical, background check and have a satisfactory driving record in accordance with the company's driving (MVR) policyIf you believe you have the necessary knowledge, experience and enthusiasm to succeed in this position, then we would like to hear from you.Amec Foster Wheeler (www.amecfw.com) designs, delivers and maintains strategic and complex assets for its customers across the global energy and related sectors.  Employing around 36,000 people in more than 55 countries and with 2015 revenues of £5.5 billion, the company operates across the oil and gas industry – from production through to refining, processing and distribution of derivative products – and in the mining, clean energy, power generation, pharma, environment and infrastructure markets.  Amec Foster Wheeler offers full life-cycle services to offshore and onshore oil and gas projects (conventional and unconventional, upstream, midstream and downstream) for greenfield, brownfield and asset support projects, plus leading refining technology.  Amec Foster Wheeler shares are publicly traded on the London Stock Exchange and its American Depositary Shares are traded on the New York Stock Exchange. Both trade under the ticker AMFW. Our Environment & Infrastructure Americas business is a leading environment and infrastructure, engineering, consulting and project management organization with about 150 offices and more than 5,500 employees. Our team of professionals provides a full range of services to clients in a wide range of sectors including government services, clean energy, industrial/pharmaceutical, water, transportation/infrastructure, mining and oil & gas. We are an equal opportunity employer that recognizes the value of a diverse workforce. All qualified individuals will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability and/or protected veteran status in accordance with governing laws. By submitting your resume, you consent to Amec Foster Wheeler Americas Limited sharing this information within its divisions in order to identify other employment opportunities for which you may be suitable.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure; Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manager-senior-inspector-on-call-job-salt-lake-city-ut-us-174611984.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,,bfd4bf01e9c1f2f64b2d4b12dc0af9b6
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:06:42:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782873 Job Views: 68 Location: WISHEK, North Dakota, United States ZIP Code: 58495 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Wishek,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782873 Job Views: 68 Location: WISHEK, North Dakota, United States ZIP Code: 58495 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-wishek-nd-us-175420527.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,fdd7004483cd5d69c6b9f9702acad527
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:06:52:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783129 Job Views: 90 Location: NEWPORT, Oregon, United States ZIP Code: 97365 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Newport,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783129 Job Views: 90 Location: NEWPORT, Oregon, United States ZIP Code: 97365 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-newport-or-us-175419698.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=19,,Entry Level,aa0759fc2d59508b1c62907d37c3a6ae
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:07:44:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 788033 Job Views: 96 Location: WEST MONROE, Louisiana, United States ZIP Code: 71292 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job in West Monroe,Full Time Employee,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 788033 Job Views: 96 Location: WEST MONROE, Louisiana, United States ZIP Code: 71292 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91l-construction-vehicle-repairer-job-west-monroe-la-us-175402688.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,7f0b8c7bc8615ac947f8418d325c7cdc
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:07:45:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Construction,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manufacturing-cleaning-services-start-your-own-business-with-the-master's-touch-job-charlottesville-va-us-170732897.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,63ac35470f412dc32f946b765ffd6ede
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:08:39:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are one of the largest general contracting companies in the nation. We are currently looking to add a motivated hard working Superintendent that is looking for a long term position to our team in the beautiful Bay Area of CA. We take pride in our work culture and foster a challenging fun work environment with the opportunity for growth.What You Will Be DoingWe hire folks who can build our future business and adhere to the highest ethical practices.- Coordinates and supervises all construction activities.- Maintains safe, secure, and healthy work environment by following and enforcing standards and procedures; complying with legal regulations.- Directs all field personnel to achieve completion of the project on schedule, within budget, and with quality workmanship that conforms to original plans and specifications.- Self-perform various Carpentry task assigned by the PM.- Understands the project plans and specifications.- Tracks and receives material deliveries; resolving delivery discrepancies.- Provides daily and weekly progress reports for each project.- Prepares schedules and supervises completion of punch lists.- Maintains an organized and clean job site.- Manage schedulesWhat You Need for this Position- Bachelor’s Degree in Construction Management or Engineering required- 5+ years experience- Knowledge of construction principles/practices required- Experienced dealing with subcontracts, subcontractors and/or self-perform work- Experience leading successful project team, including development of employee and maintaining relationships with external entities- Excellent organizational, team management, problem solving, motivational skills.- Strong scheduling skills- OSHA 10 or 30 certificationWhat's In It for You- PTO- Competitive Salaries - Comprehensive Benefits - 401(k)- Endless Growth Potential - Full pension- So Much More!!So, if you are a Superintendent looking for an exciting and challenging long term position with a great company, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Superintendent | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Devin Cochran,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-superintendent-job-hayward-ca-us-174566125.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=19,,,a0a03146c544db58123a53b6ec30fdfa
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:08:45:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job ID: 788965 Job Views: 108 Location: NAPOLEONVILLE, Louisiana, United States ZIP Code: 70390 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Napoleonville,Full Time Employee,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job ID: 788965 Job Views: 108 Location: NAPOLEONVILLE, Louisiana, United States ZIP Code: 70390 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-napoleonville-la-us-175399590.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,999f173e82ecc511a627cf8c33d9bf96
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:08:45:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Program Managers are needed to oversee Capital Project Utility construction project programs ranging up to 100 million. The Managers will have the skills to provide detailed Capital project forecasts, estimate vetting, work order creation and close out auditing, providing variance explanations and maintaining project dashboards. Qualified candidates will have a provable track record of delivering timely and satisfactory completion of assigned Capital construction project programs,Transmission construction project experience desired.These are long term Contract positions in Minnesota. Requires some travel.Responsibilities for the Construction ManagerOrganizes project update meetings with the project teams, reviews status reports, updates and maintains risk registers, submitts and tracks monthly accruals. Program Manager support for the region’s transmission system to reduce congestion, provide access to affordable energy sources and meet public policy requirements, including renewable energy mandates.Requirements for the Construction ManagerB.S Finance, Construction, Engineering, Project Management. MBA or PMP preferred.MS Office required.Transmission project experience preferred.Joint Venture Project experience is a plus.BenefitsInsurance, PTO, 401KThis Job is located in Minneapolis, MN -> United States",Construction Manager - Utility Projects/Project Controls/Transmission System Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Minneapolis, MN 55401",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manager-utility-projects-project-controls-transmission-system-job-minneapolis-mn-us-174850979.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=13,63.38 - 112.67 $ /hour,,0221cc51b2db417c57f1860ed6484a57
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:08:46:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Construction Superintendent with experience, please read on!What You Will Be DoingScheduling, Coordination, Quality, and Direct Supervision of all work performed in the field.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Field/Site Supervision Expertise with ZERO Site Injuries- Ground-Up Single-Family Homes Construction- Site Works / Land Development on Single-Family Homes- High-End Custom Home Construction- Tract Home Community ConstructionWhat's In It for YouWe are willing to offer excellent compensation packages including:- Competitive Base Salary (DOE)- Bonus Structure- And more...So, if you are a Construction Superintendent with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Superintendent - Ground-Up High-End Custom Homes | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jon Quickel,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-superintendent-ground-up-high-end-custom-homes-job-bellevue-wa-us-175274707.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=4,,,49ddcd2a97d124da42fc1a319c8d7652
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:09:42:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782878 Job Views: 67 Location: DURANGO, Colorado, United States ZIP Code: 81303 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Durango,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782878 Job Views: 67 Location: DURANGO, Colorado, United States ZIP Code: 81303 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-durango-co-us-175420521.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=4,,Entry Level,1722838bf7e59ecee2c1eb938d973403
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:09:42:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Construction client has an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Document Control Assistant for a contract assignment in Corpus Christi, TX. You will be part of the project controls team on a large gas pipeline project. You need 2+ years of document controls experience supporting heavy industrial engineering or construction projects (oil & gas, refinery, power plant, T&D, or similar). You need to be local to the Corpus Christi area or live within a commutable distance.Responsibilities for the AdministratorCoordinate document control processes by following established procedure and protocols in regards to document retention, document issuing, and processingProvides training to rest of the project team for document control systems and processesFirst point of contact for any issues regarding document controlAssists the project team with formal communication (transmittals, RFIs, notices, etc.) using the project controls systemsAssists the project team with storing electronic project files in the proper locations (including population of metadata) as defined by the Project Execution PlanCoordinates with our Client to define and turn over project records at the end of the project as defined by the Project Execution PlanSupport the Project Management team by performing project administration duties at timesAnalyzes data for error identification and reportingLeads coordination of documents for working projectsCommunicate with clients and vendors on a daily basisCompiles subcontract documents and issues appropriate revisionsRequirements for the Administrator2+ years of document controls experience supporting engineering or construction projectsProficient in MS Word, Excel, Outlook, and AccessMust be able to effectively interact with Customer, vendors, and other team members on the telephone and in personClient prefers candidates with a BS, BA or AS degree or equivalent experiencePrevious experience working with document retention software & database systems preferredYou need to be local to Corpus Christi, TXBenefitsHealth Insurance availablePTO programThis Job is located in Corpus Christi, TX -> United States",Administrator - Document Controls/Construction/Engineering Job in Corpus Christi,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Corpus Christi, TX 78407",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrator-document-controls-construction-engineering-job-corpus-christi-tx-us-175199034.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=6,18.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,,3c9969eaeb03fca509ea3688c1d70f5e
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:10:20:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783372 Job Views: 88 Location: HOULTON, Maine, United States ZIP Code: 04730 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Houlton,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783372 Job Views: 88 Location: HOULTON, Maine, United States ZIP Code: 04730 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-houlton-me-us-175418844.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,815186422b1c8a90c055ef7bc53b1762
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:10:45:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Superintendent - Civil Construction with experience, please read on! We were incorporated in September 2005 in the state of Florida. Our primary work consists of excavation, underground utilities, sewer, water and reclaimed, storm drainage, road paving, striping and street signage for residential, commercial, and apartment communities. We do not construct buildings, but we do offer our services for townhouses, apartments, timeshares, condos, hotels, roads, DOT, and several other types of work. We pride ourselves on providing quality work in all jobs that we are involved in.Top Reasons to Work with UsWe offer competitive pay packages including 401K, Benefits, Paid Vacation.What You Will Be DoingRole and ResponsibilitiesProvide leadership and oversight of designated projects to ensure that goals and objectives of projects are accomplished within prescribed time frame and budget parameters by performing the following duties through subordinate project superintendents.Reviews and enforces project proposal and project schedule.Assists in plan to ensure time frames are met and project budgets are maintained.Determines by observation if staffing requirements are sufficient and assists in allotment of available resources between other CSD projects.Determines project superintendent for projects and assists in assignment of project site personnel.Confers with project staff to ensure a work plan has been outlined which assigns duties, responsibilities, and scope of authority to best meet schedule and budget.Ensures project progress is on schedule and within prescribed budget.Review daily reports, field conditions, manpower, short term schedules, progress and conditions impacting the project.Review field as-builts to ensure accuracy with plans and specifications.Quality Control all operations of construction to ensure compliance with plans and specifications.Maintain good relationships with project site personnel as well as ensuring communication with client, owner representatives, engineer, and local authorities.Monitor labor time, equipment and material.Authorize any overtime hours required.Ensure proper coordination with equipment manager.Assist with problem solving.Communicate and enforce at all times safety and health management programs.Demonstrate commitment to an Injury-Free Environment through own actions and mentoring of others.Notify safety team immediately of any incidents, accidents, or insubordination.Ensure daily sub-contractor meetings are occurring.Attend when able client project meetings to ensure communication between project superintendent and client.Look for ways to improve and promote quality.What You Need for this PositionQualifications and Education RequirementsOSHA certification, Trench safety, Confined space, MOT, First aid / CPR Certification.Required SkillsComputer knowledge and efficiency.Broad understanding of industry.Familiarity with requirements of drawings and specifications and with terms and conditions of contracts and purchase orders.Strong written and verbal communication skills.Good math skillsStrong management skills.Functions effectively as part of a team.Exhibits strong leadership qualities.Ability to maintain discretion and confidentiality at all times.Delegates work appropriately.Strong decision making / problem solving skills.Excellent time management and organizational skills.Must be cost conscious.So, if you are a Superintendent - Civil Construction with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Superintendent - Civil Construction | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Aaron Wilks,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-civil-construction-job-orlando-fl-us-175351458.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=17,,,13f98bb2ddec016e38ba82bbea3e9277
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:10:46:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job LOOKING FOR 30 EMPLOYEES!CONSTRUCTIONLABORERSPalm Coast, & Southern JacksonvilleStarting Wage: $15.50Concrete, scaffolding/shoring and/orcarpentry skills are preferred. Must be willing and able to climb, work at heights (averaging 40ft), lift and carry heavy objects (50 lbs), and workoutside in all types of weather. This is a physically demanding position.Overtime and weekends may be required. Must have owntransportation.ACCEPTING ONLINEAPPLICATIONSONLY at:www.cromcorp.com/company/career-opportunities Click on Career Opportunities(All Divisions).Select Jacksonville FLEqual Opportunity Employer/Vet/Disability/E-Verify/DFWP Report","Crom Corporation Job Application for Construction Laborers | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Human Resources,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-laborers-job-flagler-fl-us-175370099.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=4,,,6452a717a42b2f32b61c72b7f931868c
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:00:20:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati US-KY-Crestview Hills ID  49270 Posted Date  8/3/2016 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Location: Crestview Hills, Kentucky Pizza cook, part-time, afternoon/evening hours Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Location: Crestview Hills, Kentucky Pizza cook, part-time, afternoon/evening hours Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Pizza Cook - Thomas More College Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/pizza-cook-thomas-more-college-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171898201.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=12,,Food Services/Hospitality,076c516f7ae9ff2e2ea213c0551d63b6
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:00:22:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T: So Much More of What You Work For Looking for an opportunity where you can put your energy and enthusiasm to work to create unlimited earning potential? Of course you are. How about a chance to learn, grow and advance with the number one wireless company in America? Even better. We're AT&T, and the only thing we enjoy more than pioneering and selling the latest devices is helping people make the most of them. Our retail opportunities are among the best, offering you great pay, strong benefits, advancement potential and a work environment full of fast-paced fun. Opportunity, Security and Great People Find out what it's like to work in an industry that's not about to slow down- with a company that has a legacy of successful innovation. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $47,175.00 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $55,521 per year. Add a full benefits package, including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, paid time off, work/life resources and discounts on AT&T products and services Round out your experience with training on the latest technologies and devices today, tomorrow and for as long as you work with us As you learn and succeed, you'll be eligible for new opportunities and financial rewards And every day, you'll work in a fast-paced environment with customers and colleagues that appreciate your energy and assistance JOB DESCRIPTION Develop and attain customer experience and sales objectives for store. Sell all products and services offered by the Company. Meet all sales objectives. Handle all administrative aspects of the sale including: completing customer contracts and warranties, pulling products from inventory, accepting customer payments and filing the completed orders. Maintain strong knowledge of all products, accessories, pricing plans, promotions and service features. Maintain knowledge of competitive offers and provide critical market feedback to the Store Manager regarding local competition and product/service needs. Handle service inquiries from customers. Provide efficient, courteous customer service and assist in all aspects of product offerings and services. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience. Position may be commissioned and quota based.With this position you need the flexibility to potentially work one of the stores within 15 miles as the needs of the business dictate (Kenwood Towne Center and Rookwood). GENERAL DUTIES The essential functions listed below are representative of duties performed by this job title. Duties generally include but are not limited to the following: GENERAL ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS WHICH ARE NORMALLY REQUIRED: Possess a competitive spirit and desire to meet and exceed sales goals Stay up-to-date on the latest data/entertainment technology and devices, such as Wi-Fi, data devices, TV entertainment tools Understand customers' needs and help them discover how our products meet those needs Multi-task in a fast paced team environment Educate and engage customers through product demonstrations Interact with customers and provide prompt and courteous customer service to all customers The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to stand for long periods of time Ability to complete all paperwork completely, accurately, in a timely manner Ability to lift up to 25 pounds Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work in other locations as the needs of the business dictate may be required. Complete all aspects of opening and closing the store in accordance with written procedures. Submit all transaction journals on a daily basis. Assists with inventory maintenance May be required to wear a uniform Desired Qualifications: 1-3 years retail/customer facing/sales experience preferred. Retail Sales Consultants are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these job descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Retail Sales Consultant Cincinnati OH (Cincinnati Central) Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-cincinnati-oh-cincinnati-central-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171909028.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=9,,,9bb8982ff77f500e102dc74ee8d77b75
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:00:40:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  71563 Posted Date  5/11/2016 Category  Finance/Accounting Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Facilitate all money needs while adhering to Aramark policies to ensure an efficient selling and sales reporting environment Responsible for transporting change, pickups, and banks in a safe and timely manner Adhere to money handling procedures as outlined in Aramark employee handbook Report issues and discrepancies to management immediately  Ensure adherence to Aramark policies and procedures and operate within the guidelines of the Aramark Business Conduct Policy Other duties and special projects as assigned by management Facilitate all money needs while adhering to Aramark policies to ensure an efficient selling and sales reporting environment Responsible for transporting change, pickups, and banks in a safe and timely manner Adhere to money handling procedures as outlined in Aramark employee handbook Report issues and discrepancies to management immediately  Ensure adherence to Aramark policies and procedures and operate within the guidelines of the Aramark Business Conduct Policy Other duties and special projects as assigned by management Previous cash handling experience is mandatory Must display the utmost integrity due to the handling of large sums of cash Ability to stand and work continuously in confined spaces Must be at least 18 years of age Must be able to work a flexible schedule that may include days, nights, evenings and weekends Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Money Room Attendant -Paul Brown Stadium - Concessions Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/money-room-attendant-paul-brown-stadium-concessions-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170969424.aspx?mescoid=3700623001001&jobPosition=6,,Food Services/Hospitality,0b05bc6ff60d0e625acdef4c48d007d6
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:00:41:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job HEAVY EQUIPMENT MECHANICImmediate opening for equipment mechanic with experience working on all aspects of heavy equipment, hydraulics, fuel, electrical, etc. Caterpillar, Komatsu, Bobcat & Takeuchi experience preferred. Must have own tools and a clean driving record. CDL a plus. Top pay and benefits. Apply in person or send resume to: info@orourkewrecking.com orwww.orourkewrecking.com EOEO’Rourke is a family-owned and operated business based in Cincinnati, Ohio.  O'Rourke owns and maintains an industry-leading demolition specialty equipment and trucking fleet. Since 1962, O’Rourke Wrecking Company has performed turnkey demolition and site recovery services to Commercial and Industrial clients.  O’Rourke is consistently ranked by Engineering News Record (ENR) in the Top 10 as one of the Nation’s leading specialty demolition firms. We have earned a reputation for excellence in both front-end project engineering and on-site field performance.  We have an impeccable record of successfully completing difficult projects safely, on budget and ahead of schedule.   Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 513-871-1400 Fax 513-871-1313 Address 660 Lunken Park DriveCincinnati, OH 45226",All; Automotive Sales and Repair Services; Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanic-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170733836.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=4,,,6727c0d7df3b86b57954ecf386a3f493
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:01:25:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant Job in Cincinnati, OH 45202 Ajilon Professional staffing is currently searching for an Excel Savvy Administrative Assistant to work for one of our top clients. Successful candidates will have excellent customer service and must be outcome-oriented. The ability to work in a fast paced environment with strong attention to detail is essential. You will be fully engaged and busy from the first day and we guarantee there will never be a dull moment. Responsibilities & Requirements• Ability to juggle multiple projects with superb accuracy• Strong administrative skills• Exceptional customer service skills, over the phone and in person, with our customers and internal departments• Strong sense of urgency and problem solving skills Qualifications• Must be computer savvy and proficient in Microsoft Excel and Outlook• Excellent written and verbal communication skills Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Administrative Assistant Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171060566.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,,Administrative/Clerical,3778fb32615b40d14316ba18193b48c9
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:01:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description In a world where cellphones make communication possible anytime and anywhere, it has become a priority for many companies to have their calls answered at all times of the day. Stericycle Communication Solutions, a leader in the call center industry, provides live operator services to assist commercial and healthcare businesses process their telephone calls more effectively and efficiently. Whether it’s a phone call to a plumber about a leak or a call to a physician about a sick baby or an appointment, we are here to help, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, 365 days a year.We are currently recruiting for front line customer experience agents to help process inbound and outbound calls in one of our many fast-growing call centers across the U.S. No prior customer service or healthcare experience is necessary; however, we do look for energetic, customer centric, detail-oriented individuals who fit in well with our strong company culture. Various shift options, competitive benefits, including tuition reimbursement and paid time-off, are just some of the things you can expect as an employee at Stericycle.Essential Duties & Responsibilities:- Answer urgent and non-urgent phone calls using computer-telephony integration- Provide information, document interactions, or schedule appointments using predefined scripts and templates- Deliver message content back to clients Position Requirements - Ability to read, write and comprehend the English language- Ability to speak clearly and project good voice tone- Ability to accurately document and present information during phone interactions- Ability to multitask while on the phone- Ability to keep information confidential- Needs to have completed 3 years of high school or the equivalent and be at least 17 years old- Bilingual Spanish a plus *LI We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. May require mandatory immunizations and credentialing based on customer requirements",Customer Service Representative (Full-Time,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-full-time-2nd-shift-weekends-holidays-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171199136.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d74815a3abd10defcc67009cd3016232
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:01:43:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:The Seasonal Retail Merchandising Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service, proper merchandising on the sales floor and accurate merchandise movement throughout the building. Duties include placement of new receipts and floor moves, stockroom organization and replenishment, fulfillment, reverse logistics, RFID, POS transactions and other duties as needed.Essential Functions:- Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priority- Service the customer in a helpful and friendly manner including POS transactions, credit and Plenti enrollment, and helping her to find what she is looking for- Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permits- Support Omni Channel initiatives- Perform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by Supervisor- Participate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executed- Adhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance procedures- Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality- Collaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.)- Execute merchandising, fulfillment, RFID and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include placement of merchandise to standards (zone-o-gram, directives, fixtures, ADA compliance and visual guidelines), movement of fixtures and merchandise for seasonal sets, stockroom maintenance and organization, replenishment to the sales floor, collection and transport of picked fulfillment orders to appropriate processing areas; preparing and returning BOPS/SDD orders; RFID tag up events, cycle counts, display audits and tagging standards; processing and packing of damages, non-congruent transfers, store initiated transfers, return to vendor and mark out of stock merchandise- Assist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing)Qualifications:Education/Experience:- No specific educational accomplishments are necessary.Communication Skills:- Excellent written and verbal communication skills.- Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.Mathematical Skills:- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.- Able to use a calculator.Reasoning Ability:- Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands:- This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills:- Possess strong merchandising skills.- Possess vision and creativity.- Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team.- Must possess a strong sense of urgency.- Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours:- Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. Macy's Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Macy's **Seasonal Holiday Retail Merchandising,Part Time Seasonal,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/macy's-seasonal-holiday-retail-merchandising-mornings-part-time-kenwood-towne-centre-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171802286.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,5c5a84b3f6f1b6c3161e0755383d81d0
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:02:43:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Skills:BS/BA Required, Labeling Experience, MS VISIO, Process Mapping, Project Management/ Process Excellence Certification (+), Regulatory Environment (+) Please note this is a 3+ month contract.Please include ALL contact information on your resume. “Labeling Process Analyst”. Previous labeling experience and/or regulated environment experience is highly preferred. This role will be looking at the existing processes used in the Labeling departments to conduct a gap analysis, opportunities for streamlining processes, etc. This position is anticipated to be 0.5-2 years. Pre-ID Candidate or Recruiting: Recruiting Here are the details for the Labeling Process Analyst role. Primary Responsibilities: Define and document As-Is and To-Be business processes and procedures. Identify improvements and deliver processes within the business and across Global Surgery to drive effectiveness and efficiency. Liaise with management to coordinate process improvement project activities Qualifications: Minimum undergraduate (BS/BA) required Strong analytical & problem-solving is required Process Mapping/Microsoft Visio required Labeling experience preferred Project management certification is preferred Process Excellence Certification is preferredFor consideration please refer job 9467. ",Business Analyst Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45201",,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171794318.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=11,,,5e7d3b22b43b8781d2e2003cb652f5f1
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:02:43:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  75200 Posted Date  6/10/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Oversee and assist in preparation of food items for the day and dating products Oversee and assist in setting up and breaking down of stations designated by the manager Cook and otherwise prepare foods according to recipes and directions Responsible for use of correct portions when preparing and serving items on the line Maintain daily temperature logs Responsible for taking samples of all food items on the line prior to serving the customers Alert management and pull food items that do not meet quality expectations Complete opening and closing station checklists Greet customers as they approach and leave the serving line Ask customers about the quality of their service and handle any complaints (with assistance from the manager on duty) while maintaining a positive attitude and smile Oversee and assist in maintaining a clean work station (including floors, work areas, equipment, walls, refrigerators, and meat blocks) Ensures that all work areas and serving utensils are cleaned and sanitized Responsible for proper disposal of waste from the service line Transfers supplies and equipment between storage and work areas by hand or by cart Assist with daily STEP observations and report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Cross-train in areas as required by your manager Able to work in concessions, catering, and special events required by your manager Perform task as requested by your manager on a weekly, bi-weekly or monthly basis Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Supervisory Responsibilities: Oversee and direct the employees working on the line to ensure timely and effective service of the customers. Request support from utility workers for sanitation issues of the line as needed. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Oversee and assist in preparation of food items for the day and dating products Oversee and assist in setting up and breaking down of stations designated by the manager Cook and otherwise prepare foods according to recipes and directions Responsible for use of correct portions when preparing and serving items on the line Maintain daily temperature logs Responsible for taking samples of all food items on the line prior to serving the customers Alert management and pull food items that do not meet quality expectations Complete opening and closing station checklists Greet customers as they approach and leave the serving line Ask customers about the quality of their service and handle any complaints (with assistance from the manager on duty) while maintaining a positive attitude and smile Oversee and assist in maintaining a clean work station (including floors, work areas, equipment, walls, refrigerators, and meat blocks) Ensures that all work areas and serving utensils are cleaned and sanitized Responsible for proper disposal of waste from the service line Transfers supplies and equipment between storage and work areas by hand or by cart Assist with daily STEP observations and report safety hazards discovered in the location to management immediately Additional Job Functions: Cross-train in areas as required by your manager Able to work in concessions, catering, and special events required by your manager Perform task as requested by your manager on a weekly, bi-weekly or monthly basis Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Supervisory Responsibilities: Oversee and direct the employees working on the line to ensure timely and effective service of the customers. Request support from utility workers for sanitation issues of the line as needed. Required Qualifications: Great customer service and communication skills Strong leadership and supervisory skills Ability to work in a team environment Serve Safe Certification Ability to follow detailed written and verbal instructions Desired Qualifications: Food service experience High school education or equivalent Work Environment: Most often works in front-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, loud noise, chemicals and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",UC DAAP-Food Service Shift Lead Worker Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/uc-daap-food-service-shift-lead-worker-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170968944.aspx?mescoid=3500619001001&jobPosition=8,,Food Services/Hospitality,4478c380653adba2f85561d92cc9f786
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:03:43:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview Let's Grow Together! We are a fast-moving Fortune 200 publicly-traded company with more than 12,500 stores and 13 distribution centers in 43 states, growing by hundreds of stores each year. We work in an energetic atmosphere that embraces innovation and teamwork. At Dollar General, you can see a clear and fast path to career growth and success. We are committed to attracting talented and motivated people who can advance our mission of ""Serving Others.""   GENERAL SUMMARY: Supervise store employees. Assist with efficient management of inventory and effective presentation of merchandise. Ensure a safe working environment while providing for the protection of company assets. Responsibilities   DUTIES and ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Open the store a minimum of two days per week; close the store a minimum of two days per week. Authorize and sign for refunds and overrides; count register; deposit money in bank. Assist in ensuring the financial integrity of the store through strict cashier accountability, key control, and adherence to company security practices and cash control procedures. Manage store in Store Manager's absence. Assist Store Manager, as directed, with scheduling employees; enter payroll information into computer. Assist Store Manager, as directed, in providing adequate training for employees. Review operating statements to identify business trends (including sales, profitability, and turn), expense control opportunities, potential shrink, and errors. Order drop-shipments and other areas of store as designated by store manager. Follow prescribed ordering practices to ensure the meeting or exceeding of in-stock targets; review ordering plan, seasonal direction and inventory management issues on a weekly basis. Assist with the efficient staging, stocking and storage of merchandise; unload trucks. Ensure that merchandise is presented according to established practices and Store Manager direction; utilize merchandise fixtures properly including presentation, product pricing and signage. Assist in plan-o-gram implementation and maintenance. Assist in maintaining accurate inventory levels by controlling damages, markdowns, scanning, paperwork, and facility controls. Conduct safety meetings; help to maintain a clean, well-organized store and facilitate a safe and secure working and shopping environment. Provide superior customer service leadership. Follow company policies and procedures as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures manual, Employee Handbook, and company communications. Assist Store Manager in ensuring employee compliance Complete all paperwork and documentation according to guidelines and deadlines.   Qualifications KNOWLEDGE and SKILLS: Ability to read and interpret documents such as diagrams, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedures manuals. Ability to perform mathematical calculations such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, division, and percentages. Knowledge of cash handling procedures including cashier accountability and deposit control. Ability to learn and perform IBM cash register functions to generate reports. Knowledge of inventory management and merchandising practices. Effective oral and written communication skills. Effective interpersonal skills. Knowledge of cash, facility and safety control policies and practices (deposits, store keys, SAFE program, etc.) Good organization skills with attention to detail. Ability to solve problems and deal with a variety of situations where limited standardization exists. WORK EXPERIENCE and/or EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent strongly preferred. One year of experience in a retail environment and six months supervisory experience preferred. Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Dollar General Corporation is an equal opportunity employer.",ASST STORE MGR Job in Batavia,Full Time,"Batavia, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/asst-store-mgr-job-batavia-oh-us-171878278.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ec90f8156f5db110db97a181dc237652
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:03:44:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary RETAIL RESET MERCHANDISER KROGER FULL TIME   Do you enjoy being creative and working independently? Our full time Retail Reset Merchandiser job needs an independent individual who has great attention to detail. This position is responsible for showcasing brand name products inside Kroger stores, to increase sales and product exposure. The ideal candidate will be able to build and maintain attractive displays, which will help create brand awareness and increase sales. If this sounds like you, then take this chance to join a company that offers competitive pay rates and top-notch training. Advantage Solutions jobs provide an opportunity to work with the leading sales and marketing agency in all of North America.   RESPONSIBILITIES:   Reset Activity, Shelf Conditions and Schematics Completion Implement customer approved schematics/Plan-O-Grams/MODs with all items tagged and approved by store management Must be able to take direction regarding tagging, rotating and placing products on shelf Administration/Reporting: Will complete (web based) accurate and timely reporting, recaps, timesheets, expense reports, etc.   QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or equivalent  Previous retail experience (preferred) Strong self-management skills Ability to complete daily procedures and responsibilities without direct supervision Ability to communicate effectively both internally to Advantage Solutions management and externally with Customers Must demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Retail Reset Merchandiser Kroger Full Time Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-reset-merchandiser-kroger-full-time-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171566884.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,44ed9c3d68dc36d377ed25584f96e1ae
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:03:59:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Own Your Business as an Owner Operator with The Master’s Touch Job in Cincinnati,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/own-your-business-as-an-owner-operator-with-the-master%E2%80%99s-touch-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170674058.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=7,,Business/Strategic Management,0598b4b463e27fd44a4db3e1df66e7ac
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:04:28:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  33089 Posted Date  3/22/2016 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Fulltime-Temporary About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook - UC Catering Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-uc-catering-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171818940.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=20,,Food Services/Hospitality,89a210e9c3f3d6d60f2e2ef9d3899039
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:04:40:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary RETAIL RESET MERCHANDISER KROGER FULL TIME   Do you enjoy being creative and working independently? Our full time Retail Reset Merchandiser job needs an independent individual who has great attention to detail. This position is responsible for showcasing brand name products inside Kroger stores, to increase sales and product exposure. The ideal candidate will be able to build and maintain attractive displays, which will help create brand awareness and increase sales. If this sounds like you, then take this chance to join a company that offers competitive pay rates and top-notch training. Advantage Solutions jobs provide an opportunity to work with the leading sales and marketing agency in all of North America.   RESPONSIBILITIES:   Reset Activity, Shelf Conditions and Schematics Completion Implement customer approved schematics/Plan-O-Grams/MODs with all items tagged and approved by store management Must be able to take direction regarding tagging, rotating and placing products on shelf Administration/Reporting: Will complete (web based) accurate and timely reporting, recaps, timesheets, expense reports, etc.   QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or equivalent  Previous retail experience (preferred) Strong self-management skills Ability to complete daily procedures and responsibilities without direct supervision Ability to communicate effectively both internally to Advantage Solutions management and externally with Customers Must demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Retail Reset Merchandiser Kroger Full Time Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-reset-merchandiser-kroger-full-time-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171029202.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=11,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,98dfb2914ad3721a311618c2b01bacbf
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:04:41:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  86574 Posted Date  9/2/2016 Category  Facilities Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Job Summary:  To assist management in maintaining or improving cleanliness quality through inspections, training and employee accountability, including employee counseling or disciplining. Supervisors must build upon established employee or customer relationships, improve employee morale, and help develop subordinates on a continuous basis. Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Conduct daily inspections for quality and safety. Make necessary corrections. Understand all employee work assignments and schedule for adequate coverage. Conduct training and retraining as necessary. Follow recommended training process. Maintain effective business relationship with staff. Build upon and develop employee satisfaction and knowledge. Enforce department policies, follow up on daily assignments, and conduct counseling or disciplinary action. Maintain loyalty and honesty with employees, peers, customers and managers. Monitor special projects and on-call or new employees. Tour areas of responsibilities at least 2-4 times daily. Initiate or ensure corrective action is taken. Audit building keys, pagers, and payroll on a daily basis. Ensure all projects, maintenance, or cleaning challenges are communicated effectively for resolution. Control supply inventories and distribute equipment effectively. Supervise equipment performance and make necessary corrections. Assist in performing employee performance evaluations and make recommendations on employee performance ratings. Observe and report the need of furniture or other building fixtures repairs. When necessary, complete custodial work assignments. In case of emergency, perform all duties as assigned. Provide functional/operational support to work area as essential personnel during times of emergency, catastrophe, inclement weather, etc. Complete all other assigned tasks by management in which the employee is capable of performing. Job Summary:  To assist management in maintaining or improving cleanliness quality through inspections, training and employee accountability, including employee counseling or disciplining. Supervisors must build upon established employee or customer relationships, improve employee morale, and help develop subordinates on a continuous basis. Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Conduct daily inspections for quality and safety. Make necessary corrections. Understand all employee work assignments and schedule for adequate coverage. Conduct training and retraining as necessary. Follow recommended training process. Maintain effective business relationship with staff. Build upon and develop employee satisfaction and knowledge. Enforce department policies, follow up on daily assignments, and conduct counseling or disciplinary action. Maintain loyalty and honesty with employees, peers, customers and managers. Monitor special projects and on-call or new employees. Tour areas of responsibilities at least 2-4 times daily. Initiate or ensure corrective action is taken. Audit building keys, pagers, and payroll on a daily basis. Ensure all projects, maintenance, or cleaning challenges are communicated effectively for resolution. Control supply inventories and distribute equipment effectively. Supervise equipment performance and make necessary corrections. Assist in performing employee performance evaluations and make recommendations on employee performance ratings. Observe and report the need of furniture or other building fixtures repairs. When necessary, complete custodial work assignments. In case of emergency, perform all duties as assigned. Provide functional/operational support to work area as essential personnel during times of emergency, catastrophe, inclement weather, etc. Complete all other assigned tasks by management in which the employee is capable of performing. High School Diploma or equivalent required. Must be physically able to lift, lower, push and pull objects up to 50 lbs. unassisted. Ability to stand, climb, bend, stoop and crouch for extended periods of time. Must be able to initiate and maintain good customer and co-worker relationships in a team  environment. Must have the ability to follow oral or written instructions and directions. Must be able to communicate effectively with both written and verbal skills. Bi-lingual preferred (English and Spanish). Must have the ability to supervise others, demonstrate ""quality customer service"", and good human relations skills. Pays special attention to detail. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Custodial Shift Supervisor - rd shift - University Hospital - UC Health - EVS Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/custodial-shift-supervisor-3rd-shift-university-hospital-uc-health-evs-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171813820.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=13,,Food Services/Hospitality,d946351d3565c2de4eb81cbe73ffe35c
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:05:43:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  79494 Posted Date  7/11/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Job Summary:  Responsible for providing exceptional customer service from the moment guests sits down until they leave the establishment. Display great hospitality, friendliness, and complete food and beverage knowledge. Responsible for money handling, beverage pouring, and dispensing policies as well as providing servers drinks at the service well.   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Check patrons' identification in order to ensure that they meet minimum age requirements for consumption of alcoholic beverages and following safe drinking guidelines when serving customers. Prepare needed set-up for bar. Maintain an accurate inventory of the bar including counting beer, bottled liquor, wine, cups, mixers, sodas, general bar supplies, etc. Accurate cash sales and cash handling. Close out every check once it has been paid. Assist in the set-up and break-down of bar equipment as needed. Serve and/or sell alcoholic and non-alcoholic beverages. Maintain a pleasant attitude while on duty. Inventory all stand sheet items prior to and at the end of each event and initial all bar paperwork. Calculate cash at the end of shift and return bank to the cash room. Any other task assigned by management will be considered part of the job. Opening and closing duties as assigned by supervisor or manager. Job Summary:  Responsible for providing exceptional customer service from the moment guests sits down until they leave the establishment. Display great hospitality, friendliness, and complete food and beverage knowledge. Responsible for money handling, beverage pouring, and dispensing policies as well as providing servers drinks at the service well.   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Check patrons' identification in order to ensure that they meet minimum age requirements for consumption of alcoholic beverages and following safe drinking guidelines when serving customers. Prepare needed set-up for bar. Maintain an accurate inventory of the bar including counting beer, bottled liquor, wine, cups, mixers, sodas, general bar supplies, etc. Accurate cash sales and cash handling. Close out every check once it has been paid. Assist in the set-up and break-down of bar equipment as needed. Serve and/or sell alcoholic and non-alcoholic beverages. Maintain a pleasant attitude while on duty. Inventory all stand sheet items prior to and at the end of each event and initial all bar paperwork. Calculate cash at the end of shift and return bank to the cash room. Any other task assigned by management will be considered part of the job. Opening and closing duties as assigned by supervisor or manager. EDUCATION:          High school diploma or equivalent                         KNOWLEDGE:      Extensive knowledge of advanced mixed drink recipes and restaurant point of sales computer systems.  Must be TIPS certified.                   EXPERIENCE:        Minimum two years full service bartending experience preferred.        SKILLS:                Good communication and organizational skills. Ability to work in a fast paced environment with emphasis on customer service, basic math and counting skills. A bility to pour mixed drinks and draft beer.  Must be 18 years of age or older to ring alcoholic sales on a register. Must be 21 years of age or older to pour and serve alcoholic beverages. Strong communication and organizational skills. Ability to reach, push, pull, bend, stoop, walk up and down stairs and stand for long periods of time.  Ability to handle multiple projects and stressful situations simultaneously. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Bartender - UC Catskeller Campus Pub Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/bartender-uc-catskeller-campus-pub-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170967907.aspx?mescoid=3500610001001&jobPosition=13,,Food Services/Hospitality,21dfc9abcf17e5e2a00c3c7c9d4a4997
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:05:44:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job **Engineer Signal Image Proc 2****Requisition ID: 16019373****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: No**Researches, designs, develops and verifies signal and image collection systems, and defines and develops processing and dissemination computer algorithms\. Develops requirements analysis, system architecture, and integrates new signal and image processing technology systems\. Designs, develops and analyzes systems for the extraction of information from signal and image sensors\. Systems utilization includes detection and estimation theories, speech processing, and neural networks; electromagnetic and acoustic effects on signals; and/or implementation of signal processing with advanced computer architectures\.Basic Qualifications:Coursework or equivalent experience with Digital Communications system design and implementationCoursework or equivalent experience in Digital Signal ProcessingCoursework or equivalent experience in the design and implementation of FPGA\-based DSP solutionsProficient with basic electrical test equipment \(oscilloscope, signal generator, spectrum analyzer\)Proficient in MatlabPreferred Qualifications:Software development experience, preferably on embedded platformsExperience with RF system design \(analog front\-end\)Experience with hardware bringup/troubleshootNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Engineer Signal Image Proc 2_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16019373_ Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","**Engineer Signal Image Proc 2****Requisition ID: 16019373****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: No**Researches, designs, develops and verifies signal and image collection systems, and defines and develops processing and dissemination computer algorithms\. Develops requirements analysis, system architecture, and integrates new signal and image processing technology systems\. Designs, develops and analyzes systems for the extraction of information from signal and image sensors\. Systems utilization includes detection and estimation theories, speech processing, and neural networks; electromagnetic and acoustic effects on signals; and/or implementation of signal processing with advanced computer architectures\.Basic Qualifications:Coursework or equivalent experience with Digital Communications system design and implementationCoursework or equivalent experience in Digital Signal ProcessingCoursework or equivalent experience in the design and implementation of FPGA\-based DSP solutionsProficient with basic electrical test equipment \(oscilloscope, signal generator, spectrum analyzer\)Proficient in MatlabPreferred Qualifications:Software development experience, preferably on embedded platformsExperience with RF system design \(analog front\-end\)Experience with hardware bringup/troubleshootNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Engineer Signal Image Proc 2_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16019373_",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/engineer-signal-image-proc-2-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171238549.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=18,,,6c0d8e60802e94a758c1108c16c3a97f
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:06:45:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Associates in store Customer Service/Delivery positions are responsible for ensuring an outstanding customer order fulfillment experience. Direct customer interaction is frequently required for these positions, which are often the first and/or last impression presented to the customer. Whether directing customers to store departments or merchandise, answering customer questions on product order status, or delivering products directly to a customer s home, these positions play a critical role in ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. Specific Customer Service/Delivery positions may include: Customer Services Representative, Delivery Driver Associate, Delivery Puller Associate, Delivery/Will Call Coordinator, Door Monitor Associate, and Phone Center Associate.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Execute all steps of the order fulfillment process within the storeScheduling/Prioritizing all deliveries for the store and communicating any availability and/or limitations to fellow Associates so that the best possible service is maintained by setting realistic expectationsApproaching and greeting CustomersAsking open-ended questions and expressing interest in projects in order to put the Customer at ease, determine the Customer s level of expertise and determine Customer needsAnswering questions about merchandise knowledge for the Customer s level of expertiseLeading Customers to merchandise that fits their needsChecking aisles to make sure inventory is stacked neatly and out of the way of CustomersPulling items from shelves and transporting to appropriate areasGathering the product mix to fill orders in a timely mannerManeuvering large bundles of merchandise throughout storeCreating space for delivery orders and will calls until they are moved out of the storeNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements:Environment:Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physicaldiscomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odorsTravel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesA valid drivers license and proof of insurance is required for driving positionsAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-20 pounds) Additional Qualifications:Physical Job RequirementsBending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items-Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessaryResponding to public address system announcements-Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcementsWalking and Standing-Requires moving around the store to assist CustomersIdentifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels-Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Attention to Detail: Concentrates for an extended period of time; catches errors before completing assignments; maintains high quality standards for his/her work Customer Driven: Provides outstanding customer service (to both internal and external customers); follows through on responsibilities to customers; recovers from any errors made and leaves customer satisfied Gets Things Done: Demonstrates the ability to get results despite a large workload, competing demands and a fast-paced environment Acts with Integrity: Demonstrates responsible and honest behavior in all Home Depot roles",Customer Service/Deliveries Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-deliveries-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170844446.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),77c83e0be7efd0e3600b9b4cb14d9db8
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:06:45:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description Responsible for implementing, training and deploying LEAN and Continuous Improvement initiatives as assigned and dictated by business need.• Organize and facilitate kaizen / rapid improvement events. Develop metrics and return on investment (ROI) before recommending projects to determine business expectations. Analyze realization of measurements upon completion.•Lead cross-functional teams to deploy standard operating procedures and process improvements.•Lead and facilitate training in LEAN principles for the organization. Develop standard process improvement tools for departments to utilize in process improvement efforts•Analyze highly complex production and processes. Partner with key business stakeholders to identify opportunities, present ideas, and make recommendations based upon analysis to further business goals.•Perform other related duties as required or requested. Position Requirements •Education equivalent to College Degree in Business, Engineering, Logistics, or other related field, or equivalent in related work experience, demonstrating strong organizational and change management skills.•Three or more years of relevant business or project management experience required, demonstrating the ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously in a fast paced environment.•LEAN certification preferred.•Demonstrates proficiency in Microsoft Office, Excel, Word, Power Point, Project, Visio, Outlook, and Access. Demonstrates the ability to lead cross-functional teams. Demonstrates strong business vocabulary, grammar, and communication skills. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. May require mandatory immunizations and credentialing based on customer requirements",Continuous Improvement Manager I Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/continuous-improvement-manager-i-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171845903.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a4e516b9eae417ede8b10b32b2ccae22
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:07:11:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  40322 Posted Date  8/14/2015 Category  Operations/Manufacturing/Production Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Job Summary:  The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils in a clean and sanitized condition.  In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink, and related areas clean.   Tasks & Responsibilities: Able to follow directions Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Job Summary:  The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils in a clean and sanitized condition.  In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink, and related areas clean.   Tasks & Responsibilities: Able to follow directions Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Minimum of one year experience Understanding of basic kitchen sanitation Must be able to work holidays, weekends, and varied shifts Must be able to perform repetitive tasks and stand for extended periods of time Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",General Utility Worker - U.S. Bank Arena,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/general-utility-worker-u-s-bank-arena-620649800-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171818446.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,4932ce42ff962df1ffa526922ae8ff42
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:07:44:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:The Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective's primary responsibility is to prevent the loss of company property while maintaining a safe business environment. Support store's efforts in providing the best customer service within a controlled environment so as to ensure maximum sales at the highest profit rate attainable. Under general supervision and established procedures, the Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective detects and apprehends shoplifters and dishonest employees.Essential Functions:- Respond to customer and associate incidents to facilitate first aid and minimize company liability- Recover stolen merchandise and apprehend shoplifters and other people who commit fraud or other criminal acts against the company- Investigate criminal violations against the person or property of any customer or associate that is committed on company premises- Prepare prompt and complete reports relative to all theft incidents, merchandise recoveries, accident investigations, audits, and other activities as assigned by the Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Manager- Have knowledge of and maintain strict compliance with the law and company policies concerning apprehensions, searches and seizures, and the preservation of evidence- Promote shortage awareness and theft deterrence among associates by conducting meetings and participating in training events- Successfully complete all Asset Protection / Loss Prevention training requirements including CPR and First Aid and maintain personal certifications as required by law- Conduct audits to ensure sales department compliance to merchandise exposure standards and asset protection policies- Testify in court concerning any case, criminal or civil, wherein the company is a party of interest to which the Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective is summoned- Works on special assignments, investigations, and surveillance as directed by Store Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Manager- Responds to alarm conditions at assigned store- Perform other duties as necessary- Follow shortage programs and procedures- Perform these functions in an efficient manner, as directed by the Supervisor- Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications:- Education/Experience: High School Diploma or equivalent. Some college is desirable. Completion of Store Detective Training program required upon assignment to position.- Communication Skills: Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.- Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator.- Reasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.- Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.- Other skills: Must be able to operate cameras and other surveillance equipment. Ability to think and act clearly in possible stressful and hostile situations. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.- Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Asset Protection / Loss Prevention Detective,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/asset-protection-loss-prevention-detective-part-time-cincinnati-oh-macy%E2%80%99s-fountain-place-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171743468.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=9,,Security/Protective Services,cc937ca0b8d9e3ec56a68f29a2f7e1c2
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:07:45:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati US-KY-Crestview Hills ID  82232 Posted Date  8/3/2016 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Looking for 3 culinary associates to work our retail space from 5:30 PM to midnight from Sunday to Thursday. Location: Crestview Hills,Kentucky Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Looking for 3 culinary associates to work our retail space from 5:30 PM to midnight from Sunday to Thursday. Location: Crestview Hills,Kentucky Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook - Thomas More College Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-thomas-more-college-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171895319.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=16,,Food Services/Hospitality,6c91b807a726d3dd740c0f6436257876
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:08:35:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: EMCOR Facilities Services (EFS), an EMCOR core business, services over 1 billion square feet of space worldwide. From corporate campuses to single sites, EFS provides a range of services that support mission-critical areas of financial services, manufacturing, pharmaceutical, transportation, and government sectors. Job Title: Administrative Assistant Job Summary: This position will support a Trades operation team. This Administrative Assistant will help gather data and assemble Steering Team books, help with janitorial audits on sites, and assist site leads with tracking financial data and other data pertaining to the operation.  The Administrative Assistant will also help sites with data input and analysis and may be needed to fill in at a site to perform light mechanical duties. Might be required to work overtime and possible weekends. 10% travel may be required.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Develop and prepare Steering Team booksPerform Janitorial AuditsTrack financial data for sitesData input and analysis Send in weekly time sheets for site leadsTrack open items for APTrack site safety audits and vehicle auditsVarious other duties as assignedQualifications: Two years of experience providing administrative support to a teamHS Diploma or equivalent Experience with facility maintenance work is a plusMust possess a valid driver's licenseWilling to receive Forklift and Aerial lift certification. Must receive all applicable safety training.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization.Ability to travel approximately 10%Ability to perform light mechanical duties a plus We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",Administrative Assistant Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171534288.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Administrative/Clerical,62ef613b91152cd06c25ea2853fa84f1
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:08:35:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  73273 Posted Date  5/25/2016 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Maintain a positive attitude and smile and be polite with customers throughout the transaction Greet customers as they approach the cash register Take the customer’s order and prepare the order according to brand specifications and the customer requests Must have knowledge of menu items and recipes to effectively service the customer Effectively and efficiently complete the financial transaction Maintain the balance of the cash drawer at all times Distribute and post marketing materials as required Maintain daily temperature logs Adhere to additional standards set by designated brand Proper use of station machinery and equipment Ability to understand and follow directions given by management Maintain a neat and clean beverage station and a presentable work area Ability to stand for extended periods of time, up to 6 hours Ability to lift up to 25lbs and frequently lift, push, pull, or carry up to 30 lbs Ability to walk or stand for extended time periods, up to 6 hours Involves repetitive motion Involves working with chemicals, heated equipment, steam and at other risk conditions Assist management team with administrative functions and daily food prep during down times Additional Job Functions: Work in other areas and departments as necessary Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Maintain a positive attitude and smile and be polite with customers throughout the transaction Greet customers as they approach the cash register Take the customer’s order and prepare the order according to brand specifications and the customer requests Must have knowledge of menu items and recipes to effectively service the customer Effectively and efficiently complete the financial transaction Maintain the balance of the cash drawer at all times Distribute and post marketing materials as required Maintain daily temperature logs Adhere to additional standards set by designated brand Proper use of station machinery and equipment Ability to understand and follow directions given by management Maintain a neat and clean beverage station and a presentable work area Ability to stand for extended periods of time, up to 6 hours Ability to lift up to 25lbs and frequently lift, push, pull, or carry up to 30 lbs Ability to walk or stand for extended time periods, up to 6 hours Involves repetitive motion Involves working with chemicals, heated equipment, steam and at other risk conditions Assist management team with administrative functions and daily food prep during down times Additional Job Functions: Work in other areas and departments as necessary Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team Must be a currently enrolled student at the University of Cincinnati College campus. Required Qualifications: Excellent interpersonal skills and a positive attitude Ability to work independently Posses good time management with daily tasks required by the management team Math skills for counting money and providing correct change Knowledge of running a cash register, and credit card machine transactions Desired Qualifications: Experience in the food service industry as a barista (smoothie) food service worker Great customer service skills Work Environment: Front-of-house barista station. Occasionally requires the ability to work in the kitchen area and possible interaction with hot food items, heated equipment, steam, noise and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Student Worker/Barista/Cashier- UC Starbucks SSLC Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/student-worker-barista-cashier-uc-starbucks-sslc-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171555131.aspx?mescoid=3500613001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,263cc9bfaec02c78d71c0144a4aead0f
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:08:45:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"City:CincinnatiState:OhioPostal/Zip Code:45202 Allied Building Products, a division of Oldcastle, is a national independent distributor specializing in commercial &amp; residential exterior and interior building materials with over 200 locations from Hawaii to Boston. The company was founded in 1950 as a small family-operated business focusing on the metro NY/NJ region and through acquisitions across much of the United States is now established as a major industry player. We believe that our employees are our best asset and still hold true to the core values of our humble beginnings that has made us a true success. Drive your way to a new career! Like to be outside and not stuck in an office? As one of our drivers, you’ll work close to home and have your nights and weekends free.* Enjoy competitive pay and comprehensive benefits. Experienced, safety conscious, customer-focused drivers encouraged to apply! Who are we? Allied Building Products is one of the largest, most successful distributors in the building materials industry. We have over 200 locations, maintain a fleet of over 2,700 vehicles and employ over 3,100 people. As part of the Allied Building Products family, you’ll be a member of an organization with a history of success that dates back over 60 years. What will I be doing? As a full time driver, you’ll travel locally to deliver exterior building materials(shingles) to our customers, while adhering to and understanding safety policies and regulations. A clean driving record and top-notch customer service skills are a must! We’re looking for experienced Truck Drivers with their CDL A or B driver license. Job Duties Pre-inspect truck, load with materials and verify load for accuracy Set up job perimeters, inspect site to ensure a safe environment to unload Unload truck at site –involves lifting of heavy shingles Guide helper to ensure safe unloading Communicate regularly with dispatcher to ensure timely product delivery at job site Communicate potential on-site hazards to branch management Keep log book up-to-date at all times Adhere to and understand safety policies and regulations Perform other duties as assigned Requirements CDLClass A or Bdriver license in good standing Must be able to lift 75+ lbs repeatedly throughout the day Preferences Experience handling building materials * Select branches have 4 hour Saturday shifts. What Allied Offers You Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Allied is a great place to grow! If you're up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Allied Building Products is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Allied Building Products is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.",Truck Driver CDL A or B - Local Travel / Full Time - Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-or-b-local-travel-full-time-cincinnati-oh-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171857072.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=5,,,f82a14498354aee818e49a68aec529f5
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:08:46:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionDICK'S Sporting Goods is seeking a Big Box Retail District Loss Prevention Manager to oversee Loss Prevention functions in the Cincinnati District of 14 stores in OH/KY.    You will be responsible for driving company objectives in profit and loss control, sales performance, customer satisfaction, and shrink results.  District Loss Prevention Managers are responsible for leading Loss Prevention functions within a specific operations district and for collaborating with Store Operations and Human Resources in an effort to prevent company loss.     Essential Functions of this position include:  Support and promote company values with related customer service Develop strong, customer-focused relationships with Operations and Human Resources partners Implement, coordinate, and manage all aspects of the Loss Prevention function as directed.  Work with district and store management to identify priorities and develop appropriate shrinkage reduction strategies.  Participate and/or lead associate teaching, training and development regarding loss prevention, operational, safety and new store related topics.  Schedule and conduct required loss prevention, firearms, operations and safety related audits Direct physical inventory preparation, execution and variance research processes Support the Inventory Control department in audit capacity during physical inventories  Proactively monitor controls and conduct local and remote surveillance to identify possible dishonest activity - internal and external  Utilize POS exception reporting tool to identify and react to suspicious activity and training opportunities Respond to and investigate all instances of reported and suspected associate dishonesty and conduct integrity and witness interviews as needed Effectively network to investigate and address (ORT) Organized Retail Theft Work with stores and distribution centers to resolve issues that involve the flow of goods  Complete new store security alarm, CCTV system reviews and provide appropriate system sign-offs for alarm vendor  Support special events and emergencies which may include providing or supplementing security converge or coordinating contract services.  At DICK'S Sporting Goods, our goal is to be recognized by our customers as the number one sports and fitness specialty retailer for athletes and outdoor enthusiasts, through the relentless improvement of everything we do.  Our formula for success is simple: we offer a wide selection of authentic sports, fitness and outdoor merchandise in a convenient, shopper-friendly environment. As a leading omni-channel retailer, we make lasting impacts on communities through sport and activity.  Year after year, our unwavering commitment to these principles has enabled DICK'S Sporting Goods to become a growing Fortune 500 company.   QualificationsSuccess Profile:  7+ years of Loss Prevention experience or related retail experience with at least three years in a multi-unit environment   Interview/Interrogation training and practical skills (Wicklander-Zulawski certification preferred)  4-year college degree or equivalent experience preferred  Must possess a valid driver's license   Successfully pass comprehensive criminal background and motor vehicle checks  World-class customer service skill and interpersonal/communication skills  Strong problem-solving ability and analytical skills  Proficiency in MS Office  Flexible availability - including nights, weekend, and holidays  Ability to meet Federal requirements for handling and processing firearm transactions  Must be able to keep confidences and consistently operate in a direct and truthful manner  Special Skills / Requirements  Loss Prevention Qualified (LPQ) preferred   Loss Prevention Certified (LPC) preferred   Certified Forensic Interview (CFI) preferred   Advanced level of administration and technical knowledge of Loss Prevention systems and shrinkage controls   Solid conflict management skills with the ability to work alone in stressful situations      Click HERE to review our Rewards & Benefits Information     Additional Compensation: Quarterly and Annual Bonus Programs Annual Equity Grant Eligibility     Candidates seeking employment with DICK'S Sporting Goods should be prepared to successfully complete a pre-employment background check and motor vehicle records review prior to beginning employment.     DICK'S Sporting Goods is an Equal Opportunity Employer. #LI-AB1",Manager of District LP Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45201",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-of-district-lp-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171423642.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=9,,,7b33962e8c903dd6c046d327de571b6e
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:09:41:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer Enterprise Commercial Truck Rental, a division of Enterprise Rent-A-Car has an opening for an Account Specialist. The Account Specialist is responsible for influencing the buying decision, while exceeding the customer's expectations for service, knowledge and professionalism. The Account Specialist will be knowledgeable of our complete menu of services including vehicle acquisition, maintenance management, insurance management, licensing and cycling of our trucks. The Account Specialist gains hands-on experience and knowledge to learn the business, to learn how to ultimately manage the branch and to support the entire business. The Account Specialist performs duties in all aspects of a branch to become familiar with line and staff functions, operations, management viewpoints and company policies and practices that affect each aspect of the business. The objective of the Account Specialist assignment is to educate Account Specialist as to all aspects of the business so that he or she can ultimately run the branch unit.The objective of this position is a well rounded education and preparation for the Account Specialist to ultimately run the branch unit.Assist in Branch sales and marketing efforts to increase business and income Prospect and target accounts to develop new business relationshipsUnderstand, communicate and sell optional protection products, rental terms and conditions, vehicle features and benefits as well as fuel options and additional equipmentCreate a strategy to convince prospects of their need to learn about our servicesConduct various meetings with our clients including initial and follow up fact-finding presentations, closing and transition meetings.Build the initial relationship with decision makers and secure referralsCreate custom business solutions to facilitate closing the saleRelationship management with clients after the transition on an as needed basisProvide a high level of customer service by assisting customers and assessing their rental needs in person and/or by phoneEffectively market the company while picking up and/or dropping off customers in a safe and courteous manner and assisting customers as neededConduct follow-up with various customers and businesses, including insurance adjusters or agents, dealerships, body shops, road-side assistance, and mobile vendors.Must be at least 21 years of age and be qualified to drive under certain parts of Department of Transportation (D.O.T) regulations. Applicants must be willing to submit to and successfully complete a DOT medical examination. Must have a Bachelor's degreeMinimum of one year prior successful sales experience. Prior experience in trucking, logistics, and/or business to business sales is a plus but not required Must have a valid drivers license with no more than two moving violations and/or at-fault accidents within the last 3 yearsNo drug or alcohol related conviction on driving record in the past 5 yearsMust be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future",Account Specialist - Commercial Truck Rental Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45206",,http://jobview.monster.com/account-specialist-commercial-truck-rental-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171446130.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,d16906bf8b5731c55822ab70f59abee9
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:09:42:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in Cincinnati,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171490996.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,bfab2ad747ef652446ca58796122c166
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:10:45:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in Cincinnati,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171491032.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6e19e3386761e9c8a9bc4fe42dfacb51
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:10:46:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Transaction Tax Manager Cincinnati, OHJob Purpose This individual is responsible for the Company's positions with regard to liabilities for taxes and fees assessed on products and services sold and consumed. Project management skills are crucial, as much of the work will entail complex projects that involve multiple departments throughout the company. Responsibilities will include management of transaction tax audits, working with IT personnel and multiple billing systems to ensure the proper collection of taxes, researching issues, training and mentoring tax department staff with respect to transaction taxes and effectively communicating issues and law changes to the appropriate individuals and departments.  The role includes representing the Company on tax matters with state and local tax authorities, as well as interfacing with customers regarding transaction tax issues.  In addition, the individual will be active in identifying and implementing opportunities to minimize the Company's tax liabilities.Attendance is required in this position.Essential Functions 25% Manage state and local transaction tax audits, analyze areas of tax exposure and make tax reserve recommendations 20% Direct and oversee collection and remittance of transaction taxes, including bill testing, management of the Company's exemption certificate processes, making decisions on the taxability of new products and services and ensuring changes are made as required to comply with changes in tax law 30% Project management that includes multi-departmental communication and providing transaction tax advice to the Company's business units as well as working with external tax practitioners to identify and implement tax saving ideas 25% Research and document the Company's positions with respect to transaction taxes, including the appropriate taxation of new products and services, tax liabilities for purchases, tax implications of acquisitions or divestitures and tax law changes EducationFour years of College resulting in a Bachelor's Degree or equivalent CPA preferred Experience/Background 8 to 10 years experience Public accounting experience or equivalent industry experience, specifically in the area of transaction taxes at a federal, state and local level Special Knowledge/Skills Extensive transaction tax knowledge and experience managing all facets of this area of taxation Advanced knowledge and experience in researching and concluding on the taxation of products and services sold and consumed Skilled at negotiating with state and local taxing authorities regarding tax assessments and interpretation of tax laws Excellent oral and written communicator, comfortable conversing with multiple departments and at all levels within the Company Advanced Excel capabilities While not required, familiarity with Access would be helpful Work Environment DeskSupervisory Responsibilities While no direct supervisory activity, this position reviews and directs the work of staff and co-ops, as well as trains and helps to mentor others in the department in the transaction tax area. Disability Accommodations:Cincinnati Bell and Cincinnati Bell Technology Solutions is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer and we provide reasonable accommodations for qualifying individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in our job application and interview procedures. If you would like to request an ADA accommodation for any part of the application and/or interview process, please contact our HR Compliance Department at (513) 8416310 or send an email to recruiting@cinbell.com If you should have any difficulty, you may use our alternative methods to express your interest in employment. A wonderful career awaits you! We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration. for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. ",Transaction Tax Manager Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/transaction-tax-manager-job-cincinnati-oh-us-169943180.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=3,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,899f4c1584a5197557b82c83d1a83b03
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:11:44:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:The Seasonal Retail Merchandising Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service, proper merchandising on the sales floor and accurate merchandise movement throughout the building. Duties include placement of new receipts and floor moves, stockroom organization and replenishment, fulfillment, reverse logistics, RFID, POS transactions and other duties as needed.Essential Functions:- Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priority- Service the customer in a helpful and friendly manner including POS transactions, credit and Plenti enrollment, and helping her to find what she is looking for- Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permits- Support Omni Channel initiatives- Perform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by Supervisor- Participate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executed- Adhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance procedures- Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality- Collaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.)- Execute merchandising, fulfillment, RFID and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include placement of merchandise to standards (zone-o-gram, directives, fixtures, ADA compliance and visual guidelines), movement of fixtures and merchandise for seasonal sets, stockroom maintenance and organization, replenishment to the sales floor, collection and transport of picked fulfillment orders to appropriate processing areas; preparing and returning BOPS/SDD orders; RFID tag up events, cycle counts, display audits and tagging standards; processing and packing of damages, non-congruent transfers, store initiated transfers, return to vendor and mark out of stock merchandise- Assist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing)Qualifications:Education/Experience:- No specific educational accomplishments are necessary.Communication Skills:- Excellent written and verbal communication skills.- Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.Mathematical Skills:- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.- Able to use a calculator.Reasoning Ability:- Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands:- This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills:- Possess strong merchandising skills.- Possess vision and creativity.- Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team.- Must possess a strong sense of urgency.- Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours:- Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. Macy's Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Seasonal Holiday Retail Merchandising,Part Time Seasonal,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-merchandising-mornings-part-time-macy%E2%80%99s-tri-county-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171802582.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=1,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,c650f083ceac143950c4b76aa6f1a507
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:11:45:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are experienced in Project Controls on Transmission & Distribution projects, we want to talk to you!APC is seeking a Project Controls Specialist for a position in Cincinnati, OH.  Contract duration is ~ 1 year with the possibility of extension. As a Project Controls Specialist, you will:Develop plans, schedules and reports for the Power Delivery Midwest Substation and Transmission line major capital projects.Communicate with various project teams and other internal work groups (Generation related and/or SmartGrid) for scheduling outages, equipment, work activities, labor hours, labor cost and material cost for both internal and contract resources coordinating the services of the project team to meet construction deadlines.Maintain familiarity with the system operations areas interfacing with the various projects underway.Responsible for research and development of work breakdown structure (WBS) and the overall effectiveness of the Primavera (P6) scheduling system as well as the WebPM functionality.Monitor and facilitate the scheduling process from both long and short term perspective to assure that capital project portfolio goals are met.Maximize the efficiency of the work force through the scheduling process. Provide substantial input into the budget and forecast of capital projects for labor hours/dollars, material quantities/dollars, and financial data.Coordinate shared resource activities over multiple projects. Provide reports, research, and problem solving skills for various groups on multiple projects.Provide analytical insight into project risks, risk thresholds, labor requirements, and financial targets.Provide direct support to Project Managers and department heads with information obtained from schedule updates and financial data.Advise Project Manager of schedule conflicts, outage limitations and associated risks.Manage scope, cost, and schedules by participating as an active project team member, developing project schedules, developing project cash flow, reviewing project cost estimates, developing project management plans, entering project budgeting information, and coordinating project funding updates and budget transfers with finance staffReport on status and financial matters by developing and updating project reports detaining status, cost, and schedule, assisting project managers by providing up to date project cost and forecast information, and assisting division staff with reports and information as necessary.Basic Qualifications:2 or 4-year degree in business, accounting, economics, engineering, or equivalent5 - 7 years related work experience in project planning and scheduling for T&D line and substation projects using Primavera software V5 through V6.2.Valid driver’s licenseDemonstrated advanced MS Excel skills requiredDemonstrated excellent communication skills, and strong conceptual and analytical skills.Demonstrated ability to work in a fast-paced environment with recurring deadlines.Demonstrated ability to work on multiple tasks simultaneously requiring strict adherence to schedules.Demonstrated experience in the operations of or construction of electric facilities related to electric substations and T&D lines.Preferred Qualifications:PMI Certification desired.Demonstrated experience leading teams and presentation skills desired.Demonstrated experience in current financial budgeting and/or Business Objects financial reporting processes.Cost experience preferred.Additional Information:Some travel to the client’s  locations for project and staff meetingsSome travel to project sites for project team meetings.",Project Controls Specialist II Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job SummaryCompanyAPCLocationCincinnati, OH 45202Job TypeFull Time Temporary/Contract/ProjectJob Category:EngineeringOccupations:General/Other: EngineeringIndustriesEnergy and UtilitiesJob Reference CodeBHJOB_22698_LPAddress:8200 Brownleigh DriveRaleigh, NC 27617Contact:Lisa Paolini",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/project-controls-specialist-ii-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171918950.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,,Engineering,605bfedc881849c0a05aa2a5f7380358
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:12:44:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Sterling is a dynamic company that has developed and lead the B2B market in credit card processing. We are growing our team and searching for those who truly thrive in sales! If you are dynamic, assertive, self-motivated, and goal orientated with a strong desire to succeed, our Inside Sales role may be just what you're looking for. To be successful in this role you must be a team player, have excellent phone prospecting skills, an extraordinary personality and a positive attitude. This position is focused on targeting and closing low-volume, high-margin opportunities within the B2B key vertical markets and all other B2B industry segments business over the phone.  Compensation and Benefits: Our compensation plan is not only competitive; it's designed to reward success. Competitive hourly rate; Excellent commission structure; Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, and Vacation/PTO  Responsibilities include: Prospect, qualify and develop sales ready leads through targeted, outbound calling; Key prospects will process $100k or less in monthly bankcard volume; Engage key decision makers to sell B2B services/products over the phone; Handle all inbound qualified sales leads from phone, email, web and referral partners within target market; Maintain active pipeline report through Salesforce, logging all activities; Project Management of possible referral partners, including weekly updates and providing key metrics and feedback to partner as needed. Requirement Qualifications Include: 2+ years of phone sales experience (preferably in Merchant, Bankcard or Financial Services); Associate’s Degree or Bachelor’s Degree preferred Ability to develop new business through prospecting and cold calling; Highly motivated to succeed in a performance driven environment; Excellent written communication and verbal communication skills; Track record of success and quota achievement; Computer literacy (Internet Browsing, Microsoft Outlook, Email). Preferred Skills and Experience Include: Knowledge of merchant and bank products/services and/or payment sales experience Outstanding sales, business development and negotiating skills Strong hunter in customer-centered sales with a desire to exceed expectations and quotas Ability to multitask and change direction in ever changing payment processing environment Strong communication including oral and presentation skills Proficient in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and Outlook.  Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address Cincinnati, OH 45227",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/inside-sales-representative-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170911098.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,,ac57a4cd4b349105fa32467db8b75ff4
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:12:45:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:SUMMARY: Responsible for receiving calls on WellPoint's 1-800 telephone lines and responds to inquiries and requests for assistance. MAJOR JOB DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Rep will answer inbound calls, disposition the calls, input demographic information into SalesForce when applicable, and the transfer the call to the appropriate department and/or advise caller whom they need to callPrimary duties may include, but are not limited to: Identifies problem, troubleshoots, and provides advice to assist callers. Understands WellPoint structure and how the to direct the calls to the appropriate area. EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE: Requires a high school diploma, three or more years related experience, or any combination of education and experience. Proficient analytical, communication and vocational skills required. Requires basic keyboard proficiency and familiarity with basic PC office software. Verbal communication, data entry, windows based program navigation and useSCHEDULE:8 hour shifts between the hours of 9 AM and 9 PM Monday - Friday. Some OT may be available. There will be a few Saturdays and Sundays required due to Open Enrollment. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1069607 Job Experience:,,Years of Experience Required:",Switchboard Operator Job in Cincinnati,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45206",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/switchboard-operator-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171810163.aspx?mescoid=4300693001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),de455f6d83176b6fb0ab6d7f5d2c3980
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:04:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T: So Much More of What You Work For Looking for an opportunity where you can put your energy and enthusiasm to work to create unlimited earning potential? Of course you are. How about a chance to learn, grow and advance with the number one wireless company in America? Even better. We're AT&T, and the only thing we enjoy more than pioneering and selling the latest devices is helping people make the most of them. Our retail opportunities are among the best, offering you great pay, strong benefits, advancement potential and a work environment full of fast-paced fun. Opportunity, Security and Great People Find out what it's like to work in an industry that's not about to slow down- with a company that has a legacy of successful innovation. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $47,175.00 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $55,521 per year. Add a full benefits package, including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, paid time off, work/life resources and discounts on AT&T products and services Round out your experience with training on the latest technologies and devices today, tomorrow and for as long as you work with us As you learn and succeed, you'll be eligible for new opportunities and financial rewards And every day, you'll work in a fast-paced environment with customers and colleagues that appreciate your energy and assistance JOB DESCRIPTION Develop and attain customer experience and sales objectives for store. Sell all products and services offered by the Company. Meet all sales objectives. Handle all administrative aspects of the sale including: completing customer contracts and warranties, pulling products from inventory, accepting customer payments and filing the completed orders. Maintain strong knowledge of all products, accessories, pricing plans, promotions and service features. Maintain knowledge of competitive offers and provide critical market feedback to the Store Manager regarding local competition and product/service needs. Handle service inquiries from customers. Provide efficient, courteous customer service and assist in all aspects of product offerings and services. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience. Position may be commissioned and quota based.With this position you need the flexibility to potentially work one of the stores within 15 miles as the needs of the business dictate (Kenwood Towne Center and Rookwood). GENERAL DUTIES The essential functions listed below are representative of duties performed by this job title. Duties generally include but are not limited to the following: GENERAL ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS WHICH ARE NORMALLY REQUIRED: Possess a competitive spirit and desire to meet and exceed sales goals Stay up-to-date on the latest data/entertainment technology and devices, such as Wi-Fi, data devices, TV entertainment tools Understand customers' needs and help them discover how our products meet those needs Multi-task in a fast paced team environment Educate and engage customers through product demonstrations Interact with customers and provide prompt and courteous customer service to all customers The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to stand for long periods of time Ability to complete all paperwork completely, accurately, in a timely manner Ability to lift up to 25 pounds Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work in other locations as the needs of the business dictate may be required. Complete all aspects of opening and closing the store in accordance with written procedures. Submit all transaction journals on a daily basis. Assists with inventory maintenance May be required to wear a uniform Desired Qualifications: 1-3 years retail/customer facing/sales experience preferred. Retail Sales Consultants are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these job descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Retail Sales Consultant Cincinnati OH (Cincinnati Central) Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-cincinnati-oh-cincinnati-central-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171909031.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=8,,,e409d0e72652302ec753bf149edcd63a
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:04:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Meet and exceed customer experience and sales objectives for store. Assist the Store Manager in the daily operation of a retail store. Under the direction of the Store Manager, schedule employees, maintain inventories, conduct physical inventories, maintain store appearance and complete day-to-day paperwork as directed. Assist Store Manager, as directed, by assisting in the development, training and management of assigned team, which may consist of support or sales personnel. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience at all times. ROLES & RESPONSIBILITIES Customer Experience and Sales · Execute store’s implementation of The AT&T Retail Promise · Assist Store Manager to: o Execute store initiatives related to sales, service, and customer experience o Meet and exceed assigned customer experience and reputation, sales and service, revenue and productivity targets o Create a work environment where motivated people can excel o Coach personnel on “opportunities” with key sales and reputation metrics, recognize teams on positive performance against key sales and reputation o Perform role plays with personnel on a regular basis to improve interactions with customers o Demonstrate the right customer behaviors defined by Delivering an Extraordinary Experience · Facilitate weekly personnel training/educational sessions as directed by Store Manager · Monitor Customer Experience Dashboard · Resolve or escalate appropriately any billing or service issues o Deliver the right customer experience by assisting with management of the store, customer coordination, the welcome and wait time process, supporting the team and assisting sales personnel with customer transactions · Consistently demonstrate excellent leadership and coaching skills Employee Management and Development · Assist, inspire and engage employees by motivating team to succeed · Lead by example · Develop employees for growth and promotion · Partner with Store Manager to observe and coach employees, providing feedback around sales technique effectiveness and providing excellent customer service · Improve employee engagement through leadership skills · Partner with Store Manager to observe and coach all employees as needed, providing feedback around sales technique effectiveness and providing excellent customer service · Improve store employee engagement through leadership skills · Assist Store Manager in ensuring personnel adhere to the Code of Business Conduct and company policies as directed by Store Manager · Fully understand and assist in educating personnel on compensation plan and how to maximize their earnings · Assist in ensuring all time cards are reviewed and accurate · Communicate temporary assignments and overtime for floating personnel Product Launches · Partner with Store Manager to successfully launch new products, services or processes · Actively inspect post-launch and drive improved results with best practices · Inspect that employees are properly trained on new products and promotions to sell with confidence · Report concerns with sellers’ knowledge and/or behavior to Store Manager or provide coaching as appropriate · Coordinate with security, facilities and mall management to ensure smooth product launch day execution Store Operations Staffing/Scheduling · Assist Store Manager with scheduling, coverage and resource planning to ensure the store has the right number of employees in the right roles at the right times · Facilitate the monthly scheduling process Merchandising · Adhere to the iPOG and the merchandising standards · Instill a sense of pride and ownership in store appearance - where all employees understand their store is the face of AT&T to every customer Compliance · Drive operational compliance of back office processes, procedures and policies · Inspect existing and new retail programs, tools and training Other · Report fraudulent activity to Asset Protection · On call for store emergencies Demonstrate AT&T Extraordinary Leader Model Characteristics · Continuously display high integrity · Develop strategic perspective and champion change · Inspire others to high performance through collaboration and teamwork · Utilize professional expertise to solve problems and analyze issues · Capture initiative and strive for results Desired Qualifications Three or more years sales/customer service experience in the telecommunications or related industry Previous management experience Well developed planning, analytical and problem-solving skills Strong organizational skills and attention to detail Strong communication, leadership, and presentation skills Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work at multiple locations within district preferred Familiarity with wireless terminology and AT&T Mobility systems preferred Assistant Store Managers are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these Job Descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Assistant Manager Store\Kiosk Cincinnati OH (Stone Creek) Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-manager-store-kiosk-cincinnati-oh-stone-creek-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171909138.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=4,,,8c2d5f81d4e002a27d7e7696fdc0ad66
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:42:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T: So Much More of What You Work For Looking for an opportunity where you can put your energy and enthusiasm to work to create unlimited earning potential? Of course you are. How about a chance to learn, grow and advance with the number one wireless company in America? Even better. We're AT&T, and the only thing we enjoy more than pioneering and selling the latest devices is helping people make the most of them. Our retail opportunities are among the best, offering you great pay, strong benefits, advancement potential and a work environment full of fast-paced fun. Opportunity, Security and Great People Find out what it's like to work in an industry that's not about to slow down- with a company that has a legacy of successful innovation. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $47,175.00 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $55,521 per year. Add a full benefits package, including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, paid time off, work/life resources and discounts on AT&T products and services Round out your experience with training on the latest technologies and devices today, tomorrow and for as long as you work with us As you learn and succeed, you'll be eligible for new opportunities and financial rewards And every day, you'll work in a fast-paced environment with customers and colleagues that appreciate your energy and assistance JOB DESCRIPTION Develop and attain customer experience and sales objectives for store. Sell all products and services offered by the Company. Meet all sales objectives. Handle all administrative aspects of the sale including: completing customer contracts and warranties, pulling products from inventory, accepting customer payments and filing the completed orders. Maintain strong knowledge of all products, accessories, pricing plans, promotions and service features. Maintain knowledge of competitive offers and provide critical market feedback to the Store Manager regarding local competition and product/service needs. Handle service inquiries from customers. Provide efficient, courteous customer service and assist in all aspects of product offerings and services. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience. Position may be commissioned and quota based. GENERAL DUTIES The essential functions listed below are representative of duties performed by this job title. Duties generally include but are not limited to the following: GENERAL ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS WHICH ARE NORMALLY REQUIRED: Possess a competitive spirit and desire to meet and exceed sales goals Stay up-to-date on the latest data/entertainment technology and devices, such as Wi-Fi, data devices, TV entertainment tools Understand customers' needs and help them discover how our products meet those needs Multi-task in a fast paced team environment Educate and engage customers through product demonstrations Interact with customers and provide prompt and courteous customer service to all customers The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to stand for long periods of time Ability to complete all paperwork completely, accurately, in a timely manner Ability to lift up to 25 pounds Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work in other locations as the needs of the business dictate may be required. Complete all aspects of opening and closing the store in accordance with written procedures. Submit all transaction journals on a daily basis. Assists with inventory maintenance May be required to wear a uniform Desired Qualifications: 1-3 years retail/customer facing/sales experience preferred. Retail Sales Consultants are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these job descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Retail Sales Consultant Cincinnati OH (Beechmont) Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-cincinnati-oh-beechmont-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171910993.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=2,,,d22e470b55766946ce8e766834bcbc0b
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:42:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more. We offer a drug free work environment and require a pre-employment drug screen. All Applicants are subject to pre-employment security background checks, and some positions may require pre-employment physical fitness for duty tests. The Technical Services Coordinator is responsible for coordinating the efficient use of regional equipment and manpower to provide Clean Pack & logistical services for internal and external customers. RESPONSIBILITIES: Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all times. Create runs and assign drivers and power units to available scheduled loads. Provide compliance information, maintenance; safety and permitting to Manager, including ensuring drivers meet federal and Company regulations/policies. Review available district level shipping requests and determine appropriate resources to schedule. Schedule CleanPack jobs within an assigned territory or region and organize personnel and equipment for optimal efficiency and execution. Minimize supply expense by reuse of supplies from facilities that are processing CleanPack waste, including maintaining a minimum/maximum supply inventory to support business volumes. Arrange transportation needs for pack and staged waste or LTL pickups. Create job folders prior to dispatching personnel, ensuring  that a Win Web pickup sheet is placed into every job folder, that the job folder contains pricing for the specific job or customer, supply needs for the job, and any applicable H&S completed forms. Identify H&S/Compliance requirements for each job and ensure that personnel have the appropriate personal protective equipment, work plans, training, etc. and completed H&S sheet. Ensure that the CleanPack team is utilizing the CleanPack Inventory Management System for each and every job. Creation of complete and accurate CleanPack sales orders, ensuring that all expected profiled waste is quoted and on the Win Web pickup sheet prior to dispatching field teams. Understand expected job profitability prior to scheduling and manages resources accordingly; Work with Technical Service Specialist and Accounts Manager to develop winning/profitable pricing strategy at quote or bidding stage; Gain Technical Services General Manager approval for all subcontracted transportation. Ensure trucks and drivers are in compliance with federal and Company policies and procedures, including submitting copies of Roadside Inspections and Accident Reports to Transportation Compliance within 24 hours. Support Technical Services General Manager in ensuring that all equipment is maintained and is in working order per Clean Harbors and federal guidelines and requirements. Maintains transportation permits to ensure compliance. Conduct interviews, performance evaluations and disciplinary proceedings of Drivers and/or Chemists.  Follows CleanPack and/or Driver Compensation Plan; Responsible for personnel action forms, medical cards, license requests and initial and subsequent requests regarding DQ files; Responsible for the daily supervision of CleanPack Chemists and Drivers. Ensures labels, manifests and LDRs are completed and accurate to execute upcoming scheduled jobs. Reviews job folders at completion of each job to ensure worksheets and related paperwork is sufficiently completed.  Approves and scans worksheets, drum/bulk load tracking forms, manifests and Shop Sheets. Identifies the need for job related and non-job related purchased services and initiates requisition and cuts purchase orders as needed. Ensures payroll is reconciled to meet established deadline.  Use of Win Web payroll reconciliation workbench. Ensures Drivers and Chemists follow proper procedure for adding profiled waste a work order while on the job site. Ensures the trip and dispatch reports are entered daily for every vehicle.  Ensures there are no missing miles on any vehicle. Ensures driver logs are completed daily and submits them to Corporate weekly. Ensures that the vehicle inspection reports are properly completed daily and ensures that any deficiencies are repaired prior to dispatch. Administers various aspects of drivers logbooks, trip sheets, expenses and driver exempt forms. Assesses plant needs and provides appropriate transportation services. Reviews Logistics Workbench and works closely with Customer Service to understand shipment needs.  Adheres to posted milkrun schedules if applicable. Maintains strong communication and working relationship with Central Logistics and the Regional Logistics team. Performs other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business.  EDUCATION/KNOWLEDGE:High School diploma or equivalent.2+ years or transportation industry experience.Leadership and supervisory skills.Knowledge of equipment, environmental regulations/statues, safety & compliance.Good communication, presentation skills and interaction with coworkers in office, region and company.Ability to handle multiple tasks simultaneously.Very detail oriented.Manifesting and placarding knowledge.Knowledge of federal regulations.Excellent organizational and time management skills. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:Requires sitting.Requires speaking and listening.Requires grasping, reaching, standing, walking, stooping and crouching.May lift pull and/or push or carrying up to 10 lbs. Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen.  Some positions also require a pre-hire medical exam.  Must meet all work eligibility requirements. Environmentally-responsible business.*CH*SKPotential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Technical Services Coordinator Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-services-coordinator-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171269172.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,2700aa3c81ad61a88037131c98c0c8ba
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  46875 Posted Date  9/17/2015 Category  Custodial/Housekeeping/Laundry Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Job Summary:  To lead and direct the Housekeeping and Laundry teams in maintaining and exceeding the highest quality standards on a daily basis.  The standards should be met by leading, training, developing, communicating, and motivating the location personnel whereby the results that are achieved are in accordance with goals and objectives, performance and quality standards established by the location.    Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Understands, follows, and enforces all Aramark/location policies and procedures Ensures that emergency procedures are understood so that in the event of an emergency the procedures are executed with accuracy and in a timely fashion Ensures that all safety procedures are understood and followed to maintain a safe working environment Ensures that location priorities are met in an accurate and timely fashion.  Consistently evaluates and provide feedback to the appropriate department Reviews present and future business and communicates all information and changes to all personnel departmentally and interdepartmentally Understands all pertinent aspects of Fidelio/ Micros systems Ensures the proper delivery and retrieval of guest requests such as extra pillows, blankets, and refrigerators Represents Aramark and the location in such a manner as to enhance their reputation. Attends all mandatory training and meetings Consistently strives to improve the communication process and always follows up with Housekeeping Director Ensures proper key control at all times Thoroughly completes other projects as assigned Process maintenance work tickets and follows up to ensure the work requested has been completed in a timely fashion Conducts frequent tours of the location to ensure that continuous quality improvements are being achieved, documents findings of the tours and ensure that the information is passed onto the appropriate personnel Conducts department line-ups to ensure that pertinent information is being communicated on a daily basis Ensures that all employees are well groomed, in proper uniform, and have a name tag Ensures that Material Safety Data Sheets are updated and are kept in prominent locations in Housekeeping and Laundry Ensures that OSHA standards are met on a daily basis Maintains a high level of morale and cooperation Communicates all appropriate information to managers’ and employees and always maintain an open door policy for employees and managers’ to comment and give feedback Uses good judgment, common sense, and fairness in decisions with all employees Leads all employees in such a manner as to obtain the best service at all times, at maximum work efficiency and at the highest level of quality Gives guidance to employees in their personal and professional development so they are prepared for opportunities to advance themselves Maintains constant inspections of areas and gives pointers to employees on how to achieve the best results Job Summary:  To lead and direct the Housekeeping and Laundry teams in maintaining and exceeding the highest quality standards on a daily basis.  The standards should be met by leading, training, developing, communicating, and motivating the location personnel whereby the results that are achieved are in accordance with goals and objectives, performance and quality standards established by the location.    Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Understands, follows, and enforces all Aramark/location policies and procedures Ensures that emergency procedures are understood so that in the event of an emergency the procedures are executed with accuracy and in a timely fashion Ensures that all safety procedures are understood and followed to maintain a safe working environment Ensures that location priorities are met in an accurate and timely fashion.  Consistently evaluates and provide feedback to the appropriate department Reviews present and future business and communicates all information and changes to all personnel departmentally and interdepartmentally Understands all pertinent aspects of Fidelio/ Micros systems Ensures the proper delivery and retrieval of guest requests such as extra pillows, blankets, and refrigerators Represents Aramark and the location in such a manner as to enhance their reputation. Attends all mandatory training and meetings Consistently strives to improve the communication process and always follows up with Housekeeping Director Ensures proper key control at all times Thoroughly completes other projects as assigned Process maintenance work tickets and follows up to ensure the work requested has been completed in a timely fashion Conducts frequent tours of the location to ensure that continuous quality improvements are being achieved, documents findings of the tours and ensure that the information is passed onto the appropriate personnel Conducts department line-ups to ensure that pertinent information is being communicated on a daily basis Ensures that all employees are well groomed, in proper uniform, and have a name tag Ensures that Material Safety Data Sheets are updated and are kept in prominent locations in Housekeeping and Laundry Ensures that OSHA standards are met on a daily basis Maintains a high level of morale and cooperation Communicates all appropriate information to managers’ and employees and always maintain an open door policy for employees and managers’ to comment and give feedback Uses good judgment, common sense, and fairness in decisions with all employees Leads all employees in such a manner as to obtain the best service at all times, at maximum work efficiency and at the highest level of quality Gives guidance to employees in their personal and professional development so they are prepared for opportunities to advance themselves Maintains constant inspections of areas and gives pointers to employees on how to achieve the best results Job Responsibilities: Requires a positive attitude, strong work ethic, and a willingness to do what it takes to achieve the required results Minimum two full years of supervisory experience in a related field Must be able to read, write, and clearly speak English Must be able to demonstrate good communication and organizational skills Computer knowledge is a plus Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Housekeeping Shift Supervisor - University Hospital - UC Health Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/housekeeping-shift-supervisor-university-hospital-uc-health-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171817787.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=4,,Food Services/Hospitality,1f2eab2274a460a974419373da21cd7c
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  71543 Posted Date  5/11/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. The hours for this position will be 6AM-2PM, Monday through Friday.  Hours will vary slightly based on business needs.  Scheduled hours will follow the school schedule (ie: if there is no school for the students, there will not be food service that day.  This includes holidays, weekends, spring/winter break, etc). Job Summary:  Responsible for the supervision, training, and management of the food service operation.  Ensure that appropriate quantities of food are prepared and served.  Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Produce and maintain work schedules and may prepare production records. Direct daily activities. Maintains food production that ensures the safety and quality of food according to policies, procedures, and department requirements. Ensure that food items are stored in a safe, organized, and hazard-free environment. Maintain all serving schedules; ensure that all food items are served per menu specifications in a safe and appropriate manner according to departmental policies and procedures. Maintain a sanitary department following health and safety codes and regulations. Maintain accurate inventory on a weekly basis according to departmental policies and procedures. May prepare orders as needed per vendor to ensure accurate production for location. Must be knowledgeable in operating an efficient cost effective program. Supervise and evaluate employees; counsel; promote employee growth, efficiency, morale, and teamwork. Maintain a safe and hazard-free working environment. Train/mentor other food service workers. Maintain logs on all maintenance required on equipment within the food service department. Perform preventative maintenance checklist. Justify replacement of existing equipment to meet needs of facility. Proficiency in multi-tasking. Perform other duties as requested by the Food Service Director whenever his/her skill and/or experience would be necessary to initiate, coordinate, or complete any given program. Must fill in for absent employees at location as necessary. Maintain knowledge of daily caterings and see they are prepared and delivered on time. Be able to work occasional night and weekend catered events. Attend food service meetings with staff. Maintain communication with staff (including the central office staff, e-mail, phone calls, inter-office mail, etc). May perform cashier duties as required.  Promote good public relations. Other duties as assigned. The hours for this position will be 6AM-2PM, Monday through Friday.  Hours will vary slightly based on business needs.  Scheduled hours will follow the school schedule (ie: if there is no school for the students, there will not be food service that day.  This includes holidays, weekends, spring/winter break, etc). Job Summary:  Responsible for the supervision, training, and management of the food service operation.  Ensure that appropriate quantities of food are prepared and served.  Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Produce and maintain work schedules and may prepare production records. Direct daily activities. Maintains food production that ensures the safety and quality of food according to policies, procedures, and department requirements. Ensure that food items are stored in a safe, organized, and hazard-free environment. Maintain all serving schedules; ensure that all food items are served per menu specifications in a safe and appropriate manner according to departmental policies and procedures. Maintain a sanitary department following health and safety codes and regulations. Maintain accurate inventory on a weekly basis according to departmental policies and procedures. May prepare orders as needed per vendor to ensure accurate production for location. Must be knowledgeable in operating an efficient cost effective program. Supervise and evaluate employees; counsel; promote employee growth, efficiency, morale, and teamwork. Maintain a safe and hazard-free working environment. Train/mentor other food service workers. Maintain logs on all maintenance required on equipment within the food service department. Perform preventative maintenance checklist. Justify replacement of existing equipment to meet needs of facility. Proficiency in multi-tasking. Perform other duties as requested by the Food Service Director whenever his/her skill and/or experience would be necessary to initiate, coordinate, or complete any given program. Must fill in for absent employees at location as necessary. Maintain knowledge of daily caterings and see they are prepared and delivered on time. Be able to work occasional night and weekend catered events. Attend food service meetings with staff. Maintain communication with staff (including the central office staff, e-mail, phone calls, inter-office mail, etc). May perform cashier duties as required.  Promote good public relations. Other duties as assigned. Must read, write, and understand verbal instructions Must complete a sanitation course either before or during first year as a lead Ability to perform basic arithmetic Maintain emotional control under stress Ability to resolve interpersonal situations Strong organizational skills Minimum Education/Certification High School Diploma/GED   Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Food Service Supervisor -La Salle High School Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-supervisor-la-salle-high-school-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170969447.aspx?mescoid=3500602001001&jobPosition=5,,Food Services/Hospitality,6264e29ea6aaee4790784c40529ce342
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Cashiers play a critical customer service role by providing customers with fast, friendly, accurate and safe service. They process Checkout and/or Return transactions, as well as monitor and maintain the Self-Checkout area. They proactively seek product/project knowledge to provide customers with information and identify selling opportunities. They follow all policies and procedures to ensure that shrink is minimized. A Head Cashier will position Cashiers and support them by expediting price checks, approving Point of Sale transactions and markdowns for mainline registers, Self-Checkout, Returns, Pro Desk, Special Services, and Tool Rental. They provide first level escalation for customer issues and assist in the supervision, coaching and training of other Front End Associates by participating in the training of new Cashiers and utilizing all available tools to coach and develop other Cashiers. The preferred qualification for a Head Cashier is 1+ years of Cashier experience.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provides customers with fast serviceFollow the standard checkout process to ensure fast checkoutRemove small items from the customer s cartInvite customers into your lane and meet customers in the aisle when availableLearn to recognize that a line is anything more than one customer checking out and two more waitingNotify the Head Cashier whenever lines formProvide customers with friendly service Offer a friendly greeting, smile and make eye contact with customersLet customers know you will assist them shortly if helping another customerThank each customer by saying, ""Thank You for Shopping The Home Depot.""Assess the customer s need for loading assistance, taking into consideration the merchandise being purchased as well as other environmental factorsGive customers your full attention throughout the transactionProcess all transactionsFollow the standard checkout process to ensure accuracy and to prevent shrinkIf assigned to Self-Checkout, actively monitor notification messages at the Cashier Station and assess the situation prior to over-ridingFollow SOP regarding cash handling procedures, including Self-CheckoutMonitor all entrances and exits, request proof of payment when necessaryNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsMay have to occasionally work outdoors where temperatures and climate can fluctuateEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odorsTravel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GEDPhysical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Cashier Skills: Demonstrates ability to quickly and accurately process transactions. Processes transactions efficiently (Seconds Per Transaction), minimizes voids/clearance actions, minimizes quantity key usage, and maximizes scanner usage Return/Exchange Skills: Demonstrates ability to efficiently and accurately process returns and exchange transaction Self-Checkout Skills: Demonstrates knowledge of all Self-Checkout procedures. Coaches customers on the use of Self-Checkout and assists customers Cash handling Skills: Demonstrates knowledge of cash handling policies and procedures Customer Recovery Skills: Handles dissatisfied customers or customer complaints effectively, defuses negative situations as appropriate; show diplomacy; guides toward positive resolution; conveys a sense of competence and effectiveness to customer",Cashier Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170836794.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2203ceade86069091e841358000ed2b6
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Case Management Specialist CLAIM YOUR FUTURE AS A GREAT PERFORMER! Providing both satisfying and challenging work along with a highly professional and friendly work atmosphere, Sedgwick has a strong commitment to its colleagues and its clients. If you are seeking a place where you can do great things for those whose lives you touch while maximizing your own career possibilities, Sedgwick is the place for you. As the largest and most innovative Third Party Administrator in the claims industry and the first and only TPA to receive both recognition as the Best TPA in America and the coveted Employer of Choice designation, we invite you to come be a part of our team and, ""Claim Your Future."" PRIMARY PURPOSE: To perform initial and ongoing clinical assessment and evaluate need for alternative treatment, to negotiate and coordinate appropriate medical treatment and length of disability with providers and employers; and to implement a case management plan with ongoing monitoring to ensure quality and appropriate service delivery of the case management process. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Performs initial and ongoing clinical assessment via telephone calls to client (injured employee), employer, physician and attorney as indicated; assesses client's situation for psychosocial needs, cultural implications and support systems in place.Creates a case management plan based on the assessment with measurable goals and objectives utilizing evidence-based criteria; monitors ongoing progress toward these goals and objectives; implements plan through case management interventions and communication with all parties to reach desired goals and objectives.Evaluates need for alternative treatment.Negotiates appropriate level and intensity of care and disability duration with providers through use of medical and disability duration guidelines, adhering to quality assurance standards,Negotiates and coordinates a prompt return to work with employer.Measures interventions to determine the outcome of the case manager's involvement to include clinical, financial, variance, quality of life, and client satisfaction; maintains accurate record of management including costs, savings and demographic data.Provides case direction and supervision to field case specialists when on-site intervention is required; ensures quality and appropriate service delivery.Communicates effectively with handling claims examiner, client, claimant, attorney and supervisor.Maintains client's privacy and confidentiality, promotes client safety and advocacy; and adheres to ethical, legal, accreditation and regulatory standards.ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Performs other duties as assigned. Supports the organization's quality program(s). QUALIFICATIONS Education & Licensing Current unrestricted RN license(s) in a state or territory of the United States required. Bachelor's degree in nursing (BSN) from accredited college or university or equivalent work experience preferred. Certification in case management, rehabilitation nursing or a related specialty is highly preferred. Experience Five (5) years of related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience required to include two (2) years of fulltime equivalent providing direct clinical care to the consumer required or equivalent combination of experience and education. Skills & Knowledge Knowledge of workers' compensation laws and regulations Excellent oral and written communication, including presentation skills PC literate, including Microsoft Office products Leadership/management/motivational skills Analytical and interpretive skills Strong organizational skills Excellent interpersonal skills Excellent negotiation skills Ability to work in a team environment Ability to meet or exceed Performance Competencies WORK ENVIRONMENT When applicable and appropriate, consideration will be given to reasonable accommodations. Mental: Clear and conceptual thinking ability; excellent judgment, troubleshooting, problem solving, analysis, and discretion; ability to handle work-related stress; ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously; and ability to meet deadlines Physical: Computer keyboarding, travel as required Auditory/Visual: Hearing, vision and talkingThe statements contained in this document are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by a colleague assigned to this description. They are not intended to constitute a comprehensive list of functions, duties, or local variances. Management retains the discretion to add or to change the duties of the position at any time. Sedgwick is an Equal Opportunity Employer and a Drug-Free Workplace",Case Management Spicialist Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/case-management-spicialist-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171390747.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,,d1ac9e991be5263856e818bd1802f36a
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  73225 Posted Date  5/31/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Prepare a daily report that verifies transactions Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Understand what is inclusive of a reimbursable meal Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Communicate with the Kitchen Manager daily to understand and properly prepare menu for the day Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Measure and mix ingredients according to standardized recipes using blenders, mixers, grinders, slicers, and other preparation equipment to prepare entrees, soups, salads, sandwiches, gravies, desserts, sauces, casseroles, and other food items Bake, roast, broil, boil, and steam meats, fish, vegetables, and other foods Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use May bake bread, rolls, cakes, and pastries Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, seeing, standing, walking GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Prepare a daily report that verifies transactions Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Understand what is inclusive of a reimbursable meal Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Communicate with the Kitchen Manager daily to understand and properly prepare menu for the day Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Measure and mix ingredients according to standardized recipes using blenders, mixers, grinders, slicers, and other preparation equipment to prepare entrees, soups, salads, sandwiches, gravies, desserts, sauces, casseroles, and other food items Bake, roast, broil, boil, and steam meats, fish, vegetables, and other foods Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use May bake bread, rolls, cakes, and pastries Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, seeing, standing, walking QUALIFICATIONS: Culinary experience required High School diploma/GED Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Food Service Worker - U.S. Bank Arena Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-worker-u-s-bank-arena-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170969237.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=7,,Food Services/Hospitality,e1980dcee29398d7139f6413b7d76505
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Cincinnati, OH.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Co. Chemical Division has developed into a premium tank truck carrier over the past 60 plus years of offering outstanding service to the chemical industry handling both liquid and dry bulk chemicals. Transport Service Co. has a reputation of meeting the unique needs for customer's equipment and service requirements.Transport Service Company - Chemical Division is now offering premium pay to drivers with tank experience. ** Company Drivers:Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Owner-Operators:Local, Regional and OTR positions Flexible home time Competitive pay - mileage or percentage contract Loading and unloading pay Zone pay for local work Health insurance plans available 100% of Fuel Surcharge paid to Owner-Operator 100% of Billable Pump or Compressor Charge paid to Owner-Operator Paid Orientation and Training Paid Weekly Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay *Independent contractors referring their own lease drivers are not eligible for referral payments And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.** Premium pay requires Class A CDL with a minimum of 5 years recent, verifiable tank experience. Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170652034.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,73e023081aebf50bbd1d0ba9d589d524
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  78437 Posted Date  7/1/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Parttime-Temporary About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Job Summary:  Responsible for providing exceptional customer service from the moment guests sits down until they leave the establishment. Display great hospitality, friendliness, and complete food and beverage knowledge. Responsible for money handling, beverage pouring, and dispensing policies as well as providing servers drinks at the service well.   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Check patrons' identification in order to ensure that they meet minimum age requirements for consumption of alcoholic beverages and following safe drinking guidelines when serving customers. Prepare needed set-up for bar. Maintain an accurate inventory of the bar including counting beer, bottled liquor, wine, cups, mixers, sodas, general bar supplies, etc. Accurate cash sales and cash handling. Close out every check once it has been paid. Assist in the set-up and break-down of bar equipment as needed. Serve and/or sell alcoholic and non-alcoholic beverages. Maintain a pleasant attitude while on duty. Inventory all stand sheet items prior to and at the end of each event and initial all bar paperwork. Calculate cash at the end of shift and return bank to the cash room. Any other task assigned by management will be considered part of the job. Opening and closing duties as assigned by supervisor or manager. Job Summary:  Responsible for providing exceptional customer service from the moment guests sits down until they leave the establishment. Display great hospitality, friendliness, and complete food and beverage knowledge. Responsible for money handling, beverage pouring, and dispensing policies as well as providing servers drinks at the service well.   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Check patrons' identification in order to ensure that they meet minimum age requirements for consumption of alcoholic beverages and following safe drinking guidelines when serving customers. Prepare needed set-up for bar. Maintain an accurate inventory of the bar including counting beer, bottled liquor, wine, cups, mixers, sodas, general bar supplies, etc. Accurate cash sales and cash handling. Close out every check once it has been paid. Assist in the set-up and break-down of bar equipment as needed. Serve and/or sell alcoholic and non-alcoholic beverages. Maintain a pleasant attitude while on duty. Inventory all stand sheet items prior to and at the end of each event and initial all bar paperwork. Calculate cash at the end of shift and return bank to the cash room. Any other task assigned by management will be considered part of the job. Opening and closing duties as assigned by supervisor or manager. EDUCATION:          High school diploma or equivalent                         KNOWLEDGE:      Extensive knowledge of advanced mixed drink recipes and restaurant point of sales computer systems.  Must be TIPS certified.                   EXPERIENCE:        Minimum two years full service bartending experience preferred.        SKILLS:                Good communication and organizational skills. Ability to work in a fast paced environment with emphasis on customer service, basic math and counting skills. A bility to pour mixed drinks and draft beer.  Must be 18 years of age or older to ring alcoholic sales on a register. Strong communication and organizational skills. Ability to reach, push, pull, bend, stoop, walk up and down stairs and stand for long periods of time.  Ability to handle multiple projects and stressful situations simultaneously. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Bartender - U.S. Bank Arena Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/bartender-u-s-bank-arena-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171815592.aspx?mescoid=3500610001001&jobPosition=10,,Food Services/Hospitality,72357f9ad93e61669fdfed404afc2f1e
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  75209 Posted Date  6/10/2016 Category  Culinary Employment Type  Parttime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Greet customers and inquire for their preference  Provide menu and answer customers’ questions regarding menu items  Provide information on new deals and discounts  Attempt to up-sell deals and provide add-on information  Prepare and pack food according to Taco Bell's policies and procedures  Serve food to dine-in customers in the event of delays  Ensure the quality and quantity of food items packed or served  Ensure that all food and drinks are packed appropriately without spill issues  Set up trays for dine-in customers  Accept cash in exchange of food and drinks sold  Hand change to customers  Process credit card payments  Ensure that there are enough supplies available  Order food supplies before they run low  Manage transfers of supplies from the store to the kitchen  Manage and update inventory  Clean and sanitize customer sitting areas, kitchen and counters  Operate cash registers and tally cash with receipts at the end of each shift  Ensure that all kitchen equipment is cleaned and maintained at all times  Rotate frozen products for freshness Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Use math to calculate change Work with client(s) with tact and diplomacy Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, seeing, standing, walking Inside Job (defined as spending approximately 75% or more of the time inside) Temperature changes: variations in temperature, which are sufficiently marked and abrupt to cause noticeable bodily reactions. GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES:  Greet customers and inquire for their preference  Provide menu and answer customers’ questions regarding menu items  Provide information on new deals and discounts  Attempt to up-sell deals and provide add-on information  Prepare and pack food according to Taco Bell's policies and procedures  Serve food to dine-in customers in the event of delays  Ensure the quality and quantity of food items packed or served  Ensure that all food and drinks are packed appropriately without spill issues  Set up trays for dine-in customers  Accept cash in exchange of food and drinks sold  Hand change to customers  Process credit card payments  Ensure that there are enough supplies available  Order food supplies before they run low  Manage transfers of supplies from the store to the kitchen  Manage and update inventory  Clean and sanitize customer sitting areas, kitchen and counters  Operate cash registers and tally cash with receipts at the end of each shift  Ensure that all kitchen equipment is cleaned and maintained at all times  Rotate frozen products for freshness Be able to work quickly and concisely under pressure Ensure storage of food in a proper and sanitary manner Organize and assist in major cleaning of refrigerators, freezers, and cooking and serving equipment at the regularly scheduled intervals Ensure food items and supplies are checked in as they arrive Ensure daily cleaning and sterilization of all dishes, silverware, and cooking utensils Promote good public relations Attend in-service meetings as scheduled by the General Manager/Lead Proper utilization of leftovers as required Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all HACCP regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Adhere to the uniform policy Serve food at proper portions as requested Adjust thermostat controls to regulate temperature of ovens, broilers, grills, roasters, steam kettles, and all other cooking and serving equipment Observe and test food being cooked by tasting, smelling, and taking temperature to assure it is cooked May wash, peel, cut, and shred vegetables and fruits to prepare them for use Other related duties as assigned MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Use math to calculate change Work with client(s) with tact and diplomacy Perform work that is routine and organized PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, seeing, standing, walking Inside Job (defined as spending approximately 75% or more of the time inside) Temperature changes: variations in temperature, which are sufficiently marked and abrupt to cause noticeable bodily reactions. QUALIFICATIONS: Foodservice Sanitation Certificate as needed High School diploma/GED Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Food Service Worker - UC Taco Bell Job in Cincinnati,"Part Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/food-service-worker-uc-taco-bell-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170968933.aspx?mescoid=3500611001001&jobPosition=10,,Food Services/Hospitality,d4981b1a790455dec3c65f87ef0ddb68
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title HVAC Maintenance Technician Auto Req ID 41239BR Job Description OVERVIEW We are currently seeking an HVAC Maintenance Technician to join our Corporate Solutions team in Cincinnati, OH. SUMMARYMaintenance and repairs of HVAC equipment, Controls & FMS Systems located in the interior and exterior of building. Regularly conducts a routine and on-going assessment of the building HVAC systems operations. Performs tests, inspections and analyzes data to assure the proper functioning of site equipment. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS Oversee & monitor the site HVAC systems and make adjustments and/or repairs as necessary. Maintenance and repairs of systems includes, but is not limited to; refrigeration, heat exchangers, hot water systems, chilled water systems, boilers, hot water heaters, pumps, valves, single and three phase motors, air compressors, heat exchangers, bearings, seals, filters and all associated equipment. Position requires the ability to analyze the operation of various systems, determine the root cause of failures and take corrective action as required. Performs preventive maintenance on all base building and critical system equipment. Maintain tools, order and track inventory for repairs. Maintain logs, document equipment repairs, adhere to daily work plan, track time, and communicate daily with the Operations Manager and Lead Engineer. Complies with departmental policy for the safe storage, usage and disposal of hazardous materials.   Maintains a clean and safe work space. Must have the ability to interact and communicate repair status to clients. Work across trades to provide support as required. May be required to work Overtime as needed and/or Flex schedule to meet business needs.  EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE High school diploma or state equivalent required, minimum of two years related trade schooling or two years of college. Minimum four years’ experience in HVAC/refrigeration trade.  KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES Skilled in use of tools and machinery required by the position. Ability to interpret schematics and blueprints. Personal Characteristics: Team player, hard worker, good interpersonal skills, and ability to communicate well in both oral and written reports and have excellent customer service skills. Computer Skills: Proficient with Microsoft Office, Facility Management & Building Automation systems and CMMS. Physical Requirements: Ability to frequently walk up and down stairs for inspections and emergency procedure practice or implementation. Ability to climb ladders up to 40 feet and lift 60 lbs repeatedly.  CERTIFICATIONS AND LICENSES EPA Certification preferred or ability to obtain within 1 year from date of hire. Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $58.3 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",HVAC Maintenance Technician Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/hvac-maintenance-technician-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171608893.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9c16c9b6de6e7ce94b14a8656127bca6
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"AT&T: So Much More of What You Work For Looking for an opportunity where you can put your energy and enthusiasm to work to create unlimited earning potential? Of course you are. How about a chance to learn, grow and advance with the number one wireless company in America? Even better. We're AT&T, and the only thing we enjoy more than pioneering and selling the latest devices is helping people make the most of them. Our retail opportunities are among the best, offering you great pay, strong benefits, advancement potential and a work environment full of fast-paced fun. Opportunity, Security and Great People Find out what it's like to work in an industry that's not about to slow down- with a company that has a legacy of successful innovation. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $47,175.00 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $55,521 per year. Add a full benefits package, including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), tuition reimbursement, paid time off, work/life resources and discounts on AT&T products and services Round out your experience with training on the latest technologies and devices today, tomorrow and for as long as you work with us As you learn and succeed, you'll be eligible for new opportunities and financial rewards And every day, you'll work in a fast-paced environment with customers and colleagues that appreciate your energy and assistance JOB DESCRIPTION Develop and attain customer experience and sales objectives for store. Sell all products and services offered by the Company. Meet all sales objectives. Handle all administrative aspects of the sale including: completing customer contracts and warranties, pulling products from inventory, accepting customer payments and filing the completed orders. Maintain strong knowledge of all products, accessories, pricing plans, promotions and service features. Maintain knowledge of competitive offers and provide critical market feedback to the Store Manager regarding local competition and product/service needs. Handle service inquiries from customers. Provide efficient, courteous customer service and assist in all aspects of product offerings and services. Ensure an extraordinary customer experience. Position may be commissioned and quota based.With this position you need the flexibility to potentially work one of the stores within 15 miles as the needs of the business dictate (Beechmont, Eastgate, Milford). GENERAL DUTIES The essential functions listed below are representative of duties performed by this job title. Duties generally include but are not limited to the following: GENERAL ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS WHICH ARE NORMALLY REQUIRED: Possess a competitive spirit and desire to meet and exceed sales goals Stay up-to-date on the latest data/entertainment technology and devices, such as Wi-Fi, data devices, TV entertainment tools Understand customers' needs and help them discover how our products meet those needs Multi-task in a fast paced team environment Educate and engage customers through product demonstrations Interact with customers and provide prompt and courteous customer service to all customers The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to work flexible hours, including evenings, weekends and holidays Ability to stand for long periods of time Ability to complete all paperwork completely, accurately, in a timely manner Ability to lift up to 25 pounds Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Ability to work in other locations as the needs of the business dictate may be required. Complete all aspects of opening and closing the store in accordance with written procedures. Submit all transaction journals on a daily basis. Assists with inventory maintenance May be required to wear a uniform Desired Qualifications: 1-3 years retail/customer facing/sales experience preferred. Retail Sales Consultants are paid a competitive hourly rate and can earn additional monthly commission dollars by meeting and/or exceeding sales objectives! Provisions listed in these job descriptions may be changed or modified by AT&T Mobility without prior notice at any time, at the Company's sole discretion.",Retail Sales Consultant Cincinnati OH (Cincinnati East) Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-cincinnati-oh-cincinnati-east-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171909013.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=12,,,bb5c21ee05d838f4813074e436a0ed5a
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance mechanicLocation:Cincinnati, OHDuration: 1+year2nd shift (must be able to train on 1st shift, 6 am - 2:30 pm, for 1 month)The Technician will support coating process development and industrialization efforts, coating equipment operation and maintenance, and data documentation and reporting.DESIRED: Maintenance mechanic that has hands-on experience with operation plans. Please send your resumes to gjangam@butler.com Or can call ion 805-319-4440",Maintenance mechanic Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-mechanic-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171795578.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,83fd4986697f71f45610fab686c634fc
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-Cincinnati ID  86565 Posted Date  9/1/2016 Category  Food Service Management Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Essential Tasks and Responsibilities: Sets up and breaks down work stations Maintains a clean and sanitary work station Cooks and prepares food according to production guidelines and recipes Knowledge of food product, identification, and acceptable level of food quality Ensures food is stored at the appropriate temperature for the appropriate length of time and follows all food safety standards Completes daily temperature logs Must know methods of food preparation, cooking times, and portion sizes to ensure food is prepared in prescribed manner Evaluates food quality and preparedness by tasting Cuts, trims, bones, and carves meats and poultry for cooking Responsible for using correct portions when cutting, preparing, and serving items Cleans and sanitizes work areas, equipment, and utensils Additional Job Functions: Assists in other areas as needed Adheres to weekly/monthly cleaning schedules as posted by management Completion of any task requested by a supervisor or member of the Aramark management team. Required Qualifications: Good interpersonal skills and the ability to work in a team environment Excellent customer service Minimum 1½ years experience in the food service industry as a cook The ability to safely operate all kitchen equipment The ability to read and follow recipes Desired Qualifications: Serve Safe Certified High School Education or equivalent More than 3 years experience in the food service industry as a cook Work Environment: Back-of-house. Requires frequent lifting/transporting hot food items, ability to work inside kitchen area, interact with heated equipment, steam, and other at risk conditions. Involves repetitive motion. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Cook - University Hospital - UC Health Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-university-hospital-uc-health-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171813853.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=12,,Food Services/Hospitality,fc57e46f3586a228dd12f2dcbed62b00
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:54:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Data Specialist CLAIM YOUR FUTURE AS A GREAT PERFORMER! Providing both satisfying and challenging work along with a highly professional and friendly work atmosphere, Sedgwick has a strong commitment to its colleagues and its clients. If you are seeking a place where you can do great things for those whose lives you touch while maximizing your own career possibilities, Sedgwick is the place for you. As the largest and most innovative Third Party Administrator in the claims industry and the first and only TPA to receive both recognition as the Best TPA in America and the coveted Employer of Choice designation, we invite you to come be a part of our team and, ""Claim Your Future."" PRIMARY PURPOSE: To collect, analyze and report data; to be responsible for the data integrity; and to generate reports verifying and ensuring data integrity and accuracy. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Compiles data; prepares and distributes reports; and analyzes results.Ensures data integrity; develops and produces reports utilized in measuring data accuracy.Creates reports daily to review data integrity; creates exception reports to identify incorrect data.Creates management reports to improve overall quality.Creates summary reports for external clients.Generates reports as requested by internal or external client.ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Performs other duties as assigned.Supports the organization's quality program(s).QUALIFICATIONS Education & Licensing Associate degree with business or computer related courses from an accredited college or university preferred. Experience Four (4) years of related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience required. One (1) year query and report writing experience strongly preferred. Skills & Knowledge Knowledge of query and report writingExcellent oral and written communication, including presentation skillsPC literate, including Microsoft Office productsAnalytical and interpretive skillsStrong organizational skillsExcellent interpersonal skillsExcellent negotiation skillsAbility to work in a team environmentAbility to meet or exceed Performance CompetenciesWORK ENVIRONMENTWhen applicable and appropriate, consideration will be given to reasonable accommodations. Mental: Clear and conceptual thinking ability; excellent judgment, troubleshooting, problem solving, analysis, and discretion; ability to handle work-related stress; ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously; and ability to meet deadlines Physical: Computer keyboarding, travel as required Auditory/Visual: Hearing, vision and talking NOTE: Credit security clearance, confirmed via a background credit check, is required for this position. The statements contained in this document are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by a colleague assigned to this description. They are not intended to constitute a comprehensive list of functions, duties, or local variances. Management retains the discretion to add or to change the duties of the position at any time. Sedgwick is an Equal Opportunity Employer and a Drug-Free Workplace",Data Specialist Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/data-specialist-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171611277.aspx?mescoid=4300761001001&jobPosition=5,,,e44ce4d240300e5c991c5eda385f960a
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:13:55:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer Enterprise Fleet Management in Cincinnati, Ohio is excited to announce the opening for an Account Manager ! Enterprise Fleet Management is a privately held, full-service fleet management business for companies, government agencies and organizations with medium-sized fleets. With more than 50 fully staffed offices nationwide, our team of experts can assemble a customized or full-service fleet management program that is just right for each business. The Account Manager (AM) position is an outside sales position responsible for managing, developing and penetrating our existing customer base. The AM will work with companies with a fleet of vehicles of 20 or more who have a strong need to out-source their fleet management services. The AM will achieve sales goals through referrals and various forms of marketing and sales presentations that define the value of fleet management to key decision makers. The AM's primary responsibility is to act as a virtual fleet manager for each of their customers and their success is measured by account retention, penetration and the ability to exceed the customer's expectations for service, knowledge and professionalism. Additionally, the AM will be knowledgeable of our complete menu of ancillary services. Enterprise Fleet Management continues to grow at an exceptional rate nationally and we have a world-class training program which includes an emphasis on products, finance and sales which helps lead to our growth. With significant profit growth this past Fiscal Year, we are looking for the right candidate to continue to help us with our double-digit growth plans! We have a rich legacy of getting people promoted within our region as well as out around the country and we are looking to continue that tradition. This position offers a variety of career paths which include career sales or management opportunities around the country. Success in the AM role can lead to significant income growth with a nearly unlimited upside! Other perks include: -Company Car- -Fuel Card- -Use of a Surface Pro and other great technology- -401k, Profit Sharing and Full Benefits- -Minimum starting pay is $60,000 guaranteed (based on experience) + upside Please check out our website at: www.efleets.com for additional information! This office is located at: 3700 Park 42 Drive, Cincinnati, Ohio 45241 Lower Total Cost of Ownership (TCO) for clientsEstablish appropriate expectations with accounts (amount of time for requests/questions, factory/stock purchases, cycling, etc.)Own, retain and grow existing client baseGenerate referrals from networking and existing client base for ancillaries, cycling and renewalsDevelop long term relationships with decision makers through regularly scheduled on-site meetings, ongoing marketing and being the strategic consultant for them at Enterprise Fleet Management (EFM)Regularly update product knowledge/industry news and sales skillsSet and achieve sales goalsSell additional products and servicesDevelop profitable pricing strategies; evaluate and recommend adjustmentsMeeting Prep/Meeting follow-upPartner with Account Fleet Coordinator(s) to maximize level of serviceAssist Business Management with the annual credit review processPerform creative analysis of available reportingMust be at least 18 years of ageCompleted Bachelors degree requiredMust have at least 2 years of B2B (Business to Business) outside sales experience (not retail)Must have a valid drivers license with no more than 2 moving violations/at-fault accidents within the last 3 yearsNo drug or alcohol driving related incidents within the last 5 years (ex: DUI, DWI, OWI, etc.)Must be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the futureMust live within a 1 hour commute of the office located at 3700 Park 42 Drive in Cincinnati, Ohio",Fleet Management Account Manager - Cincinnati Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45206",,http://jobview.monster.com/fleet-management-account-manager-cincinnati-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171292671.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Account Management (Commissioned)General/Other: Sales/Business Development,9f9dbafc98dba0f2c02c6de7004439eb
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:14:42:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"**Test Engineer 5****Requisition ID: 16014738****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**Northrop Grumman, Cincinnati OH is looking for a Test Engineering Lead to join our Test Engineering Department\.Candidate must be able to determine methods for effectively performing testing and/or creating test specifications, test plans, procedures and reports on complex systems\. Candidate should have experience in the collection, measurement, and evaluation of data including the use of a wide range of test equipment such as RF Power Meters, Frequency Generators, Spectrum Analyzers, Network Analyzers, DMM’s and Oscilloscope’s\. Testing is performed on analog, digital and RF circuits and systems\. RF circuits experience is a huge plus\.Candidate should have test software development experience, especially ANSI C and LabWindows/CVI\. Candidate should have the ability to analyze and troubleshoot hardware and software UUT designs from system level down to board/module level with experience using standard test interfaces such as; Ethernet TCP/IP, USB, GPIB, RS\-232, RS\-422, etc\. Candidate should have experience with RF testing from MHz to GHz including cabled and over\-the\-air testing\.Candidate should be a self\-starter, with minimal oversight needed to complete assignments\. Candidate will participate in program team meetings and act as the liaison of the Test Engineering Department interfacing directly with the customer and conducting customer training as required\.Duties are primarily performed at the Cincinnati location; however there may be occasional travel that is required to assist the customer as directed by management\. The position requires candidates to have the ability to obtain and maintain a top secret security clearance\.Basic Qualifications:BS with 10 years’ or MS with 7 years’ experiencein an engineering disciplineAble to obtain and maintain a Top Secret clearance\.Preferred Qualifications:BS with 14 years’ or MS with 10 years’ experiencein an engineering disciplineActive Top Secret clearance\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Test Engineer 5_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16014738_",Test Engineer  Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"**Test Engineer 5****Requisition ID: 16014738****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**Northrop Grumman, Cincinnati OH is looking for a Test Engineering Lead to join our Test Engineering Department\.Candidate must be able to determine methods for effectively performing testing and/or creating test specifications, test plans, procedures and reports on complex systems\. Candidate should have experience in the collection, measurement, and evaluation of data including the use of a wide range of test equipment such as RF Power Meters, Frequency Generators, Spectrum Analyzers, Network Analyzers, DMM’s and Oscilloscope’s\. Testing is performed on analog, digital and RF circuits and systems\. RF circuits experience is a huge plus\.Candidate should have test software development experience, especially ANSI C and LabWindows/CVI\. Candidate should have the ability to analyze and troubleshoot hardware and software UUT designs from system level down to board/module level with experience using standard test interfaces such as; Ethernet TCP/IP, USB, GPIB, RS\-232, RS\-422, etc\. Candidate should have experience with RF testing from MHz to GHz including cabled and over\-the\-air testing\.Candidate should be a self\-starter, with minimal oversight needed to complete assignments\. Candidate will participate in program team meetings and act as the liaison of the Test Engineering Department interfacing directly with the customer and conducting customer training as required\.Duties are primarily performed at the Cincinnati location; however there may be occasional travel that is required to assist the customer as directed by management\. The position requires candidates to have the ability to obtain and maintain a top secret security clearance\.Basic Qualifications:BS with 10 years’ or MS with 7 years’ experiencein an engineering disciplineAble to obtain and maintain a Top Secret clearance\.Preferred Qualifications:BS with 14 years’ or MS with 10 years’ experiencein an engineering disciplineActive Top Secret clearance\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Test Engineer 5_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16014738_",,http://jobview.monster.com/test-engineer-5-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170826787.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=12,,Engineering,1ab0debf8437db8fec59a89d3992cc3d
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:14:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Senior Java Developer. Summary of Responsibilities:This position will be responsible for designing, producing, modifying and implementing computer programs of all sizes and complexity.  This role will program not only Enterprise Content Management solutions, but also the custom coding necessary to integrate the platform into the larger Enterprise ecosystem. As they grow in experience and knowledge they are expected to become trusted advisors to other IT departments and the business units on the capabilities and uses of the Enterprise Content Management platform.Position Responsibilities:•Researches, designs, defines, develops, tests, documents and implements new computer applications or changes to existing applications following Western & Southern Financial Group (WSFG) standards.    •Installs software packages and/or personal computer software.  •Assures that hardware and software operate efficiently.•Utilizes programming tools effectively to ensure accuracy and enhance productivity.•Assembles and analyzes data relating to processing problems, soliciting help as needed from IS and business unit associates.•Consults and/or advises business unit associates by written and/or oral communication on inquiries concerning existing or proposed systems.•Participates in committee meetings on developmental projects, large-scale improvement projects and internal Information Services’ technical committees.•Provides training and mentoring to other programming staff, systems managers, business unit management or business unit associates on technical topics or systems definition.•Handles multiple assignments with multiple deadlines simultaneously.•Performs other duties as assigned by management.",Senior Java Developer Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-java-developer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171180931.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,IT/Software Development,e311948afc10c416c25ac3f67c4871a5
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:15:33:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"**Machinist 2****Requisition ID: 16012893****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**The Northrop Grumman, Cincinnati, OH location is looking for a 1st shift Machinist to work in our model shop\.Sets up and operates a variety of machine tools such as lathes, milling machines, shapers, planers, and precision grindersto make metal parts, mechanisms, tools, or machines to exacting tolerances and dimensions\. Interprets blueprints,sketches, and engineering specifications; determines sequence of operations, number of cuts required, and method ofsetup; uses a variety of machinist hand tools and precision measuring instruments; makes standard shop computationsrelating to dimensions of work, tooling, feeds, and speeds; measures, marks, and scribes dimensions and referencepoints to lay out stock for machining; fits and assembles precision parts into mechanical equipment and determinesmaterial, parts, and equipment required\. Some machines may be numerically controlled\. May monitor and verify quality inaccordance with statistical process or other control procedures\. Typically requires completion of a formal apprenticeshipor equivalent training and experience\.NGXETRONBasic Qualifications:Ability to set up and operate a variety of machine tools such as lathes, milling machines, shapers, planers,and precision grinders\.Ability to interpret blueprints, sketches, and engineering specifications\.Ability to make standard shop computations relating to dimensions of work\.High School diploma or equivalent\.Ability to obtain and maintain a clearance\.Preferred Qualifications:Typical Minimum Education/Experience:High School Diploma and 2 years additional educationand/or 3 years experience programming with FeatureCAM 2015 softwareSetting up and running a HAAS VF 2 threeand four axis CNC Vertical Milling Machine and 2 years experience programing and running a Fortus 450MC 3D Printerusing ABS\-M30 and Ultem 9085 materials\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Machinist 2_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16012893_",Machinist  Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"**Machinist 2****Requisition ID: 16012893****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**The Northrop Grumman, Cincinnati, OH location is looking for a 1st shift Machinist to work in our model shop\.Sets up and operates a variety of machine tools such as lathes, milling machines, shapers, planers, and precision grindersto make metal parts, mechanisms, tools, or machines to exacting tolerances and dimensions\. Interprets blueprints,sketches, and engineering specifications; determines sequence of operations, number of cuts required, and method ofsetup; uses a variety of machinist hand tools and precision measuring instruments; makes standard shop computationsrelating to dimensions of work, tooling, feeds, and speeds; measures, marks, and scribes dimensions and referencepoints to lay out stock for machining; fits and assembles precision parts into mechanical equipment and determinesmaterial, parts, and equipment required\. Some machines may be numerically controlled\. May monitor and verify quality inaccordance with statistical process or other control procedures\. Typically requires completion of a formal apprenticeshipor equivalent training and experience\.NGXETRONBasic Qualifications:Ability to set up and operate a variety of machine tools such as lathes, milling machines, shapers, planers,and precision grinders\.Ability to interpret blueprints, sketches, and engineering specifications\.Ability to make standard shop computations relating to dimensions of work\.High School diploma or equivalent\.Ability to obtain and maintain a clearance\.Preferred Qualifications:Typical Minimum Education/Experience:High School Diploma and 2 years additional educationand/or 3 years experience programming with FeatureCAM 2015 softwareSetting up and running a HAAS VF 2 threeand four axis CNC Vertical Milling Machine and 2 years experience programing and running a Fortus 450MC 3D Printerusing ABS\-M30 and Ultem 9085 materials\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Machinist 2_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16012893_",,http://jobview.monster.com/machinist-2-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170827900.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,bd223f655d80346b7f736e80e3dcdc0e
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:15:44:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"**Test Engineer 3****Requisition ID: 16011150****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**Northrop Grumman, Cincinnati OH is looking for a Test Engineer to join our Test Engineering Department\.Candidate must be able to determine methods for effectively performing testing and/or creating test specifications, test plans, procedures and reports on complex systems\. Candidate should have experience in the collection, measurement, and evaluation of data including the use of a wide range of test equipment such as RF Power Meters, Frequency Generators, Spectrum Analyzers, Network Analyzers, DMM’s and Oscilloscope’s\. Testing is performed on analog, digital and RF circuits and systems\. RF circuits experience is a huge plus\.Candidate should be a self\-starter, with minimal oversight needed to complete assignments\. Candidate will participate in program team meetings and act as the liaison of the Test Engineering Department interfacing directly with the customer and conducting customer training as required\.Duties are primarily performed at the Cincinnati location; however there may be occasional travel that is required to assist the customer as directed by management\. The position requires candidates to have the ability to obtain and maintain a top secret security clearance\.NGXETRONBasic Qualifications:BS in an engineering discipline5 years of technical experience in the test and troubleshoot of CCA's and electronic assemblies\.Ability to troubleshoot failures to root causeExperience in the test and troubleshoot of Analog and Digital circuits and assemblies\.Ability to use MS Office applications\.Able to obtain a Top Secret clearance\.Preferred Qualifications:BS in an engineering discipline\.6 years of technical experience in the test and troubleshoot of CCA's and electronic assemblies\.Ability to troubleshoot failures to the component level\.Experience in the test and troubleshoot of Analog and Digital circuits and assemblies\.Experience in the test and troubleshoot of RF circuits and assemblies\.Thorough in the use of all MS Office applications\.Familiar in the use of SAP\.Active Top Secret security clearance\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Test Engineer 3_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16011150_",Test Engineer  Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"**Test Engineer 3****Requisition ID: 16011150****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: Yes, 10 % of the Time**Northrop Grumman, Cincinnati OH is looking for a Test Engineer to join our Test Engineering Department\.Candidate must be able to determine methods for effectively performing testing and/or creating test specifications, test plans, procedures and reports on complex systems\. Candidate should have experience in the collection, measurement, and evaluation of data including the use of a wide range of test equipment such as RF Power Meters, Frequency Generators, Spectrum Analyzers, Network Analyzers, DMM’s and Oscilloscope’s\. Testing is performed on analog, digital and RF circuits and systems\. RF circuits experience is a huge plus\.Candidate should be a self\-starter, with minimal oversight needed to complete assignments\. Candidate will participate in program team meetings and act as the liaison of the Test Engineering Department interfacing directly with the customer and conducting customer training as required\.Duties are primarily performed at the Cincinnati location; however there may be occasional travel that is required to assist the customer as directed by management\. The position requires candidates to have the ability to obtain and maintain a top secret security clearance\.NGXETRONBasic Qualifications:BS in an engineering discipline5 years of technical experience in the test and troubleshoot of CCA's and electronic assemblies\.Ability to troubleshoot failures to root causeExperience in the test and troubleshoot of Analog and Digital circuits and assemblies\.Ability to use MS Office applications\.Able to obtain a Top Secret clearance\.Preferred Qualifications:BS in an engineering discipline\.6 years of technical experience in the test and troubleshoot of CCA's and electronic assemblies\.Ability to troubleshoot failures to the component level\.Experience in the test and troubleshoot of Analog and Digital circuits and assemblies\.Experience in the test and troubleshoot of RF circuits and assemblies\.Thorough in the use of all MS Office applications\.Familiar in the use of SAP\.Active Top Secret security clearance\.Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _Test Engineer 3_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16011150_",,http://jobview.monster.com/test-engineer-3-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170828069.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=10,,Engineering,49bc348c4596629a75be57cb01b2e3d0
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:15:44:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Warehouse Associate is responsible for inputting data, preparing packing and shipping documents, picking and staging outbound shipments, ensuring inbound and outbound shipments are accurate and free from damage, and maintaining a clean, neat and orderly work area. He/She must also have the ability to manually move and lift 50 to 100 lb. boxes of tile on a regular basis and be available to work nights and weekends.Read customer order, work order, shipping order, or requisition to assemble customer orders from stock and place order on pallet or shelves.Sort and place materials or items on racks, shelves, or in bins according to predetermined sequence such as size, type, style, color, or product code.Complete all paperwork pertaining to inventory, which includes shipping confirmations, receiving confirmations, purchase orders, open orders, order check-off, and UPS.Ensure complete accuracy of store inventory at all times.Label all orders and back stock clearly.Participate in the cycle counting program.Load and unload customer vehicles; ensure proper paperwork is completed and signed off by the customer after loading of product.Process incoming freight trucks in a timely manner.Proper use of equipment, including but not limited to forklifts, to move inventory.Inspect equipment to maintain good working order.Record amounts of product received and distributed.Accountable for overall cleanliness/organization of the warehouse.Enter records into computer.Other duties as assigned. High School DiplomaAbility to read and write in EnglishStrong work ethicForklift certification or willing to be certifiedExcellent organizational skillsBasic mathematical skillsBasic computer skillsKnowledge of proper safety measuresAbility to manually move and lift 50lbs regularly and up to 100 lbs.BenefitsGreat Pay and Exceptional TrainingIndividual Career Growth OpportunitiesHoliday, Vacation and PTO PayMedical, Dental, and Vision InsuranceHSA Employer Contributions401(k) Plan with employer matchingCompany Paid Basic Life Insurance and Accidental Death & DismembermentCompany Paid Long Term DisabilityThe Tile Shop is an Equal Opportunity Employer.PI95140728Apply Here",Warehouse Associate Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, MN 45209",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-job-cincinnati-mn-us-171263454.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=9,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,640a4b728d57576e3a7a3e0cdda1be10
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:15:56:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job **DSP/FPGA Engineer 4****Requisition ID: 16009838****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: No**Northrop Grumman is seeking a Senior DSP/FPGA Engineer to do important signal processing work on multiple classified government programs at our Cincinnati, OH facility\.Candidate will be involved in the architecture, design, development, and integration of hardware/software implementations of DSP algorithms and digital communication system solutions for incorporation into sophisticated embedded systems\. They will provide technical vision and leadership in the DSP area\.Candidate must have a strong background in signal processing in the RF domain and wireless digital communication systems\. Candidate must be proficient in low\-level software development and integration in an embedded systems environment\. Candidate must also have a strong background in developing FPGA\-based signal processing and digital communication systems solutions\. Matlab proficiency is required\.Typical projects are engineering intensive, rapid development jobs targeted at government and defense customers\. Experience developing software and hardware solutions for wireless, cable, or satellite digital communication systems development experience is a desired\. Experience with digital design and new board bring\-up/troubleshoot is desired\.Candidate should have experience leading small technical teams directing and overseeing their tasks\. Candidate must have the ability to apply advanced technical principles, theories and concepts and contribute to the development of new principles and concepts\. Candidate will work on unusually complex technical problems and provide solutions which are highly innovative and ingenious\.NGXETRONBasic Qualifications:\- BS degree in Electrical or Computer Engineering with a Digital Signal Processing/Digital Communications System emphasis with 9\-14 years experienceOR\- Masters Degree in same with 7\-12 years experience\.\- Matlab\- C or C\- Experience with Architecture, Design, Implementation, and Test of FPGA solutions for DSP systems in the RF domain, preferably in VHDLPreferred Qualifications:\-Possess active TS/SCI clearance\-Digital communications hardware design, implementation, and testNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _DSP/FPGA Engineer 4_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16009838_ Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","**DSP/FPGA Engineer 4****Requisition ID: 16009838****Location\(s\): United States\-Ohio\-Cincinnati****US Citizenship Required for this Position: Yes****Relocation Assistance: Relocation assistance may be available****Travel: No**Northrop Grumman is seeking a Senior DSP/FPGA Engineer to do important signal processing work on multiple classified government programs at our Cincinnati, OH facility\.Candidate will be involved in the architecture, design, development, and integration of hardware/software implementations of DSP algorithms and digital communication system solutions for incorporation into sophisticated embedded systems\. They will provide technical vision and leadership in the DSP area\.Candidate must have a strong background in signal processing in the RF domain and wireless digital communication systems\. Candidate must be proficient in low\-level software development and integration in an embedded systems environment\. Candidate must also have a strong background in developing FPGA\-based signal processing and digital communication systems solutions\. Matlab proficiency is required\.Typical projects are engineering intensive, rapid development jobs targeted at government and defense customers\. Experience developing software and hardware solutions for wireless, cable, or satellite digital communication systems development experience is a desired\. Experience with digital design and new board bring\-up/troubleshoot is desired\.Candidate should have experience leading small technical teams directing and overseeing their tasks\. Candidate must have the ability to apply advanced technical principles, theories and concepts and contribute to the development of new principles and concepts\. Candidate will work on unusually complex technical problems and provide solutions which are highly innovative and ingenious\.NGXETRONBasic Qualifications:\- BS degree in Electrical or Computer Engineering with a Digital Signal Processing/Digital Communications System emphasis with 9\-14 years experienceOR\- Masters Degree in same with 7\-12 years experience\.\- Matlab\- C or C\- Experience with Architecture, Design, Implementation, and Test of FPGA solutions for DSP systems in the RF domain, preferably in VHDLPreferred Qualifications:\-Possess active TS/SCI clearance\-Digital communications hardware design, implementation, and testNorthrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce\. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class\. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www\.northropgrumman\.com/EEO \. U\.S\. Citizenship is required for most positions\.**Title:** _DSP/FPGA Engineer 4_**Location:** _Ohio\-Cincinnati_**Requisition ID:** _16009838_",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/dsp-fpga-engineer-4-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171434406.aspx?mescoid=1700170001001&jobPosition=14,,,44b276be6cf890dc8c6397766332e135
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:16:42:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Cincinnati, OH.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!We have INCREASED our PAY PACKAGE to include increased mileage pay, loading & unloading pay and more!We're also offering premium pay to drivers with Tank Experience! Call for details.Transport Service Company - Food Grade Division provides tank truck carrier services for manufacturers of food products. With over 40 years kosher food experience, Transport Service Co. offers a variety of liquid and dry food grade equipment. Food Grade's terminal operations span the Midwest and Southeast along with several support satellite locations throughout the United States.Transport Service Co.'s Food Grade business is categorized into two product segments, sweeteners and edible products. The sweetener product segment primarily consists of corn syrup, high fructose corn syrup and liquid sugar (""sweeteners""). The edible product segment consists of other bulk liquid food products such as: glycerin, juices, molasses, sorbitol, vegetable oils, beverage alcohols and many more.Our commitment is to provide our customers with the highest level or service excellence in our industry, exceeding their requirements and bringing added value to their overall logistics strategies. We differentiate ourselves with a driver-friendly culture that emphasizes a 100% commitment to safety and various quality-of-life opportunities for professional drivers.Company Drivers:Regional and OTR Flexible home time Competitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental and Vision plans Paid vacations and holidays 401K with company match Paid training on safe driving and product handling Satellite Dispatch Mileage Club Safety Bonus Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your Life We hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with Transport Service Company.We require Class A CDL with 1 year recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank endorsement (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581 for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.",Class A CDL Driver - TSC Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-tsc-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171472760.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=1,,Logistics/Transportation,4bf4190dc50e9e672e5846e2c26c0a5f
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:16:42:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Overview:As a Gift Registry Advisor, you will be an integral part of bringing the magic of Macy's to life. Gift Registry Advisors are Macy's Home Lifestyle/Gift Registry Experts who provide personalized service through direct selling, product expertise and the use of social media tools with couples, gift givers and customers. Gift Registry Advisors are essential partners in creating a unique experience that will make customers feel welcome and comfortable.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.Essential Functions:- Guiding couples through the creation of a personalized gift registry including items for their home including kitchen, dining, bedding and bath items- Extending personalized service to couples, gift givers and all home store customers- Continual communication through email, telephone calls and in-person appointments with couples regarding their registry- Assist registering couples in developing their desired personal style for their new home through product knowledge and promoting all Families of Business (FOB's) including furniture- Maintain a professional attitude with sincerity and enthusiasm reflecting Macy's commitment to our customer the most important person in our stores- Ability to incorporate technology; computers, tablets, smart phones and social media tools to enhance the registry experience- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQualifications:Education /Experience- Retail or sales experience in customer service focused business.- 2-4 years retail/customer experience preferred- Direct Home Store experience preferred, but not requiredCommunication Skills- Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, peers and all levels of management.- Able to communicate via email and on the telephone with proper etiquette- Ability to read, write, and interpret instructional documents such as product information, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manualsMathematical Skills- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division and use a calculator.- Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios.- Must be able to make change using American Monetary units.Other Skills- Superior organizational skills and time management skills- Must be able to build relationships and influence others- Ability to set and achieve goals- Ability to task in a fast paced environment- Must enjoy meeting and interacting with customers. Possess strong sense of urgency and a thirst for learning.Work Hours- Must be able to work a four-week fixed rotating retail schedule including days, evenings and weekends.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",**Retail Gift Registry Advisor** Full Time: Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-gift-registry-advisor-full-time-cincinnati-oh-macy%E2%80%99s-kenwood-towne-centre-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171918225.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=18,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,d4c935e6ae56e512fcae0e81148f4541
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:16:44:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionCDL CLASS-A OPPORTUNITY in CINCINNATI, OH• $.51 Per Mile + Benefits• NO Touch Freight - Reefer Experience Required• Steady Work - Great Pay - Excellent EquipmentAPPLY NOW or CALL 866-780-9495 FOR MORE INFORMATIONTransForce Drivers are Respected Professionals. Join the TransForce Team …Thousands of TransForce Drivers - 53 Branch Offices - Over 24 Years of Service!• We have an excellent reputation with our drivers and our customers.• TransForce shows genuine concern for your career objectives.• Safety is our priority. We comply with DOT and FMCSA.BENEFITS:• Competitive Weekly Pay• Medical - Dental - Vision Insurance• Life & Disability Insurance• Paid Time Off• 401KREQUIREMENTS:• 2 years of recent tractor trailer driving experience• No more than 3 moving violations in the previous 3 years• Not cited for a D.O.T. defined accident in the previous 3 years• No serious offenses in the previous 7 years or pattern of unsafe practicesTruck Driver - CDL Driver (Transportation)As a CDL Truck Driver you will be responsible for the safe operation of a commercial vehicle and the reliable delivery of our clients… products.TransForce, Inc. is seeking full time and part time local and regional CDL Truck Drivers at our 53 branch offices located throughout the U.S. We are the nation…s leading transportation staffing company and our drivers are respected professionals; safe, reliable, and profitable. Join TransForce and see why our 3,500 drivers are proud to be on the TransForce team. We offer steady pay, benefits, and good equipment. In addition you…ll enjoy assignment flexibility that you won…t find anywhere else. With TransForce you have the unique ability to consider a change in assignment rather than a change in employment if situations change.Keywords: tractor trailer driver, commercial driver, Class A cdl driver, professional driver CDL-A Driver, CDL A Truck Driver, Class A CDL Driver, Class A CDL Truck Driver, CDL Truck Driver, CDL Commercial Truck Driver.*cb*",TRUCK DRIVER - CDL A OTR Driver (Transportation) Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-otr-driver-transportation-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170958413.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,de61b15c00c529410ab46dcc7eea7250
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:36:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Global Integrated Facilities Management (IFM) Director Auto Req ID 39273BR Job Description We are currently seeking a Global Integrated Facilities Management (IFM) Director for Cincinnati, OH.  The position is responsible for leading and managing the Integrated Facilities Management (IFM) service platform on the account, ensuring a high level of client and user satisfaction, including help developing an industry leading employee experience program.  This includes developing and administering global IFM programs, as well as ensuring consistency and best practices in processes, systems and reporting.The role ensures efficient and consistent operation of all facility management activities to meet contractual obligations with respect to the property portfolio of the Client across the world, achieving the Client’s global objectives of positive employee experience, cost savings, best practice, innovation, and JLL talent management. The position has supporting accountability for delivering on the account financial P&L and its management within the JLL global IFM business.  Position to be based in Chicago or Cincinnati.  Relocation assistance may be available to the ideal candidate.Essential Functions:Leadership Establish the vision and strategy of the global account IFM plans and ensure the client receives exceptional delivery. Understand the client’s key business drivers, and focus the team to ensure those priorities are aligned with JLL deliverables. The current focus is on ensuring an industry leading Employee Experience program. Ensure the account IFM team is high performing and global delivery is driven by global platforms and best practices and consistency. Ensure the account has a team of top talented FM employees; improve team capability and performance through regular coaching and feedback; provide recognition. Client/Stakeholder Management Manage relationships with Client stakeholders and the organization’s key Client contacts in CRE management to ensure all KPIs are achieved, including FM Survey scores. Serves as single point of contact for the accounts global IFM service delivery and escalation point to global management. Accountable for the global IFM service delivery to meet contractual obligations. Develop and implement global IFM business plans which meet the aligned goals. Develop and maintain a detailed understanding of the Client’s business and key factors influencing their requirement for our services. Drive the productive use of Business Intelligence decision-making and data analytics reporting. Finance Management / Cost Control / Profitability / Compliance Assist the Client with models to develop and manage global property FM budgets and forecasts in accordance with the financial timetable. Achievement of FM financial targets for the account; revenue, expenses, shared savings, and capital renewal. Meet the agreed IFM global growth targets for the account. Identify opportunities to cross-sell services. Oversee FM Compliance programs to support global/local/site requirements. Functional Responsibilities Bring strategic IFM concepts to life in tangible, effective programs with operational relevance. Direct management of global BHS and BSS and Sourcing resources and initiatives for the account. Actively manage the professional development of all direct reports, including succession plans. Implementation of technology and BI systems to support IFM service delivery, reporting and planning. Establish and manage global standard operating procedures and processes for the account. Drive client specific initiatives such as savings targets, benchmarking and best practices. ​ Contract Management Ensure adherence to the contract. Act as the IFM Contract Expert on the account, advise on any IFM contract opportunities. Responsible to achieve the IFM KPIs, service levels, and other reports as contracted. Implement and manage IFM change control process. Qualifications : A Bachelor of Arts or Bachelor of Science degree in Facilities Management / Engineering or equivalent education and experience. 20 years’ experience in Facilities Account Management or related field. Has experience leading complex account structures, running multiple teams across multiple locations and countries, in a regional or global capacity. Has demonstrated experience in handling Client and/or Firm sensitivities knowing when to escalate with urgency, or how to mitigate and de-escalate risks. Demonstrated experience in balancing the interests of the Client with those of the Firm. Experience in translating client needs into existing or new business growth. Profit and Loss experience and accountability across regions or global. Has extensive experience of living or working in another countries and regions. Critical Competencies for Success Team leadership and participation in a matrix organizational environment. Cultural awareness across regions, and passion for diversity Technical Competence Understands how to build strong client relationships. Strong IFM competency, and easily understands technical concepts. Understands technical processes and impact on delivery services and satisfaction. Running of schedules, budgets, contracts, invoices, processes. Quest for Excellence Account delivery optimization and continuous improvement. Performance management of direct reports, and influence all FM teams, using globally consistent platforms. Problem Solving & Strategic Thinking Ability to connect technical matters with monetary and business impacts. Analytical, proven ability to solve problems using an objective approach. Proven ability to employ holistic approaches and looks at long term solutions; contributes to global solutions. Project Management and Organizational Skills Excellent planning & organizational skills to prioritize work and meet tight deadlines Other Characteristics Superior client relationship skills – Able to effectively interact virtually and face to face. Proven people management skills – Ability to build and lead teams effectively, train them well and promote open, constructive and collaborative relationships at all levels. Demonstrated ability to navigate global matrix organizations through influence and collaboration, and builds strong relationships with global peers. Strong communicator – good presentation skills and possesses strong verbal & written communication skills, also an active listener. Self-motivated and confident. Flexible – able to adapt and effectively deal with rapidly changing, stressful situations. Proven ability to initiate and follow through with improvement initiatives. Able to work independently, and be a team player.   ​Exhibits honesty, trustworthiness, and consistent ethical behavior.  ​Vision, clarity, inspiration, excitement, perspective, oversight, energy, focus. Start a lasting career with JLL today! Total Rewards reflects JLL’s investment in employees’ needs and preferences in Career, Recognition, Well-being, Benefits and Pay.  We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. To be considered, please visit our Web site at www.us.am.joneslanglasalle.com/UnitedStates/EN-US/Pages/Careers.aspx to apply online.  All resumes MUST BE submitted via our web site. Please reference Job 39273BR.#LI Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $58.3 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for” in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong.•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years.•America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine.•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive years.This partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com EEO Statement EEO StatementJLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Global Integrated Facilities Management (IFM) Director Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/global-integrated-facilities-management-ifm-director-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171855689.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ffc4a5a5948a8dab94f2e79543e6b477
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:36:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Insight Global is seeking a Pharmacy Technician to work in a retail pharmacy environment for a large healthcare system in Cincinnati. This person will work under supervision of a presiding pharmacist to decipher prescription orders, enter the prescription info into the computer system, fill prescriptions, and stock medication (mostly out-patient). Additionally, this candidate will input data, update patient files and information, call patients/physicians as needed, check out customers, generate invoices, apply payments to QS1 through register, answer phones/emails/fax, process prescription orders, and complete additional paperwork as needed. This person will mainly be working in the Cincinnati area (Oak St., Dixmyth Ave., and/or Montgomery Rd), but must be willing to travel to Lebanon (zip 45036) and Hamilton (zip 45011) if needed. HOURS: Mon-Fri 8:30-5:00 (some OT possible) ATTIRE: solid color scrubs and/or business casual, lab jacket optional At least 1 year retail pharmacy experience Must provide current copy of one of the following certifications: PTCB (Pharmacy Technician Certification Board) or ExCPT Retail pharmacy experience (CVS, Kroger, Walgreens, etc. NOT mail order pharmacy companies like Humana or RightSource) Customer service background Experience with pharmacy software like QS1 (a pharmacy data management system) Epic",Pharm Tech Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,Location:,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pharm-tech-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170593264.aspx?mescoid=1900254001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,08dcb7db518d7e17002f4d4ab3cb1fbe
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:36:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description The Opportunity Our Field Service Drivers perform duties associated with Industrial tank cleaning, utility work, facility shutdown, emergency response, site remediation and rail car cleaning working outside year round in all types of weather. Field Service Divers will drive an average of 30% of the time and work onsite as part of the team assisting in the operations the remainder of the time. Depending on location, drivers may be asked to perform the duties of a field technician if business needs warrant it. Key Responsibilities: Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all time Performs industrial tank cleaning, utility work, facility shutdowns, emergency response, site remediation, rail car cleaning Vehicles operated, but not limited to Vacuum Trucks, Cusco, Air Movers, Guzzlers and Roll offs Ability to be on call for emergency response (rotation schedule will vary by branch) Maintain daily logs, time sheets, expense reports, dispatch and trip reports as well as vehicle inspection reports  Qualifications:Must have a Class B CDL with Hazmat & Tanker EndorsementsAbility to use a mobile computer Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career. Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:•      Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program)•      Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion•      Health, Dental and Life Insurance•      401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off•      Company paid certifications, licenses and training To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.com We thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company.*CHPotential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Field Service Drivers Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-drivers-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171808288.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,183d293decb2e190242daf3b42960cc3
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:36:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title Financial Analyst Auto Req ID 41078BR Job Description Our Financial Analyst will be accountable for the successful delivery and analysis of a comprehensive range of financial reports.  These reports will be used for business planning and strategic and tactical decision making.  ResponsibilitiesBudgeting/Forecasting:  Detailed forecast analysis including Budget versus Actual spending and Forecast verses Actual spending. Annual Budget planning preparation and development Assist leaders in researching and identifying budget corrections and work with others to implement change Forecast accuracy reporting  Reporting:  Support and implement “Best in Class” reporting. Complete and support regular and ad-hoc reporting including informal and formal internal and documents, reports, graphs, charts and presentations. Support team’s efforts to develop efficient reporting strategies including automation and simplification of reporting processes while preserving data integrity Organize and maintain team data collection, reporting and communication. Support cost-savings and process improvement initiatives Participate in the development and distribution of best practices, process documentation, and user support materials for reporting. Monthly & quarterly report generation Run day to day reporting and forecasting activities Maintain and enhance reporting  Analysis:   Identify tactical and strategic opportunities, gaps and financial risks through collaboration with cross-functional teams. Analyze performance data to forecast/trend. Monthly and Quarterly Report Analysis Knowledge, Skill, and Abilities Education/Training Required :   Bachelor’s degree in Finance or Accounting preferred Experience in Software Tools: MS Office Products, strong Excel skills 2 to 4 years of relevant experience  Experience in Real Estate/Property Management services preferred Ability to collaborate across many levels High level of attention to detail and accuracy and ability to make effective decisions and solve problems Strong organization and coordination skills Strong analytical skills and sound judgment Strong oral and written communication skills Excellent level of customer service skills Flexible and adaptable Excellent interpersonal skills / interpersonal sensitivity Demonstrated initiative and independence     Start a lasting career with JLL today! Total Rewards reflects JLL’s investment in employees’ needs and preferences in Career, Recognition, Well-being, Benefits and Pay.  We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. To be considered, please visit our Web site at www.us.am.joneslanglasalle.com/UnitedStates/EN-US/Pages/Careers.aspx  to apply online.   All resumes MUST BE submitted via our web site. Please reference Job  41078BR #LI     Full/Part Time Full-Time Regular/Temporary Regular Org Marketing Statement About JLLJLL (NYSE: JLL) is a professional services and investment management firm offering specialized real estate services to clients seeking increased value by owning, occupying and investing in real estate. A Fortune 500 company with annual fee revenue of $5.2 billion and gross revenue of $6.0 billion, JLL has more than 280 corporate offices, operates in more than 80 countries and has a global workforce of more than 60,000. On behalf of its clients, the firm provides management and real estate outsourcing services for a property portfolio of 4.0 billion square feet, or 372 million square meters, and completed $138 billion in sales, acquisitions and finance transactions in 2015. Its investment management business, LaSalle Investment Management, has $58.3 billion of real estate assets under management. JLL is the brand name, and a registered trademark, of Jones Lang LaSalle Incorporated. For further information, visit www.jll.com JLL is focused on winning in the marketplace and being the industry leader, executing better than anyone else and innovating to create great products and services. We operate in an atmosphere of excellence, integrity, respect and trust. We bring a sense of teamwork, inclusion and diversity in everything we pursue. Our clients see the results as we address their needs, solve their problems and bring new ideas. As a distinguished market leader, we offer challenging career opportunities in an exciting environment. Our future success as a firm depends on our ability to attract, develop and retain the very best people in the business.Our values define who we are, underscore our commitment to clients and provide direction for everything we do.Our unique culture has been recognized by industry experts and our peers. We are:•A “best company to work for’ in multiple locations around the globe, including Chicago, San Francisco, London, Ireland, Shanghai and Hong Kong•World’s Most Ethical Companies from Ethisphere Institute for seven consecutive years •America’s 100 Most Trustworthy Companies from Forbes Magazine•#1 Top Corporate Real Estate Firm 2013 from Watkins Research Group, Inc. for six consecutive yearsThis partial list of awards demonstrates our record of achievement and our commitment to fostering an award-winning culture. For further information, visit www.jll.com Information Security StatementEmployees are expected, at all times, to perform their responsibilities in accordance with the JLL Code of Business Ethics and the firm’s corporate policies. Employees granted access to the firm’s information technology are expected to follow the firm’s guidance designed to promote best practices for information security, data privacy and the appropriate use of technology systems. EEO Statement JLL is committed to developing and maintaining a diverse workforce, and strongly believes in equal opportunity extended to all individuals in all aspects of the employment relationship. Please visit www.JLL.com for additional information on JLL’s commitment to equal opportunity.",Financial Analyst Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-job-cincinnati-oh-us-171449566.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c73bc344aded9b11e8714971b9ff43c0
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:36:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Designers support three primary store priorities: Customers First, In Stock, and Store Appearance. Designers support Customers First by providing fast, thorough, and friendly service to customers. Designers interact with customers by welcoming them to the store, assessing their kitchen and/or bath project needs, providing showroom tours, setting them up for kitchen and/or bath measures, meeting with them to go over room designs and make purchasing recommendations. Designers support In Stock initiatives by assessing stock levels of samples and brochures and restocking them as necessary. Designers support the Store Appearance priority by ensuring special order displays and showrooms promote a shopping environment that is appealing and safe. By supporting these three priorities, Designers drive sales to support department and store goals.Major Tasks, Responsibilities & Key Accountabilities:Provide fast, friendly serviceActively seek out customers in the aislesOffer a friendly greeting. Smile, and make eye contact with customersAsk open ended questions about customer's projects in order to determine their needs and level of expertiseShow enthusiasm with the customerWhen necessary, handle several customers at onceThank customers for shopping at The Home DepotFollow up with customers via telephone when appropriateIs knowledgeable about products and services offered by The Home DepotAnswer questions about merchandise for the customer's level of expertiseDescribe features and benefits of merchandiseExplain the steps needed to complete projects and the products neededAssist customers with special orders and installed salesNature and Scope:Due to forklifts and other heavy equipment traveling through the store, temporary cracks may appear in the floor, causing an uneven walking surfaceThe warehouse environment can be dusty and noisyDoors are frequently open, causing drafts and interior temperature changesFloors around work area may become slippery during wet weather conditionsMay have to handle merchandise and work with tools with sharp edgesPassing forklifts emit gas fumesTools, supplies and related merchandise may contain hazardous materialsEnvironmental Job Requirements: Environment: Usually in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors causing moderate physical discomfort from such things as dust, fumes or odors Travel:Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time Must be eighteen years of age or olderMust be legally permitted to work in the United StatesAdditional Minimum Qualifications:Education Required:The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diploma and/or GED Physical Requirements:Must continuously stand or walk or regularly requires lifting/handling/carrying material or equipment of moderate weight (8-50 pounds) Additional Qualifications: Physical Job Requirements Bending, stooping, reaching, twisting, lifting, pushing, pulling and moving items - Requires the ability to move around the store and maneuver merchandise when necessary Responding to public address system announcements - Requires listening for customer service calls, personal pages and general information announcements Walking and Standing - Requires moving around the store to assist Customers Identifying and reading reports, tickets and UPC labels - Requires recognizing, identifying and using merchandise and necessary reports 2+ years Retail Sales or Trade experience 2+ years Customer Service experience Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies: Quality Service Makes customers the first priority, actively seeks out customers, greets all customers, offers assistance Product Knowledge Demonstrates a high level of knowledge of products, services and procedures in assigned area and nearby departments, knows priority SKUs Solutions Seeks to fully understand the customer's needs, provides customer with the best solution even if it involves a markdown, contacts other associates/leaders as needed until customer s need is met Respect Treats customers in a sincere, appreciative manner and thanks them for their business, minimizes their time in the checkout line, acknowledges waiting customers and thanks for shopping with The Home Depot Project Focus Asks customers about their project and provides appropriate related items and services for total project, sells the whole project Selling Skills Promotes products and services using Greet-Qualify-Recommend-Close, resolves customer's concerns; executes Good, Better, Best strategy",Kitchen/Bath Designer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/kitchen-bath-designer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-170856176.aspx?mescoid=2700411001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),77ab1778eb06d3067b7e86d289b24d65
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:36:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-OH-North Canton ID  86471 Category  Finance/Accounting Posted Date  9/1/2016 Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. About Aramark Correctional Services Aramark Correctional Services (ACS) is far and away the leader in outsourced food services within the Corrections industry, preparing well over 1,000,000 meals a day for state, county and city facilities. We are perhaps best known for our food, but to be the leader you need to do more. At ACS, we endeavor to Go Beyond for our clients by helping them solve the unique challenges of the corrections environment. We do this through the development of innovative programs that benefit not only the client, but also the officers, the offenders and the surrounding community.  We also Go Beyond for our people by providing a foundation for professional growth and advancement through world-class training and development at every level. ACS maintains an environment that encourages innovative thinking and humble confidence by nurturing and retaining the very best, talented, goal-oriented individuals who recognize the unique opportunities ACS offers.    Go Beyond. For You. With You.   About the Position:   The Accontant, field, administers and interprets company accounting policies as applicable to the specific units. This staff member compiles and analyzes financial and statistical reports and performs all accounting related functions for multiple locations, including accounts payable (AP), accounts receivable (AR), payroll, general ledger entries, and more, as applicable to the specific units or client accounts. This staff member reports to the regional finance manager and interfaces with the headquarters Accounting Services Department and client contact. He or she may have contact with outside vendors.       • Organize general accounting operations in multiple units.   • Recommend modifications in accounts, cost systems, and other practices to meet changing trends and conditions.   • Supervise the maintenance of ledgers, cost accounting activities, and the preparation of the units financial and other control reports. Compile and analyze operating performance reports.   • Prepare monthly and weekly financial and statistical reports and analyze unusual items on the reports.   • Establish standards for the conduct of accounting work, as well as for required performance, and supervise compliance with such standards.   • Supervise the submission and distribution of hourly and salary payrolls, including maintaining the required earnings and deductions records.   • May supervise the preparation of client invoices.   • Enter A/P, create client invoices, follow up on receivables, and research anomalies.   • Review operating reports and associated results for errors/omissions.   • Ensure that data entry is accurate and error free.   • Communicate with operations staff to resolve issues.   • Perform other job-related duties, as required. About Aramark Correctional Services Aramark Correctional Services (ACS) is far and away the leader in outsourced food services within the Corrections industry, preparing well over 1,000,000 meals a day for state, county and city facilities. We are perhaps best known for our food, but to be the leader you need to do more. At ACS, we endeavor to Go Beyond for our clients by helping them solve the unique challenges of the corrections environment. We do this through the development of innovative programs that benefit not only the client, but also the officers, the offenders and the surrounding community.  We also Go Beyond for our people by providing a foundation for professional growth and advancement through world-class training and development at every level. ACS maintains an environment that encourages innovative thinking and humble confidence by nurturing and retaining the very best, talented, goal-oriented individuals who recognize the unique opportunities ACS offers.    Go Beyond. For You. With You.   About the Position:   The Accontant, field, administers and interprets company accounting policies as applicable to the specific units. This staff member compiles and analyzes financial and statistical reports and performs all accounting related functions for multiple locations, including accounts payable (AP), accounts receivable (AR), payroll, general ledger entries, and more, as applicable to the specific units or client accounts. This staff member reports to the regional finance manager and interfaces with the headquarters Accounting Services Department and client contact. He or she may have contact with outside vendors.       • Organize general accounting operations in multiple units.   • Recommend modifications in accounts, cost systems, and other practices to meet changing trends and conditions.   • Supervise the maintenance of ledgers, cost accounting activities, and the preparation of the units financial and other control reports. Compile and analyze operating performance reports.   • Prepare monthly and weekly financial and statistical reports and analyze unusual items on the reports.   • Establish standards for the conduct of accounting work, as well as for required performance, and supervise compliance with such standards.   • Supervise the submission and distribution of hourly and salary payrolls, including maintaining the required earnings and deductions records.   • May supervise the preparation of client invoices.   • Enter A/P, create client invoices, follow up on receivables, and research anomalies.   • Review operating reports and associated results for errors/omissions.   • Ensure that data entry is accurate and error free.   • Communicate with operations staff to resolve issues.   • Perform other job-related duties, as required. • Ideal candidates will possess a bachelor’s degree and three to five years of experience in AP/AR, payroll, and P&L responsibility. • The ability to work in a diverse environment with focus on client and customer services is essential. • The ability to work closely with a team in reconciling accounts, cost controls, and monthly reporting is critical. • Contract-managed service experience is desirable. • This staff member should be proficient in Microsoft Office applications. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Accountant - Correctional Services Job in North Canton,"Full Time, Employee","North Canton, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-correctional-services-job-north-canton-oh-us-171813245.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,13c50ced667e87e9c4e3a884e8fba14e
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:44:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Great career opportunities at Fresno/AppleOne. We are recruiting for a local well known company, seeking top-notch payroll professionals. The company is currently recruiting for a Payroll Tax Specialist and Customer Service Rep. with payroll experience. These payroll professionals will provide support to business groups and assist with prep and completion of payroll and quarterly payroll reports. These positions will require strong knowledge of payroll for the CSR and payroll and payroll tax filing, preparation of amended 941/943 returns, quarterly & annual reconciliation of tax payments and returns, electronic file uploads to state agencies, filing for the Payroll Tax Specialist position. The ideal candidates must have the ability to meet deadlines & work with accuracy under volume pressure, excellent analytical, mathematical & organizational skills. Candidates with 3-5 plus years of outstanding payroll experience can forward their resume to the Fresno AppleOne office or apply at appleone.com, attention Mike Marmolejo. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Candidates with 3-5 plus years of outstanding payroll and payroll tax experience.Years of Experience Required:",WANTED Payroll Professionals: Customer Service Rep's to Payroll Tax Specialist Job in Fresno,Full Time Employee,"Fresno, CA 93730",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/wanted-payroll-professionals-customer-service-rep's-to-payroll-tax-specialist-job-fresno-ca-us-171916964.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6491246797f3e13fc714549d5cda5541
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:17:44:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chubb is the world’s largest publicly traded property and casualty insurer. With operations in 54 countries, Chubb provides commercial and personal property and casualty insurance, personal accident and supplemental health insurance, reinsurance and life insurance to a diverse group of clients. The company is distinguished by its extensive product and service offerings, broad distribution capabilities, exceptional financial strength, underwriting excellence, superior claims handling expertise and local operations globally.  Chubb Global Services – North America focuses on the delivery of Chubb products and services to global customers for sophisticated risk management programs through the Chubb Global Network.     Under limited supervision, work in a team environment to perform a variety of functions servicing US produced Multinational Programs   Responsibilities include:             Review and set-up New Business and Renewal Multinational programs based on information received from Underwriters within the established timeframes and quality standards of ACE Global Serviceso    Prepare program implementation notice and policy issuance instructions o    Premium invoicing and registrations o    Issuance of claims bulletins Track issuance of local invoices, policies, certificates, and premium payments Maintain electronic files according to established protocols Maintain account checklists within established standards for monthly metrics reporting Communicate and escalate open items as required to ensure resolution and “end to end” account management Update/complete MAX tasks, including delay reasons, within required timeframes Research and respond to requests from Underwriting, AGS supporting units, and Network Partner Company offices Participate in account related meetings as required (i.e. Binding, Account Status, Pre-Renewal and Stewardship meetings)    Required Qualifications:   Excellent organizational skills and ability to handle multiple priorities College degree in Accounting or Finance or comparable business experience Strong analytical skills, attention to detail, and proficiency in reconciliation work Intermediate/Advanced knowledge of Excel, Word, and Access Excellent written and oral communication skills Ability to quickly establish strong working relationships and instill confidence with external customers, team members and all levels of management Able to work effectively in a team environment Ability to operate with a minimum of structure and capable of working/participating in an environment which is constantly changing High commitment to quality. Willing to take responsibility for assigned accounts and the processes which support the success of that account Ability to work under pressure and within established departmental standards and timetables",Account Services Manager Job in Wilmington,,"Wilmington, DE 19801",,http://jobview.monster.com/account-services-manager-job-wilmington-de-us-171793125.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d45496ad6852a644ee9f5afabc74a35c
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:18:10:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are looking for a Full-Charge Bookkeeper for our Brentwood based client. This is a temporary to permanent opportunity for a local hospitality company.Do you have hands on experience with all aspects of general ledger accounting and like interacting with people? If so, we would love to talk with you!Responsibilities:Accounts PayablePayroll Processing and ReportingSales Tax ReportingBank reconciliationsMonth-end closing and journal entriesRequirements:Recent QuickBooks experience5+ years of previous bookkeeping experience Why choose Addison Finance & Accounting?Pay: We negotiate high salaries using US Bureau of Labor StatisticsBenefits & Bonuses: You are eligible for medical, dental, vision insurance benefits, 401K, and monetary bonusesPermanent Employment: Many of Addison’s Finance & Accounting job openings lead to potential permanent employmentConnections: You connect directly with hiring managers from renowned organizationsOptions: You are presented multiple employment options near your homeProfessional Development: You are provided hiring process advice, resume revision, and employment term negotiation Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Address 9005 Overlook BlvdBrentwood, TN 37027",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bookkeeper-job-brentwood-tn-us-171901661.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=15,,,8f92e598a819f892db91e6659ac9f2d3
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:18:10:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are interested in applying for this job opportunity, please email your resume in Word format to sarah.ayala@parkerlynch.com and put “CFO/VP” in the subject line. Emailed resumes will have priority consideration over online applications.  Our client, a rapidly growing non-profit health system is seeking an experienced CFO VP of Physician Enterprise! The position will have 2+ direct reports and reports directly to the VP of Finance and the CEO.  The ideal candidate will have a minimum of 10+ years of experience.  Excellent benefits with 4+ weeks of PTOStable organizationCompetitive Base Salary  Responsibilities:The Vice President and Chief Financial Officer – Physician Enterprise will have accountability for financial oversight and will be responsible for financial performance, with a focus on strategy, analytics, financial and operational performance, integration savings and improvement initiatives. Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business AdministrationCPA requiredHealthcare experience required10+ years senior level financial management experience5+ years in a role of CFO with a medical group or physician enterprise organizationMBA / MHA in Finance a plusProficient in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPointExcellent written and verbal communication skillsStrong technical and analytical skills  For immediate consideration, please email your resume in Word format to Sarah.Ayala@ParkerLynch.com with “CFO/VP” in the subject heading Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",CFO / VP - Physician Enterprise / Medical Group Job Job in Rolling Meadows,Full Time Employee,"Rolling Meadows, IL 60008",,http://jobview.monster.com/cfo-vp-physician-enterprise-medical-group-job-job-rolling-meadows-il-us-170941515.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=9,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1df5079de04a65d34c16e719a9d96e1a
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:18:42:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has client seeking a Senior Accountant for their well-known media organization in Arlington, VA.This incumbent will be an integral part of the accounting team and will include the following: Help to foster a streamlined environment Collaborate with Sales and Accountant Managers to maintain accurate revenue dataREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years of public accounting experience CPA a plus",Senior Accountant Job in Arlington,Full Time Employee,"Arlington, VA 22201",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-arlington-va-us-171745137.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=8,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),67c1ea7a934f613783f00127ff80c20d
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:18:43:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounting Principals Columbus is currently recruiting for an IMMEDIATE temp-to-hire Medical Billing job with one of our biggest non-for-profit clients. If you are looking to make a change and have a strong background in medical billing and experience with Medicare billing, you may be the perfect fit for our client!  The Medical Billing job responsibilities include: • Responsible for researching, correcting and resubmits Medicare claims• Follows up on adjustments, denials, errors, and claim rejections• Works with other staff within the billing department to ensure excellent patient service• Check Medicare eligibility for clients• Monitor aging accounts and resolve outstanding balance issues The Medical Billing job qualifications include: • High school diploma or GED required• 2+ years of medical reimbursement / collection experience• Medicare billing experience• Receivable collection and follow-up experience• Hospice billing is a plus If you, or someone you know, are interested in the Medical Billing job in Columbus, Ohio and are able to interview or start immediately, please apply at www.accountingprincipals.com TODAY!! ",Medical Biller Job in Columbus,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Columbus, OH 43085",,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-biller-job-columbus-oh-us-171792191.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=11,14.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ca3b7454c018eeb7f696e24322c02de9
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:19:41:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a start-up firm close to Boston, is searching for a Senior Accountant to join their team! Responsibilities include but are not limited to: perform monthly reconciliation for cash accounts; own balance sheet reconciliations - inventory, receivables, prepaids, and accruals; maintain fixed asset and associated depreciation schedules; support risk management in tracking and maintaining insurance policies; implement accounting tools to improve tracking and reconciliation efficiency; research accounting principles and pronouncements to assess how unusual transactions should be recorded; record revenue and payroll entries; and manage capitalization table for new options/warrants issuances and exercises and recording applicable journal entries. The ideal candidate will have: excellent research skills and ability to interpret and implement accounting principles; demonstrated quantitative analysis skills; strong public accounting experience; and systems implementation experience. Qualified candidates apply today!Find Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Senior Accountant Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,BostonMA,Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-boston-ma-us-171743058.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,433f2b6fff32e92c442e0d3e14a453e7
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:19:42:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Controller - great work/life balance!Assistant Controller - great work/life balance!Global professional services company is seeking a dynamic Assistant Controller to join their organization. Reporting directly to the VP, this person will be involved in numerous aspects of the Accounting department including, but not limited to; month-end close, financial reporting, revenue recognition, AP/AR management, internal controls, and operational support. This is a highly visible role within the organization and the ideal candidate will have a CPA and 8+ years of experience. Public accounting (preferably from a Big 4 firm) is highly preferred. Responsibilities:Responsible for maintaining the general ledger and month-end close processOversee financial reporting processPrepares, maintains, and adheres to US GAAP Accounting policiesManage global consolidation of financialsEnsure internal controls are maintained and make suggestions for improving processes and proceduresSupport revenue recognition and technical accounting as neededWork directly with VP and CFO regularlyOther ad-hoc projects as neededQualifications:Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance or Business8+ years of Accounting experienceCPA and public accounting (Big 4) highly preferredPrior management experienceDetail oriented and excellent communication skillsFor immediate consideration please send resume in Word format directly to Matt Medeiros - mmedeiros@hollisterstaff.com Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Assistant Controller - great work/life balance! Job in Wellesley,Full Time Employee,"Wellesley, MA",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-controller-great-work-life-balance!-job-wellesley-ma-us-171802112.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=15,"130,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1530457d0ca04a05c2a835c9eb1e8097
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:20:42:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is activity seeking a Billing Configuration Quality Analyst for an outstanding client in the Rockville, MD area!  This position is full time and permanent. This job will have the following responsibilities:Work collaboratively with Billing Specialists to improve quality of billing configuration procedures and documentation.Determine billing configuration inconsistencies and completion.Audit implementation projects to ensure configuration meets with Payer and State regulations.Maintains confidentiality; adheres to all HIPAA guidelines/regulationsQualifications & Requirements:BA/BS preferred3 - 5 years’ experience in Behavioral health-care billing & collection practicesKnowledge of Quality Review/Auditing of EHR configurationExperience working with Medicare, Medicaid, and commercial insurancesWorking knowledge of medical billing systems/softwaresWorking knowledge of CPT and ICD-9/ICD-10 coding systems; Coding certification preferredProficiency in Microsoft Office SuiteALL INTERESTED AND QUALIFIED CANDIDATES PLEASE SEND YOUR MOST CURRENT RESUME TO JBIGGS@JUDGE.COM OR CONTACT JESSICA DIRECTLY AT 484-434-2947. THANK YOU!",Billing Configuration Quality Analyst Job in Rockville,"Full Time, Employee","Rockville, MD",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/billing-configuration-quality-analyst-job-rockville-md-us-171867699.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=4,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,3a8e1ad38c2aeca0b1290f5ea615db10
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:20:43:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Middleburg Heights,"Full Time, Employee","Middleburg Heights, OH",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-middleburg-heights-oh-us-171232200.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,48a722bd087ba1e6a3a0ef3e4a5da715
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:20:55:07,No,jobs.monster.com,Report this job About the Job looking for a full time and part time book keeper must have computer skills and quick books exp.must have transportation and phone skills. hours are flexible .our company has been around for 30 years salary is negotiable Report,Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 7818285001 Address 293 REVERE STCANTON, MA 02021",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/book-keeping-job-canton-ma-us-171916617.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=8,,,abf171c75e31cbf92a44cd16c640c2af
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:21:23:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"CUSTODIAN To perform routine building service work to maintain cleanliness/sanitation of buildings/furnishings. REQUIRED: High school diploma or equivalent; physical ability to frequently pick up/carry items weighing up to 50 lbs; will perform physical labor over extended periods; and 1 year experience in custodial/related work. Qualified applicants must submit an application, September 5th – 9th, 2016 electronically to: recruitment@missouriwestern.edu Application forms are available on the Human Resources webpage at: https://forms.missouriwestern.edu/hr/application.asp . EOE As published in the St. Joseph News-Press",Custodian Job in Saint Joseph,Full Time,"Saint Joseph, MO 64501",All,http://jobview.monster.com/custodian-job-saint-joseph-mo-us-171833689.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=4,,,23c54e258dd928724a9a967e5e2f68cf
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:21:42:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Department Finance Schedule Part time casual (less than 20 hours per week) Shift 1st Hours Monday through Friday 7:30-5:00 Job Details Job Summary: Perform a variety of accounting duties in the following areas:  corporate accounts payable, employee expense report processing, billing, miscellaneous cash application, and general accounting. Provide support in various month end processes including account reconciliations. Required Qualifications: ·         Junior or Senior working towards a Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Finance ·         Demonstrated knowledge of general accounting ·         Detail-oriented and organized ·         Good written and verbal communication skills ·         Proficient computer skills with Microsoft Office programs ·         Equivalent combination of education, experience and/or applicable military experience will be considered   Preferred Qualifications:   ·         Experience with  integrated accounting systems ·       National Career Readiness Certificate   There are 2 open positions for this role.  Applications will be accepted until 5:00 pm on Friday, September 9th, 2016. *MON*  LHI is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.   Apply External Candidates apply here Apply later Current employees apply here Search Results Return to Search Results New Search",Intern,,"La Crosse, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/intern-finance-job-la-crosse-wi-us-171860441.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=8,,,119920f1d96d5bd3e31d9b3f573226bf
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:21:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in West Palm Beach, Florida (FL) that is currently seeking an Accounts Payable Specialist for a temporary position. Responsibilities: Processing high volume AP Matching, batching, and coding Resolving client discrepancies Researching accounts Assisting the AP department with overflowREQUIREMENTS: Minimum of 3 - 5 years of high volume accounts payable experience using a large ERP system Must have strong communication skills Able to work with a team and independently",Accounts Payable Specialist Job in West Plam Beach,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"West Plam Beach, FL 33401",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialist-job-west-plam-beach-fl-us-171918747.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,5b8e3af1eb2d8ac94cbb9dc965c1d21b
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:22:05:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chubb is the world’s largest publicly traded property and casualty insurer. With operations in 54 countries, Chubb provides commercial and personal property and casualty insurance, personal accident and supplemental health insurance, reinsurance and life insurance to a diverse group of clients. The company is distinguished by its extensive product and service offerings, broad distribution capabilities, exceptional financial strength, underwriting excellence, superior claims handling expertise and local operations globally.  ESIS HSE is a national consulting practice specializing in comprehensive environmental consulting and occupational hygiene services. The division provides a full range of environmental assessment, remedial, and compliance services, and is an established leader in industrial hygiene and asbestos and lead-based paint, and microbial management services.  Core Responsibilities: Working independently or within a consulting team arrangement,  the Environmental Project Manager is responsible for the following core responsibilities: Knowledgeable about contracts, contract interpretation and scope of work. When on-site, act as direct representative of ESIS HSE in relationship to the client; and when within scope of services, monitor and oversee clients’ contractors. Act as client’s representative in areas of expertise where ESIS HSE has a valid contract to do so, recommend additional services to clients to protect their interests. In emergency situations, recommend remedial actions to the client or contractors, including, if necessary, stopping work when public health or safety are jeopardized. Seek opportunities to expand client services with existing and new clients as part of ongoing business development. Evaluate contractor performance and advise client. Interface with and respond to regulatory and enforcement agencies at the job site and when appropriate provide requested information to them depending upon issue involved. Maintain chain of custody of sampling activity, analytical data, project recordkeeping (log book) in accordance with regulatory requirements and ESIS HSE’s recordkeeping responsibilities. Maintain proficiency and understanding in the use of scientific instruments and sampling protocols to ensure valid sample collection and reliable data analysis in compliance with regulations. Maintain high ethical standards in the performance of services, understand the ethical standards of client and report actual or perceived unethical conduct or behavior. Understand the details of the project schedule and scope of work, and provide supporting information to Project Managers when change orders may be required. Advise client/owner as to the progression of work, proposed changes to the scope of work and contractor performance with respect to project schedule. Maintain required certifications mandated by the regulations and take an active recall in maintaining respiratory fitness through the ESIS HSE medical surveillance program. Understanding of building engineering and structural design knowledge of site planning. Must make independent, on-site judgments based upon professional experience to advise or recommend to contractors alternative ways of performing work subject to specified cost and regulatory compliance. As with any professional, work is subject to peer and management review as part of a quality assurance program to avoid risk and company liability. Specific duties or tasks of the Environmental Project Manager include the following:Acts as Project Director for small projects and interfaces directly with client for project implementation. Works closely with QA Officer to define client objectives and develop work plans. Implements tasks in the field. Creates or modifies work plans to best accomplish the task. Works as a task leader on large projects. Performs detailed background review and inspection of facilities for regulatory compliance and evaluation of hazards and liabilities. Interfaces with clients and supervises subcontractors to achieve project goals. Preparation of reports, including review of background materials; creation of figures, plates and tables; and writing of text, recommendations, conclusions and proposals. Performs asbestos identification and hazard assessment, compliance monitoring and other asbestos consulting related services. Involved with a major abatement design project including preparation of drawings, specifications and the bid documents. Involved with construction administration activities including: Review and approval of contractor submittals. Processing of change orders. Processing contractor payment requests. Conducting a pre-bid “Site/Tour Meeting.” Conducting a pre-job “Pre-Construction Meeting.”Trains new technical and professional field staff. Coordinates and supervises other staff involved and participating in the same project. Attends site visits with Project Managers and prepares portions of proposals. Other project duties as assigned by senior staff personnel of a consulting team. May be required to perform duties or responsibilities of Staff Scientist Consultant II and/or Staff Geologist Consultant III. Position Requirements:Education:            Bachelor’s degree in Geology, Engineering, Environmental Science, or related environmental field. Experience:           Minimum of five years experience in technical activities directly related to ESIS HSE’s business with a Bachelor’s degree; or a Master’s degree with no experience. Knowledge & Skills:           Must be able to perform complex tasks pertinent to primary field of expertise.                              Must be capable of making appropriate modifications in procedures based on                                                observations and data. Knowledge of computer operations and standard software packages (word processing, spreadsheets, databases) required. Special:  Position normally will require Health & Safety certification pursuant to OSHA 29 CFR 1910.120. Current Asbestos Certification a MUST Chubb offers a competitive salary plus cash bonus, equity opportunities and comprehensive benefits package including life, health and dental, vision, a generous retirement savings plan with company match, disability coverage, stock purchase plan, flexible spending accounts, tuition reimbursement, and business casual dress. For additional information about Chubb or its services, please visit our website at http://www.new.chubb.com . Please direct any questions regarding this opportunity to Donna Drummond at donna.drummond@chubb.com.  In order to be considered an applicant for employment with Chubb, all applicants must go to Chubb’s Careers website to apply for the position(s) of interest and complete an online application. If you do not complete the online application, you will not be considered an applicant in accordance with Chubb’s policy.",ESIS Environmental Project Manager Job in Jersey City,,"Jersey City, NJ 07097",,http://jobview.monster.com/esis-environmental-project-manager-job-jersey-city-nj-us-171617166.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),70a0b23bd1a78b916ff244ede0fa1c46
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:22:05:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Boston, MA with an immediate need for a Staff Accountant. This accountant will be handling AP and AR. They will also be assisting with contract billing.REQUIREMENTS: Prior AP/AR experience MAS90 experience is a plus Contract billing experience is a plus Candidates need to be able to work in a fast paced environment with little supervisionKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Staff Accountant Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02115",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-boston-ma-us-171917311.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2d438b663d499f25d096119d4100132a
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:22:39:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking an Accounts Payable Coordinator at our corporate headquarters in Newton, MA. The AP Coordinator processes accounts payable and accounts receivable for multifamily apartment properties in a timely and accurate manner, and provides excellent customer service to managers, employees, and vendors regarding AP information, invoice research. This position is responsible for month end financial closing, bank reconciliations, and audit preparation for an assigned portfolio of properties.  The qualified candidate will have 2 years of experience in accounting or accounts payable, strong attention to detail, ability to work on a deadline, and in a fast paced environment. Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or related field preferred.  Northland Investment Corporation is a fully integrated real estate operating company focused on the acquisition, development, operation and long-term ownership of commercial and multifamily real estate.  Northland is a fast paced, highly principled entrepreneurial company headquartered in Newton, MA with interests nationwide.",Accounts Payable Coordinator Job in Newton,Full Time Employee,"Newton, MA 02462",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-coordinator-job-newton-ma-us-171917471.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,59a63eb9498f5bcb66cbcb98503be8e0
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:22:39:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Disability Representative Sr CLAIM YOUR FUTURE AS A GREAT PERFORMER! Providing both satisfying and challenging work along with a highly professional and friendly work atmosphere, Sedgwick has a strong commitment to its colleagues and its clients. If you are seeking a place where you can do great things for those whose lives you touch while maximizing your own career possibilities, Sedgwick is the place for you. As the largest and most innovative Third Party Administrator in the claims industry and the first and only TPA to receive both recognition as the Best TPA in America and the coveted Employer of Choice designation, we invite you to come be a part of our team and, ""Claim Your Future."" PRIMARY PURPOSE: To provide disability case management and claim determinations based on complex medical documentation and the applicable disability plan interpretation including determining benefits due and making timely payments/approvals and adjustments, medically managing disability claims; coordinating investigative efforts, thoroughly reviewing contested claims, negotiating return to work with or without job accommodations, and evaluating and arranging appropriate referral of claims to outside vendors. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Analyzes, approves and authorizes assigned claims and determines benefits due pursuant to a disability plan.Reviews and analyzes complex medical information (i.e. diagnostic tests, office notes, operative reports, etc.) to determine if the claimant is disabled as defined by the disability plan.Utilizes the appropriate clinical resources in case assessment (i.e. duration guidelines, in-house clinicians).Communicates with the claimants providers to set expectations regarding return to work.Determines benefits due, makes timely claims payments/approvals and adjustments for workers compensation, Social Security Disability Income (SSDI), and other disability offsets.Medically manages disability claims ensuring compliance with duration control guidelines and plan provisions.Communicates clearly with claimant and client on all aspects of claims process either by phone and/or written correspondence.Informs claimants of documentation required to process claims, required time frames, payment information and claims status either by phone, written correspondence and/or claims system.Coordinates investigative efforts ensuring appropriateness; provides thorough review of contested claims.Evaluates and arranges appropriate referral of claims to outside vendors for physician advisor reviews, surveillance, independent medical evaluation, functional capability evaluation, and/or related disability activities.Negotiates return ot work with our without job accommodations via the claimants physician and employer.Refers cases as appropriate to supervisor and management.Maintains professional client relationships.ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Performs other duties as assigned.Supports the organization's quality program(s).QUALIFICATIONS Education & Licensing Bachelor's degree from an accredited university or college preferred. Experience Three (3) years of benefits or disability claims management experience or equivalent combination of education and experience required. Skills & Knowledge Knowledge of ERISA regulations, required offsets and deductions, disability duration and medical management practices and Social Security application proceduresExcellent oral and written communication, including presentation skillsPC literate, including Microsoft Office productsAnalytical and interpretive skillsStrong organizational skillsAbility to work in a team environmentExcellent negotiation skillsAbility to meet or exceed Performance CompetenciesWORK ENVIRONMENT When applicable and appropriate, consideration will be given to reasonable accommodations. Mental: Clear and conceptual thinking ability; excellent judgment, troubleshooting, problem solving, analysis, and discretion; ability to handle work-related stress; ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously; and ability to meet deadlines Physical: Computer keyboarding, travel as required Auditory/Visual: Hearing, vision and talking NOTE: Credit security clearance, confirmed via a background credit check, is required for this position. The statements contained in this document are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by a colleague assigned to this description. They are not intended to constitute a comprehensive list of functions, duties, or local variances. Management retains the discretion to add or to change the duties of the position at any time. Sedgwick is an Equal Opportunity Employer and a Drug-Free Workplace",Disability Representative Sr Job in New Albany,,"New Albany, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/disability-representative-sr-job-new-albany-oh-us-170688700.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,,afc0ace815bcc93bb905f9e23650fdda
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:22:44:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Financial Reporting Specialist in Charlestown, MA. Essential Functions: Coordinate aspects of STAT accounting Manage regulatory insurance filings Maintain and supervise the maintenance of the system of accounts Control the books and records on transactions, assets and liabilities Prepare/review reconciliations and schedules for balance sheet and profit and loss accounts Coordinate and prepare for audits Coordinating with legal staff on regulatory matters Work on tax accounting and reporting Coordinate and monitor intercompany transactionsREQUIREMENTS: 5-7 years of GAAP accounting experience Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Finance Proficient with spreadsheets and Excel Strong accounting background with experience with Oracle financials a plus Strong knowledge of Statutory (STAT) insurance accounting Knowledge of corporate income tax accounting Strong analytical and communication skillsKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Financial Reporting Specialist Job in Charlestown,Full Time Employee,"Charlestown, MA 02129",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-reporting-specialist-job-charlestown-ma-us-171920705.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=17,"85,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),3393074855aa7ea97111ce730cf634b0
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:23:47:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Aramark Uniform Services (AUS) provides uniforms and related products to more than 400,000 customers nationwide, in virtually every industry.  From designing and manufacturing to laundering and delivering, AUS works with local and national clients to create and maintain a total uniform solution that promotes teamwork and establishes a professional identity.  AUS operates from over 200 locations nationwide and has an immediate opportunity for a Cash Applications Specialist in Lexington, KY.   The Cash Applications Specialist is responsible for applying cash transactions in a timely and accurate manner.  The Cash Applications Specialist is also responsible for the research, verification of cash transactions and will interact with the Accounting and Collections departments.  The incumbent also works with other application specialists on a daily basis, posts EFT payments, credit card payments, account reconciliation reapplications, and adjustment processing.   SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES: Daily processing of payments received through lockbox(s). Processing of return checks, credit card payments, EFT payments, credit and debit memos, refund checks, and adjustments. Research and solve payment discrepancies. Process manual credit card adjustments. Make adjustments to accounts as needed. File incoming material according to file system. Performs other duties as required or assigned. Qualifications EDUCATION: A High school diploma or equivalent is required.   EXPERIENCE: Two plus years of cash applications or cash transactions experience is preferred but not required. Experience with Oracle is preferred but not required.  KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS & ABILITIES: Proven ability to do 10,000 key strokes per hour by touch. A high level of organizational skills, integrity and accuracy. Good communication skills both written and verbal. Strong attention to detail. Strong analytical and problem solving skills. Excellent customer service skills. Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite (Word and Excel). Proven ability to work with minimal supervision. Knowledge in using on-line systems for input and inquiry. Must be open to working overtime as needed (up to 60 hours a week during peak periods). ADDITIONAL RESPONSIBILITIES: Ability to develop and maintain a positive working relationship with others. Supports and participates in the Company's quality standards with a continuous focus on customer service.",Cash Applications Specialist - AUS Job in Lexington,"Full Time, Employee","Lexington, KY 40509",,http://jobview.monster.com/cash-applications-specialist-aus-job-lexington-ky-us-171600415.aspx?mescoid=1500126001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,351b109c4a868cb67e6f4222e8a51f0b
United States of America,US,08/Jul/2016:23:48:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""We're seeking an Commercial Account Specialist. If you set high standards for Excellence, Integrity and Customer Service this may be the position for you.  Apply now and learn more about opportunities with TruGreen.Responsibilities• Places telephone calls to handle all aspects of commercial customer accounts.• Maintains customer database through accurate and timely data entry.• Answers inquiries, resolves problems, promotes and sells products/services.• Provides first line administrative support and coordination of commercial account activities for Business Development Reps.• Creates and reviews commercial service agreements.• Follow up on commercial customers during renewal.• Facilitates commercial growth through outbound calls to customers and prospects • Contact customers regarding outstanding balances on commercial accounts.Education and Experience Requirements• High school diploma/GED required. Associate’s degree preferred.• 2-3 years of customer service experience required• Experience resolving escalated customer service issues required• Computer skills with Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)TruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.To learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdfAn Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – EOE of Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabilityjob code:  100760TruGreen performs pre-employment testing.",Customer Account Specialist Job in Paulsboro,Full Time Employee,"Paulsboro, NJ",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-account-specialist-job-paulsboro-nj-us-171471230.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=9,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,0c692633484bd7d500c3402bf3626b7b
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:23:46:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Virtue Direct, Inc. is one of the LEADING marketing firms providing exceptional service to large corporations in the Pembroke Pines area.  We recently opened up a NEW OFFICE and are looking to fill positions in multiple departments.  These positions are ENTRY LEVEL to begin with RAPID advancement.   OPPORTUNITY:   ? Whether you are looking to get your foot in the door or already have experience, we are interested in hearing more about how your unique skill set can benefit our company. We have team members from all walks of life and believe that degrees and experience in marketing, as well as other industries, can benefit our company.   RequirementsQUALIFICATIONS: ? Our clients are all industry leaders thus we are selective about who we bring into our company to represent them.    If you have the following qualifications we are interested in meeting with you:?    Outstanding communication skills both verbal & written Able to prioritize and work independently with minimal supervision Able to work effectively in a team environment Detail-oriented and the ability to follow up on tasks Work effectively under pressure and maintain a positive attitude Capable of multi-tasking, prioritizing, and managing time efficiently. To be the best in our industry, we have to have the best people working for us. Providing the right work environment is important to us.    We offer a high-energy, supportive team environment where personal achievements are recognized and rewarded.           **After the review of your resume you will be contacted through email by our HR Department. Please be on the lookout for this email as it will be sent to you shortly if selected by our management team for a possible interview.       We have been growing rapidly and are continuing to expand our operations and offerings. If you are a proven performer, we would like to take a closer look at working for us.   All of our positions have a base with a bonus and commission structure on top There are no door to door, business to business, or telemarketing positions here   If you are interested in a full time, salary based position with the opportunity to advance into management, APPLY TODAY! Positions are limited.",*IMMEDIATE HIRE* - Entry Level Customer Service & Marketing Job in Pembroke Pines,"Full Time , Employee","Pembroke Pines, FL 33026",Retail Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/immediate-hire-entry-level-customer-service-marketing-job-pembroke-pines-fl-us-172366552.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=10,,Marketing/Product,29e9399b4b1e125fe8fb09e8fb198d29
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:23:45:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manages the relationship between property and the mail house/printer(s) by posting data, promotion code creation, file verification, proofing and routing all layouts, setting up marketing offers in gaming system, using campaign management tools and other query software to define customer segments and execute marketing programs, creating/updating marketing reinvestment matrixes and relevant support files, fielding customer inquiries and processing data. Follow Database Marketing standards and Internal Audit guidelines to ensure quality and minimal errors for all database marketing processes.The following statements are intended as general illustrations of the work in this class and are not all-inclusive for specific positions.Performs utilization, maintenance, and security of list management for all Casino Services, Players Card, Marketing, Hotel, and other internal users.Develops and tests new tools related to campaign execution along with developing the process workflow around all campaigns by acting as a project manager. This includes working with Manager to develop new solutions and upgrades to existing tools.Track and review customer direct marketing programs to determine the number of invitations, response rate, attendance rate, player activity, casino revenue, etc.Establish parameters and analyzes data base information to provide a list of preferred customers for special events; coordinate the development and distribution of invitations to upcoming events; tracks response and attendance rates for events and directs customer mail programs.Maintains a drop schedule spreadsheet that is forwarded to Guest Service Center. This communication will answer questions these entities have regarding Direct Mail; Drop Data, Qty, Event Dates/Times, Offers, etc.Ensures the accuracy and timeliness of all property direct mail drops and meets all deadlines as agreed to with the property Director/Direct Mail Manager by following up on all outstanding artwork, copy, layout, et al,.Responsible for the execution of database marketing in the additional channels below by determining the data to be gathered for: E-mail and mobile campaign managementWebsite DM processesNon-standard track-able campaignsBrand/Advertising tracking as definedAdditional “new” technology marketing delivery platformsWORKING CONDITIONS/ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONSAbility to communicate effectively with all levels of employees, as well as outside contacts.Ability to assess and analyze marketing campaign instructions to process for channel execution.Ability to use personal computers with spreadsheet and word processing applications.Strong proficiency in database marketing execution and processes required.Knowledge of Microsoft Excel and Word required.Familiarity with relational database structures and the knowledge of how to use that data withmarketing offers.Background in setting up casino related offers preferred.Background working with outside marketing vendors preferred.Knowledge of SQL, Microsoft Access and/or SAS tools preferred.Knowledge of ACSC gaming system and LMS hotel system preferred.Marketing channel experience analyzing standard direct mail, promotions and web metrics preferred.These skills and abilities are acquired through the completion of a Bachelor's degree in Marketing, Business, or related field, as well as a minimum of 2 - 4 years of Database Marketing operational experience.Two years of related casino experience preferredPI95346665Apply Here",DATABASE MARKETING SPECIALIST Job in Las Vegas,"Full Time, Employee","Las Vegas, NV 89169",Printing and Publishing Advertising and PR ServicesHotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/database-marketing-specialist-job-las-vegas-nv-us-172263948.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=9,,Marketing/Product,9258d50b79f988e16b7a572c227d3b55
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:23:29:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Our Facility Technician performs hands on operations revolving around stabilizing and treating hazardous waste. This will involve drum operations including drum movement, drum dumping, tank farm operations, and loading/unloading drums. This may also involve upkeep of the waste treatment equipment. This position is a physically intensive position that will involve equipment operations and it can be in adverse environments like heat or cold. Key Responsibilities: Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all time Manage the waste treatment equipment by oiling and changing filters Performs drum pumping, drum dumping, tank farm operations and loading/unloading drums Operate equipment and machinery Operate a skid steer and forklift Completes paperwork for waste tracking movement  Qualifications: 6+ months related work experience Mechanical aptitude Ability to work in adverse environments (cold/heat) Fork lift and DOT training preferred  Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career. Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:•      Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program)•      Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion•      Health, Dental and Life Insurance•      401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off•      Company paid certifications, licenses and training To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.com We thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company.*CHPotential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Facility Technician I Job in Dugway,Full Time Employee,"Dugway, UT",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/facility-technician-i-job-dugway-ut-us-172065898.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,df3486a8c631c2e4b1a7921b5b37d301
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:22:40:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  Responsible for the supervision, training, and management of the food service operation.  Ensure that appropriate quantities of food are prepared and served.  Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Produce and maintain work schedules and may prepare production records. Direct daily activities. Maintains food production that ensures the safety and quality of food according to policies, procedures, and department requirements. Ensure that food items are stored in a safe, organized, and hazard-free environment. Maintain all serving schedules; ensure that all food items are served per menu specifications in a safe and appropriate manner according to departmental policies and procedures. Maintain a sanitary department following health and safety codes and regulations. Maintain accurate inventory on a weekly basis according to departmental policies and procedures. May prepare orders as needed per vendor to ensure accurate production for location. Must be knowledgeable in operating an efficient cost effective program. Supervise and evaluate employees; counsel; promote employee growth, efficiency, morale, and teamwork. Maintain a safe and hazard-free working environment. Train/mentor other food service workers. Maintain logs on all maintenance required on equipment within the food service department. Perform preventative maintenance checklist. Justify replacement of existing equipment to meet needs of facility. Proficiency in multi-tasking. Perform other duties as requested by the Food Service Director whenever his/her skill and/or experience would be necessary to initiate, coordinate, or complete any given program. Must fill in for absent employees at location as necessary. Maintain knowledge of daily caterings and see they are prepared and delivered on time. Be able to work occasional night and weekend catered events. Attend food service meetings with staff. Maintain communication with staff (including the central office staff, e-mail, phone calls, inter-office mail, etc). May perform cashier duties as required.  Promote good public relations. Other duties as assigned. Qualifications Must read, write, and understand verbal instructions Must complete a sanitation course either before or during first year as a lead Ability to perform basic arithmetic Maintain emotional control under stress Ability to resolve interpersonal situations Strong organizational skills Minimum Education/Certification High School Diploma/GED  ",Qdoba Student Union Supervisor Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN 37996",,http://jobview.monster.com/qdoba-student-union-supervisor-job-knoxville-tn-us-169005783.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=3,,Food Services/Hospitality,ea81e1ba658206547f1989de7ddeb850
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:22:39:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Advertising Sales Account Executive Our Advertising & Marketing Account Executive sales position offers:$35k base, commissions, car allowance, gas paid, & health benefits. LogoNation, the leader in community oriented advertising, is rapidly expanding our outside sales team. We are seeking self-motivated and dynamic Sales and Marketing Account Executives (Community Account Manager) for our increasing sales opportunities selling advertising on The Original CommuniTee—our unique community promotion t-shirt. As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, your territory includes 25-30 small towns within a radius up to 120 miles, your daily commute is typically around 45 minutes to an hour with no overnight travel involved. You will meet with town organizations and local business owners to learn about each town and develop a CommuniTee representing and promoting what is unique and special about each town. Job Responsibilities As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, you will establish donation points at local organizations for free CommuniTees donated by LogoNation. You will conduct in person business to business sales presentations to highlight the benefits of the CommuniTee, close sales of CommuniTee ad space to local businesses, and deliver free T-shirts back to each participating business.  Additional responsibilities for our outside sales position include:· Building and maintaining good customer relationships· Meeting sales quotas· Submitting regular reports and communicating with your manager· Daily commute into local towns Job Requirements · Bachelor’s degree, specialization in marketing, communications or    business preferred· Experience in outside sales or experience with the public- however, entry    level job seekers with a track record of success are encouraged to apply· Reliable transportation  Additionally, self-motivated, and competitive individuals who have the drive to overcome obstacles and stay positive despite the inevitable challenges that come with sales typically do the best. Some of those challenges are handling rejection, working independently, and dealing with weather.  Advertising Sales Account Executive Pay and Benefits: ·        Salary $35,000·        Excellent Training (In-field and Home Office) ·        Fast Career Advancement (with our Career Growth Program) ·        Monthly car allowance ·        Monthly cell phone allowance·        Group Health Insurance·        Outstanding commission plan (uncapped commissions)·        Monthly and weekly fun incentive programs·        In-field (in-territory) training·        100% gas reimbursement from day 1·        Fuel card after 6 months·        Free AAA Membership (offering roadside assistance) ·        Paid holidays·        Accrued time off program·        401(K) retirement plan (with company match)·        Excellent communication and in field management support As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation you will have significant income potential and will also gain valuable outside sales training and experience that will propel your career forward. First year total compensation for our Sales and Marketing Account Executives averages $40,000 - $100,000! For more information and to apply, please visit our website!",Sales Representative (Advertising & Marketing) Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN 37912",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-advertising-marketing-job-knoxville-tn-us-169943415.aspx?mescoid=4100672001001&jobPosition=7,"40,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,df115f39c92cb2529a5b7e00217320bc
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:22:30:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ridgeview Behavioral Health Services is a not-for-profit community mental health center, based in Oak Ridge, TN.  We have an immediate opening for a full-time Supported Employment IPS Program Coordinator. Ridgeview has served the local Anderson, Roane, Morgan, Campbell, and Scott county communities for over 50 years and offers a friendly work environment where staff work together to provide high quality behavioral health services through prevention, treatment of mental illness and substance abuse, and support to improve the overall health, wellbeing, recovery, and hope of the people we serve.REQUIREMENTSBachelor’s degree in social science/rehabilitation or related field from an accredited school required, Masters preferred.  Two or more years experience working with consumers in a mental health, co-occurring, or intellectual disorders setting is required. Two or more years supervisory experience as a team leader or front line supervisor is required.  Demonstrated ability to provide job development for consumers, network in the community with employers/business leaders, and work 1:1 providing employment supports to consumers is required.  Excellent written and verbal skills are required.  Proficiency in MS Office including the ability to record, trend, and evaluate employment data is required.  Safe driving record and valid driver's license required; position will require travel between counties and occasional transport of clients.JOB DUTIESResponsibilities include oversight, leadership, and supervision of staff within the Supported Employment program designed to assist individuals with mental illness and/or co-occurring disorders to gain and maintain employment in the community.  Demonstrates exceptional organizational skills, presents self in a professional manner, and demonstrates ability to communicate professionally at multiple levels.  Creates a motivational work atmosphere and provides supervision of program staff.  Networks within the employment community.  Completes necessary work to ensure program success in an unstructured, self-driven environment.BENEFITSRidgeview offers a full line of benefits including: Medical, Dental, Vision, Retirement, Long-Term Disability, Holiday Pay, Vacation and Sick Leave, Life Insurance and Wellness Plan.  Ridgeview is an approved National Health Service Corp site.  Loan repayment for qualified behavioral health and primary health care providers is available.Ridgeview is an equal opportunity employer. Ridgeview conducts Background Checks, Motor Vehicle Records, License/Degree Verification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon clean drug screen, background check and driving record",Supported Employment IPS Coordinator (Full-Time,Full Time Employee,"Oak Ridge, TN",Healthcare ServicesNonprofit Charitable OrganizationsOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/supported-employment-ips-coordinator-full-time-40-hrs-wk-job-oak-ridge-tn-us-169392122.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,e56c10284a6315e8eea2fb0e60209529
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:21:43:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Agfa has an exciting opportunity for a Field Sales Representative - Offset Consumables & Equipment to join our team.Agfa is a world leader in prepress solutions for the commercial, newspaper and packaging print industries. The focus of this position will be in the prepress, press room, and packaging segments. We enable businesses to deliver powerful messages and be more profitable. We develop, manufacture and distribute innovative products, and collaborate with world-class manufacturers to provide complete solutions tailored to the ever-changing needs of the graphic communications industry.This position may be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area:Raleigh Durham, NC Greenville. SC Knoxville, TN #LIPOST Agfa has an exciting opportunity for a Field Sales Representative - Offset Consumables & Equipment to join our team.Agfa is a world leader in prepress solutions for the commercial, newspaper and packaging print industries. The focus of this position will be in the prepress, press room, and packaging segments. We enable businesses to deliver powerful messages and be more profitable. We develop, manufacture and distribute innovative products, and collaborate with world-class manufacturers to provide complete solutions tailored to the ever-changing needs of the graphic communications industry.This position may be based out of the following location(s) and surrounding area:Raleigh Durham, NC Greenville. SC Knoxville, TN #LIPOST This is an excellent opportunity for an experienced, high-energy individual who enjoys a challenge and is committed to grow their career in offset consumables & equipment sales. We are looking for an Account Manager that will manage their business professionally and continually strive to overachieve quota. The key success factors are: Closing new consumable business in prepress (plates and  proofing media) as well as press room consumables Closing DI-Offset equipment business to include CTP, workflow, proofing engines, press room equipment as well as service contracts which support above equipment Maintain current account base within assigned territory Contract renewals for assigned territory Strong negotiating skills which include ability to sell at C-Level within an organization Strong proposal writing skills which include assembling Cost Of Ownership (COO) and Return On Investment (ROI) models  to sell value Maintain SalesLink (CRM) to include forecast accuracy and proper forecast funnel to close new  business required to achieve 100% budget Agfa Offers: Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, life insurance) 401(k) plan with match company contributions, starting on first day of employment Tuition Reimbursement Program This is an excellent opportunity for an experienced, high-energy individual who enjoys a challenge and is committed to grow their career in offset consumables & equipment sales. We are looking for an Account Manager that will manage their business professionally and continually strive to overachieve quota. The key success factors are: Closing new consumable business in prepress (plates and  proofing media) as well as press room consumables Closing DI-Offset equipment business to include CTP, workflow, proofing engines, press room equipment as well as service contracts which support above equipment Maintain current account base within assigned territory Contract renewals for assigned territory Strong negotiating skills which include ability to sell at C-Level within an organization Strong proposal writing skills which include assembling Cost Of Ownership (COO) and Return On Investment (ROI) models  to sell value Maintain SalesLink (CRM) to include forecast accuracy and proper forecast funnel to close new  business required to achieve 100% budget Agfa Offers: Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, life insurance) 401(k) plan with match company contributions, starting on first day of employment Tuition Reimbursement Program Education BS or BA required Must have the ability to identify and engage new customers Demonstrated track record of consistently achieving sales goals and objectives 2+ years sales experience, preferably within the Graphics industry Must be proficient in computing skills to include use of Microsoft products and Configurator Knowledge of offset to include digital prepress (plates, proofing, CTP, & workflow) and press room process.  Must be willing to cover large geography and travel in assigned  territory. Compensation Company Car Base & commissions potentially at 100K + at 100% of plan Agfa Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Women/Individuals with Disabilities/Protected VeteransAccessibilityAgfa is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with physical or mental disabilities.If you need special assistance or an accommodation while seeking employment, please e-mail AccessAgfaJobs@agfa.com or call: 201-373-4010. We will make a determination on your request for reasonable accommodation on a case-by-case basis.""",Field Sales Representative - Offset Consumables & Equipment Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/field-sales-representative-offset-consumables-equipment-job-knoxville-tn-us-169958514.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e03a18f9ece188361bf4a56536b25867
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:21:43:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"zzz7/26/2016 Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Full Time - Evening Shift ( Job Number: 275445 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progress in achieving restorative goals. #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. #MON-NCD Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : TN-Maryville-Kindred Nursing and Rehabilitation-Fairpark Organization : 0189 - Kindred Nursing and Rehabilitation-Fairpark Shift : Evening",zzz// Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Full Time - Evening Shift Job in Maryville,"Full Time, Employee","zzz7/26/2016 Certified Nursing Assistant - CNA - Full Time - Evening Shift ( Job Number: 275445 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a healthcare setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients/residents you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it.  You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare.  Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve.  Join us! Summary: Under supervision, provides basic nursing assistance and assists residents with daily living activities. Essential Functions: Answers signal lights and bells to determine resident needs. Assists residents with grooming, oral hygiene, bathing, hair, and incontinence care. Obtains food trays and assists residents with feeding. Assists residents with range of motion exercises, and movement to wheelchair or activity areas. Assists resident with turning and positioning in bed Assists resident with ambulation for short distance in facility. Takes and records temperature, blood pressure, pulse and respiration rates, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed. Performs other tasks as assigned. Conducts job responsibilities in accordance with the standards set out in the Company's Code of Business Conduct, its policies and procedures, the Corporate Compliance Agreement, applicable federal and state laws, and applicable professional standards. Documentation on flow sheets as directed. Attends interdisciplinary meetings as needed to provide input into selected resident's plans of care. Documents restorative services provided following facility policies and procedures. Reports to Charge Nurse or designee on progress/lack of progress in achieving restorative goals. #MON-NCD Qualifications  Education: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. Licenses/Certification: Valid certification as a CNA in the state of employment. Experience: Six months experience in a long term care environment preferred. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to react decisively and quickly in emergency situations. Ability to communicate effectively with residents and their family members, and facility staff. Service Excellence Requirements: Work efforts reflect a passion for exceeding customer expectations. Solicits patient/resident feedback to understand their needs and the needs of the community. Advocates for Service Excellence within the Center and influences others to take action. Displays responsibility by taking ownership of quality care. Shows dedication to enriching the lives of our patients and residents through empathy and compassion. Exhibits a commitment to results by looking for and recommending/implementing process improvements. Demonstrates commitment to interpersonal excellence through professional greetings, proper telephone etiquette, common courtesy, a professional attitude and appearance. Enriches the Center culture by having fun. Recognizes the benefits of team collaboration. Shows respect for fellow employees by working together to get the job done. Effectively addresses customer concerns and resolves conflict in a manner that is fair to all. DISCLAIMER: This description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work for this position. It is not intended to describe minor duties or other responsibilities that may be periodically assigned. #MON-NCD Job : Aides/Assistants/Coordinators/Care givers Primary Location : TN-Maryville-Kindred Nursing and Rehabilitation-Fairpark Organization : 0189 - Kindred Nursing and Rehabilitation-Fairpark Shift : Evening",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/zzz7-26-2016-certified-nursing-assistant-cna-full-time-evening-shift-job-maryville-tn-us-169913951.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,2615a193cb93118f9ad24cfc3731e559
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:21:27:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Southeastern Technology Consultants is working with a company in Knoxville, TN seeking a midlevel .NET Developer to join their software development team. Developers on their team have the opportunity to learn new technologies and keep their development skills up-to-date. This individual will be responsible for developing new applications and enhancing existing applications per customer requirements and provide customer support. .NET Developers will need to be able to work independently and also be able to work with the development team.Job Requirements for .NET Developer position:- Experience using C# or VB.NET, ASP.NET, HTML, CSS, XML, LINQ, WebForms,  Web Services, WCF Services, AJAX, JQuery, TFS- Experience with Entity Frameworks and MVC is highly preferred.- SQL Server or other relational database experience including writing queries, stored  procedures, and designing tables- Knowledge of accounting or retail sales operations are a plus- Good analytical skills Qualified candidates interested in the .NET Developer position, please send your resume to resume@southeasternit.com ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",.NET Developer Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/net-developer-job-knoxville-tn-us-169248035.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,ffbb978566a511fec193a5b5776bfe14
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:20:49:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsSummit Medical Group has established an outstanding reputation for medical practice in this community with more than 40 years of experience. Currently, Summit Medical Group has about 220 physicians in 55 office locations and 5 hospitals serving patients in 12 counties in the East Tennessee region. Our mission is to provide quality care, value, and service to our community. In addition to our commitment to the health of our community, our organization is also committed to the health of our employees through our employee Wellness Program. Employees receive a discounted monthly insurance premium if they actively participate in the wellness program. Furthermore, Summit Medical Group hires only non-tobacco users. Pre-employment drug testing will include testing for nicotine, and only candidates who pass the drug test will be considered eligible for employment. About Our Career OpportunitySummit Express Clinics of Fountain City (a division of Summit Medical Group) has an immediate opening for an experienced Medical Office Receptionist. *Full time: Hours for position include evenings, weekends, and holidays.Responsibilities: (List does not include all duties assigned)Greets patients and checks-in patients, verifies and updates necessary information in the medical records/database, performs all registration functions and collects copays and balances due as appropriate.Assists patients with ambulatory difficulties, or other needs, as appropriate.Is customer service oriented.Maintains computerized scheduling and follows office scheduling policies.Files charts and coordinates lab work as requested.Answers and screens telephone calls, takes messages, and provides appropriate information to phone callers as well as handling outgoing phone calls as appropriate (e.g., appointment confirmations, referral calls, pre-certs, etc.) Assists with charge entry, and /or coding issues, and other related work if requested.Knowledge of medical office procedures, including online insurance verification. Knowledge of spelling, grammar and punctuation needed to process patient information along with the ability to file materials correctly by alphabetic or numeric processes.Knowledge of computer systems and applications.Requirements:Education: High School Diploma, or equivalent, required.Experience:One year of experience in a medical office setting is preferred. Six months is required. ",#NAME?,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN 37918",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/16-0151-medical-office-receptionist-job-knoxville-tn-us-167300090.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,475063fc7f2cac6ac29925624fe05381
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:20:43:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"ARG Professional Staffing/StaffSource is working with a local company seeking a Marketing Associate to join their team. Qualified individuals will have 1-3 years of experience. Great for a new grad with internship experience. Job Responsibilities:- Research and develop successful marketing plans based on direct sales and promotions- Manage social media accounts (Facebook, Twitter, etc.)- Maintain and build relationships with corporate partners- Monitor and report on internet search engine activities- Manage and maintain company website- Build and expand customer baseIf you are interested in this position, please send your resume to perm@argjobs.com ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Marketing Associate Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-associate-job-knoxville-tn-us-169250772.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,af296c328cb8d19cde019c519cab6f61
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:20:42:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARYThe Milieu Counselor under the direct supervision of the Service Coordinator is responsible for maintaining the overall structure of the treatment environment by:-Monitoring client self-administered prescription and over the counter medications.  -Conducting nightly prescription medication counts, tracking and documenting discrepancies.-Supervising and verifying completion of routine tasks of daily living and community environmental upkeep.-Conducting and documenting routine checks of facility equipment to maintain compliance with regulatory agencies.  -Conducting routine room checks to ensure client, child, and infant safety.-Facilitating and monitoring nightly client phone calls.-Transporting or arranging transportation for routine and/or emergency medical appointments or situations.-Completing and submitting Serious Incident Reports.-Supervises family visitation at regularly scheduled times.-Inventorying and searching new client belongings and conducting room searches as necessary to maintain a safe living environment.-Administering and documenting routine and unscheduled drug screens.-Communicating daily and/or nightly with clinical staff about significant client issues.-Encouraging and supporting clients in their efforts towards short term and long term recovery.-Enforcing program rules as outlined in the client handbook  issuing rule infractions and merit memos when appropriate.-implementing the daily routine of the program which includes:  assisting clients in Residential and Detoxification levels of care by direct monitoring of clients, facilitation of educational and activity groups, co-facilitation of process groups, observation of client breaks, assisting with admissions and assessments when needed,  writing daily progress notes, and other duties as assigned by the Service  Coordinator and requested by the medical and counseling staff, as well as acting in behalf of the clinical staff in their absence.  JOB REQUIREMENTSEducation/Knowledge: Must have graduated from high school with a diploma or have a GED.Experience: Experience in alcohol or drug facility or health related field preferred but not required.  Potential hires will be assessed depending on how close their work experiences in other areas have prepared them for the job. Physical: Normal residential treatment environment.  Close eye work for writing and computer work.  Staff will possibly including but not limited to: lift up to 50 lbs. pushing/pulling up to 150 lbs. frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending, stooping, reaching,  participating in client activities, as well as driving agency vehicle with clients.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1132&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",PRN New Beginnings Milieu Counselor Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/prn-new-beginnings-milieu-counselor-job-knoxville-tn-us-169487268.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=11,,,87014818a9875e31debe7352ae4fb9b2
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:19:43:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37916",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-knoxville-tn-us-169417013.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e7029cba7ccaa3faeb7efbac4995f7df
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:19:42:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Health Home Adult Nurse Coordinator RN Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/health-home-adult-nurse-coordinator-rn-job-knoxville-tn-us-169397584.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=18,,,2414e1268cec5bc9594ee51dd3eed143
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:18:41:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drive your Future!Pilot Flying J is seeking an experienced Retail General Manager to oversee our high-volume retail facilities. You will be responsible for the generation and execution of travel center and restaurant business plans to achieve established standards, sales and profit objectives as well as customer satisfaction. The Retail General Manager will also be:• Ensuring that customer expectations are met• Conducting meetings with subordinate employees • Maintaining effective vendor relationshipsAs a Retail General Manager for Pilot Flying J, you will build, coach, manage and develop teams from a staffing, interviewing, hiring and training standpoint.Additional responsibilities for the Retail General Manager include:• Driving sales• Managing team members• Tracking inventory• Providing customer service• Performing P&L analysis What Are We Looking For? As a Retail General Manager, you must exemplify integrity and accountability at the managerial level as well as demonstrate excellent team leadership skills. Furthermore, you must be able to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends and holidays.Additional requirements of the Restaurant General Manager include:• Minimum 2-3 years of management experience in the retail, restaurant, grocery or other service industry with responsibility for financial results• Previous management proficiency in high volume retail with P&L accountability• Ability to create and maintain a customer focused culture Benefits: • Nation-wide Medical Plan/Dental/Vision • 401(k) • Flexible Spending Accounts • Adoption Assistance • Tuition Reimbursement • Flexible Schedule • Weekly Pay",Retail Assistant Manager - Retail Manager - Full Time Job in Knoxville,,"Knoxville, TN 37918",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-assistant-manager-retail-manager-full-time-job-knoxville-tn-us-169720011.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ee52642377f5a54273210f24b9877a7b
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:18:41:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staffing Solutions is currently recruiting for an HR Generalist opportunity located in Clinton, TN. This is a direct hire opportunity paying between $50k-$60k.  Human Resources Generalist Job Duties:·        Implements human resources programs by providing human resources services, including talent acquisition, staffing, employment processing, compensation, health and welfare benefits, training and development, records management, safety and health, succession planning, employee relations and retention, AA/EEO compliance, and labor relations; completing personnel transactions.·        Improves manager and employee performance by identifying and clarifying problems; evaluating potential solutions; implementing selected solution; coaching and counseling·        Develops human resources solutions by collecting and analyzing information; recommending courses of action.Completes special projects by clarifying project objective; setting timetables and schedules; conducting research; developing and organizing information; fulfilling transactions.Manages client expectations by communicating project status and issues; resolving concerns; analyzing time and cost issues; preparing reports.Prepares reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing data and trends.Protects organization's value by keeping information confidential.Complies with federal, state, and local legal requirements by studying existing and new legislation; anticipating legislation; enforcing adherence to requirements; advising management on needed actions.Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations.Enhances department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Human Resources Generalist Skills and Qualifications:Performance Management, Training Management, Maintaining Employee Files, People Skills, Resolving Conflict, Employment Law, Project Management, Office Experience - General, Reporting Skills, Verbal Communication, Administrative Writing Skills.  Please provide your resume for review. Thank you!     ",Human Resources Generalist Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37923",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-generalist-job-knoxville-tn-us-169836642.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=16,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),13847597090312ebf6d8c1f7e9f4465e
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:17:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"City: Knoxville State:Tennessee Postal/Zip Code: 37914 Since 1947, Harrison Construction Company, an Oldcastle Materials company, has been the preferred source for ground-level site construction throughout eastern Tennessee and western North Carolina. Committed to quality, service and safety, our integrated products and services enable us to build and manage site development projects from concept through construction. In addition, by being a part of the Oldcastle family, we are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that come together to form Oldcastle. Oldcastle is the number one asphalt producer, the third-largest aggregates producer, and one of the top five ready mixed concrete producers in the United States. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. READY-MIX TRUCK DRIVER Tired of browsing the classifieds? Job searches unsuccessful? Look no further, HARRISON CONSTRUCTION has the perfect career opportunity waiting for you! Job Description Summary The Ready Mix Truck Driver is responsible for the transportation of ready mix concrete to construction projects, company owned facilities or various customers. This is a skilled position involving the safe and efficient operation of ready mix trucks. Deliveries will be made in both industrial and residential areas. Work will be performed per the Supervisor’s instruction, free from direct supervision except for more complicated jobs. Requirements Properly follow all company policies and procedures for safe working procedures and environment. Report any problems to the Foreman, Superintendent, Safety Manager, or Human Resources Manager. Perform daily pre/post trip inspections with appropriate documentation in compliance with DOT guidelines Obey applicable laws and follow dispatch instructions Maintain daily vehicle mileage logs Keep accurate log of deliveries and complete required paperwork for billing Monitor various gauges during operation of vehicle Load and unload equipment or materials Assure product quality to the best of the Driver’s ability Must keep vehicle in clean and orderly condition Must be 18 years of age or older Must pass DOT physical, drug screen and criminal background check Display a professional and courteous attitude to co-workers, supervisors, and the general public at all times Must be willing to work night and weekends when necessary at any plant location Report to the assigned job site in uniform and ready to begin work at the designated start time Attendance required according to company attendance policy to ensure crew is able to operate at normal efficiency level Strict adherence to Company safety requirements and procedures Willingness to work in a team environment and assist co-workers or supervisors with other duties as required Individuals are required to wear personal protective equipment (PPE) in designated operations and production areas as stated by OSHA and/or MSHA. Thorough operational knowledge and skill of mixer truck and related equipment to beoperated Ability to operate equipment safely and efficiently under a variety or working conditions Ability to understand and follow verbal and written instructions Ability to effectively communicate verbally Ability to work effectively in a team environment as well as being able to workindependently with attention to detail Ability to professionally interact with customers, collect payments and assist with issuesthat may arise The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Job requires climbing, stooping, bending, squatting, frequent lifting of extensions chutes, stretching, sitting/driving and shifting gears Ability to stand, walk, use hands and fingers to manipulate objects or controls, climb or balance, stoop, kneel, crouch, talk and hear May require sitting for extended periods of time Vision abilities (with correction) include close, distance peripheral, depth, and the ability to focus Required regular lifting of 25 to 50 lbs. Occasionally may lift up to 75 lbs. Must be able to work in all weather conditions While performing the duties of the job, the employee may be occasionally exposed to various changing job site conditions The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts; high precarious places; outside weather conditions; and risk of electrical shock or burn The noise level in some areas of the work environment may be loud, but is typically moderate The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive. They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job. Other duties may be assigned as required. Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education/Experience High school education or GED preferred but not required Must have a minimum of 3 years experience driving truck with similar weight and equipment Must maintain current driver’s license that meets state requirements, i.e., CDL, Class A and/or B Driver MVR must meet company standards What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Harrison Construction Company is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer Harrison Construction Company is part of theOldcastlecareers™network.",Ready Mix Driver Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/ready-mix-driver-job-knoxville-tn-us-169963875.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=9,,,6fa7b3af7f26beb274f0ecb22b6c9a93
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:17:44:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37916",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-knoxville-tn-us-169374763.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=9,,Customer Support/Client Care,2037e24068c015a2dd14eaf7d2ae7bb7
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:17:06:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services.Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families.The Home Option, a division of Kindred at Home, provides one on one in home medical care. Flexible schedules with Shifts from 4 to 12 hours.  As a Licensed Vocational Nurse you will:Assess client's health and safety, functional abilities, environmental and social factors.Make appropriate recommendations and referrals. Qualifications:Current LVN license requiredMinimum 2 years nursing experienceMust be well organized. Detail oriented. ReliableValid driver's license - Dependable auto / vehicle in good repair - Motor vehicle insuranceCurrent CPRPass a criminal background check and drug screenCurrent TB ScreenBilingual a plusKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, cardio nurse, cardio LPN, cardio LVN, cardiac nurse, cardiac LPN, cardiac LVN, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, home health nurse, homecare nurse, home care nurse, home health LPN, home health LVN, homecare LPN, homecare LVN, home care LPN, home care LVN, hospice nurse, hospice LPN, hospice LVN, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, LPN, LVN, L.P.N., L.V.N., license practical nurse, licensed practical nurse, license vocational nurse, licensed vocational nurse, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology LPN, oncology LVN, oncology nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho LPN, ortho LVN, palliative care LPN, palliative care LVN, LPN Job, LVN Job, LPN jobs, LVN jobs, Nursing, nursing job, nursing jobs, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab LPN, rehab LVN, rehab nurse, skilled visit, staff LPN, staff LVN, staff nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit LPN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry LPN, telemetry LVN, travel nurse, travel LPN, travel LVN, visit nurse, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. ",Per Diem Home Health Licensed Practical Nurse-Home Option Job in South Knoxville,"Per Diem, Employee","South Knoxville, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/per-diem-home-health-licensed-practical-nurse-home-option-job-south-knoxville-tn-us-169834726.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,af619c8476eb9c583e5650063bf8bc27
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:16:42:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Deane Hill 401 Catherine McAuley Way Knoxville, TN 37919 Job #: 063833Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Your responsibilities:* Plan, implement and monitor wellness and recreation programs to meet the specific needs of residents* Provide programs and events that encourage engagement and socialization to help support high quality of life for our residents* Manage volunteer program, including recruitment, training and supervising volunteers* Plan monthly life enrichment calendar for community* Coordinate transportation of residents to and from events outside of the community, which may include driving a community motor vehicle* Ensure life enrichment programs meet all local, state and federal regulationsRequired skills and qualifications:* Associate's degree with emphasis in recreation, health education or related field; bachelor's degree preferred* One year of direct programming experience with older adults* Valid state driver's license and clean driving record* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Compassion and desire to work with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Activity Coordinator Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37919",Healthcare Services Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/activity-coordinator-job-knoxville-tn-us-169907524.aspx?mescoid=3900662001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,b4ce04fc7c05f2676180165c65647497
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:16:41:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",PRN Sisters Saving Sisters Milieu Counselor Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/prn-sisters-saving-sisters-milieu-counselor-job-knoxville-tn-us-169397572.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=20,,,0a88d52e0dac77fbaf29ff1d53987f4b
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:15:44:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""We're seeking a Customer Service Representative. If you set high standards for Excellence, Integrity and Customer Service this may be the position for you.  Apply now and learn more about opportunities with TruGreen.Responsibilities• Answers inbound customer service calls, responds to customer emails and surveys.• Resolves customer service concerns after determining root cause of the concern.  • Escalates customer issues requiring extensive problem solving.• Uses save training and current save offers to retain customers at every opportunity.• Updates and maintains customer database with accurate customer information and timely data entry.  • Up-sells services to existing customers based on customer needs.• Provides resolution and timely follow-up with the customers.• Achieves quality standards as outlined in the Quality Assessment form. • Communicates customer impacting trends and/or ideas for improvement to manager.• May perform outbound calls to internal and external customers to schedule applications and/or service calls.Education and Experience Requirements• High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or up to one year related experience and/or training, or equivalent combination of education and experience.• Associate degree from a two-year college or technical school preferred• Computer skills with Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)TruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdfTruGreen performs pre-employment testing.",Customer Service Representative  Job in Alcoa,Full Time Employee,"Alcoa, TN",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-100791-job-alcoa-tn-us-169221943.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,Customer Support/Client Care,af95ef82d56ef782557def82d37d1ead
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:15:43:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  Responsible for the supervision, training, and management of the food service operation.  Ensure that appropriate quantities of food are prepared and served.  Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Produce and maintain work schedules and may prepare production records. Direct daily activities. Maintains food production that ensures the safety and quality of food according to policies, procedures, and department requirements. Ensure that food items are stored in a safe, organized, and hazard-free environment. Maintain all serving schedules; ensure that all food items are served per menu specifications in a safe and appropriate manner according to departmental policies and procedures. Maintain a sanitary department following health and safety codes and regulations. Maintain accurate inventory on a weekly basis according to departmental policies and procedures. May prepare orders as needed per vendor to ensure accurate production for location. Must be knowledgeable in operating an efficient cost effective program. Supervise and evaluate employees; counsel; promote employee growth, efficiency, morale, and teamwork. Maintain a safe and hazard-free working environment. Train/mentor other food service workers. Maintain logs on all maintenance required on equipment within the food service department. Perform preventative maintenance checklist. Justify replacement of existing equipment to meet needs of facility. Proficiency in multi-tasking. Perform other duties as requested by the Food Service Director whenever his/her skill and/or experience would be necessary to initiate, coordinate, or complete any given program. Must fill in for absent employees at location as necessary. Maintain knowledge of daily caterings and see they are prepared and delivered on time. Be able to work occasional night and weekend catered events. Attend food service meetings with staff. Maintain communication with staff (including the central office staff, e-mail, phone calls, inter-office mail, etc). May perform cashier duties as required.  Promote good public relations. Other duties as assigned. Qualifications Must read, write, and understand verbal instructions Must complete a sanitation course either before or during first year as a lead Ability to perform basic arithmetic Maintain emotional control under stress Ability to resolve interpersonal situations Strong organizational skills Minimum Education/Certification High School Diploma/GED  ",Chick Fil A Supervisor Student Union - Univ. of Tennessee Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN 37996",,http://jobview.monster.com/chick-fil-a-supervisor-student-union-univ-of-tennessee-job-knoxville-tn-us-169888469.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Food Services/Hospitality,27737ac9963aeb67095db3f934065920
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:14:43:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Your success is our success!   At P.F. Chang’s we know that we can’t continue to grow and succeed without people with talent, passion and vision. That’s why we’re looking for someone like you.   When you take charge as a Restaurant Manager you are responsible for the selection, development and performance of the front of house hospitality staff. You will ensure our guests enjoy a memorable experience by demonstrating and empowering our hospitality staff to live up to our company message – “We are truly glad that you are here and will do everything we can to make you want to come back.”   You’ll drive our success and we’ll reward you with professional development and ongoing opportunities to build your career with a global leader. Are you ready to take charge at P.F. Chang’s?   Requirements Requirements: Our Restaurant Managers come from a variety of backgrounds. Although experience in the restaurant industry is a huge plus, we will consider candidates with similar experience. Here are some factors that may enable you to jumpstart your success in this position: ·         A minimum of 3 years restaurant management experience in casual upscale dining preferred  ·         Customer service focused and oriented ·         Must be able to work an average of 55 hours work per week ·         Skillful planner with knowledge of basic business fundamentals ·         Strong communication skills with the ability to resolve conflict ·         Outgoing personality with expertise at developing relationships and leading others ·         Infectious, positive attitude that inspires others ·         Must be able to stand and walk for periods of eight to ten hours in length, each shift ·         Must be able to reach, bend, balance and transport various objects weighing up to 30 lbs repeatedly during a shift. At times it might be necessary to lift up to 50 lbs   Benefits: We value our employees’ time and efforts. Our commitment to your success is enhanced by our competitive salary, bonus plan, and an extensive benefits package including medical, dental and vision benefits, 401K plan and future growth opportunities within the company. Plus, we work to maintain the best possible environment for our employees, where people can learn and grow with the company.   Apply online today!       P.F. Chang's is an Equal Opportunity and e-Verify Employer.",Restaurant Manager Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/restaurant-manager-job-knoxville-tn-us-169930479.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=11,,Food Services/Hospitality,3997d0a79c90cf710d15fa1fc3579862
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:14:42:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drive your Future!Pilot Flying J is seeking an experienced Retail General Manager to oversee our high-volume retail facilities. You will be responsible for the generation and execution of travel center and restaurant business plans to achieve established standards, sales and profit objectives as well as customer satisfaction. The Retail General Manager will also be:• Ensuring that customer expectations are met• Conducting meetings with subordinate employees • Maintaining effective vendor relationshipsAs a Retail General Manager for Pilot Flying J, you will build, coach, manage and develop teams from a staffing, interviewing, hiring and training standpoint.Additional responsibilities for the Retail General Manager include:• Driving sales• Managing team members• Tracking inventory• Providing customer service• Performing P&L analysis What Are We Looking For? As a Retail General Manager, you must exemplify integrity and accountability at the managerial level as well as demonstrate excellent team leadership skills. Furthermore, you must be able to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends and holidays.Additional requirements of the Restaurant General Manager include:• Minimum 2-3 years of management experience in the retail, restaurant, grocery or other service industry with responsibility for financial results• Previous management proficiency in high volume retail with P&L accountability• Ability to create and maintain a customer focused culture Benefits: • Nation-wide Medical Plan/Dental/Vision • 401(k) • Flexible Spending Accounts • Adoption Assistance • Tuition Reimbursement • Flexible Schedule • Weekly Pay",Retail Assistant Manager - Retail Manager - Full Time Job in Knoxville,,"Knoxville, TN 37924",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-assistant-manager-retail-manager-full-time-job-knoxville-tn-us-169720018.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,bef7c964894cd8aceef3e7df94b26c4f
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:13:42:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dermatology Office needs full time employee to assist doctor with patient care.  Four day work week averaging 36-40 hrs.  Typing, computer, and people skills mandatory.  Good handwriting a must. This is a high energy job requiring constant attention to detail.  Send handwritten cover letter and resume listing job experience and references to Fax #865-681-0963 or mail to Blount Dermatology, 1702 E. Lamar Alexander Pkwy., Maryville, TN 37804.  No phone calls please.",Medical Office Assistant Job in Maryville,Full Time,"Maryville, TN 37804",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-office-assistant-job-maryville-tn-us-169889172.aspx?mescoid=4300748001001&jobPosition=18,,,6ed4353ad1d9e911307983090134f137
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:13:42:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Deane Hill 401 Catherine McAuley Way Knoxville, TN 37919 Job #:063832We're looking for a nurse (LPN or LVN) who's ready to make an impact at our senior living community. This position offers work/life balance, opportunities for advancement, and the chance to form meaningful bonds with our residents and their families.You'll experience life affirming moments as you ensure our residents receive the best care possible. You'll assist with writing care plans, administering medication and treatments, reviewing treatment sheets for accuracy, and supervise nursing assistants. You'll help our residents look and feel their best.Benefits: Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan. Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Required skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus* One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.",Nurse (LPN) Senior Living Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37919",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/nurse-lpn-senior-living-job-knoxville-tn-us-169907527.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,594c9859c50bce217b685d5720185928
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:12:45:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services.Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families.The Home Option, a division of Kindred at Home, provides one on one in home medical care. Flexible schedules with Shifts from 4 to 12 hours.  As a Licensed Vocational Nurse you will:Assess client's health and safety, functional abilities, environmental and social factors.Make appropriate recommendations and referrals. Qualifications:Current LVN license requiredMinimum 2 years nursing experienceMust be well organized. Detail oriented. ReliableValid driver's license - Dependable auto / vehicle in good repair - Motor vehicle insuranceCurrent CPRPass a criminal background check and drug screenCurrent TB ScreenBilingual a plusKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, cardio nurse, cardio LPN, cardio LVN, cardiac nurse, cardiac LPN, cardiac LVN, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, home health nurse, homecare nurse, home care nurse, home health LPN, home health LVN, homecare LPN, homecare LVN, home care LPN, home care LVN, hospice nurse, hospice LPN, hospice LVN, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, LPN, LVN, L.P.N., L.V.N., license practical nurse, licensed practical nurse, license vocational nurse, licensed vocational nurse, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology LPN, oncology LVN, oncology nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho LPN, ortho LVN, palliative care LPN, palliative care LVN, LPN Job, LVN Job, LPN jobs, LVN jobs, Nursing, nursing job, nursing jobs, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab LPN, rehab LVN, rehab nurse, skilled visit, staff LPN, staff LVN, staff nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit LPN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry LPN, telemetry LVN, travel nurse, travel LPN, travel LVN, visit nurse, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. ",Per Diem Home Health Licensed Practical Nurse-Home Option Job in West Knoxville,"Per Diem, Employee","West Knoxville, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/per-diem-home-health-licensed-practical-nurse-home-option-job-west-knoxville-tn-us-169834651.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,4bbbc48cff65361d66cb82997d97ea8a
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:12:44:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Knoxville CPA firm seeks Tax Manager experienced in planning, preparation, and review of personal and business taxes, as well as leading a team of CPAs. Less experienced Tax CPA will be considered for junior role. Salary dependent on experience. Qualified candidates interested in this position, please send your resume to perm@argjobs.com ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Tax Manager Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/tax-manager-job-knoxville-tn-us-169248614.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2582b739de263c0fafbdf2f339e431c7
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:11:45:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Knox Adult IST Case Manager Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/knox-adult-ist-case-manager-job-knoxville-tn-us-169871562.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=10,,,163dce78a92f00b0ad7e5656340d7bfa
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:11:44:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Washington National Insurance Company's largest American marketing partner, PMA USA, is currently hiring Sales Professionals – Insurance AgentThis position is a territory-based, outside sales role, with opportunity for rapid advancement to Field District Manager. You will be servicingour current rural and urban customers,local farmers, ranchers, and small business owners.DESIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:You don’t need a high-powered sales background. Many of our top sales professionals join PMA USA from a variety of industries, including military service, teaching, hospitality, retail, farming, legal and financial services, and many others.We do find, however, that our top sales performers all have the following skills and abilities:Motivated and goal-orientedA professional presence and demeanorA dedication to customer serviceAbility to travel in stateExperience with prospecting, networking and/or new business development Passion for making a difference in the communityStable work historyExcellent communication and time management skillsCoachable and competitive spiritAbility to earn client trust, along with excellent relationship management skillsWE OFFER:NO MANDATORY WEEKENDSFLEXIBLE SCHEDULESADVANCEMENT OPPORTUNITYSTABILITYUNMATCHED PRODUCT PORTFOLIO COMPREHENSIVE TRAINING PROGRAMTREMENDOUS INCOME OPPORTUNITY  Earn what you’re worth, make a difference in people’s lives, and have a great time while you do it!Join a respected career and Apply Now! PMA USA is an Equal Opportunity Company. 170609/16-0826, Expires 5/31/2019",Insurance Agent Job in Fountain City,"Full Time, Employee","Fountain City, TN 37938",AllInsuranceOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/insurance-agent-job-fountain-city-tn-us-169747528.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=13,"50,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Insurance Agent/BrokerGeneral/Other: Sales/Business DevelopmentFinancial Products Sales/Brokerage,c123934c565d0f460f1b2191d859eb1e
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:11:38:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Successful Knoxville employer seeks active CPA for corporate accounting role. Ideal candidate will have blend of Public and corporate experience, but CPA coming straight out of Public Audit will also be considered. No travel. Salary starting in low $50s Qualified candidates interested in this position, please send your resume to perm@argjobs.com ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Senior Staff Accountant Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-staff-accountant-job-knoxville-tn-us-169248890.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,"$50,000.00+ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,64eacf9866bedb269e2855ae3881ffb6
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:10:39:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Operating Room Nurse ManagerRegistered Nurse, RNKnoxville, TN Area Here is a great opportunity for a highly motivated and experienced nurse to function as the Operating Room Nurse Manager at a reputable hospital with an outstanding local and national reputation. Operating Room Nurse ManagerReporting to the Director of Surgical Services Looks over 10+ Operating Room Suites 100+ FTE’sThe facility conducts over 7,000+ surgical cases a yearConducts virtually all surgical cases BSN required, Masters preferred2+ years recent Operating Room Nurse Manager experience highly preferred  PLEASE CONTACT TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1339 Ryan DemerittPermanent Placement SpecialistCoreMedical Group(phone) 800-995-2673 ext. 1339(fax) 866-420-1055ryan.demeritt@coremedicalgroup.comAll applicants must be a Registered Nurse. The ideal candidate will hold a BSN and have recent experience working as Operating Room Nurse Manager. A strong Operating Room Charge RN, Supervisory or Assistant Nurse Manager will be considered. PLEASE CONTACT TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1339 Ryan DemerittPermanent Placement SpecialistCoreMedical Group(phone) 800-995-2673 ext. 13939 (fax) 866-420-1055ryan.demeritt@coremedicalgroup.com     keywords: Operating room: OR, RN, Nurse, Registered Nurse, Operating Room, CVOR, Scrub, Circulate, PACU, Pre op, Pre-operative, Post op, Post-operative, Recovery room, Surgical, Ambulatory, operating room, OR, OR Nurse, ENT, OB/GYN, general surgeries, Plastic, Opthomalogy, Orthopedic, Neuro, sterile supply, Pre-admit, BSN, JCAHO, RNFA, First Assistant, Surgical Assistant, Charge Nurse, ICU, CCU, Critical Care, Intensive Care, hearts, telemetry, critical care services, vents, acls, bls, stepdown, vice president, CNO, chief nurse, director of perioperative, director, vice president, director of operating, director of surgical services",Operating Room Nurse Manager - RN – Nurse Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/operating-room-nurse-manager-rn-%E2%80%93-nurse-job-knoxville-tn-us-169435408.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,3afe9b82a17e16dbf4f6d7f7736404ca
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:10:39:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the JobWhat is more secure than the replacement of burned out light bulbs?At Maintenance Engineering our sales team is devoted to bringing premium quality lighting and services to businesses no matter the size or industry. Our objective is to maximize a business’s revenue by assessing their specific lighting needs and providing them with a cost efficient solution.Working for the Nation’s leader, you will enjoy these advantages:commissions and bonuses pd weekly, earn an additional $3000 during training periodAdvancement opportunitiesIndustry leading products & servicesRecession proof market & industry Professional ongoing trainingPerformance rewards (cruises, resort trips)What our people are saying!“How I have blossomed and grown in the last 10 years with Maintenance Engineering is astronomical”“When you sell a Maintenance Engineering product line, you’re selling the very best in the market”Job DescriptionWe are seeking confident and highly motivated individuals for a great opportunity with unlimited earnings and growth potential. Our top performing Outside Sales Representatives earn over $100,000 each year, we want all of our Sales Professionals to be top earners and we will train for success. For over 40 years, our Sales Representatives have been conducting business with facilities across the U.S. Whether you’re a sales veteran or an entry level candidate right out of school, you will be able to take charge or your career and income as an Outside Sales Representative.Training includes: Trip to the company headquarters for advanced product and sales trainingPersonal career coachOne-on-one field trainingAll sales materials including portfolio, business cards, demo fixtures and more!RequirementsMaintenance Engineering will invest the time and effort to train the right candidate. You bring the desire and we will give you the tools. We do prefer the following:Good communication skillsA strong work ethicHonesty and integrityA competitive nature  Keyword Search:  Sales, sales rep, sales manager, sales mgr, outside sales, outside sales representative, outside sales rep, osr, account executive, acct exec, ae, account manager, acct mgr, am, marketing, business development, bus dev, business opportunity, bus opp,  independent contractor, salesperson, salesman, saleswoman, salespeople, selling, industrial, commercial, lighting, lamps, bulbs,fluorescent, tubes,  career position, career opportunity, customer service, retail, entry level, energy, environmental, green",Outside Sales Representative Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37922",AllEnergy and UtilitiesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-representative-job-knoxville-tn-us-169941081.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b7654e47abb704c7b31232c41566998a
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:09:39:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join our team as a part time Guest Services Representative 10a-2p or 5p-9p. This position will require someone with: * Minimum of 2 years call center/customer service experience* Excellent communications, attention to detail, and organizational skills* Comfort level with telephone communications* Ability to handle challenging customers* Advance problem solving skills and abilities* A strong customer service track record* A ""think outside the box"" mentality* Adapts quickly to change and willingness to take on new task* Computer skills with Microsoft Office and data entry* Team player willing to work a flexible schedule* Bilingual a plusThe basic duties of this position include: * Handling inbound customer calls on the Customer Service Hotline from 10am-2pm, 5pm-9pm or 4pm-12am* Answers customer/client requests or inquiries concerning services, products, billing, complaints, claims, and reports problem areas* May be required to work in one or multiple queues/skill sets over various customer contact channels* Handling Restaurant Concept complaint calls/emails* Maintain working knowledge of policies and procedures throughout the company* Facilitating responses to customer issues -must be able to communicate professionally with all levels of Pilot Management",Guest Services Representative - Part Time Job in Knoxville,,"Knoxville, TN 37909",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/guest-services-representative-part-time-job-knoxville-tn-us-169285115.aspx?mescoid=3900655001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,69ed43946d00775cca9af3a432f9457a
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:09:38:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Centerpointe Co-Occurring Counselor Residential Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/centerpointe-co-occurring-counselor-residential-job-knoxville-tn-us-169871547.aspx?mescoid=3900663001001&jobPosition=14,,,ed5cad4e297bdbb0a91104ef5234fd5d
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:09:06:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Knoxville, TN - YBEED11S-POS_75063009-1DescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Sanofi Genzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on specialty areas including: immunology, oncology and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Sanofi Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Sanofi Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.At Sanofi Genzyme, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Dupilumab Area Business ManagerThe Area Business Manager (ABM) is responsible for engaging Dermatologists and other key customers within an assigned geography and presenting clinically focused selling message to create and grow revenue and to consistently deliver product goals. The ABM will demonstrate initiative, drive, and independence, and take ownership for meeting and exceeding individual business goals. This will be accomplished by driving performance and delivering results in a compliant manner with a high degree of integrity strictly following all Sanofi Genzyme US policies and in compliance with all policies and procedures governing the promotion of pharmaceutical/biological products in the US. Engage Dermatology customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to introduce, launch, grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Partner with multiple collaboration stakeholders: Regeneron Sales Professional counterpart, Reimbursement and Access Specialists, and Clinical brand and corporate objectives in assigned territory Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts in the Dermatology therapeutic area to generate product utilization.Develop strong working relationships with Atopic Dermatitis experts and all additional Dermatology specialists in assigned geography as well as nurses, office staff and other important health care personnel and key patient advocacy support groups as directed. Coordinate with other Dermatology field specialists such as Regional Science Liaisons, Field Account Specialists, Account Management and Nurse Educators in their territory to ensure optimal account success. Coordinate and communicate with other field-based and home office personnel teams to proactively address customer needs, market dynamics and trends and develop strategies which support brand and corporate objectives within their assigned geography. Participate and help lead initiatives to support sales success as assigned (e.g. participate in industry related congresses, local and regional meetings and medical conferences).Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Plan, organize, and sponsor local promotional speakers programs and activities.Effectively executes short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish relationship with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Allocate resources in accordance with business opportunities.QualificationsBasic QualificationsBachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university5+ years of healthcare sales experience (pharmaceutical, biotech or medical device), with 2+ years Dermatology experience strongly preferredDemonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related informationAbility to travel to meetings/trainings/programs as necessary - additional travel may be required within the assigned territoryProven success and positive track record of consistent sales performance in complex markets with diverse customer segments operating with a high degree of integrity within compliance guidelines Ability to operate as a “team player” in cooperation with collaboration partners and internal colleagues to reach common goalsValid Driver’s LicensePreferred Qualifications2 years selling sub-cutaneous self-injectable (or office administered IV) biologics 2 years of selling experience for Atopic Dermatitis, or other Immunology disorders such as, Psoriasis, Multiple Sclerosis, Crohn’s Disease or Ulcerative Colitis and others strongly preferred.Demonstrate advanced clinically-based selling skills Results oriented with a proven track record of success with product launchesExperience with in-servicing and training office staff, nurses and office managersDemonstrate a passion and learning aptitude for science and is proactive in strengthening knowledge related to disease-state, treatment options and healthcare trends #LI-GZJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Tennessee-KnoxvilleJob Posting:Jul 13, 2016, 10:53:30 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Knoxville,,"Knoxville, TN",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/dermatology-dupilumab-area-business-manager-knoxville-tn-ybeed11s-job-knoxville-tn-us-169746079.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,8eb5d728716b6895c8856ca24c199ead
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:08:45:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Chart/Date Abstraction Nurse in the Knoxville, TN area!Responsibilities include:  •Retrieval, review, and abstraction of medical record data, required for multiple HEDIS hybrid measures  •Entering data into a HEDIS software system  •Collaborate with clinical and non-clinical staff regarding provider scheduling and on-site medical record retrieval.  •Perform duties in a professional manner, utilizing time and resources efficiently Qualifications & Requirements: •Active and unrestricted RN or LPN license in the state of Tennessee or compact state RN or LPN license. •Knowledge and experience of HEDIS data abstraction methods •Experience in medical record review •Valid Driver’s license - Some travel involved •Professional appearance as will be visiting physician offices•Must be able to work independently and have excellent organizational skills •Excellent telephone and communication skills required •Working knowledge of Windows and Microsoft Office, specifically Excel, is required •Must successfully complete the training program offered, and meet & maintain acceptable performance goalsIf interested, please send your most UP TO DATE resume to Samantha at Sadames@judge.com or contact my direct line at 610-617-1483.Thank You!Samantha Adames",Chart/Data Abstraction Nurse Job in Knoxville,"Full Time, Employee","Knoxville, TN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/chart-data-abstraction-nurse-job-knoxville-tn-us-169611958.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,bcfe30cd655eba4e15bc14362fa699b3
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:08:44:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Software Tester Summary/ObjectiveWorking under the supervision of the QA Manager, the Software Quality Assurance Test Engineer is responsible for delivering quality, well-tested software to Production. The ideal candidate has retail ecommerce experience, web applications experience, and experience with industry standard QA tools (we use WAPT Pro, QA Complete and Test Complete). The analyst is expected to work with a team and to work independently with equal proficiency. The associate will interact with his or her supervisor as needed, but many activities will require independent thought and decision making.Software Tester Roles:1.      Analyze and understand requirements, devise a test strategy to adequately cover the requirements, develop high-level test scenarios that implement the strategy, elaborate scenarios into detailed test cases. Review test artifacts with QA and development team members and edit accordingly.2.      Own the QA role throughout each project. This includes but is not limited to: consume requirements, write and execute tests (manual and automated), monitor testing progress, report status, log defects, track and test defect fixes, choose when and what to re-test, collaborate with team members, monitor project progress, incorporate schedule and scope changes, shepherd the product to delivery, be responsible for quality of product3.      Participate in test automation. Write manual tests with a view to automation, learn the automation tools in use, script automated tests, extend the automation infrastructure.4.      Collaborate with the business and development teams to produce requirements that are well-documented and clear. 5.      Maintain subject matter expertise for the systems under test and use that expertise to create, maintain, and extend the test case library. 6.      Participate in team process improvement. Understand our development lifecycle, participate in its continuous improvement. Software Tester Required Education and Experience:1.      Knowledge of QA theory and methodology: 1. Can define and execute different types of testing: functionality, reliability, usability, efficiency, maintainability, portability (and others) 2. Can define and execute different types of tests: integration, system, regression; positive, negative; performance, load, stress (and others) 3. Ability to conduct exploratory testing; able to test a product in the absence of requirements2.      Experience testing web sites and web pages, especially ecommerce 3.      Exposure to test automation4.      Experience with Microsoft SQL Server. Able to write simple queries, understand basic database architecture; can incorporate data validation and data mining into test activities5.      Experience with Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Visio, Power Point, Access)6.      Strong written, verbal and non-verbal communication skills7.      Good analytical, problem solving and decision making skills8.      Ability to organize work efficiently across multiple projects and responsibilities9.      Works well under pressure to meet due dates10.  Able to work with no or minimal supervision and willing to take the initiative11.  Enthusiastic attitude, eager to continue growing and learning12.  Strong sense of ownership, takes responsibility Keywords:  Software Quality Assurance, QA Tester, Software Tester, Software Test Engineer, Automation, Manual Testing",Software Tester Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37923",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-tester-job-knoxville-tn-us-168439764.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,9e4a491e776401cffc9a66134d17f61e
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:07:45:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",CABHI Data Specialist Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cabhi-data-specialist-job-knoxville-tn-us-169487274.aspx?mescoid=4300761001001&jobPosition=10,,,c13b7ce8453ad2f683ad8b9f637bddea
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:07:44:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",ILS Milieu or Program Counselor Adult Residential Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ils-milieu-or-program-counselor-adult-residential-job-knoxville-tn-us-169871556.aspx?mescoid=3900663001001&jobPosition=12,,,5c56660110a1f081a195e5814e2a9e64
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:07:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center is seeking two RN's to coordinate care for adults, youth and children with mental illness plus a serious physical illness to integrate care to these clients.JOB SUMMARYProvides nursing services for clients with mental health and co-occurring diagnosis. (Adult and/or children and youth)At scheduled medication appointment, vitals for target population will be performed.  RN will provide medication, training and support.  RN will determine clients height, weight, blood pressure, allergies to medications, side effects of psychotropic medications and effectiveness of medications being prescribed, administers intramuscular injections, orients nursing students (if applicable). RN will provide ongoing daily support to all prescribers in relation to any client's needs.  RN will facilitate care coordination between the doctor, pharmacy, clinician and parent and/or guardian regarding medication needs/refills. RN will ensure compliance with productivity standards set by the program coordinator.  RN will provide crisis intervention and emergency services as needed. RN will embrace the key values of clinical services:  empowerment, normalization, rehabilitation, and continuity of care, as well as to adhere to HRMC policy and procedures. RN provides case management services to assist individuals in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, and other services; provides rehabilitation and support for client population; serves as a clinical specialist for medication management issues; psychiatric monitoring; provides information, education, and referral, agency linkage, advocacy, and follow-up services, and coordination of care; utilizes center-wide and community resources as needed for client benefit; embraces the key values of case management: empowerment, normalization, rehabilitation, and continuity of care. HRMC is an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers LicenseRecord, Degree Verification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingentupon clean drug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally,certain programs are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingualapplicants are encouraged to apply.JOB REQUIREMENTS  Education:  Licensed RN required.  Experience: Experience in Psychiatric Nursing and Primary Care preferred.  Computer experience is required.    Physical:Exposure to biological hazards.  Hearing of normal and soft tones.  Close eye work.  Frequent exposure to unpleasant odors.  Lifting up to 50 lbs.  Pushing/pulling up to 250 lbs.  Frequent sitting, standing, walking, bending,stooping, and reaching.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1108&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Knox County Mental Health RN Care Coord Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/knox-county-mental-health-rn-care-coord-job-knoxville-tn-us-169871534.aspx?mescoid=2900500001001&jobPosition=17,,,f0a3ba3d5523746dd5bfedbfeab963e6
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:06:42:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Information:Sales Support Representative position with a company that gives back and works one-on-one with families in your community. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.We Need:Entry level and senior level applicant who is service-minded and wants to help people, gain experience and earn the money they need.You Will Help Your Community By:- Supporting the needs of people in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Providing customer service and communicationYou Only Need:- A high school diploma or equivalent- Be a people-person that likes interaction among others- Be independent-minded and flexible- Outstanding communication skillsWho Is American Income?We are American Income Life Insurance Company. We are a significant provider of supplemental insurance and have been helping labor unions, credit unions and associations with their insurance coverage needs. We strive to make a difference in lives of people across the United States, Canada and New Zealand.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at www.ailcareers.com",Quality Customer Service Associate Job Job in Knoxville,Part Time/ Temporary/Contract/Project,"Knoxville, TN 37902",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-customer-service-associate-job-job-knoxville-tn-us-169861728.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,ec44e1e24175ffe337ed5688403aedf3
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:06:41:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"StaffingSolutions is currently recruiting for a Sales Representative for a West Knoxville client. The sales representative is responsible for calling on potential businesses, selling company product and equipment through building business relationships, generating quotes and orders to over-achieve sales goals.Education & Experience:• High School Diploma or GED required• 1-3 years of experience in sales/customer service required• Working knowledge of NetSuite preferred• Bi-lingual a plusDuties of Sales Representative:• Supports Sales Manager(s) with order entry and relevant customer centered activities• Cultivate leads; seek out new business opportunities by developing a referral network that can generate leads• Follow up on all leads and referrals resulting from outbound calls or from in-bound leads• Help determines type of products that will best match customers’ needs• Establish and maintain both current and potential customer relationships• Maintain customer record logs, and lists electronically• Can work independently and make proactive sales decisions in an efficient and effective manner.• Maintains customer base to insure sales volumes are steady or increasing• Develops relationships in a sales focus with customer base to encourage future business• Coordinates with the rest of the team to solve customer issues• Maintains professional demeanor and positive company image to customers• Carries out all other duties as assignedHow to Apply: Please fill out an application at www.staffingsolutions.com and attach an updated resume",Sales Representative - West Knoxville Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37923",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-west-knoxville-job-knoxville-tn-us-169771452.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,15.00 - 15.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),6b7a092bc94b5c328a5d99af18d83133
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:05:44:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",ILS Residential LPN Nurse Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/ils-residential-lpn-nurse-job-knoxville-tn-us-169397559.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=3,,,94d5000e8ed52a965dddf4e314df7f11
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:05:44:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Family Crisis Center Milieu Counselor  hrs week Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/family-crisis-center-milieu-counselor-24-hrs-week-job-knoxville-tn-us-169487281.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=8,,,c190ac21ffbf9ef8eedb9d1a803dbb59
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:04:42:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company backgroundRegus is the World’s largest provider of flexible workplace solutions. Established in 1989, and based in Luxembourg, the company offers a wide range of products and services which allow individuals and companies to work however, wherever, and whenever they need to. Regus is listed on the London Stock Exchange and is a part of the FTSE 250.Although we operate in over 200 countries, 900 cities and 3,000 locations, we’re still expanding rapidly. In fact, we’re currently opening over 2 new centers every day, achieving over 20% year-on-year growth.We achieve our outstanding results through our people. It is our customer focused people who are making business happen. They are behind our fantastic success and incredible growth.The Role The world’s largest provider of workplace solutions has an opening for an Area Manager (AM)The AM is responsible for growing the overall profit performance (EBIT) across a number of Regus centres, whilst maintaining and improving customer service (NPS).  The AM will hire and manage worldclass teams within their cluster centres to help deliver these objectives.  The AM will also be the primary person responsible for new sales with a prospective customers and will present the best range of options to suit that customer’s needs. Converting sales for their cluster.Primary Objectives Profit (EBIT) and Customer service (NPS) improvement Hiring and motivating great talent measured by employee net promoter score ( ENPS) Deliver brilliant tours as per the Regus Required Standards hitting revenue targets Key responsibilities Touring customers to show the range of options available to suit their needs and closing the sale where possible Managing a group (cluster) of business centres to include: Manage by visiting centres (Visit Customers, Ensure centres look great, Ensure inventory is maximized) Managing cluster performance: EBIT, NPS, ENPS Business review planning of the centres monthly Danaging Community Managers (SCSRs) in each centre, including training and recruitment Dealing with escalated customer requests/issues Hold Networking events The candidates should have the below experience or background in order to be considered for the role: - Experienced at managing teams - Previous experience of managing P&Ls - 3 years previous experience selling products or service solutions through direct sales within a business-to-business sales environment.  - Experienced at presenting to groups of prospects.  - Experience of delivering excellent customer service in multiple locations through leadership and implementation of company standards  - Professional and clear communication skills coupled with the ability to network at a high level and build strong business relationships.  - Comfortable making decisions, evaluating options and considering consequences. - Strong organisational skills, including the ability to prioritise, multi-task, delegate and work effectively with minimal supervision. - Proven objection handling, prospecting and negotiation skills.  - Commercial/ results driven",Area Manager Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37929",All,http://jobview.monster.com/area-manager-job-knoxville-tn-us-169836293.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0b0d69c5d03d937be83cbb1f75e5bbfd
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:04:41:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description We are looking for current/former leaders in education who are available year-round for part-time flexible work located in North Texas.  This part-time, contract position is seeking individuals who have experience in: Founational/Secondary Literacy World Languages Middle/High School Math Secondary Social Studies and Secondary Science. Overall Responsibility: The Regional Consultant provides premier customer service, professional learning, in-person support and coaching to teachers and leaders using Houghton Mifflin Harcourt (HMH) programs.The Regional Consultant will work in partnership with the aligned Manager of Professional Services.Primary Accountabilities:  Professional Development Ensure deep program knowledge Provide best practice quality implementation training and professional learning for HMH programs for teachers, coaches and leaders Provide reports following each professional learning session Coaching Provide individual and team coaching to teachers using HMH programs to ensure fidelity, support instruction, differentiation, and strengthen results Share best instructional practices for HMH programs Model regular use of assessment and report data to individualize and differentiate instruction Make recommendations for further program or service needs based on coaching visits Facilitate goal setting with teachers during each visit Provide coaching reports following each visit Revenue GenerationIdentify sales opportunities and leads for additional products and services from existing customersUse service reporting as an opportunity to sell servicesEnsure program and service up-sell strategies are integrated into service deliveryJob RequirementsSKILLS & COMPETENCIES:Thorough knowledge of educational pedagogyBasic knowledge of performance data, statisticsBasic understanding of technology-based productsExcellent training, facilitating and presentation skillsCustomer focused ethicsEDUCATION & EXPERIENCE:4 year college degree, Master’s degree preferredEducation background and teaching experienceExperience in working with educators and presenting to adultsThorough knowledge of PowerPoint, Excel and MS WordOTHER REQUIREMENTS:Must be available year-round for during the day, varying hours assignments with some overnights possibleExtensive travel required*This is a home-based role with varying hours, based in North Texas.**This is a part-time opportunity, billed through a third party vendor.ABOUT US:Houghton Mifflin Harcourt (NASDAQ:HMHC) is a global learning company dedicated to changing people’s lives by fostering passionate, curious learners. As a leading provider of pre-K–12 education content, services, and cutting-edge technology solutions across a variety of media, HMH enables learning in a changing landscape. HMH is uniquely positioned to create engaging and effective educational content and experiences from early childhood to beyond the classroom.  HMH serves more than 50 million students in over 150 countries worldwide, while its award-winning children's books, novels, non-fiction, and reference titles are enjoyed by readers throughout the world.For more information, visit http://careers.hmhco.com  PLEASE NOTE:  Houghton Mifflin Harcourt is an equal employment opportunity employer and participates in E-Verify. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of gender, race/ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, or other protected group status.J2W:MO*WFH",Part Time Regional Consultant (home-based in North Texas) Job in Dallas,Per Diem,"Dallas, TX",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/Part-Time-Regional-Consultant-home-based-in-North-Texas-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165013097.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b76f7df71c2e85cf83f53c150e3e3e8f
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:04:40:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Keeps production supplied by retrieving materials and supplies; operating a forklift.  Some heavy lifting required, will not be forklift only.  Forklift Certification Required (pls submit your certificate at time of interview)Duties:* Retrieves supplies and materials based on bill of lading; locating and verifying supplies and materials; secures pallet on truck; moves pallet to production location.* Maintains inventory in production area by daily counting and inputting onto a spreadsheet.* Monitors inventory by reporting discrepancies.* Clears production area by securing and moving finished pallets; moving empty pallets.* Documents actions by logging movement of supplies, materials, and finished goods.* Maintains safe work environment by watching out for foot traffic; following standards and procedures; complying with legal regulations.* Accomplishes warehousing and organization mission by completing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Safety Management, Documentation Skills, Inventory Control, Dependability, Initiative, Handles Pressure, Coordination, Organization, Productivity, Data Entry Skills",Certified Forklift driver/Warehouse worker Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75247",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Forklift-driver-Warehouse-worker-Job-Dallas-TX-US-159274273.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=17,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hourPlus benefits (medical/dental/vision/life/401k),Experienced (Non-Manager),98609b2d31940bb74561c556c3e68159
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:03:43:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"NEIE Medical Waste Services is currently seeking a Nationwide Sales Representative for Environmental Waste Market to be responsible for expanding the Company’s business in the Federal Marketplace. This position is accountable for achieving sales goals through the acquisition and development of new customers and expansion of the product line within the existing customer base. This position is a nationwide position and candidates from all regions of the US will be considered.Essential Duties and Responsibilities:· Maintains current customers and acquires new customers by meeting or exceeding goals for territory revenue, growth objectives, account retention and customer service functions via telephone and periodic sales calls and presentations. This interaction includes the entire sales cycle from prospecting, maintenance, proposals, contracts, price increases, cancellations and contract renewals.· Builds relationships with current customers while growing the revenue and profits through service changes and price increases.· Communicates regulatory compliance issues to customers.· Implements sales strategies to maximize revenue and profits through maintenance and penetration of existing customers.· Resolve problems and coordinate customer needs with Field Operations and/or Customer Service group.· Works as liaison between customers and accounts payable department for collection of receivables when requested.· Assists with coordination and implementation of Regional and National account sales activities.· Performs other related duties as required or requested.Position Requirements:Education and Experience:· Education equivalent to Bachelor’s Degree in Sales, Marketing, or Management, or the equivalent in related work experience, demonstrating a proven track record of sales for products in similar industry.· Five or more years of sales experience, demonstrating the ability to manage multiple accounts, or the equivalent in related work experience.· Demonstrates proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint.· Extensive Travel is required.· May require mandatory immunizations and credentialing based on customer requirementsWe are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status, or on the basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Nationwide Sales Representative for Environmental Waste Market Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Waste Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Nationwide-Sales-Representative-for-Environmental-Waste-Market-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164917001.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4a67a701bb8dccba48e2a3c58ef03cf0
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:03:43:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Datum Consulting Group, LLC (dba Datum Solutions) is currently seeking a Big Data Product Manager, preferably with healthcare experience in Los Angeles, CA, Dallas, TX and/or New York City.Responsibilities:Support the client's strategy and articulate the vision and mission of the product roadmap, including implementation and prioritization;Engage in data analysis in a practical way and collaborate with the team to conceptualize and create products;Manage execution for a specific product from product definition and planning through production, release, and end of life;Develop user stories and requirements while evaluating their potential and practicality by analyzing market and customer needs;Serve as the central resource with design, process, manufacturing, test, quality and marketing as the product(s) move to production and distribution; andSupports product launch activities and ongoing market-facing support. Education:Bachelor's Degree required or equivalent in education and experience. Qualifications:3+ years of experience in software and enterprise solutions in a market-facing product role. Knowledge of Big Data platforms is required.Experience working with Agile methodology strongly preferred.Experience with Business Intelligence strongly preferred.Experience working in the healthcare industry is desirable.Working knowledge and experience with Case Management and Case Analytics.Ability to communicate effectively with cross matrix teams to accomplish project goals.Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills required.Ability to implement concepts, ideas and plans while functioning in a flexible, constantly changing environment necessary.Must be a strong collaborator, team player as well as an individual contributor. ABOUT DATUM CONSULTING GROUP, LLC:Datum is a privately held company whose main office is located in Indianapolis, Indiana. We’ve been operating since 2004 in the U.S., and have rapidly expanded our operations globally. Through a network of employees and consultants located all around the world, we here at Datum specialize in ECM technology development, re-engineering, and technology support services in the commercial business sector and select government agencies. Datum Consulting Group, LLC, dba Datum Solutions, is proud to be a Minority Business Enterprise (MBE) and an Equal Opportunity Employer.We offer competitive salaries and attractive benefits (including but not limited to, medical insurance reimbursements, 401(k), paid time off).",Big Data Product Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Big-Data-Product-Manager-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164215355.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),42dda151e2f0451c035c6c973b676287
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:02:44:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Lawn Specialist with the #1 lawn care company you will be providing regularly scheduled landscape services within your route on a daily basis. You will work closely with customers to meet and exceed their expectations. We offer: • Great hourly rate sales commission and customer retention bonus • During the production season our Specialists average between $600-800 per week • Comprehensive medical, dental, prescription and vision plans plus much more • Paid vacation, holidays and 401(k) plan with company matching • Clean uniforms provided daily • 1st class paid training & state of the art equipment • Work independently outdoors • Growth and advancement opportunities – we promote from within! Responsibilities: • Applying products to lawns according to schedule, safety procedures, and label instructions • Driving company vehicle to customer locations • Responding to customer requests for telephone and in-person service calls • Completing required production forms and customer instructions as required • Assisting in sales to current and new customers through contact on route • Performing a daily inspection of truck and equipment before taking the vehicle out on the road and upon return • Maintaining vehicle and equipment through cleanliness, safety, and general maintenance If you are motivated, hard working and customer oriented we want you on our team! Please apply today! Qualified candidates will be at least 21 years of age for DOT purposes, will have a valid, permanent driver's license from state of residence and a clean driving record per company’s standards. We perform pre-employment testing. TruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities To learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdf Keywords: Lawn, landscaping, customer service, outside sales, new sales, business development, commission, applicator, tree, landscape, laborer, pest",Residential Lawn Specialist -  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Residential-Lawn-Specialist-100889-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164751961.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,2b70d073b28efcaab6075b34d30f993c
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:02:43:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionThis job will require the qualified candidate to identify customer needs in terms of merchant services, social media and mobile marketing and suggest Central Payment solutions that best meet their business needs. The Outside Sales Representative duties may include but are not limited to:Explaining Central Payment’s bundled credit card processing and social media/mobile marketing services in simple, effective and persuasive terms Developing and maintaining strong business relationships with business owners in your area, starting with small to medium-size businesses and working your way up to larger businesses Collaborating  with a Sales Director to prepare and present competitive sales proposals Providing first-time customers with a free new programmed credit card terminal and helping to reprogram existing terminals Working closely with Central Payment colleagues in Customer Service, Underwriting, Technical Support, Web Development and other departments to meet your sales goals RequirementsExperience with sales, business development, managing customer relations and/or companies such as Avon, Mary Kay, Vector/Cutco, etc. a plusHigh school degree required; college degree or some college a plusBasic computer literacyBilingual skills preferredReliable transportation a plus BenefitsUncapped earning potentialMultiple awards, honors and contests throughout the yearPhenomenal professional training (optional) and support with a Sales Director,  online tools and live educational conference calls 4-5 times a day,  5 days a weekCreate your own hoursSuperior online management tools including a virtual office (CRM) environment for client account managementWe offer a welcome kit, business cards and informational product/service brochuresRecession-proof growing industryHere's YOUR chance to capitalize on a genuine career opportunity! If you are a motivated, high energy individual who is looking to take the next step in their career, APPLY NOW!",Sales / Account Executive Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Account-Executive-Job-Dallas-TX-US-148474320.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a873bfad742e663f69d076203de278c4
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:01:44:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsFounded in 1945, Guardian Services has been providing professional kitchen exhaust cleaning and HVAC system cleaning services to thousands of hotels, restaurants, clubs, schools, hospitals, and franchises. The ideal candidate will have a strong self directed work ethic, positive attitude, and relevant experience. It is essential that the candidate be a self-starter, capable of being effective without constant supervision and able to anticipate and solve problems before being told to do so.Responsibilities• Assist with the development of annual financial plans/updates• Complete and submit government documents• Establish and balance accounts• Keep financial records• Maintain general ledgers and prepare financial statements• Participate in annual audit activities• Post all revenues and expenses in the accounting system• Prepare tax returns• Prepare trial balance of books• Print and distribute checks or post online payments• Use manual and computerized bookkeeping systemsEducation• Accounting/Bookkeeping courses combined with several years experience• Post secondary education, accounting, bookkeeping or related field• High School Diploma (or equivalent)• First Level of a recognized professional accounting program completed (a plus)Skills• Knowledge of Quickbooks Enterprise 2015• Excellent communication skills• Great attention to detail• Knowledge of statistics processing• Works well in a team• Works well independentlyCompensation$40-$50K per yearPosition TypeFull-TimeBenefitsGuardian Services provides the following benefits:- Paid Vacation / Sick Leave- Flexible Hours- Health Insurance - Relaxed dress code, friendly work environment- Retirement Savings Plan",Bookkeeper Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75243",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Bookkeeper-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164905523.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),47f2618153cfc1ea7e9c5857a827bdcf
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:01:44:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary: The Staff Accountant will work with the Assistant Corporate Controller to ensure that the Company is reporting financial results on a timely basis. This individual will support various aspects of finance and accounting for the Company through journal entries, intercompany transactions, account reconciliations and accruals and will need to be effective and experienced in the general accounting function. This individual will fill a key role within the accounting group. The Staff Accountant must be a self-starter with a strong work ethic, bring a positive and outgoing personality to the role, and be a reliable and collaborative team member.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: · Assist with the monthly accounting close and reconciliation process, adhering to the published accounting close and reporting calendar.· Prepare account reconciliations in conjunction with the monthly close process, including the related journal entries.· Responsible for handing the accounting for bulk inventory and supplies.· Responsible for maintaining a complete set of books in QuickBooks. This includes paying all invoices, managing the inventory, creating invoices to sell supplies to Customers, completing bank reconciliations, and posting/adjusting journal entries as necessary.· Generate invoices and credit memos, send to customers and maintain the customer Masterfile.· Maintain fixed asset register, record monthly depreciation and account for disposition of fixed assets.· Provide backup support for accounts payable processing.· Assist with accurate and timely monthly, quarterly and year end close.· Maintain files as needed within the department.· Perform such other accounting, financial, or administrative tasks as may be required from time-to-time by the Assistant Corporate Controller.· Review monthly account reconciliations - reconciling cash, receivables, billing and prepare information for tax providers· Gain an understanding of the general ledger (QuickBooks) to pull data as needed, review financial transactions and determine appropriate journal entries· Implement a close calendar to ensure close is completed in a timely manner· Monthly activities include general ledger entry review, posting entries and month-end close management· Conduct self in an ethical, legal, and responsible manner at all times.Competency:To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:· Strong domain knowledge of QuickBooks – Certification preferred· Strong analytical skills· Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills.Education/Experience:· Bachelor’s degree or higher in Accounting required; CPA or CPA candidate a plus· 2 - 3 year’s accounting experience, preferably within public accounting or a blend of public accounting and healthcare industry experience· High level of proficiency in Microsoft Excel and QuickBooks· Able to work with accuracy and attention to detail· Experience in preparing account reconciliations and financial statements· Ability to work under pressure and manage multiple projects/deliverables· Highest level of integrity and ability to handle highly confidential information· Excellent interpersonal, oral and written communication skills· Self-starter and strategic thinker· Motivated, reliable and outgoing with a strong work ethic· Ability to work independently and as a member of a teamComputer Skills: Strong Microsoft Excel skills (v-lookup, pivot tables); QuickBooks experience required",Staff Accountant Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Accountant-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165244350.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d344edabe76c316c6010434d0238fd00
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:01:39:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Project Manager-Data Center. •Understanding of IT environments to include telecommunications, network, data centers and related technology applications •Understanding of Databases, Middleware systems, Operating Systems, Replication, Storage. Mainframes are a Plus. •Able to develop programs and framework required for design of metrics, analytical tools, benchmarking activities and related reporting for the identification of best practices •Able to manage large, transformative initiatives that impact multiple LOBs and/or products •Understanding of E2E delivery of the service: desktop – telephony – network – presentation – business logic – orchestration – DB – backend data store and vertical technical depth in 1-2 areas•Outstanding Leadership Skills •Analytical and Creative Thinker (thinks outside the box) •Effective Communicator in reporting accurate information and articulating in public speaking •Exceptional Conflict Resolution/Problem Solver •Decisive and Confident in Conduct•Executing and Delivery of Strategic Platform (e.g AIX/Solaris to Linux) IT Strategy Initiatives •An element of DC Cluster design •Project Managing (i.e. Issues, Schedule, Risk, Path to Green, etc.) •Managing financials (understanding of Blue $$ vs. Green $$) •Communicating to senior management (updates and next steps) •Analyzing data targeted for implementation of strategic initiatives Must be fluent in MS Products (Excel, MS Word, PowerPoint), especially in Excel: •Pivot Tables and analyzing data to implement strategic initiatives •Vertical and Horizontal Look Ups •‘What if’ scenario analysis •Charts",Project Manager-Data Center Job in Irving,"Full Time, Employee","Irving, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Data-Center-Job-Irving-TX-US-164562058.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=20,,IT/Software Development,7f9ab19e7d9d47a763655bc28a1ccbca
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:01:36:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Details:Maintains the guest rooms, public space and back of the house areas in good repair by performing various tasks related to a variety of trades including but not limited to carpentry, plumbing, electrical, air conditioning, painting, wall covering and masonry to ensure an attractive and well-maintained hotel.Inspect guestrooms, public space and back of the house for areas to repair, touch up or replace.Repairs, or replace items such as light bulbs, lamps, switches, outlets, faucets, toilets, hardware, filters, paint, furniture, wall coverings, caulking, grouting or other miscellaneous items.Assists other department team members in the systematic application of the preventive maintenance program.Makes records of repairs made, or areas needing further attention.",Maintenance Engineer - Embassy Suites DFW South Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 75062",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Engineer-Embassy-Suites-DFW-South-Job-Irving-TX-US-164688107.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=12,12.5,Experienced (Non-Manager),35ab0ba79acd6dfaa5dd11656057423f
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:00:44:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Judge Healthcare is currently seeking a Oncology Clinic Registered Nurse in Dallas, TX.  Responsibilities:Under general supervision, provides professional nursing care for patients adhering to national and company standards and guidelines for specialty regulations. Must recognize physical, psychological, and spiritual aspects of care and participates in company wide quality initiatives. Requirements:3 years Nursing experienceOncology experience is required, however not performing chemotherapyQualified candidates are encouraged to apply!  Please send an updated resume to Marissa at mmccredie@judge.com.",Oncology Clinic Registered Nurse Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Oncology-Clinic-Registered-Nurse-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164860536.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,905b0db76d4acc67fead1f4d38d07806
United States of America,US,09/Jul/2016:00:43:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Parker + Lynch is looking to fill a Senior Financial Analyst job in Dallas, TX. The client is looking for someone with a Bachelor’s degree and a minimum of 5 years related experience. This position will assist in preparing monthly forecasts, the yearly budget and strategic planning.  Responsibilities for the Senior Financial Analyst job: • Collection and review/analysis of data and the preparation of various financial reports• Assist in the preparation of monthly forecasts, yearly budget and strategic plan.• Provide internal financial information (rather than just “data”) vital to the decision making process.• Utilize financial systems and processes utilizing Hyperion, BI, and SAP.• Special projects as needed. Qualifications: • Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or Finance.• Minimum of five years of related experience.   • Hyperion Financial Management and Business Intelligence skills.• SAP experience is a plus.• Product mix, mix/volume, and channel mix experience.• Heavy experience with analyzing financials and identifying trends and variances.• Trends, forecasting and modeling experience.• Manufacturing experience is a plus.• Expert level Excel skills are required.• Access skills is a plus.• Strong organizational and negotiation skills.  If you are interested in this Senior Financial Analyst job or other Accounting and Finance career opportunities from Parker + Lynch please email Rami Muhanna at rami.muhanna@parkerlynch.com or visit our website at www.parkerlynch.com    ",Senior Financial Analyst job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Financial-Analyst-job-in-Dallas-TX-Job-Dallas-TX-US-165320627.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=4,"80,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a83915b52cfa4555f097111db1f84dd7
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:10:53:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"My client is a Multifamily General Contractor based in Shreveport, Louisiana, looking for Superintendents to add to their team right away. They are a family-owned company that is expanding rapidly, and they are seeking experienced professionals in Multifamily to add immediate value to their projects in Baton Rouge and Colorado. If you are well-versed in Apartment and/or Student Housing construction, you are highly encouraged to apply!Client DetailsMy client is a Multifamily General Contractor based in Shreveport, Louisiana, looking for Superintendents to add to their team right away. They are a family-owned company that is expanding rapidly, and they are seeking experienced professionals in Multifamily to add immediate value to their projects in Baton Rouge and Colorado. If you are well-versed in Apartment and/or Student Housing construction, you are highly encouraged to apply!DescriptionKey responsibilities for the Multifamily Superintendent will include:Establish and develop professional relationships with on-site staff, providing leadership to themDevelop a thorough understanding of each subcontract, drawings and specificationsIdentify construction issues, design deficiencies, code violations and any other issuesDevelop, refine, and update project schedules to ensure all milestones are identified and trackedCommunicate schedule updates to all subcontractors and vendorsEnsure that subcontractors regularly communicate and enforce their safety programs in order to meet OSHA safety standardsReview the subcontractor's daily progress of work completed and deliver daily reports to the project teamConsistently lead projects through comprehensive completion by establishing aggressive dates and schedulesMentor, train and develop junior employees that are running smaller jobsProfileGround up experience with multifamily is requiredAbility to engage professionally with clients, subcontractors and skilled tradesStrong knowledge of construction terms, reading plans and planning and schedulingJob OfferFantastic compensation packageOpportunity to fast track your career and build a team beneath you",Construction Superintendent - Multifamily Job in Denver,"Full Time , Employee","Denver, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-superintendent-multifamily-job-denver-co-us-174901971.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,"90,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",,d89cc725a6ce5184661cf359db22d74a
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:10:58:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are an Estimator with experience, please read on!We are a general engineering construction company specializing in pipeline and infrastructure installation since 1983. Our projects range from $500k - $400MM and we specialize in culinary waterlines, sewer lines, pressurized irrigation pipelines, storm drainage, waste water treatment facilities, roadway reconstruction and new roadway construction. This position will report to the Estimator Manager who is responsible for all bids in UT.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Estimating- Pipeline construction estimating- B2W Estimate- HeavyBid- Vista ViewpointWhat's In It for You- Family owned and operated- Great Base Salary - Strong Benefits - 401k match - PTOSo, if you are a Estimator with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Estimator - Pipe/Civil/Construction BW | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Ren Yonker,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/estimator-pipe-civil-construction-b2w-job-springville-ut-us-174831623.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=20,,,4ab220dab373ea8b36493c964b65e2f8
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:11:32:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of the Nation's Leading General Contractors is seeking a proven Commercial Construction Superintendent to join their organization. They are the pillar of stability and positioning themselves to dominate the industry further. This is not for a contract hire, but a long term career. Superintendent Qualifications:5+ years as a true lead supervisor  Must have a proven work history with a general contractor Previous experience building high rise or multi-family buildings Demonstrated experience leading commercial building projects upwards of $25M   Proficiency with safety procedures  Extensive people skills   Compensation:Competitive base salary Excellent benefits package   Please contact Olympia Scott directly at (605) 978-5475  or Olympia.Scott@gogpac.com  for more information on this or any other position.  GPAC (Growing People and Companies) is an award winning search firm specializing in placing quality professionals within multiple industries across the United States over the past 26 years. We are extremely competitive, client-focused and realize that our value is in our ability to deliver the right solutions at the right time.",Commercial Construction Superintendent Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC 28226",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-construction-superintendent-job-charlotte-nc-us-175121794.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,e1eb67da55691efe6b482d67abc43211
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:11:45:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of the Region's Leading General Contractors is seeking a proven Commercial Construction Superintendent to join their organization. They are a fast growing company specializing in a diversity of projects. If you would like to join a company that is positioning itself to dominate the industry further, this is your opportunity. This is not for a contract hire, but a long term career. Superintendent Qualifications:5+ years as a true lead supervisor  Must have a proven work history with a general contractor Previous experience leading ground-up, commercial construction building projects  upwards of $25M in valueProficiency with safety procedures  Extensive people skills   Compensation:Competitive base salary Excellent benefits package   Please contact Olympia Scott directly at (605) 978-5475  or Olympia.Scott@gogpac.com  for more information on this or any other position.  GPAC (Growing People and Companies) is an award winning search firm specializing in placing quality professionals within multiple industries across the United States over the past 26 years. We are extremely competitive, client-focused and realize that our value is in our ability to deliver the right solutions at the right time.",Commercial Construction Superintendent Job in Philadelphia,Full Time Employee,"Philadelphia, PA 19140",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-construction-superintendent-job-philadelphia-pa-us-175122135.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=12,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,42a5932411892ad1a6212cbe7ca32361
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:11:45:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 787984 Job Views: 98 Location: PITTSBURG, Kansas, United States ZIP Code: 66762 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job in Pittsburg,Full Time Employee,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 787984 Job Views: 98 Location: PITTSBURG, Kansas, United States ZIP Code: 66762 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91l-construction-vehicle-repairer-job-pittsburg-ks-us-175402860.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,098a94bca8479a1c886783af98296fd2
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:12:06:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"System One is actively seeking a Scoping Construction Manager/Telecom for a contract position located in Denver, CO.Responsibilities: Reviews audits provided by audit contractors.Starts Rev. 0 construction driver, document deliverable creation in QB and long lead material identification. The timeline per site on completion is 10 days.Hands over the MPOR to the market procurement manager for processing the order (After the SAM, Engineering and or Construction initiative lead will work with AT&T RF to obtain the final RFDS actualization permission. This will be the point of ordering long lead items for the site).Finalizes drivers and contracted material, non-contracted material is created and work authorizations are developed. Work authorizations are obtain from GCs following a site walk.Contractor is also identified for the site at this milestone. Finalize document deliverables in quick base. The timeline to completion of feed sheet is 10 days.Presents the project team an analysis that identifies the change and the impact it will have on the schedule for the site.Works with the market material manager to make sure they order materials in a timely manner after the MS41 actualization.Makes sure the first initial VPOR is processed before the site starts construction.Initiates with the Norad Administrator for the market to input the first revision OOM into NORAD.Requirements:Bachelor’s degree in construction, engineering or heavy industrial experience preferred, or relevant experience.OSHA Training2 years of experience with a degree or 3 years at Superintendent level.All applicants must be able to complete pre-employment on-boarding requirements (if selected) which may include any/all of the following: criminal/civil background check, drug screen, and motor vehicle records search, in compliance with any applicable laws and regulations.Preferred Competencies: Previous ATT project experience • Knowledge of construction technology • Knowledge of EPC industry • Constructability knowledge • Knowledge of project budget process and tools • Knowledge of department budget process and tools • Knowledge of Project controls • Risk assessment/management • Administrative policies and procedures • Construction Project Management Systems • Conceptual planning ability • Conflict management skills • Leadership ability (team building, coaching, mentoring, change management, advising) • Multi-tasking ability (prioritize, organize, schedule work) • Presentation skills • Problem solving skills (identify, analyze, research, evaluate, resolve) • Project management skills • Communication and meeting skills • Time reporting systems • Expense reporting policies and procedures Contract duration: 6 monthsPay rate: $32.00 - 40.00 (DOE)Travel: Up to 50%",Scoping Construction Manager/Telecom Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/scoping-construction-manager-telecom-job-denver-co-us-174887468.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=3,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,5fd045949e5ec3f7b274f2010911b467
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:12:44:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Construction,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manufacturing-cleaning-services-start-your-own-business-with-the-master's-touch-job-orlando-fl-us-170732889.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,803c07c1a1080b0f5c724eec55f1f499
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:12:45:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783441 Job Views: 91 Location: IRON RIVER, Michigan, United States ZIP Code: 49935 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Iron River,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783441 Job Views: 91 Location: IRON RIVER, Michigan, United States ZIP Code: 49935 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-iron-river-mi-us-175418565.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,ad7b0b4dc0cd690a435d1d32a423617b
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:12:50:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job My client is a heavy industrial, general contractor and fabricator located in Bellingham, Washington. Started in 1890 and now in its 5th generation of continuous family management, they continue to expand their capabilities. The company performs a wide variety of EPC, Design-Build, Construction Management as well as field and shop fabrication construction services to clients in power, pulp and paper, renewable energy, manufacturing & processing, ASME assemblies and structural steel fabrication. They are well known for our ability to perform on very short notice, to perform effectively in very remote and difficult environments and to efficiently manage projects that require a high level of logistical expertise.Their project sizes range from several thousand dollars to over 100 million dollars.The firm has the ability to self-perform the following construction activities:- Excavation- Forming & Concrete- Imbeds & Rebar- Structural Steel Fabrication- Structural Steel Erection- Mechanical Equipment Installation including boilers, vessels, drums, heat exchangers, fin fans, pumps and compressors.- Pipe Fabrication- Pipe Installation including B31.1 and B31.3- Mechanical InstrumentationTop Reasons to Work with Us1. Flat org structure2. Competitive salary and great benefits3. A chance to work with the brightest minds in the industryWhat You Will Be DoingSenior Estimator will be responsible for managing Estimates and Proposals for the Construction Services Division on a day to day basis, responsible for the timeliness, quality and output of the estimates and proposals. These estimates/proposals are typically for all types of industrial facilities including power, refining, renewable energy projects, pipelines, and terminals. Estimates will cover various types of contracts and include all disciplines and subcontractors for Plan Spec and/or EPC Conceptual Proposals. The Senior Estimator will also work with the Chief Estimator to develop documented processes and procedures as well as evaluating and implementing or re-implementing the company estimating software.- Oversee proposal effort with estimating group and attend bid meetings and walk downs at various client locations to determine scope of work, complexities, accessibilities, and required content of estimates.- Review instructions and proposal specifications, drawings, technical data, and welding processes necessary to estimate the work.- Review and incorporate historical data from purchase orders, subcontracts, other bids, job reports, into unit and man-hour figures for estimates.- Prepare full-scope estimates on small, medium, and large-scale projects, in a timely and accurate manner.- Ensure all documentation is maintained to support estimate figures.- Work with Project Managers, Engineering, and management, as needed, in the preparation and final evaluation of bids.- Ensure the best possible material and subcontracting costs.- Perform additional responsibilities as directed.What You Need for this Position- 10+ years heavy industrial/process facility experience in cost estimating and cost control in the civil, structural, mechanical, and piping fields.- Degree in Engineering, Construction Estimating, or related area preferred.- Strong knowledge of estimating techniques, engineering disciplines, and cost control techniques.- Ability to lead estimate efforts in all types and sizes of industrial-related projects.- Ability to supervise estimating personnel in the preparation of complex proposals with minimal supervision.- Knowledge of petrochemical, material handling and power/steam generation industries.- Strong communication skills, both written and oral, and good organizational skills.- Strong computer skills, including MS Word, Excel, Outlook, Primavera P6 Scheduling, and estimating software and database programs.- Ability to work on multiple projects at one tim- A working knowledge of Heavy Bid HCSS estimating software and MC2 is preferred but not required.- Strong understanding of industrial construction practices and ability to accurately price self-perform labor- Ability to write a complete execution plan and a proposal schedule- Good interpersonal communication skills.What's In It for You- Competitive base salary - Medical/Dental/Vision - Tons of room for career growth- Unparalleled cultureSo, if you are a Senior Mechanical Estimator with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Senior Mechanical Estimator - Estimating,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Justin Kim,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-mechanical-estimator-estimating-bidding-construction-job-bellingham-wa-us-175351497.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=16,,,98eae31707a8e80d2ebd4da45499e24d
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:13:43:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782966 Job Views: 86 Location: AUGUSTA, Georgia, United States ZIP Code: 30904 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Augusta,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782966 Job Views: 86 Location: AUGUSTA, Georgia, United States ZIP Code: 30904 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-augusta-ga-us-175420214.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,ee04bfcb0a1ea726d5fa8c577293cea8
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:13:44:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783203 Job Views: 94 Location: LANCASTER, South Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 29720 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Lancaster,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783203 Job Views: 94 Location: LANCASTER, South Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 29720 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-lancaster-sc-us-175419418.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,41fb3979f7aedac6556f201afe650d4a
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:14:09:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Job Responsibilities:The Engineer II responsibilities include design and preparation of Engineering Work Orders for all growth whether Land developments, new buildings, single line requests, Government & Safety, Preservation, Rehab, DSL, FTTN, FTTH, FTTT, Road Relocation, augmentation projects and circuit/special circuit requests. Utilizing the following tools; Bidmaster/Fireworks, JDS, FORTE, NDTT, RTT, JDS, NDTT, ACAD.   Prepare detailed field notes for OSP projects to construct. Apply for all governing authority permits.  Maintain positive interaction with Internal and External customers; maintain open conversation with Planning and all company departments providing high quality of service to the CenturyLink customers. THIS POSITION WILL SUPPORT DES MOINES, IA AND SURROUNDING AREAS.Basic Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree in Engineering or equivalent communications OSP engineering experience. 4-5 years of relevant, work experience required. Computer skills, including Email-Microsoft Outlook, Word, Excel, ACAD and Qwest legacy systems.Work with Planning, BNG (Operations) and all internal and external customers, maintain budget, and assist with forecasting budgets.Maintain positive interaction between all governing authoritiesExcellent oral and written communication skillsAdditional hours may be required.Valid driver's license, with a satisfactory driving record.Preferred Qualifications:Previous experience in a multi-tasking, result oriented position in a deadline focused department.Five years applicable engineering experience related to RUS - legacy CenturyLink and legacy Quest background OSP/ISP a plus. Previous experience in outside plant, aerial, buried, underground and utility construction.Must perform work with minimal supervision for a designated area, including potential for any special projects as determined by management with-in the companyBe able to take a project from planning, design through construction to closeoutMust be able to prioritize multiple projects and perform under pressure.Must negotiate timeframes for completion and meet critical deadlines.Alternate Location: US-Illinois-Chicago; US-Illinois-Springfield; US-Iowa-Cedar Rapids; US-Iowa-Des Moines; US-Kansas-Overland Park; US-Kansas-Topeka; US-Minnesota-Minneapolis; US-Missouri-Columbia; US-Missouri-Kansas City; US-Missouri-St Louis; US-Nebraska-Omaha; US-South Dakota-Sioux Falls; US-Wisconsin-Madison; US-Wisconsin-MilwaukeeRequisition #: 69507 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Engineer II - Telecom Engineering & Construction Job in Des Moines,Full Time Employee,"Des Moines, IA 50309",,http://jobview.monster.com/engineer-ii-telecom-engineering-construction-job-des-moines-ia-us-174727553.aspx?mescoid=1500133001001&jobPosition=6,,,b841a98fca7b8258e2704950d44e7257
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:14:09:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Construction,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manufacturing-cleaning-services-start-your-own-business-with-the-master's-touch-job-lansing-mi-us-170732917.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,32ddb04945a0b709ab2dae91be574f67
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:14:43:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Do you have at least five years as an Estimator? Have you worked in the Environmental Remediation (dirt work) Industry? If this sounds like you AND you are looking for a better career, this could be the move for you!!Top Reasons to Work with UsAmazing benefits!!Tremendous Growth!!Holiday Parties!!What You Will Be Doing-Solicit and maintains communication with subcontractors and vendors.-Prepare subcontractor bid packages-Transmit addenda and other bid information to subcontractors.-Ensure that we have the proper coverage from subcontractors on bid day.-Submit 100% of bids and budgets by the bid deadline - no exceptions.-Review bid requirements thoroughly.-Has a thorough understanding of the scope for specific trades assigned.-Creates bid lists that fit scope of job, ensuring that we have the right subs for the project.-Develop RFI’s and clarifications and ensures adequate sub coverage.-Contribute to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.-Properly turns over bid documents and sub buyout information to PM.-Review drawings with PM team and highlight areas of concern.What You Need for this Position- At least 5 years experience in Estimating -Dirt Work / Environmental Remediation expSo, if you are a Environmental Remediation Estimator with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Environmental Remediation Estimator - Bidding,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jaclyn DAmore,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-remediation-estimator-bidding-construction-di-job-houston-tx-us-174725726.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=7,,,3845d6f146eb0cd7fce44a8b4b7afb38
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:14:44:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782971 Job Views: 95 Location: LAS VEGAS, Nevada, United States ZIP Code: 89165 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Las Vegas,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782971 Job Views: 95 Location: LAS VEGAS, Nevada, United States ZIP Code: 89165 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-las-vegas-nv-us-175420206.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,46cd793af50c860089fddabd95ceef35
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:15:44:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"My client is a Multifamily General Contractor based in Shreveport, Louisiana, looking for Superintendents to add to their team right away. They are family-owned company that is expanding rapidly, and they are seeking experienced professionals in Multifamily to add immediate value to their projects in Baton Rouge and Colorado. If you are well-versed in Apartment and/or Student Housing construction, you are highly encouraged to apply!Client DetailsMy client is a Multifamily General Contractor based in Shreveport, Louisiana, looking for Superintendents to add to their team right away. They are family-owned company that is expanding rapidly, and they are seeking experienced professionals in Multifamily to add immediate value to their projects in Baton Rouge and Colorado. If you are well-versed in Apartment and/or Student Housing construction, you are highly encouraged to apply!DescriptionKey responsibilities for the Multifamily Superintendent will include:Establish and develop professional relationships with on-site staff, providing leadership to themDevelop a thorough understanding of each subcontract, drawings and specificationsIdentify construction issues, design deficiencies, code violations and any other issuesDevelop, refine, and update project schedules to ensure all milestones are identified and trackedCommunicate schedule updates to all subcontractors and vendorsEnsure that subcontractors regularly communicate and enforce their safety programs in order to meet OSHA safety standardsReview the subcontractor's daily progress of work completed and deliver daily reports to the project teamConsistently lead projects through comprehensive completion by establishing aggressive dates and schedulesMentor, train and develop junior employees that are running smaller jobsProfileGround up experience with Multifamily is requiredAbility to engage professionally with clients, subcontractors and skilled tradesStrong knowledge of construction terms, reading plans and planning and schedulingJob OfferFantastic compensation packageOpportunity to fast track your career and build a team beneath you",Construction Superintendent - Multifamily Job in Baton Rouge,"Full Time , Employee","Baton Rouge, LA",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-superintendent-multifamily-job-baton-rouge-la-us-174865562.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=19,"90,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",,e43d54572887e29e3b46dfbac576a13a
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:15:44:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782638 Job Views: 68 Location: HAMLET, North Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 28345 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Hamlet,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782638 Job Views: 68 Location: HAMLET, North Carolina, United States ZIP Code: 28345 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-hamlet-nc-us-175421307.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,9b8ef9a9d9636d02b63264e918b438c8
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:16:10:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782634 Job Views: 65 Location: MILES CITY, Montana, United States ZIP Code: 59301 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Miles City,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782634 Job Views: 65 Location: MILES CITY, Montana, United States ZIP Code: 59301 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-miles-city-mt-us-175421390.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,1c5d652b9737b2e485c185b72a28ff70
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:16:42:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783054 Job Views: 90 Location: BOISE, Idaho, United States ZIP Code: 83705 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Boise,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783054 Job Views: 90 Location: BOISE, Idaho, United States ZIP Code: 83705 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-boise-id-us-175419924.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=13,,Entry Level,2c06f8b499b6851105b3217804f887b0
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:16:42:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 787817 Job Views: 96 Location: EDGELEY, North Dakota, United States ZIP Code: 58433 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job in Edgeley,Full Time Employee,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 787817 Job Views: 96 Location: EDGELEY, North Dakota, United States ZIP Code: 58433 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91l-construction-vehicle-repairer-job-edgeley-nd-us-175403487.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,e2b05622279bf8a5a46391479060cba8
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:16:44:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783049 Job Views: 87 Location: TOCCOA, Georgia, United States ZIP Code: 30577 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Toccoa,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783049 Job Views: 87 Location: TOCCOA, Georgia, United States ZIP Code: 30577 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-toccoa-ga-us-175419953.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,7376c682b1f0ee5feaeb97fcd0747c97
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:17:11:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Sr Construction Estimator needed for well established fast growing construction / engineering company!! We are seeking an experienced Construction Senior Project Estimator with current knowledge of the Sacramento market in Heavy Civil construction. We are bidding civil projects in the Sacramento to Fresno, California area and seeking a full time estimator with experience in demolition, grading, paving, underground utilities, levee repair, flood control, and river or wetlands restoration.Top Reasons to Work with UsGreat pay, excellent benefits and career growth!!What You Will Be Doing• Analyze plans and specifications to prepare time, cost, materials and labor estimates• Has a thorough understanding of the scope for specific assigned trades• Solicits and maintains communication with subcontractors and vendors• Contacts multiple subcontractors and vendors to obtain pricing for each bid item• Consult with clients, engineers, vendors and in house staff for information during the bid process• Write, submit, and track Request For Information and clarifications• Reviews all bid items in house and performs a comprehensive Bid Day analysis of specific assigned trades• Enters all bid information into Company estimating software• Prepare and maintain a directory of suppliers contractors, and subcontractors• Prepares subcontractors bid packages• Assess cost effectiveness of products, projects or services, tracking actual costs, relative to bids as the project develops.• May work on one or more projects simultaneously• May be required to manage field projects they winWhat You Need for this PositionEducation & Experience Requirements:• Must have a current working knowledge of HCSS Heavy Bid estimating software• Must have 5 years field experience and 5 years Heavy Civil estimating experience• Must be able to work alone with minimal supervision• PC literate in Microsoft Office applications with a proficiency in Excel and Word• Candidate must be able to pass a drug test as part of the selection process.• Candidate must consent to a background check.• Candidate must have unrestricted authorization to work in the United States.• Must have a clean driving record for the past 3 yearsA Plus:• Field Project Management experience• Knowledge of Master Builder, Timberline, or Sage accounting software• Estimating experience in urban/high vehicular and pedestrian environments• Recent experience on CAL - Trans or Federal projects• P-6 Scheduling Software experience• Been lead estimator on $10 million + projectsWhat's In It for YouGreat pay, excellent benefits and career growth!!So, if you are a Construction Estimator, please apply today!! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Sr Construction Estimator - HCSS Required | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Craig Montgomery,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-construction-estimator-hcss-required-job-fairfield-ca-us-173864068.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=19,,,85de2bba998f103f256d29bf133f6a7b
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:17:43:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Indianapolis, IN | construction Superintendent |Full-TimePOSITION SUMMARY: Responsible and accountable for supervising the site (including maintaining all safety protocols) and building construction process for the entire project. We are looking for someone who has worked with primarily in tax credit/low income housing.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: •Supervise trade contractors involved in the project and monitor the quality of their work daily.•Supervise the job site to meet or exceed all OSHA requirements for personnel and property safety.•Assist the Project Manager in preparing and updating the project’s master schedule.•Inform all trade contractors and home office on the status of the master schedule and provide a two-week look ahead of future work.•Hold weekly safety & project meetings individually with all documentation of paperwork.•Work with the local utility companies to establish procedures for final taps and approvals.•Supervise any laborers and work with the Assistant Superintendent to accomplish daily task.•Investigate and recommend new products or trade contractors to Project Manager for future consideration.•Responsible for obtaining the Certificate of Occupancy in a timely manner.•Responsible for the creation of the as-built drawings.•Other duties as assigned.Requirements QUALIFICATIONS/SKILLS & KNOWLEDGE REQUIREMENTS •High school diploma or general education degree (GED)•15 years experience in multifamily construction in supervisory role•Language Skills – Ability to read, write, interpret and analyze business publications, technical procedures and government regulations. Ability to write and interpret reports, correspondence and manuals. Ability to effectively present to groups of people including employees, vendors and the general public.•Math Skills – Ability to calculate proportions, percentages, and to apply concepts of algebra and geometry.•Reasoning Skills – Ability to solve problems and work with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only general guidelines exist. Ability to interpret instructions in written, oral, diagram or schedule form.•Computer Skills – Intermediate experience with MS Office and MS Project.•Other Skills – Understanding of civil, architectural, and structural design; general knowledge of MEP design, basic estimating skills, knowledge of local and state building codes.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Multi-Family Construction- Single Family Homes- residential constructionSo, if you are a Superintendent with experience, please apply today or submit resumes to jon.lopez@cybercoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Superintendent - Multi-Family Construction,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jon Lopez,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/superintendent-multi-family-construction-single-family-homes-job-indianapolis-in-us-173957370.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=14,,,78b0ecfbe92bb6c24eee490d601eca02
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:17:44:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />Description The Opportunity:Join Clean Harbors growing sales team as a Account Executive- Modular Construction. Our Technical Sales Experts will grow, expand and maintain revenues and numbers for our Modular Construction customers within an assigned territory. Key Responsibilities:Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all time.Prospects for new customers and can effectively close new business.Ensure that a specific business development strategy which includes a plan to clearly define each customer's non-price value proposition is developed and employed.Interfaces with existing customers in a professional and effective manager to update them on the project status and/or to resolve problems/issues.Represents Clean Harbors in regional and national networking organizations that best benefits growth within assigned product lines.Works closely with operational branch teams to ensure that customer needs are being met in regards to all projects for the two job types.Establishes an in-depth knowledge of competitive pricing, market rates, and market dynamics to assure an acceptable win rate at acceptable margins.Maintain company/contact information and document all sales calls, customer visits and business opportunities.Work closely with corporate sales and marketing organization to ensure all fact sheets and white papers are up to date and posted in the sales library. Maintain focus on all opportunities to cross-sell other companies services. Communicate any evidence of customers or prospect need for services. Qualifications:High school diploma or equivalent required. Bachelor’s degree preferred.3+ years of business-to-business sales experience. Construction experience, with an emphasis on modular or factory built structures preferred.Knowledge in commercial, institutional and residential modular construction.Strong negotiation skills; ability to drive decision-making.Strong collaborations skills; ability to facilitate service team approach to ensure customer satisfaction and follow- through.Time and territory management skills to ensure focus on value-added sales activities.Computer skills (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market.  For many positions, we have implemented a Competency Based Progression and Pay Program, which directly rewards employees for developing increased proficiency in their key job functions through training and experience. At Clean Harbors you are offered unique opportunities for all stages of your career. Clean Harbors offers all eligible employees a comprehensive benefits package including:•      Competitive annual salary (CBPP Competency Based Pay Program)•      Opportunities for growth, development and internal promotion•      Health, Dental and Life Insurance•      401K, tuition reimbursement, and generous paid time off•      Company paid certifications, licenses and training To learn more about our company visit us at www.cleanharbors.comWe thank all those interested in joining the Clean Harbors team; however only those that complete the online application and meet the minimum job qualifications will be considered for this role. construction, modular, manufacturing, environmental services,Clean Harbors is a Military & Veteran friendly company. *CHP #LI-LK1 Potential Applicants: We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Account Executive- Modular Construction Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/account-executive-modular-construction-job-denver-co-us-174323260.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,99b71552ae5ab83bb29fea2a3eb300db
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:17:45:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 788008 Job Views: 102 Location: ANDERSON, Missouri, United States ZIP Code: 64831 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job in Anderson,Full Time Employee,"91L Construction Vehicle Repairer Job ID: 788008 Job Views: 102 Location: ANDERSON, Missouri, United States ZIP Code: 64831 Job Category: Mechanic and Maintenance Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionTrucks. Bulldozers. Power shovels. These are the types of machinery that you will work on as a Construction Vehicle Repairer in the Army National Guard. In doing so, you will join the Army National Guard on the road to success.As a Construction Vehicle Repairer you will maintain and replace brake actuators, batteries, starter motors, alternators, mechanical fuel pumps, and hydraulic cylinders; adjust engine speed governor/valves, carburetors, dry-disc clutches, steering brakes, and fuel injector racks; charge suspension accumulators, transmission shift accumulators and main hydraulic accumulators; troubleshoot problems in vehicle engines, electrical systems, steering, brakes, and suspensions; tune up and repair engines; replace or repair damaged body parts, hydraulic arms, shovels, and grader blades; and establish and follow maintenance schedules.Your Army National Guard training will prepare you for all maintenance, troubleshooting, repairing, tuning, and other duties necessary to keep the Guard's construction vehicles running at peak performance. It will also set you up for a rewarding civilian career with auto and construction equipment dealers and farm equipment companies.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Construction Equipment Repairer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight to 29 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/91l-construction-vehicle-repairer-job-anderson-mo-us-175402767.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=4,,Entry Level,092cb85b65eb1315ce11332c5d79fa48
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:18:38:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782877 Job Views: 99 Location: DOTHAN, Alabama, United States ZIP Code: 36302 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Dothan,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782877 Job Views: 99 Location: DOTHAN, Alabama, United States ZIP Code: 36302 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-dothan-al-us-175420554.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,63f84718964addefc24c0431ae7ece02
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:18:38:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"CONSTRUCTIONESTIMATORSeeking experienced individual to estimate construction related work. Must possess knowledge of the building process, computer skills and able to learn industry estimating software. Also possess good people & sales skills.Must pass drug testing and have valid driver's license.APPLY AT:42-38th StreetWheeling, WV 26003OR ONLINE ATwww.panhandlecr.comPHONE: 304-232-2321provided by The Intelligencer and Wheeling News-Register",Construction Estimator Job in Wheeling,Full Time,"Wheeling, WV 26003",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-estimator-job-wheeling-wv-us-174877524.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d59e5b67969b3ec9d453e03dc7fa8eff
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:18:42:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job For years 40+ years, we have provided deep expertise and tangible results to a wide range of commercial GC and Construction Management projects. These have totaled more than 60 million square and range up to $60 million in total budget. We are close to 200M+ in revenue for the past 3 years. In addition, we also provide demo, drywall, carpentry, and many other services to maintain a level of quality that we trust our reputation on.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Highly successful, growing firm- Work hard/play hard (Year long company sponsored events)- Winner of multiple awards for multiple services (37 since 2000 to be exact)- Parterships with 25+ local charities and communitiesWhat You Will Be Doing- Develop schedules- Sequence work- Supervise subcontractors- Establish and maintain work site safetyWhat You Need for this PositionQualified candidates will have 4+ years of experience with:- Construction Management- High end Commercial interiors- New Construction- Heavy RenovationMission Critical highly preferredWhat's In It for You- Competitive compensation and salary- Full benefits: medical, dental, vision- 401 (K) with company match- Life insurance coverage- Paid time off (PTO)- Vacation, paid, and sick daysIf this sounds like you:1. Apply here!!or 2. Send an updated Word Doc copy of your resume to nick.colonna@cybercoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Superintendent - Mission Critical | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Nick Colonna,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-superintendent-mission-critical-job-chicago-il-us-174867744.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,,,6835db2590b57e58fdd136e552ca0765
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:18:43:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client that designs & constructs gas processing plants & refineries is looking for an I&E (instrumentation & electrical) Construction Superintendent/Inspector for a short term (2-3 month) contract assignment in Baytown, TX. You need 15+ years of related experience supporting large, heavy industrial plant (process, power, etc...) EPC projects. Mob, demob, & per diem provided.Responsibilities for the SupervisorProvide on-site administrative & technical management of all I&E construction activities on a refinery construction projectWork with I&E Subcontractors daily to ensure that the project is constructed & documented in accordance with the project specifications, policies, detailed drawings & industry standardsReview & verify that company Site Instrumentation and Electrical sub-contractors are in compliance with the 'Approved' Quality programAssure that sub-contractor is adhering to scope of work and direction from company Electrical CoordinatorEnsure equipment and in-process installations comply with National Electric Code, company & client specifications, drawings and tolerances while maintaining a high level of quality, fitment and finishAssure that scheduled megger and similar testing with all documentation is performed in accordance with company & Client standards and specificationsRequirements for the Supervisor15+ years of I&E construction experience on heavy industrial plant EPC projectsPrevious experience supervising instrumentation and electrical craft employees and/or other I&E contractorsSolid understanding of I&E equipment & systems used to build refineries, gas plants and similar heavy industrial facilitiesAny specific I&E construction experience supporting gas processing (natural gas, ethane recovery, sulfur, hydrocarbon, nitrogen rejection, gas treating, etc...) or refinery EPC projects is a PLUSWorking knowledge and understanding of NEC CodeTraining in the reading of schematics, P & I. D.’s and blue-print drawingsUnderstanding of Industrial Electrical Safety proceduresBenefitsPTO ProgramHealth Insurance plans, and moreThis Job is located in Rock Springs, WY -> United States",Supervisor - I&E/Construction/QC Job in Rock Springs,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Rock Springs, WY 82902",,http://jobview.monster.com/supervisor-i-e-construction-qc-job-baytown-tx-us-175321019.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=18,45.00 - 55.00 $ /hour,,87d57654199545ebefe86ce4108ddb1f
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:18:52:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783372 Job Views: 88 Location: HOULTON, Maine, United States ZIP Code: 04730 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Houlton,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783372 Job Views: 88 Location: HOULTON, Maine, United States ZIP Code: 04730 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-houlton-me-us-175418844.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,a4eb4664191dbfcdaa8bce1e43e96317
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:19:41:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783370 Job Views: 94 Location: BELFAST, Maine, United States ZIP Code: 04915 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Belfast,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783370 Job Views: 94 Location: BELFAST, Maine, United States ZIP Code: 04915 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-belfast-me-us-175418820.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,fc67a397ac90e0684ad27948d38bf992
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:19:42:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Construction,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manufacturing-cleaning-services-start-your-own-business-with-the-master's-touch-job-yuma-az-us-170732905.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,289805aebc1b7eb74c0adbceb23c26d7
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:20:09:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, one of the largest full service heavy equipment dealerships in the nation, has an opening for a Field Mechanic. The Field Mechanics responsibilities include repairing, diagnosing, inspecting and maintaining various types of aerial and earth moving equipment, primarily servicing rentals and some customer owned equipment. Job Requirements: A minimum 3-5 years of experience as a mechanic repairing and maintaining heavy construction equipmentValid driver’s license and satisfactory driving recordAble to read schematics (both electrical and hydraulic)Capable of accomplishing task independently without direct supervision Perform thorough and accurate annual inspectionsKnowledgeable in troubleshooting various heavy equipment product linesAble to lift up to 40 lbs.History of safe work habitsGood customer service and communication skillsMaintains a great attitude toward workA high school diploma or equivalent is required Preferred Qualifications: Factory, vocational or mechanical training is a plusHistory of working with different forms of heavy equipment, specifically excavators, forklifts, compactors and other types of aerial and earth moving. Searching for a solid, growth-oriented company that values its employees? Join our client! They offer competitive salaries, excellent benefits package, 401K with company matching and ongoing training and development opportunities. EOE/AA Disabled/Veterans",Field Mechanic / Diesel Technician / Construction Equipment / Heavy Equipment Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-mechanic-diesel-technician-construction-equipment-heavy-equipment-job-san-jose-ca-us-173859921.aspx?mescoid=4900873001001&jobPosition=20,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,460d3096c525c100d8b07f705f031a1b
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:20:43:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782629 Job Views: 65 Location: GREENVILLE, Mississippi, United States ZIP Code: 38701 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Greenville,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782629 Job Views: 65 Location: GREENVILLE, Mississippi, United States ZIP Code: 38701 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-greenville-ms-us-175421379.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,8d03671c19c803116f838677e4aed7c3
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:20:44:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782968 Job Views: 86 Location: GLENNVILLE, Georgia, United States ZIP Code: 30427 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Glennville,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 782968 Job Views: 86 Location: GLENNVILLE, Georgia, United States ZIP Code: 30427 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-glennville-ga-us-175420239.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,c2b3105915ce8de9bb0de2e222303ad3
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:21:42:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"The client is an well-established general contractor in the Pacific Northwest with a large pipeline of commercial construction projects. They are looking for an experienced Commercial Construction Superintendent.Client DetailsThe client is an well-established general contractor in the Pacific Northwest with a large pipeline of commercial construction projects. They are looking for an experienced Commercial Construction Superintendent.DescriptionThe Commercial Construction Superintendent will be responsible for managing all aspects of projects including client relationships, schedules, budgets, and profitability through comprehensive project completion. The Commercial Construction Superintendent will also be responsible for collaborating with the Project Manager to develop, refine, and update project schedules to ensure all milestones are identified and tracked.Select Responsibilities:Meet weekly and communicate daily with subcontractors to assess project progress, schedule, changes and deliveries.Proactively identify design deficiencies, schedule concerns, and other project specific issues.Attain a thorough and complete understanding of the Prime Contract, all subcontracts, the drawings, and specifications.Enforce safety protocols to ensure job site consistently meets or exceeds OSHA safety standards.Maintain appropriate documentation throughout the project including change order logs, RFI logs, and submittal lots.Communicate daily with owners, tenant reps, construction managers, superintendents and project coordinators to ensure progress toward the common goal is achieved.The Superintendent will have a Project Coordinator supporting with the project.ProfileThe successful Commercial Construction Superintendent will have the following:Minimum of 5 years experience in the construction industry, preferably with a commercial general contractor.Experience as Superintendent on ground-up commercial projects including high rise, healthcare, hospitality or office/retail buildings.Proficiency with computer software used in the construction industry.Strong oral and written communication skills.Job OfferOffering an opportunity for a driven Commercial Construction Superintendent in addition to a $80,000 to $120,000 base salary (experience based), competitive vehicle allowance, 401K plan and insurance plan.",Commercial Construction Superintendent Job in Seattle,"Full Time , Employee","Seattle, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-construction-superintendent-job-seattle-wa-us-175123771.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=9,,,7d2f037d6d004afe8f89e7cffb8f8c46
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:21:43:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of the Region's Leading Commercial Builders is ready to add an experienced Construction Project Manager to the team. Due to progressive growth, this opportunity is available for a highly motivated candidate who is able to hit the ground running. We are looking for a Project Manager who is ready to grow both personally as well as professionally.   Essential Duties:Oversee contract activities on a job site such as, communication with the owner, architect and subs, submittals, procurement, budgeting and scheduleSelect the best delivery method for each projectDevelop measurements to determine the strategic plan is met during all phases of construction Qualifications: 3+ years experience working for a general contractor as a Project Manager on commercial building projects upwards of $25MBachelor's Degree in Engineering, Construction Management or a related discipline preferredHave an ownership attitude; be willing and able to grow, coach, and mentorStrive for excellence in every project; do whatever it takes to achieve optimum resultsAble to resolve conflict to be mutually beneficial to all parties involvedPossess oral and written communication skills  Compensation:Competitive base salaryExcellent benefits package Please contact Olympia Scott directly at 605-978-5475  or email Olympia.Scott@gogpac.com  for more information on this position.   GPAC (Growing People and Companies) is an award winning search firm specializing in placing quality professionals within multiple industries across the United States over the past 26 years. We are extremely competitive, client-focused and realize that our value is in our ability to deliver the right solutions at the right time.",Project Manager - Commercial Construction Job in Philadelphia,Full Time Employee,"Philadelphia, PA 19140",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-commercial-construction-job-philadelphia-pa-us-175122892.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=10,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,405b703e57d9609a569bbd05625ede05
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:22:39:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. You can get started with as little as $2,000 dollars down. CLICK APPLY BELOW to learn more.We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Construction,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manufacturing-cleaning-services-start-your-own-business-with-the-master's-touch-job-albuquerque-nm-us-170732876.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,8f147ad8b3039c29f0d34beb20ab0cd7
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:22:40:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Are you an Estimator with 10+ years in the Commercial and/or Industrial Construction Industry?Do you have experience with either Primavera or Timberline Cost Estimating software?If yes to both, READ ON!We are an Engineering and Construction Management company based in Cincinnati OH, with other locations across the US.We are looking for a Senior Estimator for our Jacksonville, FL office who has 10+ years of experience as a Commercial/Industrial Construction Estimator!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Competitive Base Pay: $85-120k- Well Known Name in the Industry- Incredibly Stable, been in business for 30+ years- Incentives given to obtain your PE License- Overtime Eligible** Relocation assistance provided! **What You Will Be Doing- Prepare various estimates from conceptual cost estimates developed from schematic or feasibility level documentation- Prepare a detailed cost estimate comparison on updates to the design as it evolves, including preparing variance summaries between funding gate estimates- Prepare for, and often lead the presentation of the cost estimate to the Client- Be involved in the RFP processWhat You Need for this Position- 10+ years of experience- Timberline OR Primavera software- Bachelor's Degree in Construction Management, Engineering, or a Business degree with comparable experienceIcing on the cake!- OSHA 10 or 30- ASPE or AACE certifications- Construction Management experienceWhat's In It for You- Relocation assistance- Medical, Dental, Vision- PTO and Holidays- 401k with Company MatchSo, if you are an Estimator with 10+ years in the Commercial and/or Industrial Construction Industry, please apply today!Interviews are underway! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Senior Estimator - Construction - Relocation Provided! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Casey McCulloh,Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-estimator-construction-relocation-provided!-job-jacksonville-fl-us-175350817.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=5,,,30b02286dd5ddef11614e1dbdbd93b44
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:23:16:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"System One is currently seeking a Sr Construction Manager on a direct hire position located in Chicago, IL.  Responsibilities:Responsible for implementing and ensuring adherence with the strategies and execution of business plans for all capital construction projects.Establish and maintain effective relationships across the Gas Operations leadership team, between Gas Operations personnel and other support organizations to facilitate an environment of cooperation, transparency and mutual interest.Implement procedures and appropriate operational key performance indicators to monitor the status and effectiveness of overall capital construction with a focus on safety, compliance and customer satisfaction.  Requirements:5+ years leadership experience10+ years experience in utility or operations in gas, electric or customer relationsMust maintain and possess a valid driver's license.10-15 years experience in a safety role Preferred Requirements:Bachelor's degree in Business, Engineering or related fieldsMBA with emphasis on Construction ManagementExtensive (20+ years) of Subcontract management experienceExtensive (20+ years) of union labor experienceHistory of success in a leadership position(s)   Direct HireLocation: Chicago, ILSalary: $160,000-175,000/yrRelocation paid     #LI-NP1 ",Sr Construction Manager Job in Chicago,"Full Time, Employee","System One is currently seeking a Sr Construction Manager on a direct hire position located in Chicago, IL.  Responsibilities:Responsible for implementing and ensuring adherence with the strategies and execution of business plans for all capital construction projects.Establish and maintain effective relationships across the Gas Operations leadership team, between Gas Operations personnel and other support organizations to facilitate an environment of cooperation, transparency and mutual interest.Implement procedures and appropriate operational key performance indicators to monitor the status and effectiveness of overall capital construction with a focus on safety, compliance and customer satisfaction.  Requirements:5+ years leadership experience10+ years experience in utility or operations in gas, electric or customer relationsMust maintain and possess a valid driver's license.10-15 years experience in a safety role Preferred Requirements:Bachelor's degree in Business, Engineering or related fieldsMBA with emphasis on Construction ManagementExtensive (20+ years) of Subcontract management experienceExtensive (20+ years) of union labor experienceHistory of success in a leadership position(s)   Direct HireLocation: Chicago, ILSalary: $160,000-175,000/yrRelocation paid     #LI-NP1 ",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-construction-manager-job-chicago-il-us-174242863.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=2,,Other,0ef1285086053b48f5e47233152d7178
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:23:28:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job ID: 788964 Job Views: 96 Location: MONROE, Louisiana, United States ZIP Code: 71203 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"12B Combat Engineer - Construction and Engineering Specialist Job ID: 788964 Job Views: 96 Location: MONROE, Louisiana, United States ZIP Code: 71203 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionWe're looking for team players to provide construction and engineering support vital to the successful outcome of Army National Guard missions. As a member of a Guard Combat Engineer team, you'll be designing and building bridges, roadways, secure perimeters, and tactical firing systems, as well as detecting and safely neutralizing mines and other dangers. In doing so, you will ensure the safe and timely mobility of other combat teams and materials.After your paid Guard training and experience, you will be qualified to pursue a variety of civilian career paths, including construction, building inspection, and building engineering.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and six weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT). Your on-the-job training primarily consists of hands-on work in a variety of construction projects.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12b-combat-engineer-construction-engineering-specialist-job-monroe-la-us-175399581.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,559b5028907d1990dc914155410b2357
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:23:39:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Project Manager with experience, please read on!Job Title: Project Manager Salary: $130-150k base + bonus, truck, phone etc..Location: Redwood City We have been steadily growing our presence in the Bay Area over the years and have created an excellent reputation for getting projects done on time and within budget. We are based on the Peninsula and have a focus in Commercial Construction. With weekly lunches and team events, we strive to promote interaction between our employees in a lively, laid-back environment so they can thrive both inside and outside of work. Only with this close-knit and friendly companionship within our company do we believe that our mission can be achieved.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Over 90% of our clients return to us for their next projectWhat You Will Be Doing- Prepare job schedules- Maintain project files physically and digitally - Monthly review of billings and approve all job invoices - Complete subcontractor buy-out and subcontractor selection - Run weekly owner/contractor job meetings including follow up and distribution of minutes.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Negotiating- Project Management- Commercial Construction- Managing Multiple Projects- Ground-up Commercial Construction- Commercial Architecture / ConstructionWhat's In It for You- 401K program- Car allowance- Full medical/dental plan- Highly competitive base salary- Paid vacation, sick days, and holidays- Our newly remodeled offices provide a great working environment - Lucrative profit split program based on the individual’s own projects’ profitsSo, if you are a Project Manager with Commercial Construction experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Construction Project Manager - Established and Growing | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","If you are a Project Manager with experience, please read on!Job Title: Project Manager Salary: $130-150k base + bonus, truck, phone etc..Location: Redwood City We have been steadily growing our presence in the Bay Area over the years and have created an excellent reputation for getting projects done on time and within budget. We are based on the Peninsula and have a focus in Commercial Construction. With weekly lunches and team events, we strive to promote interaction between our employees in a lively, laid-back environment so they can thrive both inside and outside of work. Only with this close-knit and friendly companionship within our company do we believe that our mission can be achieved.Top Reasons to Work with Us- Over 90% of our clients return to us for their next projectWhat You Will Be Doing- Prepare job schedules- Maintain project files physically and digitally - Monthly review of billings and approve all job invoices - Complete subcontractor buy-out and subcontractor selection - Run weekly owner/contractor job meetings including follow up and distribution of minutes.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 5 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Negotiating- Project Management- Commercial Construction- Managing Multiple Projects- Ground-up Commercial Construction- Commercial Architecture / ConstructionWhat's In It for You- 401K program- Car allowance- Full medical/dental plan- Highly competitive base salary- Paid vacation, sick days, and holidays- Our newly remodeled offices provide a great working environment - Lucrative profit split program based on the individual’s own projects’ profitsSo, if you are a Project Manager with Commercial Construction experience, please apply today!",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-established-growing-job-redwood-city-ca-us-175169313.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,,,88d2b152252f89d92025ff919058c403
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:23:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783135 Job Views: 89 Location: COFFEYVILLE, Kansas, United States ZIP Code: 67337 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Coffeyville,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783135 Job Views: 89 Location: COFFEYVILLE, Kansas, United States ZIP Code: 67337 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-coffeyville-ks-us-175419663.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,c47fec2b29331de73995d558a667da32
United States of America,US,06/Jul/2016:23:47:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783058 Job Views: 92 Location: GALESBURG, Illinois, United States ZIP Code: 61401 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job in Galesburg,Full Time Employee,"12N Horizontal Construction Engineers Job ID: 783058 Job Views: 92 Location: GALESBURG, Illinois, United States ZIP Code: 61401 Job Category: Engineer Posted: 11.04.2016 Job DescriptionAirfields. Roads. Dams. Buildings. Name the project, and the Army National Guard builds it. And to do it, they need to move tons of earth, debris, and building materials. That's where the Horizontal Construction Engineer comes in with bulldozers, cranes, graders, and other heavy equipment.As a Guard Horizontal Construction Engineer, you will use heavy machinery to level earth for runways and roadbeds; clear, excavate, dig, and backfill areas of construction sites; spread fill material; transport heavy construction equipment with a tractor-trailer; move heavy building materials with cranes; and assist in performance of combat engineer missions.Through training and practice in this specialty you will develop skills and experience in basic construction methods and engineering principles, particularly as they pertain to operating heavy construction equipment. Plus, you may earn specialized certifications that enable you to step right into a civilian construction career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for Horizontal Construction Engineers consists of nine weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/12n-horizontal-construction-engineers-job-galesburg-il-us-175419936.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,6c488473131516f5a89181abc1e4809c
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:00:43:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is currently in search of a Mid-level SCRUM Master for a Fortune 500 Financial Services Company in Austin, TX.  3rd Party Candidates WILL NOT be considered. Contract-To-Hire PositionResponsibilities:Our Mobile Technology Team is looking for a Senior Scrum Master/Project Delivery Manager to join the team. A Mobile Scrum Master will challenge the teams and strive for predictable and high-quality delivery. The role requires the candidate to directly engage, understand, and champion while also mentoring and facilitating maturing teams. The position requires the right candidate understand and support the Schwab-adopted agile-based SDLC for software development. The Scrum Master provides effective planning, collaboration, facilitation, leadership and coaching skills required in support of delivering our highly-integrated applications. As a project and team leader, the Scrum Master is responsible for creating highly-functioning and creative teams and be a productive and positive addition to the Mobile Scrum Master organization.In addition, the Scrum Master will organize and facilitate daily stand-up meetings, reviews, retrospectives, sprint/release planning, demos, sprint progress and completion forecasting, maintain process and project documentation, and escalate delivery risks in a timely fashion. Execute on Scrum Master responsibilities that include organizing and facilitating daily stand-up meetings, reviews, retrospectives, sprint and release planning, demos and other Scrum-related meetings.Track and communicate team velocity and sprint/release progress, maintain process documentation.Ensure that the development teams are practicing/following core agile principles of collaboration, prioritization, team accountability, and visibility.Update Agile tracking systems to provide transparency on Product & Sprint Backlogs; Recommend improvements and assist in changes to best practice; Support Development Managers and Project Leads as necessary. Assist with internal and external communication, improving transparency, and information sharing. Assist team with making appropriate commitments through story selection and task definition; Identify and remove impediments; prevent distractions that interfere with the ability of the team to deliver the sprint goal; Facilitate discussion and conflict resolution.Empower the teams to self-organize; improve the productivity of the sprint teams; ensure that the team strives to make each increment of functionality potentially releasable.Participate in the organization and planning of the development schedule based on methodology that has been developed to create a cohesive plan with identifiable platform dependencies, and major milestones, and manages the agreed project user stories and schedules, ensuring successful completion within scope, budget, time, and quality parameters.Adapting project scope, schedules, and resource assignments as required throughout projects to respond to emerging requirements and risks. Requirements:Must be a Certified Scrum Master with 3+ years Scrum Master experience and be able to manage multiple scrum teams 8+ years of technology experience, preferably in a Lead roleExperience leading scrum teams with native mobile applications is a plusExperience using JIRA Agile templates Must be an excellent team player with the ability to influence and negotiate Experience working with Agile methodology on large scale, technically complex projects for a large enterprise Thorough understanding of agile software development methodologies, values, and procedures Thorough understanding of the software development lifecycle Highly adaptable to changing environment Must have exceptional communication, organization, and time management skills Excellent interpersonal skills and ability to work with diverse and a geographically dispersed teams Ability to coach teams to reach their highest potential Must be self-motivated, as well as, creative and efficient in proposing solutions to complex, time-critical problems Must be collaborative in driving decisions and able to deal with multiple projects and deadlines Ability to hold team members accountable, set clear sprint performance standards, resolve sprint performance issues, keep team engaged and on task Results Driven (Prioritizing, Taking Initiative, Taking Ownership) Team Leadership (Coaching Others, Dealing with Stress, Demonstrating Teamwork, Influencing Others, Interacting with Others, Maintaining Composure, Motivating Others, Providing Direction and Leadership)Bachelor's degree and relevant education and experience",Mid-level Scrum Master Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mid-level-scrum-master-job-austin-tx-us-169075049.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,7cc3fb5b228b7efff87e7b1aa0a9d571
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:00:43:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail Sales Merchandiser FULL TIME   Retail Sales Merchandiser candidates are organized, self-motivated and friendly. As a member of our Top Performing Sales Team, you will work in full time Retail Sales with oversight and responsibility for increasing sales of our client’s products for leading brands in chocolate, candy/confections, sports drinks, soda products, and snacks. This Retail Sales position services and sells to retail accounts within an assigned territory, ensuring Client standards are met and sales volumes are increased. The ideal candidate for this Retail Sales position is independent, ambitious and driven to succeed with strong sales skills and the confidence to influence key decision makers at the store level. This is a great opportunity to work with Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.   Responsibilities:   Meet and exceed sales goals, by maintaining proper product inventory Engage with store management using the latest technology to drive sales and enhance client satisfaction  Maintain client objectives  Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers, building rapport with clients and customers Perform merchandising duties QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or higher education or equivalent job-related experience Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Position Summary   The Retail Sales Merchandiser (RSM) is responsible for servicing and selling to retail accounts within an assigned territory to ensure Client standards are met and volume is increased.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities   Sales and Merchandising Maintain Client objectives by ensuring secondary placements of product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics Shelf Standards and Conditions: authorization of items to meet Client shelf schematic standards Meet Client and Company objectives by maintaining full distribution on existing SKUs. Take direction regarding tagging, rotating, and placing POS materials for products on shelf Prepare for and respond to audits Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Complete accurate and timely paperwork and reports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. May provide feedback for Client audit objectives  Customer Relations Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers Build rapport with Clients and Customers Field questions and proactively develop action plans to resolve issues Additional Responsibilities: Demonstrates high degree of professionalism in communication, attitude and teamwork with customers, peers and management Demonstrates high level of quality work, attendance and appearance Adheres to all Company Policies & Procedures and Safety Regulations Adheres to local, state and federal laws Performs the job safely utilizing proper equipment and safety techniques Additional responsibilities as assigned by supervisor related to the position/department Supervisory Responsibilities   Direct Reports   This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports   This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are essential duties and function of this job  Travel up to   20%         Must maintain current and valid driver’s license and valid proof of current insurance Minimum Qualifications Minimum Qualifications   The following are the minimum job-related qualifications which an individual needs in order to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities of the job   Education Level: (Required): High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience   Field of Study/Area of Experience:  Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels. Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills Demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others Works cooperatively with others toward common group objectives, demonstrates respect for the ideas and contributions of other team members, cultivates positive relationships with other associates, and provides assistance and support to others Ability to communicate with email and basic internet skills Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Demonstrate commitment to meet or exceed customers’ expectations Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Administrative Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work may be performed in an office, field, retail store, or warehouse environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.      Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).      ",Retail Sales Merchandiser Full Time Job in Round Rock,Full Time Employee,"Round Rock, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-merchandiser-full-time-job-round-rock-tx-us-169303843.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=7,,Retail,f5658df0ef1633039a898971acc170a7
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:01:00:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsSolis Constructors, Inc. is an Austin, Texas based general contractor/design builder. We have been in business since 2002 specializing in medium sized governmental (primarily Military) and commercial construction projects throughout Texas and the southwestern United States. We are currently seeking a Project Manager. This person will have a strong background in managing construction for governmental, institutional, industrial and commercial projects. This position will report directly to the President and Vice President of Operations. The position is available immediately, and offers unlimited opportunities for professional development and advancement.Responsibilities• Provide leadership for the project delivery team• Manage and support field project delivery team• Lead project planning and implementation• Develop the project schedule and maintain it using established controls• Manage contractor's risk and take corrective action as needed• Monitor and report on progress• Define tasks, assign staff, and develop schedules• Manage project controls• Manage subcontract agreements• Support contract compliance efforts of the on-site staff• Implement quality assurance procedures• Determine the project scope and goals• Prepare monthly owner pay requests and project status reportsQualifications• Minimum 5 years previous project management experience (general construction)• Previous military construction experience• Working knowledge of Primavera Project Planner (P6)• Working knowledge of MS Office software• Working knowledge of Adobe Acrobat software• Solid overall knowledge of construction• Design Build project delivery experiencePosition TypeFull-TimeBenefitsWe offer a competitive compensation package with unlimited opportunities for professional development and advancement. We also provide an excellent benefits package, including health insurance, health savings accounts, 401(k) and paid vacation. Project managers are also assigned a company smartphone, computer, and any technology and/or equipment necessary to fulfill the needs of the position. SOLIS CONSTRUCTORS, INC. IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. All qualified applicants will be considered, regardless of race, gender or status as an individual with a disability or a veteran.",Construction Project Manager Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX 78758",All,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-manager-job-austin-tx-us-169780363.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c61e6db1b14ebf0edc819bea876bf6e9
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:01:21:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is looking for a long term temporary Patient Experience/Customer Service Representative to join their team! The Patient Experience Representative will be responsible for providing positive and effective customer service that supports departmental and hospital operations, scheduling patient encounters and procedures to coordinate within and across providers, departments, and institutions, greeting and directing patients, families and visitors and monitoring daily schedule and patient flow. S/he will also be responsible for collecting and organizing medical records, information, materials and supplies required for admissions or encounters, reconciling payments and preparing deposits providing an accurate accounting of funds and answering, screening and routing telephone calls. Candidates should have a high school level of educational development and one to two years of previous experience such as customer service, administrative, or experience in a health care setting, the ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing and provide empathy in difficult interpersonal situations and have the ability to work with diverse internal and external constituencies. This position is full-time and could lead to a permanent position in the future! Interested candidates should apply today!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Find Us on Facebook!Follow Us on Twitter!Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com.We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Patient Experience Representative / Customer Service Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,BostonMA,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/patient-experience-representative-customer-service-job-boston-ma-us-169013197.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,0.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Customer Support/Client Care,769c9a65d35d44534c4f0e8cb4c9c17e
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:01:40:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Maintenance - Live On Site Service Manager / Maintenance Manager  - Apartments Homes  Western National Property Management is looking to fill a Live On Site Service Manager position at Seacrest Apartment Homes, a 368 unit community in San Clemente, CA.    The Service Manager directly oversees, coordinates and schedules all general apartment and facilities maintenance with all maintenance associates as well as outside vendors. Expected to perform under minimum supervision in a manner which ensures overall customer service satisfaction and optimum property performance.   The ideal candidate is polished, engaging and energetic.  Candidates need significant customer service experience as well as previous multifamily property management experience with a commitment to apply their very best in a high-energy environment that rewards your efforts and dedication! Job Requirements : Minimum of 2 years previous experience in multi-family residential property management.Minimum of one year of supervisory experience required.Possess strong customer service skills.Detail oriented and organized.Must have the ability to interact effectively with prospects, residents, peers and management.Knowledge in carpentry, electrical, HVAC, plumbing, painting, drywall repairs, masonry and appliance repairs and installation.Computer literate in Microsoft Office Suite.Must possess a valid driver’s license and maintain current auto insurance.Must maintain an acceptable driving record.             High School Diploma or GED equivalent.Benefits:Competitive hourly salaryFull medical and dental benefits401K savings plan with company participationEducational reimbursementOn- going training and advancement opportunities  Western National Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, medical condition, disability or any other legally protected status.This is an excellent opportunity to join a name-recognized, industry respected, growing company with a solid history, a bright future and opportunities for growth.Your future is now, why wait? Apply Now",Maintenance - Live On Site Service Manager/Maintenance Manager,"Full Time, Employee","San Clemente, CA",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-live-on-site-service-manager-maintenance-manager-seacrest-368-units-job-san-clemente-ca-us-177445898.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=5,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,77bb2711395ae55c1e802cc963a75e17
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:01:41:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Commercial Bank is seeking candidates for a full time Mortgage Servicing Specialist in our Alma office. Minimum two years banking related experience. Competitive wage and benefits. Applications available at all Commercial Bank offices, apply on-line at www.commercial-bank.com or mail cover letter and resume to Human Resource Director 101 N Pine River Street Ithaca MI 48847. EOE",Mortgage Servicing Specialist Job in St. Louis,Part Time,"St. Louis, MI 48856",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/mortgage-servicing-specialist-job-st.-louis-mi-us-177052620.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=1,,,f3ed4f52829bbbd11573ef252b229f0c
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:02:43:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job BANK TELLER (Part-Time) Applications for a part-time teller are being accepted at The First Citizens National Bank Powell Banking Center. You will enjoy a customer oriented, friendly work environment and be part of a 156 year old community bank. Individuals with banking experience or one or more years of cashing handling experience will be considered. Please apply at the Powell Banking Center 9595 Sawmill Parkway (corner of Powell Rd and Sawmill Pkwy) Powell, OH 43065 Phone: (614) 789-9595 - Fax: (614) 789-9599 Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V The FIRST CITIZENS NATIONAL BANK of Upper Sandusky, OH This listing brought to you by ThisWeek Community News and www.columbusjobs.com/monster. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","First Citizens National Bank Job Application for Bank Teller | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Employee","Address UPPER SANDUSKY, OH 433510299",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/bank-teller-job-powell-oh-us-177304869.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=8,,,ecaf01f9ebca353c6cbabfc6fe99e1e2
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:02:44:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job FULL TIME TELLERCommunity Bank is looking for bright, personable and friendly people to join our team of full-time skilled tellers. If you are a person who has a strong work ethic and attention to detail, is computer literate with a background in customer service send us your resume for review. While technical skills are critical for us, the most successful working relationships we've had have been with people who are professional, disciplined and focused. We offer a competitive salary and benefits.Send your resume to:Personnel DepartmentCommunity BankP.O. Box 988Parkersburg, WV 26102www.communitybankpkbg.com/about/careersCommunity Bank is anEqual Opportunity Employerprovided by The Parkersburg News & Sentinel $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","Community Bank Job Application for Full Time Teller | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Community Bank Address 631 Juliana St.Parkersburg, WV 26102",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/full-time-teller-job-parkersburg-wv-us-177452347.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=15,,,16fea2a3830826e3499cfce71c814831
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:03:40:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionPosition DescriptionTeller/Cashier/ClerkCash Processing Services involves the critical functions of deposit verification and order preparation for banks, ATMs and commercial customers. This requires following specifically outlined procedures and utilizing specialized counting equipment. The Teller/Cashier/Clerk position requires the enforcement of rules to protect the premises and property of Brink’s and its customers, as well as the safety of persons on the premises of Brink’s and its customers. If you’re someone who thrives in a fast paced environment, and heavy responsibility then we want to hear from you.Responsibilities:• Process, verify, reconcile and balance inbound and outbound currency transactions• Complete data entry for all currency transactions• Prepare outbound currency orders and replenishments• Count, verify and report currency inventory daily• Meet deadlines and ensure maximum product quality• Report any issues affecting production or accuracyPosition QualificationsRequirements:• Minimum of 21 years of age• A valid firearms permit OR ability to pass applicable firearms licensing requirements• A valid guard card OR ability to obtain a guard card or any other required licenses• Ability to read, count, add, subtract, write and record numbers• Ability to bend, squat, stoop, stand, walk, lift up to 50 pounds, sit, push, pull, wrist/hand/finger dexterity, and perform all other essential functions with or without reasonable accommodationsPreferred Qualifications• 10-Key by touch• General ledger or basic bookkeeping skillsProfessional Skills• Excellent ethics and integrity• Excellent customer service• High attention to detail• Ability to work independently• Professional demeanorBenefits• Insurance including health, dental, and life• 401(K) with company match• Paid vacation• Holiday Pay• Profit SharingAre you ready to calculate your next career move?About Brink’sBrink’s U.S., a division of Brink’s, Incorporated, is the premier provider of armored car transportation, currency and coin processing, ATM servicing and other value added services to financial institutions, retailers and other commercial and government entities. The company has a proud history of providing growth and advancement opportunities for its employees. We have a challenging opportunity for a Teller/Cashier/Clerk.Brink’s is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information or history or any other characteristic protected by law. Brink’s is also committed to providing a drug free workplace.We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Cash Processor - $,Full Time,"Columbus, OH",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/cash-processor-4-000-sign-on-bonus-job-columbus-oh-us-177323952.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bb56d63af6ef9ea4e080a3c560b8b4f0
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:03:41:12,No,jobs.monster.com,".custom-description p{margin-bottom: 15px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important;}.custom-description ul{margin:10px 0px !important;font-size:14px !important;line-height: 18px !important; }Workway is a professional staffing firm, working with organizations across the country to place exceptional candidates. We are looking for aRetail Loan Specialist responsible toworks within a Retail Branch, and will have primary responsibility for loan processing and / or loan closing. Your specific duties will include:Performs the processing of mortgage loan files requiring the verification of loan documents including income, credit appraisal and title insurance-while maintaining strict compliance with RESPA, Section 32, HMDA and the turndown of mortgage loan files. Also includes any administrative duties to complete these tasks (i.e. faxing, copying, filing and phone support).Enter loan information into Nationstar Mortgage computer system. Prepare closing documents and arrange closings with mortgage professional.Reviews files and TMO for input accuracy prior to final approval. Corrects errors as necessary in compliance with Nationstar Mortgage underwriting guidelines. Ensures each closing file is in compliance with NSM closing requirements and state and federal reporting guidelines (RESPA, HMDA, Section32).Authorizes funding upon verification of all critical signed documentation and review of HUD-1.Specific qualifications for the position include: Graduation from a 4-year college or university with major course work in a discipline related to the requirements of the position is preferred. Will consider the equivalent combination of job experience & education that demonstrates the ability to perform the essential functions of this job.2 years experience processing and/or closing government and agency mortgage loans. Experience within a retail mortgage branch is preferred.Let one of our recruiters assist you in finding and preparing for interviews with our clients. Whether you are interested in a direct hire, temp-to-hire, or temporary position, Workway can help you to put your best foot forward. Contact us today! ",Retail Loan Specialist Job in Irvine,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Irvine, CA 92612",All,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-loan-specialist-job-irvine-ca-us-177162269.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=3,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,6cda94eb6bf18a13db131d802295a9d4
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:03:52:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part Time TellerShore to Shore CFCU is hiring for a part time teller position. Duties include cash handlingand member services. Send resumes: Attn: Branch Mgr 21701 Allen RdWoodhaven, MI 48183",Teller Job in Woodhaven,Part Time,"Woodhaven, MI 48183",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/teller-job-woodhaven-mi-us-177469778.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=10,,,193f7dc9269109a6718b8ff2be67e976
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:04:19:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sterling has immediate openings for a Customer Service Representative located in San Francisco, California. Are you….·        Friendly? ·        A team player? ·        Provide outstanding customer service? ·        Interested in a long-term career? Then Sterling Bank & Trust is the place for you!  We are looking to add talented team members who desire to be on a winning team with opportunities for career advancement.   Our Customer Service Representativesare responsible for building account relationships by promoting and cross selling bank products and performing a variety of financial transactions. Qualified candidates will have two years of previous experience with cash handling, sales and customer service.  Previous banking experience preferred.  Candidates who speak English and are bilingual in either Cantonese or Mandarin a plus.  If you are customer service focused with integrity, motivation and excellent interpersonal skills you don’t want to miss this exciting opportunity! For more information and to apply for this position candidates should apply online.  EOE Minorities/Women/Disabled/VetsVEVRAA Federal Contractor",Customer Service Representative Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94104",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-san-francisco-ca-us-176193273.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=19,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,aacbc0390f32f8a74b3c1bafc5e57da6
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:04:19:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Detailed, analytical, and client focused individuals-American National invites you to join our team!         If you find satisfaction working in a collaborative and dynamic team-environment, while also being provided stimulating work that is crucial to the success of the organization: American National would like to speak with you.   As a full-time, Associate Underwriter your job duties will encompass the below:   Assume processing responsibility for assigned states and agencies, process policy changes via the computer system, review policy information, perform rating of vehicle drivers, and verify appropriate coverages   Finalize data entry and authorizing issuance of policies via the computer system   Maintain a working knowledge of the American National policy systems   Maintain understanding of state guidelines, including available discounts, selection / rejection requirements, state specific forms, and updates to underwriting guidelines and rating factors   Review required documentation for policy changes, following up with the underwriters and modify policies as necessary   Review new business applications for accuracy, determine if policies meet eligibility guidelines and accept, reject, and /or adjust coverage as necessary   Assume responsibility for incoming inquiries via phone, email, and fax from agents and others, handle overflow phone inquiries via phone system   Instruct agents on company guidelines and procedures, be an available resource to agents on a daily basis   Research agent service problems / issues to conclusion, this may include communication across divisions   Job Requirements for Consideration :   High School diploma required, completed 2 year degree preferred   Insurance experience and / or insurance education / training preferred   Prior work experience in a customer service / administrative position valuable     Located in Springfield Missouri #LI-MT1   At American National we put our core values of financial strength, integrity, respect, service and teamwork at the heart of everything we do. If you share these values and would like to grow your career at a strong, respected company, here’s an opportunity for you.   American National was started in 1905 in Galveston, TX, and also has offices in League City, TX, Springfield, MO, and Albany, NY. We offer life, accident and health insurance; property/casualty insurance for personal lines, agribusiness and targeted commercial businesses; and retirement, annuities and pension plan products. We’re committed to our employees and clients alike. If you want a long, rewarding career, if you want a chance to be a part of something big and if you want to make a difference in people’s lives, then we want to hear from you.",Associate Underwriter Job in Springfield,Full Time Employee,"Springfield, MO",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-underwriter-job-springfield-mo-us-177421321.aspx?mescoid=1300110001001&jobPosition=12,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,5a9ad999c2ec3f0b3bacd97c774c07b3
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:04:27:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Maintenance - Service Manager / Maintenance Manager  - Apartments Homes  Western National Property Management is looking to fill a Service Manager position at Rancho Vista Apartment Homes, a 117 unit community in Anaheim, CA.    The Service Manager directly oversees, coordinates and schedules all general apartment and facilities maintenance with all maintenance associates as well as outside vendors. Expected to perform under minimum supervision in a manner which ensures overall customer service satisfaction and optimum property performance.   The ideal candidate is polished, engaging and energetic.  Candidates need significant customer service experience as well as previous multifamily property management experience with a commitment to apply their very best in a high-energy environment that rewards your efforts and dedication! Job Requirements : Minimum of 2 years previous experience in multi-family residential property management.Minimum of one year of supervisory experience required.Possess strong customer service skills.Detail oriented and organized.Must have the ability to interact effectively with prospects, residents, peers and management.Knowledge in carpentry, electrical, HVAC, plumbing, painting, drywall repairs, masonry and appliance repairs and installation.Computer literate in Microsoft Office Suite.Must possess a valid driver’s license and maintain current auto insurance.Must maintain an acceptable driving record.             High School Diploma or GED equivalent.Benefits:Competitive hourly salaryFull medical and dental benefits401K savings plan with company participationEducational reimbursementOn- going training and advancement opportunities  Western National Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, medical condition, disability or any other legally protected status.This is an excellent opportunity to join a name-recognized, industry respected, growing company with a solid history, a bright future and opportunities for growth.Your future is now, why wait? Apply Now",Maintenance - Service Manager/Maintenance Manager,"Full Time, Employee","Anaheim, CA",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-service-manager-maintenance-manager-rancho-vista-117-units-job-anaheim-ca-us-176521399.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,4d2c8334916c53839bc7994f888d5c4a
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:04:31:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Mortgage Closer/FunderJob Title: Mortgage Closer FunderReports To: Operations ManagerStatus: Full-timeLocation: Corporate Headquarters– Miami Lakes, FL Looking for a Mortgage Closer/Funder to work in our corporate office in Miami Lakes, FL. Responsibilities will include reviewing loan closing documents, and funding loans in accordance with Company standards and federal, state and investor requirements, ensuring the marketable quality of each loan. Additionally, the Closer/Funder is responsible for understanding the requirements and preparation of loan documents in accordance with the above standards. Mortgage Closer/Funder must be able to manage very tight deadlines on a daily basis, while maintaining a high level of accuracy and quick turnaround.Responsibilities:Work with closely with other processors to review and prioritize incoming doc requests and loan packages;Prepare loan documents in accordance with Agency, Federal, State and Company requirements;Familiarity with GFE, TIL and disclosure requirements;Informs Originator and Closing Agent of document delivery;Addresses all inquiries regarding loan documents. Amends or updates items as needed;Assists Closing Team Members as needed;Review closing documents to ensure accuracy and compliance;Review conditions and send status;Send wires through multiple Warehouse Banks;Work on post-closing issues;Keep Team Members apprised of issues and work load;Other tasks as requested by Team Lead and/or Management;Qualifications:Minimum of 3 years mortgage experience or equivalent in preparing and reviewing mortgage loan documents and closing loansRequired Computer Skills: Office, including Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, OutlookRequirements:Ability to fund 5 loans and review 5 doc packages, on average, per work day as volume allows.Draw closing documents as necessary to meet business needs.Detail oriented, with the ability to prioritize, manage multiple projects, and meet deadlines efficiently.Can be depended upon to complete work in a timely, accurate, and thorough manner and is conscientious about assignments.Communicates effectively both verbally and in writing with superiors, colleagues, and individuals inside and outside the Company.Exhibits a professional manner in dealing with others and works to maintain constructive working relationships.Demonstrates predictable and regular attendance.Work Environment and Physical Demands:Work is performed primarily in an office environment;Requires sitting at a desk for long periods of time, up to 8 hours and ability to lift up to 10 lbs.;Requires sufficient personal mobility and physical reflexes, to permit the employee to function in a general office environment and accomplish tasks.Must be able to work on multiple assignments, under moderate stress levels.To perform this job, an individual must be able to perform the primary job responsibilities satisfactorily with or without reasonable accommodation. However, reasonable accommodation may be provided to qualified individuals with disabilities who are employees or applicants for employment, unless to do so would cause undue hardship. The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being assigned to this job. They are not intended to be construed as a complete list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of individuals in the job. This document does not create an employment contract, implied or otherwise, other than an ""at will"" relationship. Management has the exclusive right to alter this job description at any time without notice.  Report","MCM HOLDINGS INC Job Application for Mortgage Loan Closer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Mortgage Closer/FunderJob Title: Mortgage Closer FunderReports To: Operations ManagerStatus: Full-timeLocation: Corporate Headquarters– Miami Lakes, FL Looking for a Mortgage Closer/Funder to work in our corporate office in Miami Lakes, FL. Responsibilities will include reviewing loan closing documents, and funding loans in accordance with Company standards and federal, state and investor requirements, ensuring the marketable quality of each loan. Additionally, the Closer/Funder is responsible for understanding the requirements and preparation of loan documents in accordance with the above standards. Mortgage Closer/Funder must be able to manage very tight deadlines on a daily basis, while maintaining a high level of accuracy and quick turnaround.Responsibilities:Work with closely with other processors to review and prioritize incoming doc requests and loan packages;Prepare loan documents in accordance with Agency, Federal, State and Company requirements;Familiarity with GFE, TIL and disclosure requirements;Informs Originator and Closing Agent of document delivery;Addresses all inquiries regarding loan documents. Amends or updates items as needed;Assists Closing Team Members as needed;Review closing documents to ensure accuracy and compliance;Review conditions and send status;Send wires through multiple Warehouse Banks;Work on post-closing issues;Keep Team Members apprised of issues and work load;Other tasks as requested by Team Lead and/or Management;Qualifications:Minimum of 3 years mortgage experience or equivalent in preparing and reviewing mortgage loan documents and closing loansRequired Computer Skills: Office, including Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, OutlookRequirements:Ability to fund 5 loans and review 5 doc packages, on average, per work day as volume allows.Draw closing documents as necessary to meet business needs.Detail oriented, with the ability to prioritize, manage multiple projects, and meet deadlines efficiently.Can be depended upon to complete work in a timely, accurate, and thorough manner and is conscientious about assignments.Communicates effectively both verbally and in writing with superiors, colleagues, and individuals inside and outside the Company.Exhibits a professional manner in dealing with others and works to maintain constructive working relationships.Demonstrates predictable and regular attendance.Work Environment and Physical Demands:Work is performed primarily in an office environment;Requires sitting at a desk for long periods of time, up to 8 hours and ability to lift up to 10 lbs.;Requires sufficient personal mobility and physical reflexes, to permit the employee to function in a general office environment and accomplish tasks.Must be able to work on multiple assignments, under moderate stress levels.To perform this job, an individual must be able to perform the primary job responsibilities satisfactorily with or without reasonable accommodation. However, reasonable accommodation may be provided to qualified individuals with disabilities who are employees or applicants for employment, unless to do so would cause undue hardship. The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being assigned to this job. They are not intended to be construed as a complete list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of individuals in the job. This document does not create an employment contract, implied or otherwise, other than an ""at will"" relationship. Management has the exclusive right to alter this job description at any time without notice. ",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/mortgage-loan-closer-job-miami-fl-us-140576534.aspx?mescoid=4300722001001&jobPosition=8,,,d3c99b202f8d1e631cc218a9e7b3cd82
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:04:40:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Area Retail Managers – Multiple Locations TAP INTO OUR NETWORK OF DISTRICT MANAGER CAREERSOn average first and second year earnings fall between $80K -110K. This includes a competitive base salaries, bonuses, awesome benefits and generous stock plans. Due to industry growth realistic career advancement opportunities to Regional level are achieved within 3-5 years. Do you manage multiple retail locations or manage a big box retail store? Would you like to find out more about the opportunities we are recruiting for. Requirements:District Manager of Multiple Locations or General Manager of Big Box Retail StoreDocumented Accomplishments Ability to recruit, coach and train staff Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred Prior P&L responsibility required Industries Preferred: Car Rental, Restaurant, Storage, Video/Entertainment, Coffee, Shoe, Vitamin, Mattress, Rental Centers, Check Cashing, Woman Accessories, Retail Electronics, Juice and Health Food, Auto Parts, Auto Repair CentersPlease apply below for immediate consideration.All resume submissions are confidential. Connect with us: https://www.linkedin.com/company/aspire-careers https://twitter.com/salesinterview https://www.facebook.com/salesrecruiting  Report","Aspire Careers Job Application for Area Retail Manager – Multiple Locations | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Area Retail Managers – Multiple Locations TAP INTO OUR NETWORK OF DISTRICT MANAGER CAREERSOn average first and second year earnings fall between $80K -110K. This includes a competitive base salaries, bonuses, awesome benefits and generous stock plans. Due to industry growth realistic career advancement opportunities to Regional level are achieved within 3-5 years. Do you manage multiple retail locations or manage a big box retail store? Would you like to find out more about the opportunities we are recruiting for. Requirements:District Manager of Multiple Locations or General Manager of Big Box Retail StoreDocumented Accomplishments Ability to recruit, coach and train staff Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred Prior P&L responsibility required Industries Preferred: Car Rental, Restaurant, Storage, Video/Entertainment, Coffee, Shoe, Vitamin, Mattress, Rental Centers, Check Cashing, Woman Accessories, Retail Electronics, Juice and Health Food, Auto Parts, Auto Repair CentersPlease apply below for immediate consideration.All resume submissions are confidential. Connect with us: https://www.linkedin.com/company/aspire-careers https://twitter.com/salesinterview https://www.facebook.com/salesrecruiting ",All,http://jobview.monster.com/area-retail-manager-%E2%80%93-multiple-locations-job-greensboro-nc-us-177163065.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=20,,,86d9979ddfa23bcf4ab6fd581f6d14dd
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:04:41:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"The FIRST CITIZENS NATIONAL BANK of Upper Sandusky, OH BANKING POSITION Area community bank is looking for an ambitious individual to serve as HEAD TELLER AT THE POWELL BANKING CENTER LOCATION. HEAD TELLER - FULL TIME Job requirements include a High school diploma, GED, or equivalent: At least four years teller experience, with excellent performance: demonstrates leadership ability; outstanding customer relations skills; Basic typing, CRT Inquiry, 10-Key and Telephone skills: Basic math skills and ability to comprehend, interpret,and apply detailed information. The individual in this position provides courteous and efficient customer service and principal duties include: - Reliably accepts and processes customer transactions consisting of - Open new deposit accounts - Cash and coin deposits - Checking and savings deposits - Mortgage, commercial and installment loan payments - Redeem Series E and EE Savings Bonds - Cash checks - Count and wrap coin - Issue credit card cash advances - Prepare cash and general ledger debits and credits - Night deposit bags and daily mail deposits - Other services including cashiers checks, personal money orders, savings bonds, ATM applications - Other duties as assigned Wage is commensurate with experience and a complete benefits package is provided. Please send or email resumes to: The First Citizens National Bank - Attn: Human Resources P.O. Box 299 - Upper Sandusky, OH 4351 - BShaw@FirstCitizensNational.com Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/V/DThis listing brought to you by ThisWeek Community News and www.columbusjobs.com/monster.",Head Teller Job in Powell,Full Time,"Powell, OH 43065",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/head-teller-job-powell-oh-us-177304870.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a00376196e747ee2251d5517e2a396aa
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:05:43:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Established community bank in the Sacramento area is looking for a  Commercial Underwriter to join their group!! Requirements:Ability to underwriter and make credit decision recommendations for C&I and CRE loan applications, ranging from simple to complex creditsMonitor existing CRE portfolioStrong oral and written communication skills with precise attention to detail3-5 years experience preferredTo find out more about this position,  contact Sarah at the information below: Sarah HagenlockSearch ConsultantGPAC(Growing People and Companies)Direct: (605) 809-8548sarah.hagenlock@gogpac.com Thank you for looking, and I look forward to visiting with you!",Commercial Underwriter (SBH /) Job in Sacramento,Full Time,"Sacramento, CA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-underwriter-sbh-11-23-job-sacramento-ca-us-176782835.aspx?mescoid=1300110001001&jobPosition=10,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,e26bd3af1526490f9a4bc60cd03900c6
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:05:43:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job New American Funding is a family-owned business, dedicated to helping other families and individuals improve their quality of living. We’re a Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, and Ginnie Mae direct lender, seller, and servicer with call center, distributed retail, wholesale, and builder divisions. We have more than 90 retail branches, over 1,900 employees, and we fund over $900 million in home loans every month. For the past three years, The Orange County Register has recognized us as one of the top workplaces in the county, this year Fortune named us among their Best Workplaces for Diversity and Mortgage Executive Magazine named us in their 50 Best Companies to Work For. The Scotsman Guide named us in their Top Mortgage Lenders list, Mortgage Executive Magazine ranked us in their Top 100 Mortgage Companies in America, and we were included in Inc.5000’s Fastest Growing Companies, to name just a few of our recent accolades. Our high loan volume and efficient operations allow us to offer aggressive compensation to our employees and low rates to our clients.We’re not your typical mortgage banker. We have a style all our own; tech-driven efficiency with a personalized, boutique feel. We’re a family. We collaborate with confidence, knowing our work is infused with integrity, not just at each desk, but in all of our operations.People like working with us, and we think you will too.Position: Area Production Manager - Builder DivisionLocation: Redlands, CA. Position Summary: Oversees all activities related to operations and development of company products by performing the following duties personally or through subordinate supervisors and employees.Duties and Responsibilities:1.     Review pipelines for timeliness, lock expiration, COE, loan contingency, etc.2.     Works with processors to manage the pipeline to ensure we meet the COE date.3.     Reviews/validates 14 day close submissions prior to submission to the underwriter for completeness.4.     Supports Sales Team by reviewing scenarios and assisting with structuring loan files reviewing income etc.5.     Supports Loan Consultants and production team, resolves or escalates file level issues if needed.6.     Reviews rush request and escalates to Nation Production Manager or National Processing Manager if necessary7.     Communicate training needs as needed to the management team.8.     Escalates to corporate managers if any operation staff issues are noticed.9.     Review and track monthly funding projection for the branch.10.   Review Encompass report for file start date for new files not elevated to PA.11.   Review loans that are in processing that are still floating work with the LO/SM/BM to get loans reviewed for locks.12.   Coordinates rushes for doc drawing and funding with corporate management 13.   Review files that are suspended by underwriting.14.   Meet with LO to review pipeline as needed.15.   Ensure compliance posters are up to date for the branch office.16.   Conduct monthly meeting with Loan Consultants/Branch Manager to review policy changes/updates.17.   Assist new LO’s with Encompass questions and DU/LP finding.18.   Request lock extension via the lock desk for locks that are expiring.19.   Assist with office equipment to ensure all is running well or call for service.20.   Provides input to the development of product strategy and research and development of new and emerging products.21.   Establishes production and quality control standards.22.   Ensures all established costs, quality, and delivery commitments are met.23.   Determines responsibilities of assigned organization and staff positions to accomplish business objectives.24.   Trains and ensures all assigned employees are aware of and comply with company, government, and customer policies, procedures, and regulations.25.   Other duties may be assigned.  Desired Competencies:1.     Demonstrate advanced product knowledge of FHA, VA, Conventional and other loan programs such as Home Equity Lines of Credit, 2nd Mortgages, Home Improvement, down payment assistance and bond programs.2.     Demonstrate working knowledge of federal and state guidelines, rules and regulations such as RESPA, TILA, HMDA, etc.3.     Advanced ability to analyze complex tax returns and accurately calculate income for all types of borrowers.4.     Ability to maintain a high level of professionalism, customer service, and communication with all parties involved in the loan cycle.5.     Proficient with Encompass, or other paperless mortgage loan origination systems.6.     Understanding of all compliance regulations and investor guidelines.7.     Strong PC Skills.  Must be proficient in MS Windows, Excel, Outlook and Work. Intermediate Excel skills a plus.8.     Has knowledge of commonly used terminology, concepts and practices and procedures within the mortgage industry.9.     Ability to meet time deadlines while working under pressure.10.   Ability to effectively handle simultaneous tasks and projects in a fast paced environment. 11.   Able to effectively and efficiently work independently or as a member of a team.12.   Strong business writing and math skills.13.   Ability to effectively analyze loan account related problems and define solutions.14.   Must be able to work a flexible schedule that may include some evening and weekend hours.Desired Education/Experience:1.     Five or more years' recent mortgage operations, underwriting and/or processing experience; management experience preferred.2.     Current hands on underwriting or processing experience.3.     Advanced knowledge of and experience working with FNMA, FHLMC, FHA, VA and other refinance and purchase loan programs and mortgage insurance guidelines.4.     Direct Endorsement (DE) and/or LAPP/SAR certifications a plus.5.     High school diploma or equivalent; College Degree in Accounting, Finance or Business a plus.Other Duties: This job may require frequent sitting or standing for long periods of time. This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.Work Authorization: Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.[EOE/M/F/D/V. Drug-free workplace.]Physical Demands:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  Must be able to lift up to ten pounds.  Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information.  VISION:  See in the normal visual range with or without correction.  HEARING:  Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.    Report","New American Funding Job Application for Area Production Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","New American Funding is a family-owned business, dedicated to helping other families and individuals improve their quality of living. We’re a Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, and Ginnie Mae direct lender, seller, and servicer with call center, distributed retail, wholesale, and builder divisions. We have more than 90 retail branches, over 1,900 employees, and we fund over $900 million in home loans every month. For the past three years, The Orange County Register has recognized us as one of the top workplaces in the county, this year Fortune named us among their Best Workplaces for Diversity and Mortgage Executive Magazine named us in their 50 Best Companies to Work For. The Scotsman Guide named us in their Top Mortgage Lenders list, Mortgage Executive Magazine ranked us in their Top 100 Mortgage Companies in America, and we were included in Inc.5000’s Fastest Growing Companies, to name just a few of our recent accolades. Our high loan volume and efficient operations allow us to offer aggressive compensation to our employees and low rates to our clients.We’re not your typical mortgage banker. We have a style all our own; tech-driven efficiency with a personalized, boutique feel. We’re a family. We collaborate with confidence, knowing our work is infused with integrity, not just at each desk, but in all of our operations.People like working with us, and we think you will too.Position: Area Production Manager - Builder DivisionLocation: Redlands, CA. Position Summary: Oversees all activities related to operations and development of company products by performing the following duties personally or through subordinate supervisors and employees.Duties and Responsibilities:1.     Review pipelines for timeliness, lock expiration, COE, loan contingency, etc.2.     Works with processors to manage the pipeline to ensure we meet the COE date.3.     Reviews/validates 14 day close submissions prior to submission to the underwriter for completeness.4.     Supports Sales Team by reviewing scenarios and assisting with structuring loan files reviewing income etc.5.     Supports Loan Consultants and production team, resolves or escalates file level issues if needed.6.     Reviews rush request and escalates to Nation Production Manager or National Processing Manager if necessary7.     Communicate training needs as needed to the management team.8.     Escalates to corporate managers if any operation staff issues are noticed.9.     Review and track monthly funding projection for the branch.10.   Review Encompass report for file start date for new files not elevated to PA.11.   Review loans that are in processing that are still floating work with the LO/SM/BM to get loans reviewed for locks.12.   Coordinates rushes for doc drawing and funding with corporate management 13.   Review files that are suspended by underwriting.14.   Meet with LO to review pipeline as needed.15.   Ensure compliance posters are up to date for the branch office.16.   Conduct monthly meeting with Loan Consultants/Branch Manager to review policy changes/updates.17.   Assist new LO’s with Encompass questions and DU/LP finding.18.   Request lock extension via the lock desk for locks that are expiring.19.   Assist with office equipment to ensure all is running well or call for service.20.   Provides input to the development of product strategy and research and development of new and emerging products.21.   Establishes production and quality control standards.22.   Ensures all established costs, quality, and delivery commitments are met.23.   Determines responsibilities of assigned organization and staff positions to accomplish business objectives.24.   Trains and ensures all assigned employees are aware of and comply with company, government, and customer policies, procedures, and regulations.25.   Other duties may be assigned.  Desired Competencies:1.     Demonstrate advanced product knowledge of FHA, VA, Conventional and other loan programs such as Home Equity Lines of Credit, 2nd Mortgages, Home Improvement, down payment assistance and bond programs.2.     Demonstrate working knowledge of federal and state guidelines, rules and regulations such as RESPA, TILA, HMDA, etc.3.     Advanced ability to analyze complex tax returns and accurately calculate income for all types of borrowers.4.     Ability to maintain a high level of professionalism, customer service, and communication with all parties involved in the loan cycle.5.     Proficient with Encompass, or other paperless mortgage loan origination systems.6.     Understanding of all compliance regulations and investor guidelines.7.     Strong PC Skills.  Must be proficient in MS Windows, Excel, Outlook and Work. Intermediate Excel skills a plus.8.     Has knowledge of commonly used terminology, concepts and practices and procedures within the mortgage industry.9.     Ability to meet time deadlines while working under pressure.10.   Ability to effectively handle simultaneous tasks and projects in a fast paced environment. 11.   Able to effectively and efficiently work independently or as a member of a team.12.   Strong business writing and math skills.13.   Ability to effectively analyze loan account related problems and define solutions.14.   Must be able to work a flexible schedule that may include some evening and weekend hours.Desired Education/Experience:1.     Five or more years' recent mortgage operations, underwriting and/or processing experience; management experience preferred.2.     Current hands on underwriting or processing experience.3.     Advanced knowledge of and experience working with FNMA, FHLMC, FHA, VA and other refinance and purchase loan programs and mortgage insurance guidelines.4.     Direct Endorsement (DE) and/or LAPP/SAR certifications a plus.5.     High school diploma or equivalent; College Degree in Accounting, Finance or Business a plus.Other Duties: This job may require frequent sitting or standing for long periods of time. This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.Work Authorization: Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.[EOE/M/F/D/V. Drug-free workplace.]Physical Demands:The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  Must be able to lift up to ten pounds.  Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information.  VISION:  See in the normal visual range with or without correction.  HEARING:  Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.   ",Banking; Real Estate/Property Management; Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/area-production-manager-job-redlands-ca-us-176968150.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=10,,,d907af5936ddd98d221b4f924854be1b
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:05:59:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionPosition DescriptionBrink’s U.S., a division of Brink’s, Incorporated, is the premier provider of armored car transportation, ATM servicing, currency and coin processing, and other value added services to financial institutions, retailers and other commercial and government entities. The company has a proud history of providing growth and advancement opportunities for its employees. We have a challenging opportunity for a Vault Processor.Job Summary:The Vault Processor is responsible for checking libability in and out of the facility, processing the liability, maintaining the liability inventory, and preparing liability for delivery. This position functions in an armed environment. This position requires the enforcement of rules to protect the premises and property of Brink’s and its customers, as well as the safety of persons on the premises of Brink’s and its customers.Key Responsibilities:• Process, verify and balance inbound and outbound liability• Complete data entry for all transactions of liability• Prepare outbound orders and replenishments for the next day’s routes• Count, verify and report every item in inventory daily• Generate and maintain all records and reports accurately on a daily basis• Meet deadlines and ensure maximum product quality• Resolve customer and employee issues• Monitor performance of processes and machines• Report any issues affecting production or accuracy• Complete maintenance requirements and troubleshoot malfunctions• Maintain clean and organized work area• Able to work weekends, holidays and/or extended hours• Cross-train and perform other duties as assignedPosition QualificationsMinimum Qualifications:• Minimum of 3 months experience in at least one of the following: cash handling, inventory control, deposit processing, vault balancing, account reconciliation, ATM Processing, cashier experience, or teller experience• Minimum of 21 years of age• A valid firearms permit or ability to pass applicable firearms licensing requirements• A valid guard card or ability to obtain a guard card or any other required licenses• Able to lift at least 50 poundsPreferred Qualifications:• Cash handling experience in the secure logistics or banking industry• Able to identify different commodities• 10-key experience• Basic computer skills• High school diploma or GEDProfessional Skills:• Excellent ethics and integrity• High attention to detail• Collaborative work style• Excellent customer service• Ability to work independently• Professional, positive demeanorIf you have the background and integrity we require and are looking for a challenging opportunity, we hope you will consider employment with Brink’s. We provide a competitive salary, medical, dental, vision and life insurance plans. In addition, we offer a 401(k) plan with company match. If you are interested and meet the requirements for this position, please apply.Brink’s is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information or history or any other characteristic protected by law. Brink’s is also committed to providing a drug free workplace.We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Vault Processor Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/vault-processor-job-philadelphia-pa-us-176524040.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b7a5e96cc8477c48c5a5682081201e44
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:06:41:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Real Estate Specialist - Services CROWN CASTLE USA - Seattle, WA 98109 Posted: 11/30/2016 - Expires: 12/31/2016 Job ID: 176923997",Real Estate Specialist - Services Job in Seattle,Job Type Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98109",,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-specialist-services-job-seattle-wa-us-176923997.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,Education Level Bachelor's Degree,135487c74df05cb70684464b29126528
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:06:41:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Area Retail Managers – Multiple Locations TAP INTO OUR NETWORK OF DISTRICT MANAGER CAREERSOn average first and second year earnings fall between $80K -110K. This includes a competitive base salaries, bonuses, awesome benefits and generous stock plans. Due to industry growth realistic career advancement opportunities to Regional level are achieved within 3-5 years. Do you manage multiple retail locations or manage a big box retail store? Would you like to find out more about the opportunities we are recruiting for. Requirements:District Manager of Multiple Locations or General Manager of Big Box Retail StoreDocumented Accomplishments Ability to recruit, coach and train staff Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred Prior P&L responsibility required Industries Preferred: Car Rental, Restaurant, Storage, Video/Entertainment, Coffee, Shoe, Vitamin, Mattress, Rental Centers, Check Cashing, Woman Accessories, Retail Electronics, Juice and Health Food, Auto Parts, Auto Repair CentersPlease apply below for immediate consideration.All resume submissions are confidential. Connect with us: https://www.linkedin.com/company/aspire-careers https://twitter.com/salesinterview https://www.facebook.com/salesrecruiting  Report","Aspire Careers Job Application for Area Retail Manager – Multiple Locations | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Area Retail Managers – Multiple Locations TAP INTO OUR NETWORK OF DISTRICT MANAGER CAREERSOn average first and second year earnings fall between $80K -110K. This includes a competitive base salaries, bonuses, awesome benefits and generous stock plans. Due to industry growth realistic career advancement opportunities to Regional level are achieved within 3-5 years. Do you manage multiple retail locations or manage a big box retail store? Would you like to find out more about the opportunities we are recruiting for. Requirements:District Manager of Multiple Locations or General Manager of Big Box Retail StoreDocumented Accomplishments Ability to recruit, coach and train staff Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred Prior P&L responsibility required Industries Preferred: Car Rental, Restaurant, Storage, Video/Entertainment, Coffee, Shoe, Vitamin, Mattress, Rental Centers, Check Cashing, Woman Accessories, Retail Electronics, Juice and Health Food, Auto Parts, Auto Repair CentersPlease apply below for immediate consideration.All resume submissions are confidential. Connect with us: https://www.linkedin.com/company/aspire-careers https://twitter.com/salesinterview https://www.facebook.com/salesrecruiting ",All,http://jobview.monster.com/area-retail-manager-%E2%80%93-multiple-locations-job-university-heights-oh-us-177157825.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=8,,,e66b118b526ffd31bbb697381f7b9c76
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:07:44:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Maintenance – (Service Technician) Electrical, HVAC, Plumbing & Carpentry – Apartment Homes   Western National Property Management is looking to fill a PART TIME Maintenance Technician position @ Monrovia Apartment Homes, a 37 unit community located in Costa Mesa, CA. The Service Technician performs all general apartment and facilities maintenance under supervision of the Service Manager and/or Community Manager in a manner which ensures overall customer service satisfaction and optimum property performance.   The ideal candidate is polished, engaging and energetic. Candidates need significant customer service experience as well as previous multifamily residential property maintenance experience with a commitment to apply their very best in a high-energy environment that rewards your efforts and dedication! Job Requirements : Preferred experience in multifamily residential property maintenance.Must have the ability to interact effectively with prospects, residents, peers and management.Knowledge in carpentry, electrical, HVAC, plumbing, painting, masonry and appliance repairs and installation (dishwashers, stoves, refrigerators, etc).Detail oriented and organized.Make ready units for new occupancy per company policy.Maintaining the leasing office and all recreational and common area facilities.Demonstrates initiative, personal awareness, professionalism and integrity. Exercises confidentiality in all areas of performance.Must possess a valid driver’s license and maintain current auto insurance.Must maintain an acceptable driving record.High School Diploma or GED equivalent.Benefits:Competitive hourly salaryFull medical and dental benefits401K savings plan with company participationEducational reimbursementOn- going training and advancement opportunities  Western National Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, medical condition, disability or any other legally protected status.This is an excellent opportunity to join a name-recognized, industry respected, growing company with a solid history, a bright future and opportunities for growth.Your future is now, why wait? Apply Now",Maintenance -(PART TIME Service Technician) Electrical,"Part Time, Employee","Costa Mesa, CA",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-part-time-service-technician-electrical-hvac-plumbing-carpentry-monrovia-37-uni-job-costa-mesa-ca-us-176521405.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Banking/Real Estate/Mortgage Professionals,d43c4e157be65c98f13944a9406a7028
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:07:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Development opportunities with a rapidly expanding facilities services provider in San Francisco Your new company Our client is a rapidly expanding, national, facilities management and engineering services provider, currently offering facilities services solutions to a number of household name, blue chip organizations, both in the San Francisco Bay area and around the globe. Your new role The Business Development professional will be responsible for: - Develop and execute the end to end sales strategy - Actively pursue business leads and create opportunities yourself - Respond to RFPs and manage the bid process - Actively network and sell the companies offering at a senior, local and national level - Manage and create group and local marketing efforts What you'll need to succeed The successful candidate will be a proven sales and business development professional with a strong track record in selling facilities management or building maintenance services. It is essential that the candidate has working knowledge of the facilities management sector. The Business Development professional is a charismatic and engaging sales person, able to confidently sell to senior clients over long and short sales cycles. What you'll get in return Our client is a well-established, yet rapidly growing Facility Service provider, and as such you will be backed by a brand with an exceptional reputation in the industry, an already well developed client base and proven track record in delivering services in the FM environment. In addition to a highly competitive base salary, candidates will receive commissions, bonuses and a competitive benefits package (PTO, health, dental, vision, flex time, 401K, etc). What you need to do now If you're interested in this Business Development position with Hays Facilities Management in the San Francisco Bay area, click 'apply now' to forward an up-to-date copy of your CV, or call us now. PLEASE ENSURE YOU ATTACH A WORD VERSION OF YOUR RESUME. If this job isn't quite right for you but you are looking for a new position, please contact us for a confidential discussion on your career.",Business Development Manager (Facilities Management) Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Real Estate/Property ManagementOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/business-development-manager-facilities-management-job-san-francisco-ca-us-169658318.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=16,"50,000.00 - 200,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,89e0a60c12e90a61b8f6ff3aec9366f7
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:08:23:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Entry Level Advertising Account Manager: Full Training  As part of our team, you’ll work alongside some of the brightest and most experienced people in our industry to deliver fresh and innovative digital and traditional marketing and advertising services for home improvement corporations. These solutions include promotional advertising, targeted marketing, advertising sales, business development and lead generation.Position Description:As an entry level Advertising Account Manager, you will be responsible for implementing marketing, advertising solutions for home improvement clients within a defined territory. You will participate in sales activities that drive revenue including lead generation, gathering competitive intelligence, product demonstrations, discovery of accounts and proposals to customers. You will participate in team sales presentations, as well as plan and implement sales strategies and programs within your region. All entry level Advertising Account Managers are eligible for management promotions within their first year dependent upon performance. Training:Our training consists of time with your mentor in the field, online courses completed in your home office, and classroom instruction. You will complete four different phases throughout your first year of training. Topics covered will include training on sales techniques, marketing presentation skills, and in-depth product training. You will be given progress checkpoint tests throughout your training that will identify areas for improvement and to ensure you are on the right track. While training in the field, you will shadow field representatives including experienced sales representatives, consultants, and field technicians. This will allow you to learn the overall sales process and will give you the opportunity to observe marketing operationsRequirementsSkills Required:verbal communication skills and comfort talking to people you've just metwork ethic and commitment to getting the job done in excellencelove of people and helping them come to solutions and leave happyability to multitask and work & train in a fast paced environmentdesire to learn more, be trained, and grow with a companyability to think on your feel and make decisions quicklyprofessionalism, able to work well with and have fun with am entry level team    Thank you for your interest in joining our team and good luck.                             People from all backgrounds seeking part time or full time opportunities in the following areas are encouraged to inquire about our program: sales, customer service, sales representative, internships, part time, manager, management, purchasing, part time, restaurant, assistant, hotel, supervisor, general, advertising, communications, sales manager, project management, editor, hospitality, professional, bartender, call center, inventory, photography, bilingual, sports, cashier, clerk, distribution, sales management, shipping, waiter, waitress.  Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, management, administrative, business development, business, internship, advertising, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summ",Entry Level Advertising Account Manager: Full Training Job in Philadelphia,Full Time Employee,"Philadelphia, PA 19130",Telecommunications Services Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-advertising-account-manager-full-training-job-philadelphia-pa-us-169094227.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,Marketing/Product,d50ff4a5a35966a7125fe9145a80f1c9
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:08:44:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lifestyle Publications is seeking highly motivated, sales background individuals to launch and run their own businesses within their local community. This is a chance for you to own, run and grow your own business as a Sales Director. Our Sales Directors receive full support and training. Our business model requires no need for knowledge within the publishing industry but would require strong sales, communication and organization background. If you are an individual that has the desire to start, build and benefit from creating your own business but also wishes to control the upfront cost to do so, then this would be a great opportunity. With our sales platform you would build residual revenue streams each month as well as cultivate and manage future sales individuals who would help increase your revenue streams. This opportunity does require an investment. We will cover the training and the materials to get you started in this amount. Key Job Responsibilities:Calling and marketing advertising opportunities to local businesses Working with established local editor to support publication Providing support for future sales representatives Enter agreements and monitor receivables within provided CRM system Conduct networking events supporting businesses and communityJob RequirementsSales DirectorNeeded Requirements:Self-motivated, driven and committed to developing new business Strong communication skills (verbal and written) Previous sales experience and success Solid organizational and leadership skills Basic computer skills Benefits:The ability to work your own schedule The opportunity to build your own business The creation for exceptional income The opportunity to join communities together and make a difference Advertising trade benefits between you and your clientsCorporate Support:You do not need to know the publishing business and we handle the work in creating your new publication. This allows you to focus solely on growing your own business as the Sales Director. We Provide:Full training and sales support Complete layout and ad design Creation, printing and mailing of publication to your readers Website design and support Customized Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems Weekly conference calls for training and motivation for you and team",Sales Director Job in Birmingham,Full Time / Employee,"Birmingham, AL 35203",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-director-job-birmingham-al-us-165363915.aspx?mescoid=1100008001001&jobPosition=18,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,33d775bb49bbe4342fb36ab577c77cf6
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:08:45:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Study Guides for pre-employment screening (click the links below to open the various study guides) Retail Sales Consultant Test Reid Report Apply now! Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Part Time Retail Sales Consultant Job in State College,,"State College, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-retail-sales-consultant-job-state-college-pa-us-169068162.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=12,,,ae9a6aa483bff4e1122f51a7c9647d44
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:09:42:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time,"Oklahoma City, OK",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-169614597.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),febd653ce1aacf712ce4c579a6d2cabb
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:09:42:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:Founded in 2007, Club Pilates is the nation's largest and fastest-growing Pilates franchise, offering several signature class formats in order to fit the needs of all clients - from young to more senior, and from beginner to advanced.  The first studio to create a 500 hour Teacher Training Program designed to thoroughly and safely teach group Pilates apparatus classes that flow.  Club Pilates currently has more than 100 territories sold, approximately 40,000 members, 100+ instructors and 75,000 monthly workouts throughout the United States and Australia.  For more information, please visit www.clubpilates.com POSITION: The purpose of the Sales Rep is to represent Club Pilates to potential clients, bringing new members in the door.  Along with bringing in new members, the Sales Rep also focuses on retaining current members.  Pilate’s fitness background is preferred but not required; candidates with a strong sales management background are also ideal. REQUIREMENTS:Pilates fitness background is preferred but not required; candidates with a strong sales management background are also ideal.Excellent sales, communication, and customer service skills requiredGoal-oriented with an ability to achieve sales of an acceptable number of units per monthAbility to learn and use the Club Ready membership sales systemRequires the ability to stand or sit for up to 8 hours throughout the workdayHearing sufficient to understand conversations, both in person and on the telephoneMust be able to work under pressure and meet tight deadlinesMust communicate professionally and effectively to clients and colleaguesMust have excellent public speaking skillsMust have proficient computer skillsValid drivers’ license, proof of insurance, and access to reliable transportation. Must have a clean DMV record and successfully pass background check. Daily and/or occasional travel may be required. RESPONSIBILITIES:Contact prospective members to explain benefits of a regular Pilates routine and costs of membershipConduct tours of the facility while establishing a relationship and targeting individual’s needs and wantsMaintain acceptable level of personal sales productionEmphasize and enforce objectives of the club as a fitness and wellness providerPresent available services to current or prospective membersBook quality appointments to achieve monthly sales quotaParticipate in special events (health fairs, grand openings, marathons, and community and hospital events) to promote the clubAssumes responsibility for developing selling skillsOther duties as assigned COMPENSATION & BENEFITS:This position offers a very competitive base salary; based on experience.($12-15hrly)Plus 10% Commission Paid on Sales!!Bonus’s also paid on Performance as well!!Successful Sales Reps can minimally expect to make $50-$75,000 yearly with the opportunity to increase that amount each year. Unlimited Growth Potential as well within the company.",Sales Rep Job in Carmel,Full Time Employee,"Carmel, IN 46033",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-job-carmel-in-us-168976465.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,12.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f294282e3149c152452b0b663d22d7d1
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:09:57:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"11503 Philips Hwy., Jacksonville, FL 32256 AUTOMOTIVE, SALES REPRESENTATIVES HIRING IMMEDIATELY!Commission + Bonuses! Income Potential $100K PLUS!Sales Experience Required! Walk-In Applicants are Welcome! NIMNICHT BUICK GMC, one of the largest group dealerships in Jacksonville needs Experienced Sales Representatives due to Sales Growth. A High School Diploma or equivalent, plus 6-12 months of Sales Experience will enable you to meet required goals and expectations. Automotive Sales Experience is preferred, but not required. If you have Sales Experience in any type of industry such as cell phone sales, electronics sales, insurance or business-to-business (B2B), this is the opportunity for you!Enthusiastic, ambitious, Customer Service focused candidates meeting the above criteria should apply with confidence! APPLY ONLINE NOW and upload a Resume. Nimnicht Family of Dealerships in Jacksonville, FL treats the needs of each individual customer with paramount concern. We are family owned and operated since 1941. We are the GM Mark of Excellence Award Winner Year in, Year out. Sales Representative - Job Description: Day to day responsibilities will include handling inbound customer calls, executing outbound telesales to develop new business, setting sales appointments, providing quotes to customers, and delivering vehicles to customers. Sales Representative - Requirements: High School Diploma or equivalent6-12 months of Sales Experience in any IndustryProfessional appearance and strong communications skillsComputer skillsTeam orientedValid driver's license with good driving record Job Benefits: The compensation for your hard work is the best you will find including: Full benefits package availableGreat Income potential - $100K +!On-site Café and Work-Out Center available for Employee use! We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants must be able to demonstrate the ability to pass pre-employment testing to include background checks, MVR, and drug screen. sales associates; auto sales; Sales representatives Jacksonville, FL; Jacksonville jobs; FL jobs; Jacksonville sales consultants; sales professionals FL",SALES - SALES EXP. IN ANY FIELD REQ'D,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32256",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-sales-exp-in-any-field-req'd-earn-up-to-100k-plus-great-benefits!-nimnicht-buick-gmc-job-jacksonville-fl-us-169640477.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),16ef698f778b949bcbcae05dcefa02dc
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:09:59:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Lifestyle Publications is seeking highly motivated, sales background individuals to launch and run their own businesses within their local community. This is a chance for you to own, run and grow your own business as a Sales Director. Our Sales Directors receive full support and training. Our business model requires no need for knowledge within the publishing industry but would require strong sales, communication and organization background. If you are an individual that has the desire to start, build and benefit from creating your own business but also wishes to control the upfront cost to do so, then this would be a great opportunity. With our sales platform you would build residual revenue streams each month as well as cultivate and manage future sales individuals who would help increase your revenue streams. This opportunity does require an investment. We will cover the training and the materials to get you started in this amount. Key Job Responsibilities:Calling and marketing advertising opportunities to local businesses Working with established local editor to support publication Providing support for future sales representatives Enter agreements and monitor receivables within provided CRM system Conduct networking events supporting businesses and communityJob RequirementsSales DirectorNeeded Requirements:Self-motivated, driven and committed to developing new business Strong communication skills (verbal and written) Previous sales experience and success Solid organizational and leadership skills Basic computer skills Benefits:The ability to work your own schedule The opportunity to build your own business The creation for exceptional income The opportunity to join communities together and make a difference Advertising trade benefits between you and your clientsCorporate Support:You do not need to know the publishing business and we handle the work in creating your new publication. This allows you to focus solely on growing your own business as the Sales Director. We Provide:Full training and sales support Complete layout and ad design Creation, printing and mailing of publication to your readers Website design and support Customized Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems Weekly conference calls for training and motivation for you and team",Sales Director Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time / Employee,"Virginia Beach, VA 23451",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-director-job-virginia-beach-va-us-165364086.aspx?mescoid=1100008001001&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,5938206fea0de5c010f52f4768160a9a
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:02:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"A salesperson’s dream!  How would you like to own your own business without all the headaches? It is our mission to maintain a world class sales and training organization. Superior Lamp has successfully assisted hundreds of people that entered the business with no industry experience. Working for the Nation’s leader, you will enjoy these advantages: Earn $40,000-$65,000 your first year (paid weekly)No Nights, weekends or holidaysAdvancement opportunities/Sales ManagementIndustry leading products & services85% repeat businessRecession proof market & industryProfessional ongoing training 24/7 sales & technical support Field Sales Representative/Account Representative How can Superior Lamp be so sure that we are providing an unrivaled package which will guarantee a long lasting career at Superior Lamp? ·        Sales Commissions that are unrivaled in this industry.  Superior Lamp understands that outside sales is a rewarding job and why not reward our sales professionals accordingly for their hard work.·        Our sales techniques are times tested, why not get paid for how hard you work.  Superior Lamp will help guide you to maximize your earning potential are each sales appointment by providing the best products, services and support.·        24/7 Customer Service. With nearly 40 years of industry experience, our operational team understands what it takes to have long lasting business relationships; Superior Lamp understands that it starts with service. The Superior Lamp Difference: Professional sales training and ongoing support1 on 1 training is provided by our top sales people with additional daily guidance from a personal sales coach to ensure your development  We are currently seeking applicants interested in joining our Professional Sales team:Benefits from our outstanding training programsOne on one local field training in your areaDaily sales support with In-House MentorExcellent income potential 85% Repeat BusinessAll expenses paid Home Office Visits This position will allow you to achieve$40,000 to $65,000 the first year and continue to increase your income year by year.  This is an independent contractor position with all the pluses that offers; such as mileage deduction, tax advantages, retirement saving opportunities and more.  Apply now or fax your resume to learn about the advantages involved as well as the unlimited income potential with this position FOR IMMEDIATE CONSIDERATION CALL  1-800-807-4788 Job Requirements No sales experience necessary! Apply now to change your career! Training includes: All expense paid trip to company headquarters for advanced product and sales trainingPersonal career coachOne-on-One field trainingSales material including portfolio, business cards, demo fixtures and more Keyword Search:  Sales, sales rep, sales manager, sales mgr, outside sales, outside sales representative, outside sales rep, osr, account executive, acct exec, ae, account manager, acct mgr,am, marketing, business development, bus dev, business opportunity, bus opp,  independent contractor, salesperson, salesman, saleswoman,salespeople, selling, industrial, commercial, lighting, lamps, bulbs,fluorescent, tubes,  career position, career opportunity, customer service, retail, entry level, energy, environmental, green, superior, superior lamp, sales director ",Sales – Account Executive – Sales Representative - Sales Director Job in Adams,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project",JOB OVERVIEW,Energy and Utilities Manufacturing - Other Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-%E2%80%93-account-executive-%E2%80%93-sales-representative-sales-director-job-adams-ma-us-169632637.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,a3711229f2f7c1215553d579836a4141
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:06:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Advertising Sales Account Executive Our Advertising & Marketing Account Executive sales position offers:$35k base, commissions, car allowance, gas paid, & health benefits. LogoNation, the leader in community oriented advertising, is rapidly expanding our outside sales team. We are seeking self-motivated and dynamic Sales and Marketing Account Executives (Community Account Manager) for our increasing sales opportunities selling advertising on The Original CommuniTee—our unique community promotion t-shirt. As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, your territory includes 25-30 small towns within a radius up to 120 miles, your daily commute is typically around 45 minutes to an hour with no overnight travel involved. You will meet with town organizations and local business owners to learn about each town and develop a CommuniTee representing and promoting what is unique and special about each town. Job Responsibilities As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, you will establish donation points at local organizations for free CommuniTees donated by LogoNation. You will conduct in person business to business sales presentations to highlight the benefits of the CommuniTee, close sales of CommuniTee ad space to local businesses, and deliver free T-shirts back to each participating business.  Additional responsibilities for our outside sales position include:· Building and maintaining good customer relationships· Meeting sales quotas· Submitting regular reports and communicating with your manager· Daily commute into local towns Job Requirements · Bachelor’s degree, specialization in marketing, communications or    business preferred· Experience in outside sales or experience with the public- however, entry    level job seekers with a track record of success are encouraged to apply· Reliable transportation  Additionally, self-motivated, and competitive individuals who have the drive to overcome obstacles and stay positive despite the inevitable challenges that come with sales typically do the best. Some of those challenges are handling rejection, working independently, and dealing with weather.  Advertising Sales Account Executive Pay and Benefits: ·        Salary $35,000·        Excellent Training (In-field and Home Office) ·        Fast Career Advancement (with our Career Growth Program) ·        Monthly car allowance ·        Monthly cell phone allowance·        Group Health Insurance·        Outstanding commission plan (uncapped commissions)·        Monthly and weekly fun incentive programs·        In-field (in-territory) training·        100% gas reimbursement from day 1·        Fuel card after 6 months·        Free AAA Membership (offering roadside assistance) ·        Paid holidays·        Accrued time off program·        401(K) retirement plan (with company match)·        Excellent communication and in field management support As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation you will have significant income potential and will also gain valuable outside sales training and experience that will propel your career forward. First year total compensation for our Sales and Marketing Account Executives averages $40,000 - $100,000! For more information and to apply, please visit our website!",Sales Representative (Advertising & Marketing) Job in Bloomington,"Full Time, Employee","Bloomington, IN 47405",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-advertising-marketing-job-bloomington-in-us-169418327.aspx?mescoid=4100672001001&jobPosition=19,"40,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,517bdf6302b244e09ebb50c258e04963
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:32:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-sales-manager-sales-owner-operator-job-fairfax-va-us-151144805.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,19b6c100f00e06dfcf50cbd0cef2b596
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:33:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",Sales Professionals – General Manager – Owner Operator – Own your Business with The Master’s Touch Job in Viola,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-professionals-%E2%80%93-general-manager-%E2%80%93-owner-operator-%E2%80%93-own-your-business-with-the-master%E2%80%99s-touch-job-viola-de-us-151145140.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,4a3e7acf520cfd56782b4c8a473a7fb8
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:38:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Retail Sales Consultant Job in West Jordan,,"West Jordan, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-job-west-jordan-ut-us-169637561.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=8,,,95d3cd71389db8c598b42dbc9dbb62c0
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:38:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our firm has achieved significant growth and has been named as a ""Best Firm to Work For"" every year since 2007 by Consulting Magazine. Our Professional Staffing Practice has been recognized as one of the nation's fastest growing talent acquisition firms since 2011. We work with clients to fill Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire opportunities within Management Consulting, IT, Accounting/Finance, Human Resources, and Marketing areas. We are a collaborative, entrepreneurial firm that takes pride in our people, culture, clients and work-life balance. The client is looking for someone who has 3-5 years of experience selling commodity products, especially polypropylene, with the most recent experience being within the last 2-5 years JOB DESCRIPTIONSales Manager - Off Grade Products Ability to develop and close business 5+ years' experience in commodity chemical sales.Excellent communication and sales skills including strong presentation skills Ability to communicate in both English and Spanish. Results orientedComfortable and efficient in working in an autonomous environment.Knowledge / Experience with base resin processing systems such as extruders and injection molding equipment.SAP experience a plus Bachelor's Degree from an accredited college or university in Engineering, Business or Science related disciplinesFlexible - Preferably Midwest Estimate travel 60-70%, mostly NA based travel to customers and manufacturing locations as well as Head office in Houston, TX.May travel to Europe once or twice a year. North Highland is a global consulting firm with a proven record of enabling great returns on our clients' investment. Our high-caliber consultants offer deep experience and expertise across many diverse industries and service areas. We specialize in solving tough business challenges, being easy to work with, and nurturing long-standing relationships with the most recognizable brands in the world. Ask any of our clients, and they'll tell you. North Highland is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, religion, national origin, age, sexual orientation, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or other legally protected status.",Sales Manager (Commodity Chemicals) Job in Arlington Heights,Full Time Employee,"Arlington Heights, OH",Chemicals/Petro-ChemicalsOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-manager-commodity-chemicals-job-arlington-heights-oh-us-169653303.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=19,"120,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,81892ee602f031f46b93295c913a50f6
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:39:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in San Antonio,Part Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169627624.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6e424745b8501ccb10749e6825c30f4e
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:10:44:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"For the third year in a row, Selling Power Magazine ranked SCI/Dignity Memorial on their list of “The 50 Best Companies to Sell For”. We continue to grow our dynamic sales team to meet the increasing demand for our services. Our opportunity represents exceptional income potential, training, benefits, career advancement, and more! This is not just a job. It's a meaningful career in sales that make a difference in the lives of people we serve while providing you an opportunity you will love. Our Advisors assist families, most often in a home sales presentation, by helping them make decisions about the planning of their Funeral Services and Cemetery Property needs in advance of their time of need. Truly a career you can feel GREAT about while still earning a terrific income.We have immediate openings for a Sales Professional at Sunset Memorial Gardens located in Greeley, CO. We provide excellent structured training in the classroom, in the field, and on-line through our award winning Dignity University. Your responsibilities will include making sales presentations, networking, getting referrals, and presenting group informational seminars.We Offer:Unlimited Income Potential via a commissioned incentive packageStability – SCI* (www.sci-corp.com) is the nation's LARGEST provider of funeral, cremation and cemetery servicesFull benefits available (Including Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance, Tuition Assistance Program, PLUS a 401K with a GENEROUS company match)Best in class ~ Professional TrainingState of the Art Electronic Contract Hardware & SoftwareBest in Class ~ Technology and Sales Operating SystemsCareer Advancement OpportunitiesFor additional information regarding our company, please visit our corporate site at www.sci-corp.com. img.img { width: 0px !important;}Sales experience is helpful but not mandatoryComfortable with in-home sales and conducting group presentationsA good driving record / Valid driver's licenseSolid work historyMust submit to and pass a pre-employment background check / drug screening testHigh level of comfort in using computer systems within a sales environmentPrevious experience with Customer Relationship Management (CRM) systems is a plusHigh level of integrity, dedication, and desire to succeedDesire to help others, and earn a competitive incomeAbility to work well as part of a team or independentlyCreative, Outgoing and EnergeticBilingual candidates strongly encouraged to applyLife insurance license preferred or willing to obtainSCI OverviewWho We are. What We do. SCI is more than North America's largest provider of funeral, cremation and cemetery services. We are mothers, fathers, sisters, brothers, sons and daughters who are devoted to the communities where we live and work. We are more than 20,000 dedicated individuals who provide caring assistance to families in need, honor veterans and public servants and deliver lifesaving programs to help keep children and seniors safe. We operate under the umbrella of the Dignity Memorial network of 1,800 funeral homes and cemeteries. Dignity Memorial providers care for more than 300,000 families each year and understand the importance of thoughtful, personalized arrangements. We believe creating meaningful ways to pay tribute to a loved one begins with compassion and is shaped by the understanding that each life is truly unique. For us, there is no greater responsibility than honoring and preserving the story of one's life.As used herein, “SCI” refers to Service Corporation International and its affiliated companies.Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V Apply Here PI94802577",Sales Professional Job in Greeley,Full Time Employee,"Greeley, CO 80634",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-professional-job-greeley-co-us-169634564.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,d5ac69c8641a64282d9c4902757a3461
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:11:45:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We are currently seeking an advertising support assistant who will be responsible for providing support to a national network of local sales representatives. This employee will support up to 15 sales representatives. Duties & Responsibilities: -Work with advertisers and sales representatives to move the order process from origination to completion ? order forms, paperwork, local ad creative, etc.-Assist in providing support for sales representatives within the region-Assist in providing support for advertisers within the region-Work closely with graphic design team in securing creative assets for ad production-Communicate with advertisers to secure ad approvals or facilitate ad revisions as needed-Interact with Traffic Department to effect ad broadcast-Generate and monitor periodic reports Qualifications/Skills:-Four-year degree required - Advertising, Marketing or Communications preferred -Prior customer service experience required-Excellent communication and organizational skills a must-Friendly disposition and the patience required to work with customers via the phone-Self-motivated with the ability to handle a variety of tasks and efficiently manage one?s time-Ability to function in a teamwork environment-Proficient using standard business applications such as Microsoft Word, -Excel, Outlook and Customer Relationship Management software We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1052410 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Advertising Assistant Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time Employee,"Pittsburgh, PA 15276",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/advertising-assistant-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-169426994.aspx?mescoid=4100672001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7eef3dc0bf5df795483318e22f31757e
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:11:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Retail Sales Consultant Job in Murray,,"Murray, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-job-murray-ut-us-169637493.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=11,,,dfd5d43e4d72bd1c264a19731d3575ef
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:12:41:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB OVERVIEW:With a role in the Macy's Cosmetics Department, you will have the opportunity to help others look their best every day. You'll make one-on-one connections with customers to learn their sense of beauty and style, develop your artistic side through customer consultation and make-up and product application, and attain a sense of accomplishment when your skills combine with your passion for beauty to reach personal and team sales goals. Previous cosmetics experience is nice to have, but is not required to begin a career in beauty at Macy's. Performs other duties as assigned.The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:- Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaboration- Partner with Sales Manager and Counter Manager to identify business driving opportunities and stock needs- Develop a repeat-business customer base in order to regularly communicate: upcoming events, new merchandise receipts and product replenishment to increase incremental sales- Participate in pre-selling and sales driving events as well as processing of new receipts, damages, testers, and return to vendors (RTVs)- Attend product training classes and seminars- Regular, dependable attendance & punctualityQUALIFICATIONS:Education /ExperienceHigh school diploma or equivalent. Previous cosmetic or fragrance sales experience a plusCommunication SkillsAbility to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with and present information to customers, vendors, buyers, peers, and all levels of managementMathematical SkillsBasic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American Monetary units.Other SkillsSuperior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Ability to set and achieve goals. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment. Must possess a strong sense of urgency and a thirst for knowledge. Must be able to lead by example.Work HoursAbility to work a flexible schedule including days, nights, weekends, holidays, and sales events,based on department and store/company needs.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an EqualOpportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",**Retail Cosmetics Sales - Beauty Advisor Estee Lauder** Part Time: Arlington,Part Time Employee,"Arlington, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-cosmetics-sales-beauty-advisor-estee-lauder-part-time-arlington-va-macy%E2%80%99s-the-fashio-job-arlington-va-us-169644119.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,285d5cb754d84b39a8f167c873a2b7da
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:12:42:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company: Evoqua Water Technologies LLC (US)Division: IP & S - Equipment SolutionsLocation: WA - SeattleReq ID: 131075Position Title: Capital Sales Account Representative – Seattle, WAExperience Level: Senior LevelEducation Required: Bachelors Degree or equivalent experienceTravel Required: YesCompany Description:Evoqua Water Technologies is the global leader in helping municipalities and industrial customers protect and improve the world’s water. Evoqua has a more than 100-year heritage of transforming water and wastewater through innovation and industry firsts, market-leading expertise, and unmatched customer service. Its treatment systems and services enable regulatory and environmental compliance, ensure uninterrupted quantity and quality of water, increase efficiency through water reuse, and prepare customers for next-generation demands. For more information, visit www.evoqua.com Job Description:Specific Requirements: Evoqua Water Technologies LLC is recruiting for the position of Capital Account Representative in the Northwest United States responsible for sales of Water & Wastewater treatment solutions to our Industrial clients. The Primary responsibilities include all product sales activities & technical support, promoting the following product groups: *Capital sales of water and wastewater systems and solutions- Promotion of service contracts (preventive maintenance & inspections) and Services through our Sales Representative in the Service Division*Promotion of expendables/consumables & spare parts through our Aftermarket Sales RepresentativeOther responsibilities include:*Achieve business objectives within territory, industrial vertical market and at key accounts (for example, penetration of account with product/solution/service offerings)*Guides the development and execution of strategic account plans to ensure achievement of assigned business goals *Develops / builds / cultivates long-term relationships with key management within the customer organization*Assists management in devising sales plans and strategies*May develop forecasts, budgets and operating plans for territory*May form account teams and coordinate team activities while minimizingsales and marketing costs and maximizing sales*May lead team reviews and updates of account plan based on changing market, customer conditions, and competitive activity*Performs advanced areas of work for the professional field*Applies advanced skills to resolve complex problems not covered byexisting procedures or practices independently*Displays a high level of critical thinking in bringing successful resolution to high-impact, complex, and/or cross-functional problemsThe qualifications the ideal candidate will have include: BSCHemE/BA in related discipline, or advanced degree, where required, or equivalent combination of education and experience. Certification may berequired in some areas *Technical Education(chemical/mechanical engineering) complemented by formal sales training.*Good commercial business acumen(familiarity with commercial terms and conditions)*Minimum 2 years experience in water treatment industry (direct sales to end users/intermediaries)*Minimum 5 years industrial capital systems sales experience in related verticals (HPI,CPI,Power, F&B, microelectronics, metals/mining, P&P)*Solution selling experience (specified systems and outcome based requirements) to EPCs, A&E firms and end users.*Demonstrated ability to cultivate and sustain relationships at multiple levels of customer organizations; strong collaboration skills*Disciplined approach to managing opportunities from initial discovery through final disposition.*Goal oriented and results driven; self-starter/initiative and ability to work independently to achieve results.*Proven track record of defining/mining sales territories and achieving market leading growth.*Strong working knowledge of industrial raw water, process water, waste water and integrated treatment processes, units of operation, and economicimpact of same*Strong record of sales success employing consultative sales skills in the sale of large capital systems. Previous industrial capital sales experiencepreferred.*Consultative selling is a relationship-based selling process whereby the account manager identifies the customer's needs (both technical andfinancial); quantifies a technical and financial solution; manages the development of a system solution; and establishes a partnership with thecustomer to implement the solution. The solution will include the sale of large capital systems. The Account Representative will manage thecustomer relationship as well as relationships with internal business center partners to ensure the effective development and delivery of solutions.*Must have valid driver’s license and clean driving record #LI-AP1Equal Employment Opportunity StatementEvoqua Water Technologies is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran or military status. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. .Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 60%",Capital Sales Account Representative – Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA 98188",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/capital-sales-account-representative-%E2%80%93-seattle-wa-job-seattle-wa-us-169654540.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2a82e6eaea281001cbffa2e6692a5132
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:13:33:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Magnolia,Full Time,"Magnolia, AR",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-magnolia-ar-us-169614496.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9148421c7ee8bc17ad5caa65882019b0
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:14:20:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"84 Lumber is searching for a Contractor Sales Representative. This is an excellent opportunity for you to develop a great career in sales with an industry leader! As a Contractor Sales Representative you are responsible for identifying potential customers, building positive relationships, and creating customer loyalty.Responsibilities include:Selling lumber and building materials supplies.Sourcing special orders and other activities that enhance the customer's experience.Must achieve predetermined sales goals at an acceptable margin.Reading and interpreting blueprints & creating material estimates.Scheduling deliveries.Maintains and grows existing customer base across through prospecting, sales development, quoting and customer follow-up to ensure sales goals are met or exceeded.Regular site visits to plan and evaluate customers needs, ensuring prompt and accurate service.Correlates with sales support, operations team and vendor resources to secure business and attain profit and sales goals.Regular account evaluation determining revenue and profitabilityUpdates and maintains accurate account information, customer details, and contact information available to management and support teams.Ability to maintain and grow customer base through prospecting, development, quoting, and follow-up.Computer literate with Microsoft Office and email.Ability to read blue prints and prepare a material take-off list.Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures and government regulations; write reports, business correspondence and procedure manuals; effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers and the general public.Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral or diagram form; deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situations.High School diploma or general education degree (GED).Minimum 3 years sales experience in building materials supply.Demonstrated selling experience, working knowledge of sales forecasting and account management.",Contractor Sales Rep ( D ) Job in Fort Myers,Full Time Employee,"Fort Myers, FL 33916",,http://jobview.monster.com/contractor-sales-rep-1321-2d-001-job-fort-myers-fl-us-169615702.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,13ff6a9082e5d28cec366165f5e2222a
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:14:40:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Fuel Convenience Clerk (Part time) Painesville GetGo Job in Painesville,Full Time Employee,"Painesville, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/fuel-convenience-clerk-part-time-painesville-getgo-job-painesville-oh-us-169078270.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,918f41a72e1c571d6e545a2398b89f65
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:14:41:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-sales-manager-sales-owner-operator-job-carroll-ia-us-151144845.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6beceaf645e35ed94bd1fc3d242bee54
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:14:52:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift Any Hours 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Fuel Convenience Clerk (Part-time) South Euclid GetGo Job in South Euclid,Full Time Employee,"South Euclid, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/fuel-convenience-clerk-part-time-south-euclid-getgo-job-south-euclid-oh-us-169084108.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=1,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,8bf7b10f6ba58bbdfe6dcfce3c256566
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:15:44:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5255239-1Location: Ashburn,VAJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goals Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Street Address VA-Ashburn: 42995 Eastern Kingbird Plz - Ashburn, VADisclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Ashburn,Full Time Employee,"Ashburn, VA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-ashburn-va-us-169626887.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5f579a37db98f6d7db0fbc5313633b79
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:15:44:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview:Advertising Consultant -Outside Sales RepresentativeIf you’re in sales, this is the opportunity to take your career to the next level. It’s the chance to join a global company, the opportunity to drive business for a leading provider of digital and print advertising services, and, in turn, build arewarding and lucrative career. This is your chance to partner with hibu, a company dedicated to helping communities thrive by connecting local consumers and merchants.Right now, we are seeking a talented Advertising Consultant (Account Manager) for our outside sales team. We help small to mid-size businesses compete in the digital world with a broad range of marketing solutions, and you help us make the connection. You will hunt for new opportunities, build consultative client relationships, and work one-on-one with business owners to grow advertising strategies. WithUNCAPPED commissions,bonuses,full benefits, and abook of business, this is the opportunity your entrepreneurial spirit has been craving!As an Advertising Consultant you will enjoy:·         Base Salary & Book of Business·Productivity Bonuses·         Expense Allowance for your car and cell phone·         UNCAPPED Commissions·World Class Paid Training, plus ongoing training·Promotion opportunitiesfor ALL Top Performers·         Medical, Dental, Vision, Prescription, Life Insurance; FSA, EAP, and Disability Benefits·         Employee referral bonuses and tuition assistance·         401(k) retirement plan with discretionary matching·         Paid holidays, personal, and vacation daysResponsibilities:An Advertising Consultant collaborates with business owners to grow advertising strategies. You are accountable for meeting and exceeding sales goals.Additional responsibilities:·         Maintain and grow current print accounts·         Leverage relationships for referrals·         Sell new accounts digital and print solutions·         Run multiple sales appointments; meet face-to-face with customers·         Work in a virtual environment·         Use iPad to sell the hibu product suiteRequirements:From bonuses to promotions; we reward performance! Ready to take control of your paycheck and career? We’re looking for a go-getter who will become a media expert on all hibu products. Someone who’s not scared to pound the pavement, network, and get involved in the community. If that’s you, we want to hear from you!Advertising Consultant requirements:·         2+ years sales, marketing or advertising experience·         Proven track record of successful account management·         Proficient use of Microsoft Office including Power Point, Excel, and Outlook·         Technically savvy and proficient user of the iPad·         Strong work ethic and highly motivated·         Excellent time-management and organizational skills·         Self-disciplined to work independently·         Ability to walk up to 5 miles per day, carry up to 25 pounds, sit or drive 2-4 hours, and stand 1-2 hours per day·         Successful completion of a drug screen and background check·         Reliable, insured transportation in most markets·         Valid state driver’s licenseBenefits:Why choose hibu?OO“Good benefits and training, company provides tools you need”– Sales Representative“The best reason for working at hibu is the people”– Senior Manager“Variety of advertising solutions. Increased base salary. Work schedule very flexible. You run your own business”– Manager“Excellent Management that wants you to succeed. Continued Training that gives you tools and knowledge that is always keeping up with the times. Minimal sales meetings that keeps you in the field making money. Easy bonus structure that if you swing doors and hit the phones they are highly attainable.”– Account Executive/Media ConsultantSay hello to hibu:hibu helps communities thrive by facilitating millions of connections each year between consumers who want to find products and services locally and the merchants who provide them.hibu helps consumers find local businesses and shop in new, innovative ways. Its dedicated online hibu markets provide comprehensive, convenient access to local goods and services. hibu helps merchants compete in the digital world with a broad range of marketing and commerce solutions delivered online and through hibu’s direct sales teams. Building on its heritage as a premier directories provider, hibu continues to offer a full range of print- and distribution-based marketing services.hibu operates in the US, UK, Spain, Argentina, Chile, Peru and US Hispanic Markets. hibu has 1 million Small/Medium Enterprise (SME) customers and total revenues of £1.3 billionOur employees:We embrace and value diversity in everything we do. This melting pot of differing opinions, perspectives, cultures and backgrounds energizes the company and fuels our passion to do what's right for our consumers, our clients and our employees. It drives our entrepreneurial culture, generates new ideas throughout the organization and makes hibu a better, smarter, rewarding company for those of us fortunate enough to work here.For further information about hibu, visitwww.hibu.comTogether, we can take your career farther than you’ve imagined!Apply Today!Options:Apply for this job online ApplyShareRefer this job to a friend ReferShare on your newsfeedShare|",Advertising Consultant - Outside Sales Representative Job in Brentwood,Full Time,"Brentwood, TN",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/advertising-consultant-outside-sales-representative-job-brentwood-tn-us-169657975.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),002139162b354fa7b2bd9e91e408fa30
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:16:41:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:Founded in 2007, Club Pilates is the nation's largest and fastest-growing Pilates franchise, offering several signature class formats in order to fit the needs of all clients - from young to more senior, and from beginner to advanced.  The first studio to create a 500 hour Teacher Training Program designed to thoroughly and safely teach group Pilates apparatus classes that flow.  Club Pilates currently has more than 100 territories sold, approximately 40,000 members, 100+ instructors and 75,000 monthly workouts throughout the United States and Australia.  For more information, please visit www.clubpilates.com POSITION: The purpose of the Sales Rep is to represent Club Pilates to potential clients, bringing new members in the door.  Along with bringing in new members, the Sales Rep also focuses on retaining current members.  Pilate’s fitness background is preferred but not required; candidates with a strong sales management background are also ideal. REQUIREMENTS:Pilates fitness background is preferred but not required; candidates with a strong sales management background are also ideal.Excellent sales, communication, and customer service skills requiredGoal-oriented with an ability to achieve sales of an acceptable number of units per monthAbility to learn and use the Club Ready membership sales systemRequires the ability to stand or sit for up to 8 hours throughout the workdayHearing sufficient to understand conversations, both in person and on the telephoneMust be able to work under pressure and meet tight deadlinesMust communicate professionally and effectively to clients and colleaguesMust have excellent public speaking skillsMust have proficient computer skillsValid drivers’ license, proof of insurance, and access to reliable transportation. Must have a clean DMV record and successfully pass background check. Daily and/or occasional travel may be required. RESPONSIBILITIES:Contact prospective members to explain benefits of a regular Pilates routine and costs of membershipConduct tours of the facility while establishing a relationship and targeting individual’s needs and wantsMaintain acceptable level of personal sales productionEmphasize and enforce objectives of the club as a fitness and wellness providerPresent available services to current or prospective membersBook quality appointments to achieve monthly sales quotaParticipate in special events (health fairs, grand openings, marathons, and community and hospital events) to promote the clubAssumes responsibility for developing selling skillsOther duties as assigned COMPENSATION & BENEFITS:This position offers a very competitive base salary; based on experience.($12-15hrly)Plus 10% Commission Paid on Sales!!Bonus’s also paid on Performance as well!!Successful Sales Reps can minimally expect to make $50-$75,000 yearly with the opportunity to increase that amount each year. Unlimited Growth Potential as well within the company.",Sales Rep Job in Beaverton,Full Time Employee,"Beaverton, OR 97005",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-job-beaverton-or-us-169070617.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,12.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e79d67fe0b1a8d2212758704826b58b7
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:16:42:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are now hiring for Marketing & Advertising Sales Coordinators in the local area. These openings are ENTRY LEVEL, no experience is necessary, we love to train! We have a very successful history developing entry level candidates into high performing market managers. The primary focus of a Marketing & Advertising Sales Coordinator is: Designing and Executing Marketing and Promotional Campaigns for clientsManage Advertising Promotions - Promotions Materials, Public Relations, MerchandizingSales - Client Acquisition through excellent brand consultingOur clients are currently partnered with over 20 different clients-ranging from health and wellness, automotive products and technology! Our daily work environment is fun, fast paced and energetic. Our goal is simple: we want to help our clients exceed their goals by providing world class service, quality and value while providing an avenue to develop vibrant, enthusiastic individuals that are eager to learn and grow with our company.IDEAL CANDIDATES WILL BE TRAINED TO:Learn marketing portfolio of clients quicklySchedule promotions and manage calendarPrepare the necessary marketing materials for campaignsInteract with customers through field marketing activitiesManage client relationshipDUE TO OUR BUSIEST SEASON OF THE YEAR WE ARE LOOKING FOR IMMEDIATE HIRES. ALL OPENINGS ARE ENTRY LEVEL WITH OPPORTUNITY TO ADVANCE TO MANAGEMENT. *All promotions are from within*RequirementsEntry Level  Marketing & Advertising Coordinator RequirementsAbility to learn basic sales and marketing skillsDetail orientedFun and outgoing personalityStrong people skillsAbility to work with a team as well as individuallyPerformance drivenExcellent time management skillsCoachableIf you have any of the following experiences we would like to hear from you: event sales, business-to-business sales, event promotions, retail, restaurant, fundraising, event marketing and promotions.Key Words: Marketing, Sales, Customer Service, Entry Level, Junior, Promotions, Advertising, Communications, Brand, Events.",Marketing & Advertising Coordinator - Entry Level Job in Binghamton,"Full Time, Employee","Binghamton, NY 13902",Advertising and PR Services;Staffing/Employment Agencies;Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-advertising-coordinator-entry-level-job-binghamton-ny-us-169126138.aspx?mescoid=1100005001001&jobPosition=11,,Marketing/Product,59d7bd4d8f9697c4dc485ddbb5b5e345
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:17:28:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"A salesperson’s dream!  How would you like to own your own business without all the headaches? It is our mission to maintain a world class sales and training organization. Superior Lamp has successfully assisted hundreds of people that entered the business with no industry experience. Working for the Nation’s leader, you will enjoy these advantages: Earn $40,000-$65,000 your first year (paid weekly)No Nights, weekends or holidaysAdvancement opportunities/Sales ManagementIndustry leading products & services85% repeat businessRecession proof market & industryProfessional ongoing training 24/7 sales & technical support Field Sales Representative/Account Representative How can Superior Lamp be so sure that we are providing an unrivaled package which will guarantee a long lasting career at Superior Lamp? ·        Sales Commissions that are unrivaled in this industry.  Superior Lamp understands that outside sales is a rewarding job and why not reward our sales professionals accordingly for their hard work.·        Our sales techniques are times tested, why not get paid for how hard you work.  Superior Lamp will help guide you to maximize your earning potential are each sales appointment by providing the best products, services and support.·        24/7 Customer Service. With nearly 40 years of industry experience, our operational team understands what it takes to have long lasting business relationships; Superior Lamp understands that it starts with service. The Superior Lamp Difference: Professional sales training and ongoing support1 on 1 training is provided by our top sales people with additional daily guidance from a personal sales coach to ensure your development  We are currently seeking applicants interested in joining our Professional Sales team:Benefits from our outstanding training programsOne on one local field training in your areaDaily sales support with In-House MentorExcellent income potential 85% Repeat BusinessAll expenses paid Home Office Visits This position will allow you to achieve$40,000 to $65,000 the first year and continue to increase your income year by year.  This is an independent contractor position with all the pluses that offers; such as mileage deduction, tax advantages, retirement saving opportunities and more.  Apply now or fax your resume to learn about the advantages involved as well as the unlimited income potential with this position FOR IMMEDIATE CONSIDERATION CALL  1-800-807-4788 Job Requirements No sales experience necessary! Apply now to change your career! Training includes: All expense paid trip to company headquarters for advanced product and sales trainingPersonal career coachOne-on-One field trainingSales material including portfolio, business cards, demo fixtures and more Keyword Search:  Sales, sales rep, sales manager, sales mgr, outside sales, outside sales representative, outside sales rep, osr, account executive, acct exec, ae, account manager, acct mgr,am, marketing, business development, bus dev, business opportunity, bus opp,  independent contractor, salesperson, salesman, saleswoman,salespeople, selling, industrial, commercial, lighting, lamps, bulbs,fluorescent, tubes,  career position, career opportunity, customer service, retail, entry level, energy, environmental, green, superior, superior lamp, sales director ",Sales – Account Executive – Sales Representative - Sales Director Job in Pottsville,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project",JOB OVERVIEW,Energy and Utilities Manufacturing - Other Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-%E2%80%93-account-executive-%E2%80%93-sales-representative-sales-director-job-pottsville-pa-us-169633770.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,0b68ff1b2ccb9d348c10ff764074be93
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:17:28:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-sales-manager-sales-owner-operator-job-scottsville-ny-us-151144704.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,81424820bc4bb14e83211c71e124288b
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:17:38:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drive your Future!Pilot Flying J is seeking an experienced Retail General Manager to oversee our high-volume retail facilities. You will be responsible for the generation and execution of travel center and restaurant business plans to achieve established standards, sales and profit objectives as well as customer satisfaction. The Retail General Manager will also be:• Ensuring that customer expectations are met• Conducting meetings with subordinate employees • Maintaining effective vendor relationshipsAs a Retail General Manager for Pilot Flying J, you will build, coach, manage and develop teams from a staffing, interviewing, hiring and training standpoint.Additional responsibilities for the Retail General Manager include:• Driving sales• Managing team members• Tracking inventory• Providing customer service• Performing P&L analysis What Are We Looking For? As a Retail General Manager, you must exemplify integrity and accountability at the managerial level as well as demonstrate excellent team leadership skills. Furthermore, you must be able to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends and holidays.Additional requirements of the Restaurant General Manager include:• Minimum 2-3 years of management experience in the retail, restaurant, grocery or other service industry with responsibility for financial results• Previous management proficiency in high volume retail with P&L accountability• Ability to create and maintain a customer focused culture Benefits: • Nation-wide Medical Plan/Dental/Vision • 401(k) • Flexible Spending Accounts • Adoption Assistance • Tuition Reimbursement • Flexible Schedule • Weekly Pay",Retail General Manager - Retail Manager - Retail Assistant Manager Job in Shreveport,,"Shreveport, LA 71101",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-general-manager-retail-manager-retail-assistant-manager-job-shreveport-la-us-169055435.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,17a9d21aa20a5a538db8fa3615e5640c
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:17:38:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Retail Sales Consultant Bilingual Mandarin Required Job in Escondido,,"Escondido, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-bilingual-mandarin-required-job-escondido-ca-us-168813131.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=8,,,c81c3ba0e19777b2c0c25ae1da367c95
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:17:41:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Advertising Sales Account Executive Our Advertising & Marketing Account Executive sales position offers:$35k base, commissions, car allowance, gas paid, & health benefits. LogoNation, the leader in community oriented advertising, is rapidly expanding our outside sales team. We are seeking self-motivated and dynamic Sales and Marketing Account Executives (Community Account Manager) for our increasing sales opportunities selling advertising on The Original CommuniTee—our unique community promotion t-shirt. As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, your territory includes 25-30 small towns within a radius up to 120 miles, your daily commute is typically around 45 minutes to an hour with no overnight travel involved. You will meet with town organizations and local business owners to learn about each town and develop a CommuniTee representing and promoting what is unique and special about each town. Job Responsibilities As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation, you will establish donation points at local organizations for free CommuniTees donated by LogoNation. You will conduct in person business to business sales presentations to highlight the benefits of the CommuniTee, close sales of CommuniTee ad space to local businesses, and deliver free T-shirts back to each participating business.  Additional responsibilities for our outside sales position include:· Building and maintaining good customer relationships· Meeting sales quotas· Submitting regular reports and communicating with your manager· Daily commute into local towns Job Requirements · Bachelor’s degree, specialization in marketing, communications or    business preferred· Experience in outside sales or experience with the public- however, entry    level job seekers with a track record of success are encouraged to apply· Reliable transportation  Additionally, self-motivated, and competitive individuals who have the drive to overcome obstacles and stay positive despite the inevitable challenges that come with sales typically do the best. Some of those challenges are handling rejection, working independently, and dealing with weather.  Advertising Sales Account Executive Pay and Benefits: ·        Salary $35,000·        Excellent Training (In-field and Home Office) ·        Fast Career Advancement (with our Career Growth Program) ·        Monthly car allowance ·        Monthly cell phone allowance·        Group Health Insurance·        Outstanding commission plan (uncapped commissions)·        Monthly and weekly fun incentive programs·        In-field (in-territory) training·        100% gas reimbursement from day 1·        Fuel card after 6 months·        Free AAA Membership (offering roadside assistance) ·        Paid holidays·        Accrued time off program·        401(K) retirement plan (with company match)·        Excellent communication and in field management support As a Sales and Marketing Account Executive for LogoNation you will have significant income potential and will also gain valuable outside sales training and experience that will propel your career forward. First year total compensation for our Sales and Marketing Account Executives averages $40,000 - $100,000! For more information and to apply, please visit our website!",Sales Representative (Advertising & Marketing) Job in Indianapolis,"Full Time, Employee","Indianapolis, IN 46205",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-advertising-marketing-job-indianapolis-in-us-169418273.aspx?mescoid=4100672001001&jobPosition=20,"40,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Sales/Retail/Business Development,7cd0021f0ab5251822913cf80d653d9c
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:17:42:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Support the Ashland Specialty Ingredients Coatings and Construction Specialties growth strategy by leading the technical support for sales growth of new and existing products in North America. This position will be located in Wilmington, DE.Responsibilities:Provide technical leadership for management of strategic account relationships, new product launches, competitive benchmarking and co-supplier relationships which includes development of technical data packages, presentations, and sales tools.Maintains well established working relationships with customers, suppliers and vendors to support program objectives.Perform laboratory work as required to meet objectives.Ability to travel (up to 20%)US citizenship, permanent residency status in the US, or other authorization by the Attorney General.Skills and Competencies:Demonstrated subject matter expertiseDemonstrated ability to lead teamsProblem solving and technical abilityStrong interpersonal and organizational skillsStrong communication skills: written, oral and presentationKnowledge of structure- property relationships *This position is located in Wilmington, DE.**This job is based on a ladder structure and the job level (salary) will be determined by the quantity and quality of your experience. BS required in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or Polymer/Materials science or related disciplineMA/MS preferred.Minimum ten years of experience in an industrial laboratory setting in coatings, joint compound, thin set mortars or related field15 years or more experience preferred.TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION, please select the Apply button. If no Apply button is provided, please visit Ashland's Career Center. Once there, enter job number 2016-6142 in the Keyword Search field to find this posting and apply online. NOTE: We do not accept resumes from external staffing agencies or independent recruiters for any of our openings unless we have a signed recruiting agreement in place to fill a specific position. In more than 100 countries, the people of Ashland Inc. (NYSE: ASH) provide the specialty chemicals, technologies and insights to help customers create new and improved products for today and sustainable solutions for tomorrow. Our chemistry is at work every day in a wide variety of markets and applications, including architectural coatings, automotive, construction, energy, personal care and pharmaceutical. Visit www.ashland.com to see the innovations we offer through our three commercial units - Ashland Specialty Ingredients, Ashland Performance Materials and Valvoline. At Ashland our vision is to be a leading, global specialty chemicals company whose inspired and engaged employees add value to all we touch. In fact our people, employees, customers and vendors define who we are. They are the driving force behind everything we do. Not only do we value our customers but we value our employees, and we work to offer them a dynamic and challenging environment. We hold ourselves to high standards at Ashland, and we value integrity and honesty. Ashland has a history of attracting the best people and keeping them. The reasons are simple: industry competitive salary and benefits, pay-for-performance incentive plans and a diverse work environment where employees feel challenged and valued. People come to Ashland and stay. As a growing Fortune 500 specialty chemicals company, we offer opportunities for development and advancement throughout our global organization. Our values define who we are and what we care about as a company. If you are looking for a relationship with a company instead of simply a job, this may be a great fit. Ashland is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation. Ashland is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. PI94804004Apply Here",Senior Staff Scientist - Coatings Technical Service Job in Wilmington,,"Wilmington, DE 19801",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-staff-scientist-coatings-technical-service-job-wilmington-de-us-169651510.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=6,,,1d076a185d442fd7dcb9a0fd41c7c62b
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:18:21:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Account Manager (Sales, Marketing, & Business Development) - Entry Level - Immediate Hire!Businesses that partner with The Icon Groups come in all shapes, sizes and market caps. Our tried and true sales and marketing system works for them all.You’re new to the work force but you’re ambitious and looking to hit the ground running. Your communication skills and leadership abilities shapes how new and existing business grows. You leverage your entrepreneurial drive to target, educate and persuade new customers to embrace our client’s latest services and technologies. Using your influencing and relationship-building skills, you provide caliber client service and team building initiatives. You anticipate how decisions are made, understand the details of individual campaigns and persistently explore and uncover the business needs of key clients and the The Icon Groups team. Working with them, you set the vision of the business development strategy.Be at the heart of The Icon Groups' future business, managing cutting edge sales and marketing campaigns with your inordinate talent of multitasking efficiency. What you love most is delivering success, exceeding expectations around such tasks as optimal sales campaign delivery, team building, solution consultations, turnarounds, and get excited when new, never been done before challenges fall into your lap!ResponsibilitiesExecute day to day sales, marketing, and campaign managementExcel in our management training program working from Entry Level to Senior ManagementThis job involves one on one sales interaction with customersManage the implementation and delivery of a key client’s activity, maximizing performance, return on investment, and identifying opportunity to expandOwn all problem solving, troubleshooting, client campaign requests, media planning and key implementationsBuild client relationships through service excellence and balance their campaign needs with your proactive approachGet your hands dirty with team building, growth, and expansion effortsThis position offers a compensation structure where pay is based upon individual performance**This is an entry level position with advancement opportunities into senior management**www.theicongroups.comJOB REQUIREMENTSMinimum qualificationsBA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience.Relevant experience in a leadership roleAbility to speak English fluently and idiomatically.Preferred qualificationsInternship experience in sales, marketing and account management.Interest in developing customer partnerships.Detail oriented with the ability to prioritize, plan, and organize sales activity.If you're up for the challenge and fit these qualifications send us your resume!The Icon Groups' Mission Statement:Our mission for excellence starts with individuals that believe in themselves.Building a foundation for success and development of other people is the key to helping others reach their goals and going beyond their potential.www.theicongroups.comThe Icon Groups  is looking for people with skills in: sales, entry level management, sales or account management, retail sales, sales representative, full time entry level sales, communication, sales techniques, marketing, full time account manager, full time management, managing a sales team, full time inside sales, entry level field sales, telephone sales, IT sales, entry level sales, sales analyst, national account manager, software sales, entry level medical sales, full time advertising sales, entry level management, full time distribution sales, full time sales management, inside sales, entry level inside sales, full time sales and marketing, retail sales, retail management",Account Manager (Sales,Full Time Employee,"Nashville, TN 37228",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-sales-marketing-business-development-entry-level-immediate-hire!-job-nashville-tn-us-164312325.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ddb9d5d7a81c68aa178e98bc0295d2f0
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:18:40:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $50,636 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $57,511 per year. You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Apply now. Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Retail Sales Consultant Santa Barbara\Goleta Area CA Job in Santa Barbara,,"Santa Barbara, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-consultant-santa-barbara-goleta-area-ca-job-santa-barbara-ca-us-169636997.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=18,,,59a28a91c5b70912ccad832585192cdb
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:18:41:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"4080 Lexington Road, Nicholasville, KY 40356 AUTOMOTIVE SERVICE ADVISOR Hiring now!POTENTIAL INCOME - UP TO $80K! Please apply online. Questions? Please contact Jason Roney, Service Director at 859-271-1800 Glenn Ford Lincoln is adding to our team of Service Advisors. Come work for a successful dealership that offers a great benefits package! Glenn Ford Lincoln is proud to be one of the premier dealerships in Lexington Nicholasville area. While Auto Service Advisor or Technician experience is a plus, it is not required. We will train the right individual. If you are a people-person, have strong customer service skills, and have a passion for cars, we'd like to talk with you! Service Advisor - Job Responsibilities: Greet customers and assist them with any inquiries.Consult with customer on applicable service specialsDocument services declined and ask for follow-up on future service considerationsKeep customer informed on completion times, service expenses, and possible changesRemain involved with delivery of vehicle to customer upon completion to assure all customer concerns are addressedProvide concierge support for all owner inquiries, whether by phone or in person, to assure the customer has a positive service experienceBuild strong relationships with the customers Service Advisor - Requirements: Service Advisor Experience preferred but not requiredStrong written and oral communication skillsMust have strong customer service skills Valid Driver's license and clean driving recordAble to work efficiently and multi-task in a fast-paced environment Job Benefits: We provide a positive, professional work environment with the best training in the industry. We believe in employee development through training and advancement from within. Our team members enjoy terrific benefits which include: Potential Income Up to $80K!Medical & Dental Health Benefits401(k)Great Team Environment! We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants must be able to demonstrate the ability to pass pre-employment testing to include background checks, MVR, and drug screen. Service Advisor, Automotive Service Advisor, Automotive Service Writer, auto dealership service department jobs, auto dealership service department service writer jobs, Nicholasville, Kentucky service advisor; Jessamine County; Lexington, Kentucky; Fayette County; Kentucky auto jobs; Kentucky service advisor jobs",AUTOMOTIVE SERVICE ADVISOR,Full Time,"Nicholasville, KY 40356",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/automotive-service-advisor-earn-up-to-80k-exp-preferred-not-req'd-great-benefits!-glen-ford-job-nicholasville-ky-us-169640429.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,2b06458c3b85f48915163320cde4e3b1
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:19:42:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Information:Sales Support Representative position with a company that gives back and works one-on-one with families in your community. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.We Need:Entry level and senior level applicant who is service-minded and wants to help people, gain experience and earn the money they need.You Will Help Your Community By:- Supporting the needs of people in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Providing customer service and communicationYou Only Need:- A high school diploma or equivalent- Be a people-person that likes interaction among others- Be independent-minded and flexible- Outstanding communication skillsWho Is American Income?We are American Income Life Insurance Company. We are a significant provider of supplemental insurance and have been helping labor unions, credit unions and associations with their insurance coverage needs. We strive to make a difference in lives of people across the United States, Canada and New Zealand.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at www.ailcareers.com",Quality Sales Associate Job Job in Greensboro,Part Time/ Temporary/Contract/Project,"Greensboro, NC 27405",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-sales-associate-job-job-greensboro-nc-us-169638905.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Entry Level,520788959039722585e9de88ae714fe6
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:19:42:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drive your Future! Pilot Flying J is committed to making life better for Professional drivers. Pilot Flying J has over 650 retail locations and is the largest operator of travel centers and travel plazas in North America. With over 350 restaurants, we are one of the largest restaurant franchisees in America. We serve our customers 24 hours a day, 365 days a year. If you are customer-service driven and thrive in a fast-paced, high-energy environment, then we've got the opportunity you've been looking for. Now Hiring! Retail Shift Managers Restaurant Shift Managers Face to Face Interviews: Wednesdays, May 4th - 25th2:00pm - 4:00pm Location: Flying J(I-25 Exit 7)2250 Etchepare DriveCheyenne, WY 82007Phone: (307) 635-2918 What Are We Looking For? Our team ensures each customer in our Travel Centers receives excellent customer service. Our team achieves this by consistently delivering fast service, friendly smiles, and clean facilities to all of our customers. You could be our ideal candidate if you have: • Incredible customer service skills & the ability to help maintain a customer focused culture.• Ability to work as part of a team and interact with different levels from hourly team members, customers, vendors, and corporate representatives.• Ability to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends, and holidays. - Flexible Schedule - 401(k) - Weekly Pay - Flexible spending account - Medical/Dental/Vision - Tuition reimbursement - Adoption Assistance   - Pilot Flying J provides an extensive training program to help provide new hires with everything they need to succeed and thrive in our fast-paced environment! Click the APPLY NOW button, or visit your local Pilot Travel Center or Flying J Travel Plaza to apply!",Retail Shift Manager - Restaurant Shift Manager - Deli Shift Manager - Open Interviews! Job in Cheyenne,,"Drive your Future! Pilot Flying J is committed to making life better for Professional drivers. Pilot Flying J has over 650 retail locations and is the largest operator of travel centers and travel plazas in North America. With over 350 restaurants, we are one of the largest restaurant franchisees in America. We serve our customers 24 hours a day, 365 days a year. If you are customer-service driven and thrive in a fast-paced, high-energy environment, then we've got the opportunity you've been looking for. Now Hiring! Retail Shift Managers Restaurant Shift Managers Face to Face Interviews: Wednesdays, May 4th - 25th2:00pm - 4:00pm Location: Flying J(I-25 Exit 7)2250 Etchepare DriveCheyenne, WY 82007Phone: (307) 635-2918 What Are We Looking For? Our team ensures each customer in our Travel Centers receives excellent customer service. Our team achieves this by consistently delivering fast service, friendly smiles, and clean facilities to all of our customers. You could be our ideal candidate if you have: • Incredible customer service skills & the ability to help maintain a customer focused culture.• Ability to work as part of a team and interact with different levels from hourly team members, customers, vendors, and corporate representatives.• Ability to work a flexible schedule of nights, days, weekends, and holidays. - Flexible Schedule - 401(k) - Weekly Pay - Flexible spending account - Medical/Dental/Vision - Tuition reimbursement - Adoption Assistance   - Pilot Flying J provides an extensive training program to help provide new hires with everything they need to succeed and thrive in our fast-paced environment! Click the APPLY NOW button, or visit your local Pilot Travel Center or Flying J Travel Plaza to apply!",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-shift-manager-restaurant-shift-manager-deli-shift-manager-open-interviews!-job-cheyenne-wy-us-169055595.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=1,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,2c39778757949aef9f5efc8960d6c018
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:20:42:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Seymour,Full Time,"Seymour, IN",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-seymour-in-us-169614621.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),63b83a62657d5b52fce1aa833bc8776f
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:20:43:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis Engineering has an immediate need for a Technical Sales Engineer to support work for a global manufacturing company in San Antonio, TX. JOB RESPONSIBILITIES: We are currently seeking a high energy, motivated Technical Sales Engineer / Professional to join our sales team to market and sell Applied and Industrial HVAC products and solutions to current and potential customers within our territory. We have an experienced sales team and staff that can provide the proper training and support, as needed, for the right individual. Specific responsibilities for this position include: Routinely call on and support our customers, which include Mechanical Contractors, Consulting MEP firms and Facility Owners / Developers (School Districts, Universities, Hospitals, Private Corporations, etc). Manage and grow assigned territory and business through existing and new accounts by building solid long term relationships, promoting our client's line card of products, attending trade shows and marketing events, supporting our local educational efforts, etc Achieve annual sales, gross margin and market share targets set by management Daily duties include executing takeoffs and quotes, assisting in bid day operations, follow-up and close work with customers, handle post-sale submittal and order entry work and assist with project management duties once the equipment has shipped to the customer including cash collection and accounts receivable responsibilities. EDUCATION / CERTIFICATIONS: BA/BS degree with 4-6+ years relevant work experience. BS in Mechanical Engineering or a related technical discipline preferred. EXPERIENCE / QUALIFICATIONS: Knowledge of HVAC design and application tools preferred Exceptional communication skills and customer focus Comprehensive knowledge of MS Office software applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook) High attention to detail a must Be team oriented and have the ability to work in a fast paced environment PE Certification desired, LEED AP accreditation a plusExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Technical Sales Engineer Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,Technical Sales Engineer,"San Antonio, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/technical-sales-engineer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-169655191.aspx?mescoid=4100688001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,a2aa3351f9233cc304c8d4c90e234906
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:21:41:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Outside Sales Account Manager In most sales organizations, prospecting can take up all of your time, limiting the amount of money you can earn. We not only provide our sales consultants with pre-set, daily appointments with qualified business owners but also have experienced sales managers on staff to provide sales support ensuring YOU CLOSE DEALS! Our industry is exploding with business. We need talented high energy sales professionals to join our world-class organization.Requirements:Outside business to business sales experienceAssertive and positive attitudeEthical approach to businessEffective closing abilityNetworking and business development skillsPower to learn and execute marketing and sales programsStrong desire to succeedBenefits:Professional sales training and ongoing supportClosing assistance at every appointment with your sales managerMultiple income streams (performance based commission plus bonus)3,500+ per month in bonuses on top of regular commissionsGenerous Gas Bonus/Self-Gen BonusAverage commission $690 on every saleState of the art programs and innovative products that merchants needNo nights and no weekends (appointments are 9 am to 4 pm Mon - Fri) Excellent customer service after saleShort sales cycle - one call closeA+ rated company and accredited by the Better Business BureauRecession proof industryApply now to speak with one of our corporate recruiters and find out if you qualify to join our fast growing high energy sales team.",Outside Sales Account Manager Job in Albany,,"Albany, NY",All,http://jobview.monster.com/outside-sales-account-manager-job-albany-ny-us-161983092.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,6c9771f7af3ca830269bd2586ea8253f
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:21:42:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-sales-manager-sales-owner-operator-job-balitmore-md-us-151144656.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f5e142e25a72fa59dc0929d4732dbbad
United States of America,US,10/Jul/2016:21:49:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regardless of college major or professional experience, nearly 100% of our full-time employees start out in our Sales Management Training Program. This allows everyone to learn our business from the ground up and understand how they play a significant role in seeing it succeed. Once you've completed your initial orientation and training, you'll be assigned to a branch office in your home area and the hands-on training begins. You'll learn valuable business skills from capable mentors who were once in your shoes. Nearly 100% of all our managers and corporate executives started out as Sales Management Trainees. During your first year, you will actively participate in everything from sales and marketing and customer service to operations and finance. As you progress, you will be tested and evaluated to determine your proficiency in these areas. Successful completion of these tests and evaluations will result in rewards, pay increases and the opportunity for continued promotions. As you progress, increasingly more opportunities will become available to you. You can choose, as most people do, to continue your rewarding ascent within our Rental Operations managerial track or you can explore one of many other exciting options including Fleet Management, Human Resources, Car Sales, Accounting, Marketing and more. As a Sales Management Trainee, you are empowered to make business decisions that greatly affect your career as well as the bottom line. You'll gain responsibility for developing new business and maintaining current relationships. You'll be responsible for understanding cost control, reading your branch's P&L statement and understanding what it takes to run a profitable business. You will also learn how to deliver superior customer service. We will teach you how to effectively communicate, influence and interact with all types of customers, vendors and co-workers. You'll learn proper sales techniques to problem solving and conflict management. Those skills will provide you with the opportunity to market to local business partners and build solid, long-lasting relationships with key business decision-makers. In your development to become a successful manager at Enterprise, you'll learn how to mentor, train, develop, manage and promote a staff of your own. Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledBachelor's degree required.Must have a minimum of 6 months of sales (business to business, commission based or quota based) or customer service or marketing or management experience.Must have a valid driver's license with no more than 2 moving violations and/or at fault accidents in the past 3 years.No drug or alcohol related conviction on your record in the past 5 years (i.e., DUI, DWI)Must be at least 18 years old.Must be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the future.",Sales Management Trainee-Madison,,"Madison, IN",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-management-trainee-madison-in-carrolton-ky-job-madison-in-us-169655273.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,33953b54712020324a76d3b9ff84997c
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:12:23:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Plans and coordinates preparation of project documentation, such as engineering drawings, production specifications and schedules, and contract modifications, to ensure customer contract requirements are met. Reviews contract to determine documentation required for each phase of project, applying knowledge of engineering and manufacturing processes. Analyzes proposed changes of product design to determine effect on overall product and system. Coordinates modification records for management control. Establishes change orders and prepares for change authorization and documentation by company and subcontractor. Reviews and analyzes released engineering change data and coordinates changes with engineering, quality, support, manufacturing, and engineering data control activities. Security Clearance / International Traffic In Arms Regulations (ITAR) This position requires use of information which is subject to the International Traffic In Arms Regulations (ITAR). Therefore, all applicants must be U.S. Persons as defined in ITAR 120.15 (e.g., U.S. Citizen or Permanent Resident (Green Card holder) or protected individual. ULA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other categories protected by law. ULA is a participant in the federal E-Verify Program. Requirements:Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Technical, Communications, Business Management, or related disciplinesPrevious experience with technical or production environmentExperience or knowledge of Configuration ManagementPrior experience with Engineering drawings, specifications, change orders or prior experience with -Data Management, Intellectual Property, Compliance Background in Audit, Contracts, ProcurementStrong skills in MS Office Applications (Office, Word, Excel, PowerPoint)Detailed oriented with strong business analytical skills.Must have excellent writing and communication skills.",Configuration Analysis Specialist  Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80201",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/configuration-analysis-specialist-1-job-denver-co-us-168740159.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ffd5b7f1b76a2be26bbf23dcae109920
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:11:50:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"AIR QUALITY OPERATIONS ANALYSTS North Central Texas Council of Governments DFW Metro The North Central Texas Council of Governments (NCTCOG) serves as the Metropolitan Planning Organization for transportation in the Dallas-Fort Worth Metropolitan Area. The NCTCOG Transportation Department is seeking Air Quality Operations Analyst III to carry out daily activities required to administer the AirCheckTexas Drive a Clean Machine Program including direct outreach to the public. Persons seeking more information or wishing to apply should go to https://mycogcareer.silkroad.com/. EEO affirmative action employer The Dallas Morning News  -  06/19/2016 $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",AIR QUALITY OPERATIONS ANALYSTS Job in Dfw Metro,Full Time,"Dfw Metro , TX 75261",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/air-quality-operations-analysts-job-dfw-metro-tx-us-168782308.aspx?mescoid=1900261001001&jobPosition=1,,,7d7b11bb9b3b14e786d3ec808e4bf31d
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:11:45:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Senior Network Engineer Job #:  656394NOC Engineer SR - Weekend Night ShiftThe Network Operations Center Engineer Sr. is an operational support position providing network, server, storage, application systems surveillance, performing multiple of the core competencies of the team at a high level. Needs minimal assistance, mentors NOC Engineer positions, designs, develops, installs, and maintains multiple operational technology tool sets. In addition to the tool sets itself, the NOC Engineer Sr works well with customers and other stakeholders. This position is considered a career level position. Job Functions Adheres to clients policies, procedures and standards with occasional supervision. Offers fresh insights to help others overcome mental blocks and think creatively. Considers the ideas, needs and suggestions of other group members. Provides leadership and mentoring for the NOC Engineer position including the understanding of clients policies, procedures and standards, system administration, system design, implementations, updates, maintenance, support, documentation reporting, research and development for systems of medium complexity. Is responsible for technology tool set system design and implementations for network routing/switching, wireless, UPSs, monitoring, storage architecture and disaster recovery procedures with minimal assistance. Maintains technical relationships and evaluates market technologies associated with technology tool set vendors so that as product enhancements are made or new products become available, an understanding can be obtained to determine how they could be beneficially applied to the engineering support teams within the Information Services departments. Understands competencies within multiple technology tool sets utilized by the technology teams. Has the ability to correlate reoccurring issues and the ability to make medium level network, server, and storage configuration changes. Prioritizes work appropriately, carrying out assignments with the appropriate level of direction and completing tasks within deadlines with occasional supervision. Monitors work progress, informing team leaders, team managers and/or customers of project status, problems or obstacles and workload problems in a timely manner with occasional supervision. Provides timely and accurate status reports with occasional supervision. Enters work time appropriately and timely into applicable systems with occasional supervision. Provides accurate and concise up to date system information of problem escalation. Provides appropriate documentation for scheduling of resources. Creates and maintains system report such as uptime, utilization and growth.  Easily adapts to change and remains stable in stressful situations. Demonstrates an understanding of diversity and supports system goals, with occasional supervision. Assists with monitoring tool design and implementations of tool sets for network routing/switching, and recovery procedures. May be assigned design and implementation responsibilities for systems of basic complexity and minimal criticality. Understands competencies within a single tool utilized by the technology teams. Has the ability to correlate reoccurring issues and the ability to make simple network, server, and storage configuration changes. Prioritizes work appropriately, carrying out assignments with the appropriate level of direction and completing tasks within deadlines, with supervision. Monitors work progress, informing team leaders, team managers and/or customers of project status, problems or obstacles and workload problems in a timely manner with supervision. Provides timely and accurate status reports with supervision. Enters work time appropriately and timely into applicable systems with occasional supervision. Provides accurate and concise up to date system information of problem escalation. Provides appropriate documentation for scheduling of resources. Creates and maintains system report such as uptime, utilization and growth. SR NOC engineer must be able to provide a proper explanation when an issue is raised, which includes client handling and email etiquette. SR NOC engineer must possess good communication skills to handle calls and escalations. SR NOC staff will be required to work an On-call rotation schedule to cover the weekend day and night shifts.Must be willing to work all shifts including weekends. We are 7/24/365 Service Center.Responsible for Monitoring BSWH enterprise, which includes Network, Server, Storage, Web Services and Applications on Solarwinds Application.Troubleshoot Wireless/wired network and good understand of DHCP Reservations. Hands on Port investigations and Port verification in a Network environment.Must be able to identify, detect and report a problem to the next escalation tier.Network Configuration and support. Required knowledge and support secure VPN solutions.Communicate System Wide Outages. Lead bridge calls.Works together to achieve successful outcomes. Seeks input from others. Seeks win win solutions. Supports a shared purpose. Builds relationships. Supports others to achieve success. The essential job functions as stated are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this job. The stated job functions are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all job responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.' Required Education and/or Experience: Education Required  Type of DegreeBachelor's Degree Preferred  Applicable to Position Amount of Experience  Type of Experience  5 - 6 Years   Associated with Progressive Responsibility  Organizational Core Competency Requirements:Communication - Communicates openly and in a timely way. Listens to understand. Speaks and writes clearly. Shares information appropriately. Keeps others well informed. Encourages others to share contrary views. Responds in a timely manner to messages/requests. Adaptability/Flexibility - Deals effectively with change and uncertainty. Copes well with stress and reassure. Is patient. Maintains a positive outlook. Deals constructively with mistakes and setbacks. Looks for ways to help the organization. SR. NOC Engineer Skill SetWindows OS 7, 8, 10Familiar with MAC (plus)Advance PC skillsSolarwinds administrationAdvance Networking T- Shooting skills.VPN T-shootingUnix, Aix, Linux, Server 2003, 2008R2 and 2012R2 administrationBasic Server Admin SkillsNetwork Monitoring tools.Supervisor or Team lead experienceIP managementProblem IdentificationProblem ResolutionCommunication SkillsCustomer Service experience requiredFamiliar with Active Directory, IIS.         EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Senior Network Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-network-engineer-job-dallas-tx-us-168784878.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),95088fa40288ecb191e201ecc8b77f60
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:11:44:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Take Comfort in a Career that Never Goes ColdWhen you join Levy & Son, you can take comfort in knowing that your career is stable and has great potential for growth. We value our employees and are committed to promoting from within. We are lucky to have a skilled group of individuals on our team, and are excited to invite dedicated HVAC professionals to join us. Looking to make a career move? Become part of the leading air conditioning, heating, and plumbing company in the Dallas, Highland Park, and University Park area.Commercial HVAC InstallerDallasAs a member of our team, you will install heating, air conditioning, ventilation and refrigeration equipment as well as accessories. 1-5 years’ commercial install experience is needed with a strong focus on customer service and a commitment to integrity.The qualified candidate must have a high school diploma or equivalent, good communication skills, and mechanical aptitude. Team work is a priority and installers must be willing to work with and assist co-workers as needed, in addition to working overtime, night, and weekend hours.All employees must be able to pass our background check, drug-screen, and MVR driving record check.We are proud to offer our employees excellent benefits, which include: - Employer paid group health insurance with prescription drug benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision)- 401k with company match- Paid vacation - Six paid holidays per year- Company vehicle- Competitive payHelp us celebrate 105 years of providing quality dependable service.Levy & Son is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Commercial HVAC Installer Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-hvac-installer-job-dallas-tx-us-168772112.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),478085731f7c3511d747078c523545ae
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:11:21:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248281-4Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168847750.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8a0203bab8649974ad690812c3bf0fcb
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:11:12:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"(Part time) Premier Security Officers 3829BR Northern California 408-326-0210 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING PART TIME OFFICERS! EARN EXTRA MONEY WORKING ON THE WEEKENDS! We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees A Premier Security Officer is required to provide security and other safety related functions to the highest of standards – capable of representing Whelan as the premier provider of security services in the industry. Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Must posses a valid California Guard Card Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now!   If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at some of our outstanding client locations in the Greater San Jose area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 4 N 2nd Street, Suite 598, San Jose, CA 95113 t o apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at 408-326-0210. Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say! California Private Patrol Operator License Number 16344 San Jose, CA 95113",(Part time) Premier Security Officers Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-premier-security-officers-job-ca-us-168941229.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=19,,Security/Protective Services,66415e273074a1c0cd9adbb6b475d1ee
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:11:07:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Airport Security Officer 3820BR Minnesota (651) 628-4010 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING Have you ever wanted to work at Whelan’s largest account in Minnesota? Now is your opportunity to join our world-class security team at a premier client site with immediate openings across all shifts. Are you ready for a challenging position that will expose you to new roles in security? We are looking for team members who want to grow as a professional and develop their security/military skills in inspections and safety. Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Security officers with 2+ years of experience Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: 2 years of previous security and/or military experience Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! I f you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Saint Paul area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 1700 W highway 36, Suite 420, Roseville, MN to apply . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? St. Paul, MN 55111",Airport Security Officer Job in Minnesota US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MN,,http://jobview.monster.com/airport-security-officer-job-mn-us-168941167.aspx?mescoid=3300598001001&jobPosition=17,,Security/Protective Services,bc318ec379e7014e79808c7367d8a960
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:10:38:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Position Description:  Energize your career with one of Healthcare’s fastest growingcompanies.   You dream of a great career with a great company - where you canmake an impact and help people.  We dream of giving you the opportunity todo just this.  And with the incredible growth of our business, it’s adream that definitely can come true. Already one of the world’s leadingHealthcare companies, UnitedHealth Group is restlessly pursuing new ways tooperate our Service Centers, improve our Service levels and help people leadhealthier lives. We live for the opportunity to make a difference and rightnow, we are living it up. This opportunity is with one of our most exciting business areas:Optum - a growing part of our family of companies that make UnitedHealth Groupa Fortune 14 leader. Optum helps nearly 60 million Americans live their lives to thefullest by educating them about their symptoms, conditions, and treatments;helping them to navigate the system, finance their Healthcare needs, and stayon track with their Health goals. No other business touches so many lives in sucha positive way. And we do it all with every action focused on our shared valuesof Integrity, Compassion, Relationships, Innovation, and Performance.Primary Responsibilities:Examine, assess, and document business operations and procedures to ensure data integrity, data security and process optimization.Investigate, recover, and resolve all types of claims as well as recovery and resolution for health plans, commercial customers, and government entitiesInvestigate and pursue recoveries and payables on subrogation claims and file managementInitiate phone calls to members, providers, and other insurance companies to gather coordination of benefits informationProcess recovery on claimsEnsure adherence to state and federal compliance policies, reimbursement policies, and contract complianceUse pertinent data and facts to identify and solve a range of problems within area of expertiseGenerally work is self-directed and not prescribed.Works with less structured, more complex issues.Serves as a resource to others.Qualifications:Required Qualifications:Associate's Degree (or higher) in Criminal Justice OR High School Diploma/GED 2+ years experience in a related field2+ years of experience within the health insurance claims industryExperience with two or more of the following: claim processing, provider demographic information or insurance billing practicesExperience with pivot tables and macros in Microsoft ExcelExperience creating and editing documents in Microsoft WordAbility to travel up to 25%Preferred Qualifications:Professional certification as a Certified Fraud Examiner (CFE), Accredited Healthcare Fraud Investigator (AHFI), or similarFamiliar with CPT code terminologyExperience with computer researchPhysical Requirements and Work Environment:Frequent speaking, listening using a headset, sitting, use of hands/fingers across keyboard or mouse, handling other objects, long periods working at a computerService center environment with moderate noise level due to Representatives talking, computers, printers, and floor activityCareers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SMDiversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.Travel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Claim Recovery/Resol/COB/SubroBusinessSegment: Optum Operations Division: Optum Ops-Payment Integrity DeliveryModel: Gold ContestNumber: 655519 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Non-exempt",Optum SIU Senior Pre-Pay Investigator - US Telecommute Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/optum-siu-senior-pre-pay-investigator-us-telecommute-job-dallas-tx-us-168470314.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8732002ebe9cbe414de2778047a931f2
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:10:38:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"CEC is the leading national provider of rehabilitative services for offenders in reentry and in-prison treatment facilities, as well as providing comprehensive management of county, state, and federal jail and detention facilities. The company provides evidence-based programming for residential and non-residential clients and maintains a documented record of reducing recidivism. CEC services also include SECON, a division that conducts comprehensive drug testing and screening services worldwide. CEC is seeking a professional in the role of Security Monitor Supervisor at the Scranton Facility, located in Scranton, PA.  This facility is a 60 bed adult male program that contracts with the Pennsylvania Department of Corrections and the Pennsylvania Board of Probation and Parole. The full-time shift available for this position is  7am - 3pm. As a Security Monitor Supervisor, you will supervisor the Security Monitors who work to maintain an orderly environment within assigned unit or area of facility by conducting standard operating procedures in accordance with facility policies/procedures and required contractual obligations. Daily schedules are followed and employee serves as role model for residents and other employees.   Principal Duties & Responsibilities: Supervises all resident movement/activities within the assigned area;  Supervise and Train Security Monitor staff; Performs scheduled resident headcounts and completes written count reports; Conducts daily inspections and searches of resident sleeping quarters Reports all resident behavioral problem incidents in writing to supervisor and conducts appropriate crisis intervention; Collects urine samples for random and routine substance abuse screenings of residents as required; Monitors residents’ behavior during the daily scheduled recreational activities; Enforces the facility rules of conduct with the residents; Assists with new arrivals/admissions and discharges residents as required High school diploma or GED. Experience supervising staff in a shift work setting. Knowledge or correctional institutions and/or military procedures. Ability to work effectively with residents and aid them in the re-entry process. Ability to read, write, and communicate clearly. Ability to establish and maintain working relations with staff, outside agencies, and the community. Valid driver’s license. Knowledge of particular skill area such as recreation, maintenance, cleaning, safety and security. Community Education Centers offers unlimited potential for career growth, a comprehensive benefits program including medical, dental, and 401(k). To apply, please visit our website at: www.cecintl.com .   We are an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individuals with Disabilities.  ",Security Monitor Supervisor- Scranton Job in Scranton,Full Time Employee,"Scranton, PA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/security-monitor-supervisor-scranton-job-scranton-pa-us-168545111.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=11,,Security/Protective Services,d1d7a7254663fdd7e7e407f7ec774eb0
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:09:42:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative AssistantAdministrative Assistant needed for our legal consultant located in Downtown Dallas, TX on a contract basis starting ASAP. Company Profile:Trial Consultant & AttorneyEstablished in 1990Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseAdministrative Assistant Role:The Administrative Assistant will represent the company as the initial/primary point of contact at the reception area as well as answer a multi-line phone system while maintaining a neat and professional appearance. The Administrative Assistant will handle client invoicing, expenses and entering into QuickBooks. Prepares client invoices and sends via email weekly, obtaining the production staff time notes from internal system and entering those details along with reimbursable expenses into QuickBooks.Assist Business Manager with monthly statementsMaintains electronic copies of all invoices, statements and depositsMaintains inventory of office and kitchen supplies both physical items and an electronic list to replenish as neededHandles shipping and receiving of office packages and equipment, building/equipment repair records and schedules in reference to maintenance on equipmentIncoming and outgoing mailOversee credit card accounts and obtain receipts from employees for all charges Accurately code to the correct expense account and enter the purchase into QuickBooks on a weekly basis required by IRSScan all receipts as back up to the statement and store on the server no later than the 12th of each month for the use in the Sales and Use Tax Return processing and the credit card reconciliation for the Business ManagerMaintain clean reception area, kitchen and lobby as well as make coffee, load and unload the dishwasherAttends and contributes to companywide Monday Morning Meeting and Operations MeetingsAdministrative Assistant Background Profile:2+ years experience as a front desk/administrative assistantHigh School Diploma or equivalentExperience working in QuickBooks a plusExposure to expenses or A/R a plusExcellent verbal and written communication skillsAbility to work as a team or independentlyPlease visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/dallas.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/administrative.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Administrative Assistant Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-dallas-tx-us-168403770.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,16.00 - 17.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,64e4ef868d1a169474c235739720133e
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:09:41:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Supervisor 3874BR Kentucky (859)957-1774 Job Description Whelan Security is searching for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded. Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country!  Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The Site Supervisor is the operational employee responsible for the personnel in an account, typically reporting into an MSS or CSM.  The Site Supervisor is an hourly position that includes manning a security post while also providing operational support for the account to include scheduling, payroll, compliance, post order development, performance metrics tracking, training, employee recognition and inspections during working hours.  The Site Supervisor role is 100% tactical and operational.  The Site Supervisor is expected to build upon a culture of employee engagement and set the example for all employees in the assigned account of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics:  The Site Supervisor is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Manage to 2.5% unbilled overtime or less on assigned account Retention of the account Period over period improvement (usually quarterly) of performance metrics specific to the account Personnel inspections and training of assigned personnel each month 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics:  Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun. Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Why Whelan? Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded: We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you are looking for a great opportunity to work in Frankfort, Kentucky for a leader in the contract security industry – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 541 Buttermilk Pike, Suite 203, Crescent Springs, KY 41017 to apply in person.  For more information, you can also call us at (859) 957-1774. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say! Frankfort, KY 40601",Security Supervisor Job in Kentucky US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,KY,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-supervisor-job-ky-us-168941137.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=7,,Security/Protective Services,1ed942b8e399db3d04e9863e8ecabaeb
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:09:00:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Porject controller in DallasClient Detailsdigital service companyDescriptionProject Controller position for the Public Market- Manage and supervise onshore and offshore, junior and senior account financial analysts- Responsible for month end close and consolidation for assigned accounts and completion of monthly variance analyses, forecasts, and various reporting packages- Assist the Market Controller as needed- Perform the duties of the Market Controller as his/her delegate in times of absence- At month end, challenge CBU Managers to ensure that the P&L and the B/S are accurate.- Ensure consistency of financial information and control closing process- Support operational functions in the analyses of their activities- Support cost improvement initiatives and analyze impact on cost base- Analyze to ensure TOP2 savings and others improvement activities are materializing in P&L- Ensure compliance with relevant accounting standards- Support CBU Managers in reaching financial targets- Check & sign off TCV, Backlog, WIP, accruals, provisions- Liaise with other functions (O2C Back-office, Treasury/Credit Control, etc.) on specific topics- Analytical reviews; past-, current-, future/ IBC, Actuals, Budge/ Forecast- Provide ad-hoc analysis to Management- Provide the business with training and guidance on Project financial management ProfileBachelors degree in accounting or finance required, Masters preferred- Strong Excel, SAP, and Hyperion Essbase skills required- Proficiency in other MS Office applications required- Knowledge of US GAAP and/or IFRS accounting standards- Familiarity with the IT services business preferred- Financial modeling skills required- Strong ethical principles.- Previous management experience is required.- Ability to communicate, present and defend results and forecasts to upper management and outside parties.Job Offercompetitive salary and bonus",Project Controller Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-controller-job-dallas-tx-us-168661328.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,,9ad7e73cd2a1bf5b5333bc9826cde5cc
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:08:46:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time; Morning shift 6am to 2 pm. Evening shift 2pm to 10pm and night shift from 10pm to 6 am. Ability to work on weekends and holidays.Brookdale Denver Tech Center 4901 South Monaco Street Denver, CO 80237Job #:057525aBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management* Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus* One year of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80237",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-nurse-lpn-job-denver-co-us-168191853.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,48de479de919e3567616b0b2315548a8
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:08:45:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"TN Licensed Unarmed Security Officer - Memphis 3241BR Tennessee 615-331-5201 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS HIRING for a part-time weekend position at a location on Chelsea Avenue, Memphis We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) TN State Security licensed persons will be screened first Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Memphis area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately and follow the application with the three pending qualifying assessments. For questions you can call our TN branch office at 615-331-5201 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Memphis,TN 38108",TN Licensed Unarmed Security Officer - Memphis Job in Tennessee US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TN,,http://jobview.monster.com/tn-licensed-unarmed-security-officer-memphis-job-tn-us-168941339.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=13,,Security/Protective Services,eb399c3998a6a81427d9d19567372cf9
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:07:44:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION: Reports to: Operations Manager GENERAL PURPOSE: Responsible for the implementation of manufacturing and delivery schedules ensuring timely and efficient delivery of high quality bedding products at the best cost, and for the preservation of Company assets. Supervises and utilizes available resources (manpower and equipment) to move freight in the safest and most cost effective manner to meet/exceed customer expectations and to achieve service center and Company goals. Ensures compliance with DOT regulations. Prepares daily and weekly reports and maintains related delivery documentation. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: ·         Plans, organizes and supervises the delivery function of the department ensuring timely and efficient delivery of high quality products·         Coordinates with the Plant Manager, Plant Supervisors, Production Scheduler and other Plant personnel in order to attain delivery, cost and quality of service objectives·         Works effectively with dealers/customers to schedule deliveries and the pick-up of returned merchandise·         Ensures the cost effectiveness of the delivery function, including the control of labor utilization - preventing excess hours, downtime and overtime, and efficient usage of transportation related equipment·         Tracks and analyzes functional metrics; calculates estimated costs associated with the shipping/delivery function and recommends appropriate alternatives·         Supervises and directs all job related activities of Dock workers and other support staff engaged in the loading and unloading of freight while working with other Plant supervisors and/or office staff to ensure product, equipment and paperwork availability·         Ensures products are loaded in adherence to approved loading patterns in order to prevent freight damage during transit and safe truck operations·         Prepares and plans daily utilization of resources to ensure a consistent and efficient operation while adhering to scheduled transit times and reduction of short ships·         Ensures compliance with DOT regulations including the review of daily driver's log sheets, accident reporting and investigation, drug testing requirements, and transportation equipment maintenance·         Determines delivery routes and dispatches drivers accordingly optimizing efficiencies in time and cost·         Tracks delivery routes utilizing a GPS tracking system·         Monitors and analyzes dispatch activities and scheduling metrics to ensure maximum effectiveness·         Solicits bids, analyzes quotes, negotiates terms and selects contract carriers who can provide the best services for the most favorable price consistent with quality, quantity, specifications and other factors on an as needed basis·         Communicates regularly with carriers to provide status updates and to ensure proactive problem resolutions·         Enters contract carrier authorizations into the database system·         Sources viable external backhaul opportunities to maximize fuel costs and driver times. Ensures proper credit reporting·         Reviews activities and recommends backhaul management solutions·         Completes necessary paperwork, computer entries and prepares, daily management reports, weekly mileage reports for state fuel tax reporting, Load Sheets and Not Made reports·         Prepares other standard and ad hoc reports as needed·         Maintains various files and records - both computerized and hard copy files·         Performs daily file back up of computer systems·         Monitors Drivers' mileage and wage system for correct payments·         Recruits, interviews and makes selection recommendations of Dock and/or Driver positions·         Provides initial and on-going training and evaluation to assigned personnel related to job duties and performance expectations utilizing work method programs to motivate employees in order to improve performance and quality of work·         Manages work assignments and provides/facilitates training related to job duties, Company policies and procedures·         Raises employee performance levels through consistent feedback and ongoing coaching·         Fosters positive working relationships·         Responds proactively to performance concerns, discipline, employee complaints and other employee relations matters·         Ensures safety and health procedures are being followed within the delivery function and in the Plant·         Administers and reinforces safety and health programs to ensure a safe work environment in compliance with government regulations·         Supports safe handling, loading and storage of materials on the dock and/or in offsite warehouses·         Corrects and/or reports unsafe conditions·         Coordinates with Plant personnel to report and investigate work related accidents and injuries on a timely basis·         Identifies systems and procedures designed to improve operations·         Makes recommendations and implements new programs as needed·         Assists the Plant Manager with special projects as requested·         Maintains knowledge of current trends in the field; and attends appropriate training programs to remain current on delivery, local union, DOT, health/safety and related issues. REQUIREMENTS: ·         Minimum 18 years of age·         Basic English reading/writing skills·         Two or more years shipping/delivery/routing related experience to include supervisory or significant lead level experience and customer service related experience; or equivalent training and experience in other plant operations·         High school graduate or equivalent plus additional college coursework or specialized training. Bachelor Degree preferred·                   Experience working with routing software·         This job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties or responsibilities associated with the job. Other job-related duties may be assigned. An Affirmative Action Equal Opportunity Employer * Drug-Free Working Environment .",Shipping Supervisor Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-supervisor-job-dallas-tx-us-168712597.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a22f67c4e4e346694496eb048bc094e3
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:07:44:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Isabella County Trial Courthas job openings forCOLLECTION/ WARRANT CLERKFILE CLERKCOURT OFFICERPlease visit www.isabellacounty.org quick links section for job descriptions and info on how to apply. APPLICATION Deadline is 4:30 pm June 29, 2016Click to apply at: http:/www.isabellacounty.org",Collection Warrant Clerk Job in Mount Pleasant,Full Time,"Mount Pleasant, MI 48858",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/collection-warrant-clerk-job-mount-pleasant-mi-us-168790755.aspx?mescoid=4300708001001&jobPosition=13,,,baf9fe4deadbdbfb8a9acec5464a8782
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:06:42:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pharmacy Consultant at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/10/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: Not Specified Date Posted: 6/10/2016 The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson.The BusinessOur Health and Group Benefits business helps large and mid-size clients control soaring health and welfare plan costs, improve health outcomes and promote employee engagement through broad-based, state-of-the-art interventions. Within that strategy, professionals in the Pharmacy Practice provide focused expertise around the pharmacy benefit of a health and group benefits plan. They bring technical resources and talent in helping clients design and manage their pharmacy benefit. Our unique, cutting-edge solutions have set a new standard in terms of pricing transparency and service accountability among pharmacy benefit managers (PBM) in the marketplace.The Role WHILE THE PREFERENCE IS TO HAVE THIS POSITION IN DALLAS, WE WILL CONSIDER CANDIDATES FOR SAN FRANCISCO, PHOENIX AND IRVINE, CA AS WELL.As a Pharmacy Consultant you will consult with clients on a wide variety of complex Pharmacy and broader Health and Group Benefits projects. You will serve as the project manager and day to day communication liaison with clients, create client deliverables, contribute to new business activities, and participate in the creation of new intellectual capital. Performance Objectives: Clients Deliver superior, consistent project management for assigned clients: Draft statements of work, project plans and budgets involving multiple workflow streams and client teams Serve as the day to day project lead, ensuring the progress of the team against established objectives, budget, timeline, deliverables and quality standards Manage daily interactions with vendors (e.g., PBMs, health management vendors) Serve as primary, daily contact to clients on delivery of services Manage client expectations and raise appropriate issues to Senior Consultants and Client Relationship Managers Interface with colleagues from other practices and regions on assignments that reflect the client’s broader business issues Develop a trusted advisor relationship with client contacts through effective communication and efficient, quality execution of projects Excellence+ Provide valued-added consulting support on large, sophisticated Pharmacy projects including + Pharmacy benefit plan analysis, design and cost savings strategies + Pharmacy Benefits Manager vendor procurement and negotiation + Audits of PBM performance (financial and operational) + Strategy for specialty pharmacy products + Evaluation of onsite pharmacies at client locations+ Contribute pharmacy and related perspectives to broader health and group benefits projects including care management strategy+ Contribute to the development of new tools and approaches Financial Meet revenue and billable hour goals as described by manager Support the generation of new business as part of the broader team Support new business opportunities and enhance existing relationships Directly contribute to clients’ success through applying your technical expertise People Build relationships internally and collaborate effectively on cross-functional teams Demonstrate natural ease and effectiveness when dealing with clients/colleagues at all levels Educate other Towers Watson consultants and associates on pharmacy related intellectual capital and market trends",Pharmacy Consultant at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/pharmacy-consultant-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168837882.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1a79da91c59291d9bb628f5fbd342647
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:06:41:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis has partnered with a Fortune 100 Company in Dallas, TX to bring on a Pricing Analyst for a 6 month contract. *Candidates must be eligible to work on W2Qualifications:Attention to detailExcellent MS Excel experience (V-Lookup)Bloomberg terminal knowledge a plusMust have securities pricing experienceExcellent analysis skillsExcellent relationship management skillsRoles and Responsibilities: The Americas team for asset pricing services departments and clients across multiple regions including WHEM, EMEA, and APAC. The pricing team is responsible for the capture and validation of security prices used by Fund Accounting or the Investment Bank to calculate and submit daily and monthly NAVs subject to time sensitive deliverable deadlines or to price client positions and traders books. Functions performed by the hub include: Client directed daily customized pricing for production of mutual fund NAVs reported to NASDAQ; Customized daily pricing for European based mutual fund clients; Pricing for institutional and retirement investment plans; pricing for Hedge Fund Services clients, pricing Prime Brokerage client positions and pricing trader position via the End of Day process.Key Responsibilities and skills: Perform daily pricing and validation of all investment assets.Review of price confirmation collection within department.Analyze price movements against market expectations.Provide Subject Matter Expert support to downstream teams and clients.Liaise with pricing vendors and brokers to resolve issuesExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Pricing Analyst Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Pricing Analyst,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/pricing-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-168875783.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=5,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,cf26958b8901c4b0804bb1b69401532b
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:05:43:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248281-5Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168799506.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ac0232472f4b6dc680034cd5d0f0c74f
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:05:43:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resource Manager 3787BR Tennessee 615-331-5201 Job Description Whelan Security is looking for a talented and driven leader to manage our Human Resources in the Nashville area! Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The Human Resources Manager is responsible for providing H.R. direction and counsel to branch HR Team members, streamlining hiring processes to ensure consistent, effective and efficient hiring new team members, training, posting/reposting officers and ensuring compliance with federal, state and local laws within the assigned branch.  The HRM role is 10% strategic and 90% tactical.  The strategic portion consists of driving business results through solid people strategy and leadership, which includes the following four leadership principles – 1) hire great people, 2) set clear expectations, 3) provide the tools they need to succeed, 4) hold them accountable. Qualifications Duties and Responsibilities: Leadership to branch HR team members – may supervise 1-3 office support staff. Tactically involved in the recruitment process to ensure a continuous applicant pool. Ensure constant communication and use of Referral program. Manage and participate in targeted recruiting initiatives by communicating regularly with the Branch Manager, Regional Human Resources Manager, and Client Service Managers regarding specific recruiting needs. Attend recruitment functions such as job fairs, career days, and other events to source candidate. Tactically involved in the selection, onboarding and placement process specific to all new employees. Communicate open and in process positions to all branch staff. Distribute required weekly, monthly reporting. Ensure compliance to Whelan required training including Welcome to Whelan, Supervisor Training, CPR, and Driver required assessments, training and checklist. Facilitate employee engagement by co-writing eNPS action plans and encouraging officer recognition programs such as Officer of the Month and Making a Difference Awards. Guarantee compliance for all State licensing requirements. Balance the Petty Cash registry monthly. Enforce all State training requirements. Support benefit communication during annual open enrollment and serve as ongoing liaison between officers and corporate office. Ensure compliance with regulatory or collective bargaining requirements (where applicable). Process FMLA/LOA requests. Manage all worker’s compensation claims for the branch. Ensure OSHA compliance and reporting for the branch. Complete all requests for Unemployment claims for the branch. Responsible for creating a Safety culture within the branch. Facilitate branch progressive disciple policies and ensure it is executed fairly and consistently. Respond to all Ethics & Compliance hotline alerts. Investigate all allegations of policy violations. Perform other duties as assigned. Experience, Skills and Abilities: Years of Experience: 3-5 years HR Generalist or HR Leadership role in a diverse organization. Must be proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook). Experience with applicant tracking systems and recruitment processes. Experience with HRIS systems. Good understanding of sourcing and selection techniques, inclusive of social media technology. Demonstrated experience and capability to recruit professional level roles required. Strong interview skills and the ability to assess high-quality, high performing talent in support of the company’s standards & expectations, specifically the 10 Core Values. Ability to work collaboratively and openly with cross-functional business partners in a non-hierarchical environment. Detail-oriented with exceptional organizational skills and ability to multi-task. Action oriented and results driven with ability to get projects done with limited resources. Collaborative partner – with external as well as internal personnel. Excellent communication skills both oral and written. Ability to think and react in a high-energy, fast-paced environment. Self-starter, able to drive projects to conclusion and work effectively with a variety of people at various levels within the company. Comfortable Dealing with Ambiguity. Must possess a strong understanding and appreciation of a diverse work environment and have the ability to demonstrate initiatives for recruiting for diversity. Must have a working knowledge of Human Resource topics (FMLA, Unemployment Claims, Workman’s Comp, Employment Law, Harassment, etc...) as well as discrimination laws related to recruiting, hiring, and transferring employees. Must demonstrate the ability to act independently and make quality decisions. Education Education: BS/BA Degree in Human Resources, Business Administration or related field. Why Whelan?  Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits, (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program.Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry. Apply Now! At Whelan, we are passionate about our employees. If you have a passion for people and wish to join a family-owned, industry leading organization in the Nashville area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say! Nashville, TN 37211",Human Resource Manager Job in Tennessee US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TN,,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-manager-job-tn-us-168941541.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=8,,Security/Protective Services,52c0811b34a67c422d6db8de71999fd5
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:04:52:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Maintenance Associate (House Keeping Associate)Department: Remote-Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: NoFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation:U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Maintenance Associate will be responsible for interior and exterior cleanliness, maintenance, and light repair of the store. The Associate will also be responsible for ensuring the store’s cleaning and maintenance standards are consistently met and in compliance with corporate and regulatory guidelines.  Deliverables: Perform maintenance and custodial duties in all store areas in order to maintain a clean and orderly conditionMaintain the Store Front Area which includes: clean windows, store signs, walls, and mannequinsMaintain the Sales Area which includes: clean exposed ducts, light fixtures, floors, and furnitureMaintain the Fitting Rooms which includes dust removal and cleaning the floor as neededClean and polish floors, equipment, windows, mirrors, walls, countertops, tables and other store furniture using cleaning solutions and items approved by corporateSanitize and restock restroom facilitiesClear waste materials from trash containers and wastebaskets in all work areasPerform minor maintenance and repairs on equipment, machinery, and systems such as: lubricating, cleaning, replacing filters and bulbs in lighting fixturesAssist in the relocation of equipment, furniture, and machineryResponsible for following operational standards as directedKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be 18 years of age. A high school diploma or equivalent desired.Prior experience of 6+ months in the maintenance or facilities field is preferred.Must be able to multi-task, work well under pressure, and follow directionMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning solutionsMust be reliable and trustworthyMust be able to pass Criminal Background CheckMust be able to spend up to 100% of the working time standing and walkingMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the businessAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 21807 Division : Field - Region : Northwest Location : 0176 - F21 - Park Meadows Mall, Littleton CO US 80124 Job Type : Part Time",Maintenance Associate - Park Meadows Mall # Job in Littleton,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Maintenance Associate (House Keeping Associate)Department: Remote-Store OperationsReports to: Store ManagerDirect Reports: NoFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation:U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Maintenance Associate will be responsible for interior and exterior cleanliness, maintenance, and light repair of the store. The Associate will also be responsible for ensuring the store’s cleaning and maintenance standards are consistently met and in compliance with corporate and regulatory guidelines.  Deliverables: Perform maintenance and custodial duties in all store areas in order to maintain a clean and orderly conditionMaintain the Store Front Area which includes: clean windows, store signs, walls, and mannequinsMaintain the Sales Area which includes: clean exposed ducts, light fixtures, floors, and furnitureMaintain the Fitting Rooms which includes dust removal and cleaning the floor as neededClean and polish floors, equipment, windows, mirrors, walls, countertops, tables and other store furniture using cleaning solutions and items approved by corporateSanitize and restock restroom facilitiesClear waste materials from trash containers and wastebaskets in all work areasPerform minor maintenance and repairs on equipment, machinery, and systems such as: lubricating, cleaning, replacing filters and bulbs in lighting fixturesAssist in the relocation of equipment, furniture, and machineryResponsible for following operational standards as directedKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be 18 years of age. A high school diploma or equivalent desired.Prior experience of 6+ months in the maintenance or facilities field is preferred.Must be able to multi-task, work well under pressure, and follow directionMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning solutionsMust be reliable and trustworthyMust be able to pass Criminal Background CheckMust be able to spend up to 100% of the working time standing and walkingMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the businessAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 21807 Division : Field - Region : Northwest Location : 0176 - F21 - Park Meadows Mall, Littleton CO US 80124 Job Type : Part Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-associate-park-meadows-mall-176-job-littleton-co-us-168618752.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),77d059d5961cb84ba9d9c396a39661ed
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:04:41:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field SupervisorGreensburg/Pittsburgh, PAThis position requires the individual to split their time between both Greensburg and Pittsburgh.Applicants must successfully pass a criminal record check in compliance with the PA Private Detective Act.DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Essential Duties:Manages a shift and/or segment of guarding operations at multiple sites, including supervision of subordinate officers; ensures that personnel deliver high quality service Maintains and submits payroll records and other employee and business information; reviews client and company reports for accuracy and timeliness. Communicates and coordinates with line management regarding scheduling, staffing, equipment, record keeping, and related matters, to ensure smooth delivery of services; makes scheduling and staffing adjustments as needed to meet client requirements while controlling labor costs; reviews reports to ensure that commitments have been met and client directions have been followed. Ensures that service expectations are being met through regular contact with clients; evaluates service quality, inspects posts and initiates corrective action in a timely manner as necessary. Maintains a positive, professional environment in full compliance with applicable laws, regulations, policies and procedures; acts to ensure that staff members understand and comply with applicable laws, regulations, policies and procedures. Performs tasks and duties of a similar nature and scope as required for assigned office.Education/Experience: 1 year of experience in security operations, or an equivalent combination of education and experience sufficient to perform the essential functions of the job, as determined by the company.   Additional Information:Competencies (as demonstrated through experience, training, and/or testing)Applicant must have a clean driving recordUnderstanding of security operations is a mustMust have current Act 235 Certification.Must have valid driver's license and ability to pass MVR check. We offer an attractive compensation package including competitive hourly wage, benefits, training and opportunities for advancement. St. Moritz Security Services, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V.",Field Supervisor Job in Greensburg,Full Time Employee,"Greensburg, PA 15601",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/field-supervisor-job-greensburg-pa-us-168858692.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Security/Protective Services,1b1c25191111b97583ef5859b4f53f01
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:04:40:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"SECURITY OFFICER - Great Downtown Location! 3859BR Detroit 2483069076 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the DETROIT area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.   For more information, you can also call us at 248 306 9076 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Detroit, MI 48104",SECURITY OFFICER - Great Downtown Location! Job in Michigan US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MI,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-great-downtown-location!-job-mi-us-168941202.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=7,,Security/Protective Services,e4cb9313f3688a4006218e9b6548ecf6
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:00:04:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in De Soto,Full Time,"De Soto, KS 66018",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-de-soto-ks-us-166654778.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=7,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,856bdb8c65d409ed09b9efcd2200dde8
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:00:06:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Camden,Full Time,"Camden, NJ 08009",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-camden-nj-us-166654929.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e4d3bb423c66e3ad664bd36fa74398e6
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:00:11:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Headquartered in New York with several locations around the world, AIG Investments provides investment advisory and asset management services to AIG and its businesses. AIG Investment's platform spans multiple asset classes including high grade and high yield corporate and sovereign debt, municipal bonds, structured products, external mandates, private placements, and global real estate as well as investment strategy and sovereign research. Investments works collaboratively with all areas of the company to drive shared financial interests and investment goals.Position SummaryThe Senior Investment Analyst - Direct Origination position is a mid-level analyst responsible for fundamental investment analysis, industry research, preparing financial models, and supporting senior direct originators in sourcing, marketing, and executing private placement investments across multiple industry sectors and asset classes. While there will be no direct portfolio management responsibilities, this analyst will be responsible for assisting in developing and maintaining relationships with prospective and existing private placement issuers. More specifically, this person will:Assist in the analysis, review, and recommendation of new private placement transactions including: developing financial models; analyzing industry trends and issues; drafting approval memorandums; pre-qualifying prospects, participating in marketing calls and due diligence meetings with issuer management; conducting reference checks; and participating in internal approval committees.Work with in-house and external counsel to satisfactorily document amendments and new transactions.Interact with bankers and other investors, as well as work with internal constituents and the issuer to close transactions.Assist with special projects, as needed.Organizational StructureThis position will report to the Vice President, Marketing who in turn reports to the Head of Direct Originations and Workout. Primary interactions will be with the direct originators located throughout the U.S., prospective issuers, private placement analysts and portfolio managers. This position will also interact with members of Enterprise Risk Management and with the Private Placement Investment committee. Position can be located in San Francisco, Dallas or Houston. No relocation package is being offered. The Ideal Candidate Will Have 2-5 years of experience as a credit/investment analyst. Four-year degree from an accredited college or university is required; MBA or CFA is preferred. Finance or accounting major preferred.Excellent analytic and credit skills, including strong ability to analyze financial statements and create financial models. Strong Excel skills are required. Strong written and oral communication skills. Ability to interact well with people and exhibit good business development skills in support of senior originators.Self-starter with strong organization and prioritization skills, which allow him or her to complete multiple tasks with minimal supervision. Demonstrated high ethical standards, good judgment and flexibility in achieving goals. About AIGAmerican International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Senior Investment Analyst - Direct Origination Job in San Francisco,,"San Francisco, CA",InsuranceFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-investment-analyst-direct-origination-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167859834.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=5,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,d1caa420f275402e0643a34772f98f8f
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:00:17:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Kintnersville,Full Time,"Kintnersville, PA 18930",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-kintnersville-pa-us-166654999.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=19,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,37cf5579d3fb4f05dd07a137b452f644
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:00:42:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:Responsible for following up on aged, unpaid or short paid insurance claims in a timely manner to assure maximum payment is received and adjustments are kept to a minimum. Responsible for the appeals and review processes for denied or unpaid claims.Essential Duties and Responsibilities:·         Communicates with insurance companies regarding incorrectly processed claims and other claims issues. ·         Assures that re-bills are processed correctly and denial issues are resolved promptly.·         Accurately documents communications with other parties regarding claims issues.·         Maintains communication with insurance companies on aged balances for payment resolution.·         Maintains all supporting documentation for claims and claims follow up.·         Accurately adjusts accounts pending appeal resolution.·         Communicates with patients, family and account contacts to resolved issues related to insurance payments.Education and/or Experience:·         Minimum of a High school degree or GED. Some advanced study preferred.         Minimum of one year of computer experience in medical billing and collections.Qualifications (Skills & Abilities):·         Knowledge of medical terminology, coding and office procedures.·         Knowledge of basic math to make calculations, balance and reconcile figures.·         Knowledge of computer systems, and applications.·         Knowledge of HIPAA rules and regulations.·         Skill maintaining and organizing large volumes of information.",Reimbursement Specialist Job in Stoughton,Full Time Employee,"Stoughton, MA 02072",,http://jobview.monster.com/reimbursement-specialist-job-stoughton-ma-us-166755316.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,7dba5c1db4592e92276e629617617b0d
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:00:43:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"SENIOR ACCOUNTS PAYABLE JOB IN INDIANAPOLIS, IN I am helping a long-term client, a Fortune 500 company, in their search to fill a Senior Accounts Payable job.  In this role, you must have had experience working in Concur, as this is the system they use.  Your responsibilities will include travel and expense reporting, auditing expense reports, and completing reconciliations.  In addition, you will be the ‘go-to’ person for the Concur tool, giving you high visibility to everyone across the organization.  The Manager of Accounts Payable will be the person to whom you will report.  Compensation for this position includes a base, over-time potential, competitive medical, dental, and vision, and 401(k) match.  More importantly, this company consistently promotes from within, so your growth opportunities are huge. YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES FOR THE SENIOR ACCOUNTS PAYABLE JOB: • Audit expense reports submitted for payment to ensure all reports are in compliance with our T&E policy.• Maintain accurate source files to ensure users are appropriate, removed upon termination and supervisor is accurate.• Manage and test any system upgrade projects on our expense reporting tool for our group. This will require individual to become a power user and continually train and develop working knowledge of the tool.• Actively involved and collaborate on reporting solution, reconciliations and testing issues/resolutions with colleagues across all of the shared service centers. Perform basic reconciliation between software, general ledger and bank funding account(s).• Assists with creating process documentation manuals, job aids, training materials, operational procedures related to the travel expense process.• Raising of technical issues to appropriate IT teams and monitoring of same• Troubleshooting for:  Third party outsourced processes and controls,  SAP general accounting processes and employee expense report system processes, Interfaces and disbursements processes• Actively improve and implement the following process improvements for:  Reporting methodology for liability accruals, Reporting methodology for unapplied card data reporting,  YOUR QUALIFICATIONS MUST INCLUDE:  • Four to six (4-6) years AP experience in progressive roles• Experience using Concur and Microsoft Office Products, including the use of Microsoft Excel Pivot Tables and V-Lookups• Bachelor degree or higher• High concern for detail and accuracy• Ability to take notes when in training, and to follow written procedures and identify exceptions to bring to the attention of Manager for resolution.• Commitment to task with awareness of urgency and strict adherence to deadlines.• Possess Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal, including the ability to formulate questions to help further learning of job duties• Ability to deal with difficult internal/external customers as well as adapting to change and learning new processes including assisting with creating process documentation.• Ability to display diplomacy in day-to-day interactions with the commitment to task and with awareness of urgency• Possesses leadership qualities including the ability to work within the team to help further advance the capabilities of others If you are a qualified candidate and interested in exploring this opportunity or having a confidential discussion about a career move, please contact Maddie.Waters@parkerlynch.com  Note: If this position is not suited for your background but you are interested in exploring other career opportunities in Accounting/Finance, please contact us. Parker + Lynch is a leader in the permanent placement of premier accounting and finance professionals.   Please visit our website at www.parkerlynch.com. ;",Senior Accounts Payable Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46240",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accounts-payable-job-indianapolis-in-us-167159088.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=3,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c3062546cd0bd0f9c9e4e09abd991cb3
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:01:07:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Staatsburg,Full Time,"Staatsburg, NY 12580",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-staatsburg-ny-us-167841334.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4ac7467477aee7d9e9a643443738dada
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:01:08:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Ligonier,Full Time,"Ligonier, PA 15658",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-ligonier-pa-us-166654998.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=3,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,cbfc8f9228a38eb02ccb75f049055d74
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:01:40:28,No,jobs.monster.com," Three Month Contract Credit Analyst Job Carmel, IN Our client is hiring for a Three Month Contract Credit Analyst job in Carmel, IN.  You must have a minimum of one year experience in a strong credit and collections role.  You must also have a Bachelors’ degree in Accounting, Finance or Business. You will be responsible for managing and monitoring accounts receivables balances on the client side for the entire company. You will also be responsible for a portfolio of accounts to ensure invoices are paid promptly. The salary for this position is based on experience.  While contracted through Accounting Principals preventative healthcare coverage will be offered. This particular client is known for hiring on or extending contracts and has a great relationship with Accounting Principals going back several years. In this Three Month Contract Credit Analyst job in Carmel, IN you will be responsible for:• Charging back invalid deductions to client accounts.• Working closely with clients and sales teams to deliver seamless problem resolution.• Make collection calls or emails and follow up on past due payments.• Maintains client database records and client rapport. If you have a minimum of one year experience in heavy credit and collections, a Bachelors’ degree in Accounting or Finance and the ability to commit to the three month contract to start to finish then don’t delay! Apply right away! Please apply by clicking apply below or at www.accountingprincipals.com.        ",Credit Analyst Contract Three Month Carmel,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Indianapolis, IN 46240",,http://jobview.monster.com/credit-analyst-contract-three-month-carmel-in-job-indianapolis-in-us-167302206.aspx?mescoid=1300107001001&jobPosition=4,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6a0e1acda5ae8a8f0009a7033b2fbeed
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:01:40:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Wurtsboro,Full Time,"Wurtsboro, NY 12790",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-wurtsboro-ny-us-166654939.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,5a09886f8db20762a0e82375be75d65d
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:01:49:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Bear,Full Time,"Bear, DE 19701",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-bear-de-us-167841051.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,5cfd109fdca497b6d85d2c0416e71192
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:02:43:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accountable to the Group Leader for service delivery and tactical support of the OneSource account service team.  Ensure the delivery of best-in-class customer support (service, preventive maintenance, product solutions, customer and sales relatioins, laboratory services and parts inventories) through effective service and resource planning/deployment.  Act as a primary contact point for all local client issues.  Interface with the Group Leader and Regional Manager on a frequent basis to review operational performance, customer satisfaction status, staffing optimization and business expansion opportunities. Responsibilities: Maintenance & Repair: Some percentage of time will be spent providing maintenance and support of in-scope equipment to insure best-in-class service within established time frame in the assigned OneSource account.   The time spent providing maintenance is dependent upon OneSource account supported and the on-site team.   Mentor and/or train CSEs at OneSource location regarding best-in-class customer support, follow up, communication, and specific product line skills to drive growth and customer satisfaction.   Drive toward zero service recalls for any reason. Resource Planning and Deployment: Work with Group Leader to effectively deploy assigned CSEs to meet customer demands in the account.   Work with Group Leader to insure on-site team is efficiently deployed and has proper training with cross training opportunities defined.   Develop and maintain ongoing communication and a strong working relationship with peers to understand and manage resource availability/limitations. Ensure adequate planning and coordination of coverage to meet customer needs and achieve established operational metrics.   Interpret SOW and associated agreements and ensure that resources are deployed consistently with defined objectives.   Act as liaison between on-site staff and support staff to escalate critical support issues.   Resource Development: Take an active role in developing on-site resources through mentoring and/or training activities.   Work with on-site team and Training Department to assure the appropriate training and cross training opportunities are available.   Provide input for and assist with the LEAD Process.   Collaborate with the Group Leader to drive talent development, overall business performance, and succession planning through the LEAD Process.   Address disciplinary and/or performance problems when necessary in accordance with company policy.   Job Requirements: Bachelor’s Degree in Biology, Chemistry, Electronics, or related discipline plus 5 years relevant experience. 5 or more years field service experience.  Prior supervisory experience in a field service organization is helpful.  Skills relevant to the maintain requirements are needed. Knowledge of laboratory safety practices as defined by the company and/or customer’s site safety code.   Valid driver’s license.  While performing the duties of this job, the employee must safely operate a motor vehicle as evidenced by a good driving record. Knowledge of laboratory safety practices as defined by the Company and/or the customer’s site safety code. Additional requirements include the ability to follow written and verbal directions, read and understand technical bulletins and service manuals, work under time constraints, maintain alertness and concentration, work safely with potential electrical, chemical, radiologic, and biologic hazards using universal precautions.   Additionally the ability to operate personal computer to enter data and generate reports, and communicate clearly and effectively with customers, peers, managers and other technical support professionals are critical to successful performance in this role.  ",Service Site Leader Job in Exton,Full Time,"Exton, PA 19341",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/service-site-leader-job-exton-pa-us-167037531.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3e6b9a86a01696f1fcd54fa82fc84939
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:02:44:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Revenue Accountant Location: Bethesda, Maryland Reports to: Senior Manager -Revenue JOB FUNCTION The Senior Revenue Accountant will play key role managing the day to day revenue processes, creates journal entries, reconciles accounts, analyzes account balances, and produces audit schedules and ad hoc reports, and other duties as assigned for a fast paced rapidly growing technology company. This role is very hands-on position. The Senior Revenue Accountant must be able to collaboratively work the full revenue cycle, while working closely not only with revenue team but business operation group. ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES • Completion of customer invoicing, billing and revenue schedules for designated business lines. • Assist in preparing contract reviews of incoming deals to determine proper revenue recognition treatment • Provide assistance in cash collections and meeting targets • Maintain contract management database • Assist in establishing/documenting revenue recognition policies and procedures • Provide assistance with internal and external audit requirements as needed • Assist in special projects within finance departments. QUALIFICATIONS • 3-5 years of experience in a similar position with Graduate degree in accounting or finance. • CPA or CPA candidate • Have excellent analytical skills and be able to perform complex reconciliations • Moderate to Advanced Excel Skills (pivot tables, vLookups, If-Then a minimum) • Knowledge of Microsoft Navision and Jet reports a plus • Well versed on revenue recognition topic 605, ASU 2009-13, SOP 97-2 • Strong communication skills, both verbal and written, and the ability to effectively interact with senior management and individuals with varying degrees of financial knowledge; • Good planning and organizational skills to balance and prioritize work",Monster,,"  Revenue Accountant Location: Bethesda, Maryland Reports to: Senior Manager -Revenue JOB FUNCTION The Senior Revenue Accountant will play key role managing the day to day revenue processes, creates journal entries, reconciles accounts, analyzes account balances, and produces audit schedules and ad hoc reports, and other duties as assigned for a fast paced rapidly growing technology company. This role is very hands-on position. The Senior Revenue Accountant must be able to collaboratively work the full revenue cycle, while working closely not only with revenue team but business operation group. ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES • Completion of customer invoicing, billing and revenue schedules for designated business lines. • Assist in preparing contract reviews of incoming deals to determine proper revenue recognition treatment • Provide assistance in cash collections and meeting targets • Maintain contract management database • Assist in establishing/documenting revenue recognition policies and procedures • Provide assistance with internal and external audit requirements as needed • Assist in special projects within finance departments. QUALIFICATIONS • 3-5 years of experience in a similar position with Graduate degree in accounting or finance. • CPA or CPA candidate • Have excellent analytical skills and be able to perform complex reconciliations • Moderate to Advanced Excel Skills (pivot tables, vLookups, If-Then a minimum) • Knowledge of Microsoft Navision and Jet reports a plus • Well versed on revenue recognition topic 605, ASU 2009-13, SOP 97-2 • Strong communication skills, both verbal and written, and the ability to effectively interact with senior management and individuals with varying degrees of financial knowledge; • Good planning and organizational skills to balance and prioritize work",,http://jobview.monster.com/revenue-accountant-job-bethesda-md-us-167863341.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=13,,,2b707c3b271d3dcc4c61cd8c3ee9f93d
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:02:49:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail Client Services Manager   Retail Client Services Manager will work to maintain/improve client specific retail conditions and be a key point of communication between the retail team/conditions and the Headquarter team and client team.  They will be an aid to the retail organization in regard to training to accomplish the client’s objectives.   Responsibilities  Ensure compliance in regard to distribution, new item speed to shelf, pricing objectives, planogram conditions, display performance against features and promotional activity and POS distribution Work to resolve any noncompliance issues at retail where possible and communicate properly the unsolvable issues Perform ridewiths at all levels of the retail organization Audit stores in assigned geography according to executable items Track and score retail audits, shipment opportunities, and report all competitive activity  Attend retail meetings to communicate client objectives, general retail trainings, market condition observations and assist in sales training Hires, retains, trains, coaches, guides, directs, and develops direct reports using company-wide processes, tools and resources May delegate work of others and provide guidance, direction and mentoring to indirect reports Qualifications  Ability to work effectively with management Ability to direct, lead, coach, and develop people Ability to visualize and plan objectives and goals strategically Ability to develop strategic plans to grow the business Strong prioritization skills Team building Skills Ability to understand complex demands of a decentralized organization and meet challenging time lines Strong functional experience in retail management Project management skills Good interpersonal skills Skill in supervising to include delegating responsibility, training and evaluating performance -Basic computer skills including familiarity with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Internet usage Customer/Client specific applications 3-5 years of experience in applicable field 2+ years of supervisory experience Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer",Retail Client Services Manager Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-client-services-manager-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175169972.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,b66712e6bdb46087113a15b03c6e58de
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:03:42:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you are a Software Engineer - Python, AWS with experience, please read on!Top Reasons to Work with Us1. Be the first in the world to play with new cutting edge technology. work with an extremely talented team, and enjoy your 9-5!!!2. Outside of awesome technology, we also offer a fun, flexible and laid back work environment.3. We offer an incredible benefits package to our full time employees, we want to be sure our employees work to live and not the other way around.What You Will Be Doing- Assume responsibility for all back-end code base of a small new product that we have developed, fix outstanding bugs and update APIs for integration with 3rd party systems- Full R&D cycle for new capabilities for version 2 of this product as we are testing market fit for new capabilities- Learn big data architecture of our primary product and explore different ways to optimize the platform. - Participate as a technical resource on data science R&D tiger team and develop prototypes integrating Google Analytics, Google BigQuery, AWS, etc-Deliver new products that are a part of our innovation roadmap.What You Need for this Position- 3+ Years Experience with Python- 5+ Years Experience with Web Development (HTML, JavaScript)- 3+ Years Experience with Relational Databases (MySQL, Postgresql, etc).- Working knowledge of Linux- Proven success as an awesome software engineer. You must live, eat and breathe technology.- A slightly obsessive focus on getting things done. - High levels of creativity and quick problem solving capabilities- Amazon AWS Experience. Understanding of Amazon Web Services, specifically: EC2, RDS, VPC is a major plus- Experience with ‘Big Data’ technologies – Hadoop, Spark, Redshift, BigQuery, etc.- Professional experience with PHP.- Understanding of web analytics technologies, tagging and cookies is a major plus- SysOps experienceWhat's In It for YouCompetitive salary based on experiencePaid premiums for medical, vision, dental and long-term disability. Seriously.401(k) plan with matchPaid vacation/holidaysCasual/creative office, snacks and lunches provided dailyFlexible hoursSo, if you are a Software Engineer - Python, AWS with experience, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",CyberCoders Job Application for Software Engineer - Python,"Full Time, Employee",Contact name Allyson Cronan Shields,Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/software-engineer-python-aws-python-aws-linux-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173747536.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=18,,,e6ad40493081c5054ad42c1655b4e3a5
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:03:43:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionSurprise. Delight. Engage. Amaze. As a seasonal retail sales associate, you're the cornerstone in bringing the magic of Macy's to life for our customers - engaging, interacting, and delighting them with smart merchandise recommendations and outstanding customer service. You'll work independently and as part of a high-performance retail team using your enthusiasm and your great attitude to amaze our customers and help your team members create the kind of memorable shopping experience that has made Macy's America's choice for finding the best holiday gifts. The JobHere's what you'll do as a Macy's seasonal retail associate:Greet customers quickly and warmly as they enter the area - let them know you're glad they're thereProvide outstanding customer service that's sincere, enthusiastic, and professionalMaintain a great attitude that reflects our commitment to the customerQualify customer needs, figure out what's right for them, and help them get it through one of our shopping channels - either in store or onlineShare your knowledge of store products and services to build sales and minimize returnsRecommend additional merchandise that complements customer selectionsUse our in-store technology and tools to enhance the shopping experience: this make include Search and Send, the More@Macy's app, Buy Online Pick Up in Store, and more (don't worry - we'll train you!)Use point-of-sale and mobile point-of-sale systems to process customer purchases (we'll train you on these, too!)Handle returns with courtesy, ease, and professionalismBe at work and be there on time - your team is counting on you! ScheduleIt takes a lot of time to create that magical shopping experience, so many of our associates arrive in the early morning hours while others stay later to set the stage for the next day. You'll have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a part time temporary basis, which may include mornings, evenings, weekends, and busy events like Thanksgiving, Black Friday and the day after Christmas. Generous Employee Discount: Bigger, Better, Faster, More!Just in time for holiday shopping, you'll receive a generous employee discount of up to 20% on most items starting your first day - and that's on top of other specials, coupons, promotions, and special offers - so your holiday dollars go farther, faster. QualificationsYou don't necessarily need retail experience or a degree, but you'll need to be a self-starter with good time management skills, and be able to work independently and as part of a team. And a few other things:Excellent communication skills - written and verbalBasic math functions (addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division) and ability to use a calculatorPossess a strong sense of urgencyEnjoy meeting and working with customersComfortable with technology, such as point of sale registersHave a love of learningNo experience required, just a great attitude!Physical DemandsYou'll be on your feet a lot - this job involves a lot of moving and standing (at least two consecutive hours). You'll need to be able to lift at least 30 pounds, and may occasionally need to reach, stoop, kneel, crouch, climb ladders, and reach above eye level - it's not cardio, but it's a lot of movement! The job also involved close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Apply NowBecome a part of our Macy's seasonal retail sales team and start making magic - apply now! Click here to see the complete Seasonal Retail Sales Associate job description This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Non-Commissioned Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Seasonal Holiday Retail Sales,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-sales-flex-macy's-anderson-towne-center-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174714363.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,3b1b31a3e588917a67e4999200a36e04
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:04:40:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift Any Hours Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Fuel Convenience Clerk (Part-Time) Grandview Yard GetGo Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/fuel-convenience-clerk-part-time-grandview-yard-getgo-job-columbus-oh-us-175133170.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,25a000ba4d87e89b1d50d1144b3885d9
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:04:40:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Are you a Value / VAVE Engineer with Project Management, electromechanical and medical device experience? We are a highly regarded and growing medical device company working in the field of cancer diagnostics. On a daily basis we are striving to impact and improve patients' lives through innovation, research and development of technology. Our systems are used in numerous countries, offering early detection and treatment to thousands of individuals, and we provide support, education and information to both clinicians and patients. We are currently seeking a great VAVE Project Manager to help us in our progress!What You Will Be Doing- project management of VAVE projects: engineering changes on commercially released products- working with cross-functional teams (including marketing, operations, supply chain, quality regulatory, etc.)- working with external suppliers & partners- monitoring all financial aspects of projectWhat You Need for this Position- 5+ years of Engineering Project Management experience - Bachelor's Degree in Engineering- 1+ years in a leadership / ability to mentor engineers- desire to focus on margin improvement on commercially released products- medical device experience- electromechanical device experience- experience in Project Management of product design and/or product development activities in a regulated environment (medical or aerospace)- ability to manage multiple projects at the same time (projects may be 8 to 10 months long)- ability to travel up to 20% (domestic and international, typically 3-5 day trips with overnight stays)- PMP certification is a PLUS!What's In It for You- competitive salary- bonus potential- strong benefits package- potential relocation supportSo, if you are a Value Engineering / VAVE Project Manager with electromechanical experience in the medical device field, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Engineering Project Manager - Medical Devices | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Lisa van Horne,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/engineering-project-manager-medical-devices-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174420832.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,,,a748231ef40e0bfec27ed7b6e1687f16
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:05:07:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Grocery team, you will be responsible for replenishing stock for our customers. The majority of your time will be spent on the sales floor, directly interacting with our customers and ensuring they are able to find the products they need. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Dairy and Frozen Departments, as well as the Front End service area. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by ensuring products are replenished on the shelves and helping customers locate product. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Be knowledgeable of weekly ad items. Smile and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product on the shelf, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Set up displays on the sales floor. Assist in maintaining back room efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customer's safety. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Numeric Computation/Reporting Presentation & Verbal Communic Written Communication Takes Direction Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Sorting Standing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Pushing Reading Reaching Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Climbing Grasping Sight or Peripheral Vision Twisting Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Safety Cutter U-Boats",Grocery Stock Clerk (Part Time) Neil Avenue Giant Eagle Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/grocery-stock-clerk-part-time-neil-avenue-giant-eagle-job-columbus-oh-us-175133329.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=12,,Administrative/Clerical,02378935bffe19d27a1be632977c9c80
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:05:19:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Document Capture Application DeveloperJOB DESCRIPTIONSummary:Seeking a talented and passionate mid-level developer to work as part of our Document Capture team.  Someone that is enthusiastic about delivering high quality solutions that deliver real business value with focus on writing smart, simple and clean code.Main Responsibilities:•Candidate will develop, test and implement software application code for Image Capture systems and develop automation processes.•Candidate requires the ability to adapt to changes quickly, communicate with users and managers, and solve problems quickly•Candidate will support various Non-Prod Environments for the Image Capture Systems•Candidate will be required to troubleshoot production issues and develop/test resolutions using InputAccel, Microsoft VBA, SQL, and Microsoft .NET frameworks.   Note: a separate team handles production support responsibilities.Qualifications:•3-5 years experience working as an Application Developer.•Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or a related field or the foreign equivalent.•Technologies:•EMC's InputAccel 5.3\6x•EMC's Dispatcher 5.3\6x •Development in .Net Framework (2.0, 3.5) with C# and/or or VB.Net.  •Visual Basic 6 and Office VBA-Visual Basic for Applications and/or converting from these languages to .Net•VBS Scripting •RDBMS Concepts, SQL Server --T-SQL including queries and stored procedures•Silas Reveille Monitoring Software. •Imaging background, or similar tools (ie, Kofax)•Familiarity with Microsoft server environment•Knowledge and experience working in an Agile environment.•Experience working in a large corporation on complex/challenging systems•Exposure to development in more than one programming language and a good understanding of fundamental web/internet technologies.•Excellent communication skills in English (both written and spoken forms).",Document Capture Developer Job in Columbus,"Full Time, Employee","Columbus, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/document-capture-developer-job-columbus-oh-us-175267872.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,24583e83e310883594aa86c7add48a89
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:05:19:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialist is responsible for providing outstanding customer service, meeting personal sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, demonstrating superior product knowledge to customers, and creating a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable. Additionally, the Fragrance Specialist is responsible for becoming an expert on fragrances as well as developing and impacting sales through the growth and implementation of the preferred customer list. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialists arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! Essential Functions:Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaborationExplain and demonstrate use of cosmetics through actual application Be knowledgeable of and perform sales support functions related to POS procedures Alert Fragrance Counter Manager or GSM of Cosmetics and Fragrances of inventory and other inaccuracies Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications: Education/Experience: High School degree or equivalent. Previous selling experience is required, preferably in fragrances.Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with customers, peers, and management.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Other skills: Superior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to multi-task in a fast-paced environment during constant periods of high volume. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Must possess a thirst for knowledge. Must be flexible in regards to hours workedWork Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule, including mornings, evenings, and weekends, and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving, special Big Event days, and the day after Christmas, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Kentucky-FlorenceJob:Cosmetics Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Sales - Fragrance Specialist** Full Time: Macy's Florence Mall Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-sales-fragrance-specialist-full-time-macy's-florence-mall-job-florence-ky-us-175140760.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=14,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e7471e70ec318d604660f5d3063ac6d3
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:05:43:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Johnson & Johnson is currently recruiting for a Director, Technology Transfer (3D Printing Technology Center) that can sit in Raritan NJ, Skillman NJ, Warsaw IN, Raynham MA, West Chester PA, Cincinnati OH, Jacksonville FL, Miami FL, Leeds UK, Limerick Ireland, Cork Ireland, or Hägendorf Switzerland. Caring for the world, one person at a time has inspired and united the people of Johnson & Johnson for over 125 years. We embrace research and science -- bringing innovative ideas, products and services to advance the health and well-being of people. Employees of the Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies work with partners in health care to touch the lives of over a billion people every day, throughout the world.Reporting to the Head of the 3D printing Technology center, the Director is expected to provide leadership in managing and delivering Technology transfer from 3D center to businesses. The Director will have direct ownership of two 3D printing development lines for Implants and Instruments. The Director will own, lead and mentor various process and development engineers to validation and transfer mature technology products to various business units. The Director will closely work with business engineering groups to ensure swift & flawless transfer of mature 3D printed products into commercialization.Qualifications10 years of experience in technical, engineering or business leadershipBachelor’s degree in science, engineering and/or business  Proven experience working with Implementation of Medical Device Products Proven Experience with Medical Device New Product Launches The ability to motivate and inspire various team members to drive significantly increased performance through technical execution and change A highly successful engineering background with experience in delivering innovative technical and engineering solutions across multiple businesses An ability to communicate clearly and concisely across all levels of the company and across various functions and businesses. Must demonstrate working knowledge of process development and validation, including design of experiments, statistical analysis, and project management.  Significant Experience in technology transfer in business transferring products Undergraduate degree in science, engineering and/or business. This position will require up to 50% travel both domestic and international (depending on location).Primary LocationUnited States-New Jersey-RaritanOther LocationsEurope/Middle East/Africa-United Kingdom-England-Leeds, North America-United States-Florida-Miami, Europe/Middle East/Africa-Switzerland-Solothurn-Hägendorf, North America-United States-Florida-Jacksonville, Europe/Middle East/Africa-Ireland-Limerick-Limerick, Europe/Middle East/Africa-Ireland-Cork-Cork, North America-United States-Massachusetts-Raynham, North America-United States-Pennsylvania-West Chester, North America-United States-New Jersey-Skillman, North America-United States-Ohio-Cincinnati, North America-United States-Indiana-WarsawOrganizationJohnson & Johnson Services Inc. (6090)Job FunctionEngineering (Generalist) Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-4.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-5.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies Job Application for DIRECTOR TECH TRANSFER - D PRINTING CTR | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Johnson & Johnson is currently recruiting for a Director, Technology Transfer (3D Printing Technology Center) that can sit in Raritan NJ, Skillman NJ, Warsaw IN, Raynham MA, West Chester PA, Cincinnati OH, Jacksonville FL, Miami FL, Leeds UK, Limerick Ireland, Cork Ireland, or Hägendorf Switzerland. Caring for the world, one person at a time has inspired and united the people of Johnson & Johnson for over 125 years. We embrace research and science -- bringing innovative ideas, products and services to advance the health and well-being of people. Employees of the Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies work with partners in health care to touch the lives of over a billion people every day, throughout the world.Reporting to the Head of the 3D printing Technology center, the Director is expected to provide leadership in managing and delivering Technology transfer from 3D center to businesses. The Director will have direct ownership of two 3D printing development lines for Implants and Instruments. The Director will own, lead and mentor various process and development engineers to validation and transfer mature technology products to various business units. The Director will closely work with business engineering groups to ensure swift & flawless transfer of mature 3D printed products into commercialization.Qualifications10 years of experience in technical, engineering or business leadershipBachelor’s degree in science, engineering and/or business  Proven experience working with Implementation of Medical Device Products Proven Experience with Medical Device New Product Launches The ability to motivate and inspire various team members to drive significantly increased performance through technical execution and change A highly successful engineering background with experience in delivering innovative technical and engineering solutions across multiple businesses An ability to communicate clearly and concisely across all levels of the company and across various functions and businesses. Must demonstrate working knowledge of process development and validation, including design of experiments, statistical analysis, and project management.  Significant Experience in technology transfer in business transferring products Undergraduate degree in science, engineering and/or business. This position will require up to 50% travel both domestic and international (depending on location).Primary LocationUnited States-New Jersey-RaritanOther LocationsEurope/Middle East/Africa-United Kingdom-England-Leeds, North America-United States-Florida-Miami, Europe/Middle East/Africa-Switzerland-Solothurn-Hägendorf, North America-United States-Florida-Jacksonville, Europe/Middle East/Africa-Ireland-Limerick-Limerick, Europe/Middle East/Africa-Ireland-Cork-Cork, North America-United States-Massachusetts-Raynham, North America-United States-Pennsylvania-West Chester, North America-United States-New Jersey-Skillman, North America-United States-Ohio-Cincinnati, North America-United States-Indiana-WarsawOrganizationJohnson & Johnson Services Inc. (6090)Job FunctionEngineering (Generalist)",Personal and Household Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-tech-transfer-3d-printing-ctr-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174828954.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=7,,,7f9d24af75d7226abb7f996f99b929c3
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:05:44:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer Enterprise Fleet Management has an immediate opening for an Administrative Coordinator ! The primary role of the Administrative Coordinator is to support the Fleet Management team by completing various tasks pertaining to vendor and dealer maintenance, vehicle acquisition, car sales and license and title. This individual will also maintain daily contact with and provide customer service through professional verbal and written communications with vendors and dealers. The ideal candidate is a professional and self-motivated team player with strong organizational, time management and PC skills. Enterprise Fleet Management is a privately held, full-service fleet management business for companies, government agencies and organizations with medium-sized fleets. With more than 50 fully staffed offices nationwide, our team of experts can assemble a customized or full-service fleet management program that is just right for each business. Why Become an Administrative Coordinator? This is a career role that is perfect for someone looking to ""set roots"" in a position while taking on greater responsibilities and challenges! If you have prior success with building relationships with outside vendors and clients, then this it the role for you! Here are some other great reasons: -Staring pay of $35,000/year -40 hour work week - Monday - Friday, 8:00am-5:00pm- -Full benefits--401K and profit sharing--Great discounts!- This position is located at: 3700 Park 42 Drive, Suite 110A, Cincinnati, OH 45241 The Administrative Coordinator's responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Provide exceptional customer serviceAssist with various leased unit administrative duties including AR maintenance, collections, titling, processing, managing aftermarket equipment and invoicingAssist with unit deletion process including processing car sales and remitting paymentsHandle renewals/registrationsAdministrative tasks including filing and processing inter-company itemsAssist in preparing units for delivery as neededAssist in transporting vehicles to/from customers as neededPerform miscellaneous job-related duties as assigned The ideal candidate should have the following skill set: Strong customer service skills and the ability to project patience, empathy, and listening skills, through email and on the phone Strong verbal and written communication skills (including spelling and grammar)Advanced level of attention to detailStrong organizational and time management skills Must be able to work in a fast-paced environment with demonstrated ability to prioritize and manage multiple competing tasks and demandsAbility to work independently as well as within a teamAbility to communicate with co-workers and customers in a professional business mannerAccurate typing and data entry skillsAbility to analyze problems and develop solutionsIntermediate computer skills (Microsoft Word, Excel, and Outlook)Basic business accounting or math principles Must be at least 18 years of ageMust have a High School Diploma or G.E.D completedMust have a valid driver's license with no more than 2 moving violations/at-fault accidents on your record within the last 3 yearsNo drug or alcohol related convictions on your record within the last 5 yearsMust be authorized to work in the U.S. and not require authorization sponsorship for this position by our company now or in the futureMinimum of three (3) years of professional office experience in an administrative support roleMust have strong PC skills with an intermediate to advanced proficiency of Microsoft Office products (Word, Excel and Outlook) Must live within a one hour commute of the office located at 3700 Park 42 Drive in Cincinnati, Ohio or plan on moving to the area within 30 days of applyingMust be willing to accept $35,000/year for this position",Fleet Management Administrative Coordinator Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45206",,http://jobview.monster.com/fleet-management-administrative-coordinator-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174083786.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=7,,Administrative SupportData Entry/Order ProcessingGeneral/Other: Administrative/Clerical,f8a241024b7e5b2463371098170bda94
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:05:55:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Springdale,Part Time Employee,"Springdale, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-springdale-oh-us-175109573.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,63c7c4d40a3f3314f0b291014e7905ec
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:06:20:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionPosition DescriptionDriver – MessengerHave you ever seen an armored truck, and thought about the importance of the team that is responsible for the truck and its contents? It requires a special person to be able serve on an armored vehicle crew, delivering and picking up valuables at customer locations and ensuring smooth customer transactions. The messenger and driver positions require the enforcement of rules to protect the premises and property of Brink’s and its customers, as well as the safety of persons on the premises of Brink’s and its customers. If you’re someone who thrives in a fast pace environment, and heavy responsibility then we want to hear from you.Responsibilities:• Deliver or pick up and reconcile the valuables at a customer’s location• Maintain radio communication with the vehicle crew and dispatch personnel to ensure a secure transaction• Maintain the highest degree of security and control of the customer shipment at all times• Remain alert and prepared at all times, not only protecting the crew or premises against attack, but also watching for the accidental mishandling of packages that might result in a loss• Reconcile customer deposits and receipts of all valuables handled throughout the daily scheduled runPosition QualificationsRequirements:• Minimum of 21 years of age• A valid driver’s license and maintenance of a satisfactory driving record• Satisfy all applicable Department of Transportation requirements• A valid firearms permit OR ability to pass applicable firearms licensing requirements• A valid guard card OR ability to obtain a guard card or any other required licenses• Chauffeur’s license or ability to obtain one in the states of Indiana, Louisiana, and Michigan• Ability to lift at least 50 poundsPreferred Qualifications• Previous armored car messenger or driver experience• Military experience• Protective services experienceProfessional Skills• Excellent ethics and integrity• Excellent customer service• High attention to detail• Ability to work independently• Professional demeanorBenefits• Insurance including health, dental, and life• 401(K) with company match• Paid vacation• Holiday Pay• Profit SharingAre you ready to drive into your new career?About Brink’sBrink’s U.S., a division of Brink’s, Incorporated, is the premier provider of armored car transportation, currency and coin processing, ATM servicing and other value added services to financial institutions, retailers and other commercial and government entities. The company has a proud history of providing growth and advancement opportunities for its employees. We have a challenging opportunity for a Driver/Messenger.Brink’s is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, marital status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information or history or any other characteristic protected by law. Brink’s is also committed to providing a drug free workplace.We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Driver Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173838943.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),aa0b4d8f1e2fc5834896dea388f22c73
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:06:32:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"must have background in moving materials and productw/manufacturing experience and crane/hoist experience for 1 positionw/manufacturing experience (this is a labor intensive position that will require heavy lifting and the ability to get into hard to reach places. for 2nd position1st shift Material Handler (experience working with sheet metal gates, operate cranes, forklift, some fabrication experience helpful)minimum 3 years manufacturing and fork lift experience is mandatory. Must pass drug and background check and have a good driving record.Experience in readying engineering drawings or quality inspection a good driving record Belcan is a leading provider of qualified personnel to many of the world's most respected enterprises. We offer excellent opportunities for contract/temporary, temp-to-hire, and direct assignments in the technical, IT, professional, and clerical fields. We are the employer of choice for thousands worldwide. Our overriding goal is to provide quality staffing solutions that help people, organizations, and communities succeed. Belcan is a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity. For more information, please visit our website at http://www.belcan.com .Apply Online $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",material handler Job in Fairfield,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Fairfield, OH 45014",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handler-job-fairfield-oh-us-174945915.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),eac569d91a1e20dfe0fb327fd4fe342a
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:06:39:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"NRT LLC, a subsidiary of Realogy, operates all company-owned real estate offices under Realogy’s world-renowned brands of Coldwell Banker®, Coldwell Banker Commercial®, Sotheby’s International Realty® and ZipRealty®, as well as the powerful regional brands, The Corcoran Group® and Citi Habitats®. As the nation’s largest residential real estate brokerage firm, NRT owns and operates companies in more than 45 of the 100 largest metropolitan areas in the United States, with approximately 725 offices and 45,200 affiliated sales associates. The Coldwell Banker West Shell Agent Shared Service Center in Cincinnati, OH is looking to hire a Full Time Data Management Coordinator. This role is responsible for data entry and transaction processing for all 8 Cincinnati, OH branch offices. This role creates and processes sales transactions, along with maintaining large amounts of information across various real estate specific databases. This position will also offer agent support as needed by answering agent questions and requests. Employees in this position will also step in to provide branch office vacation coverage based on business need. Job Duties: Process all listings including all data and photo entry; listings are entered in to four local MLS systems, and other company-specific sites (e.g., - HomeBase, Trident, ShowingDesk) Process all sales and necessary documentation in to required sites including HomeBase and Trident; update statuses as needed in MLS Process closed business in Trident, HomeBase, and MLS Work with the branch office administrative staff, as well as Central Region Service Center staff  to ensure data accuracy and compliance to prevent errors Track Sales Agent award levels and run reports on a monthly basis to determine award eligibility based on overall earnings, commissions, and other sales metrics Provide coverage in the 8 area branch offices for scheduled vacation time when the Office Concierge is away from the office. Responsibilities include: Scanning all transactions to the ASSC Handling all new agent on-boarding Assisting their managers with various recruiting projects Additional duties as required to ensure operational efficiency of the branch offices Qualifications: High school diploma required 2 years  administrative experience required; customer service training preferred Excellent verbal and written communication skills required; majority of communication via phone or email Ability to communicate with different audiences to convey message successfully and to change gear quickly to support different customers Creative thinking skills and ability to solve problems quickly; strong multi-tasking skills Very strong computer and Internet competence with proficiency in Microsoft Office applications Outstanding organizational and file management skills; emphasis on attention to detail Customer-focused, delivery-oriented, ability to work in a team environment Ability to travel through the Cincinnati metro area to the 8 CB West Shell branch offices is required To be considered an applicant for this position you must show how you meet the basic qualifications of the job in a resume or document you upload. Employment by NRT is contingent upon completing Form I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification, education verification, and satisfactory reference and background checks. NRT LLC, a subsidiary of Realogy Corporation, is committed to providing equal employment opportunity (“EEO”) and will make employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, sexual preference, gender identity or gender expression, veteran status, marital status, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations.Under the Americans with Disabilities Act and other applicable laws Realogy will provide reasonable accommodation to disabled applicants upon request during the application process to ensure equal opportunities to be considered for employment.",Data Management Coordinator Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45242",,http://jobview.monster.com/data-management-coordinator-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174962043.aspx?mescoid=1500148001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,a1a75d4cfe6bf503444a722eba845ef8
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:06:40:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in Cincinnati,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175169998.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=16,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,9ef3e90d820b6ebcbcf0be44254b347c
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:06:56:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job The Ethicon Surgical Care/Energy business, a part of the Johnson & Johnson family of companies, is recruiting for an Associate Quality Engineer, located in Cincinnati, OH. The Ethicon Surgical Care business offers a broad range of products, platforms and technologies-including sutures, surgical staplers, clip appliers, trocars and synthetic mesh devices. The Energy portion of the business offers a broad range of products that use either Ultrasonic or RF energy to seal and transect vessels. The products are used in a wide variety of minimally invasive and open surgical procedures. Specialties include support for treatment of colorectal and thoracic conditions, women's health conditions, hernias, cancer and obesity. The Ethicon Surgical Care business combines products and services of two market leading legacy companies, both with long histories of medical innovation. Ethicon, Inc. based in Somerville, New Jersey, was founded more than 80 years ago as a pioneer in suture development and manufacturing, helping to transform the safety and electiveness of open surgery. Ethicon Endo-Surgery, Inc. was created 20 years ago in Cincinnati, Ohio, developing innovative devices that have driven the revolutionary shift from open to minimally invasive surgery that continues to lead the industry today.Position SummaryAs an Associate Quality Engineer, you will have the opportunity to use state of the art tools and take advantage of various training courses related to statistics, risk management, process control and anatomy, offered on-site. You will be assigned to a specific product team/product family to oversee the quality of a product prior to product launch, during its stabilization period or to sustain ongoing production.  As the voice of quality your are also a voice of the customer within the core team.  The Associate Quality Engineer’s major responsibilities will include but are not limited to;• Reliability modeling and test method development• Ownership of the Risk management File and FMEA development, • Failure Investigation and Analysis,• Requirement Definition and Verification, • Data Analysis (hypothesis testing, DOE analysis, process capability, linear regressions)• Component Qualifications• Design and Process validation • Complaint Analysis (as applicable)Qualifications•       A  Bachelor’s or Master’s degree is required in Engineering or relevant discipline. A degree in Mechanical, Biomechanical or Biomedical Engineering is preferred. • Previous co-op, internship or work experience.• Demonstrated leadership/participation in campus programs and/or community service activities. • Data analysis especially in Minitab including but not limited to: Hypothesis testing, DOE analysis, Linear Regressions, and Process Capability is preferred.• Knowledge of 21CFR820 and ISO 13485 is preferred.• Design for Six Sigma is preferred.• Excellent Investigative skills such as analytical problem solving Fishbone/Ishikawa, root cause analysis, 5Y’s, etc. is required.  • Geometric Dimensioning & Tolerancing (GD&T) is preferred.• Knowledge of Risk Management tools like FMEA’s is preferred.• Knowledge of CAPA Systems is preferred.• Excellent interpersonal, organizational, and verbal and written communication skills are required.  • Comfortable working in a matrix environment and have the ability to connect with different functional groups and people who work in multiple levels while embracing and driving change.  •      This position may require up to 10% domestic/international travel.BE VITAL in your career, Be seen for the talent you bring to your work. Explore opportunities within the Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies. J2W: LI NAPrimary LocationUnited States-Ohio-CincinnatiOrganizationEthicon Endo Surgery Inc (6041)Job FunctionQuality (Eng) Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-4.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://images.monster.com/mm/xjjsonx/cjt1/Carousel-5.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies Job Application for Associate Quality Engineer | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","The Ethicon Surgical Care/Energy business, a part of the Johnson & Johnson family of companies, is recruiting for an Associate Quality Engineer, located in Cincinnati, OH. The Ethicon Surgical Care business offers a broad range of products, platforms and technologies-including sutures, surgical staplers, clip appliers, trocars and synthetic mesh devices. The Energy portion of the business offers a broad range of products that use either Ultrasonic or RF energy to seal and transect vessels. The products are used in a wide variety of minimally invasive and open surgical procedures. Specialties include support for treatment of colorectal and thoracic conditions, women's health conditions, hernias, cancer and obesity. The Ethicon Surgical Care business combines products and services of two market leading legacy companies, both with long histories of medical innovation. Ethicon, Inc. based in Somerville, New Jersey, was founded more than 80 years ago as a pioneer in suture development and manufacturing, helping to transform the safety and electiveness of open surgery. Ethicon Endo-Surgery, Inc. was created 20 years ago in Cincinnati, Ohio, developing innovative devices that have driven the revolutionary shift from open to minimally invasive surgery that continues to lead the industry today.Position SummaryAs an Associate Quality Engineer, you will have the opportunity to use state of the art tools and take advantage of various training courses related to statistics, risk management, process control and anatomy, offered on-site. You will be assigned to a specific product team/product family to oversee the quality of a product prior to product launch, during its stabilization period or to sustain ongoing production.  As the voice of quality your are also a voice of the customer within the core team.  The Associate Quality Engineer’s major responsibilities will include but are not limited to;• Reliability modeling and test method development• Ownership of the Risk management File and FMEA development, • Failure Investigation and Analysis,• Requirement Definition and Verification, • Data Analysis (hypothesis testing, DOE analysis, process capability, linear regressions)• Component Qualifications• Design and Process validation • Complaint Analysis (as applicable)Qualifications•       A  Bachelor’s or Master’s degree is required in Engineering or relevant discipline. A degree in Mechanical, Biomechanical or Biomedical Engineering is preferred. • Previous co-op, internship or work experience.• Demonstrated leadership/participation in campus programs and/or community service activities. • Data analysis especially in Minitab including but not limited to: Hypothesis testing, DOE analysis, Linear Regressions, and Process Capability is preferred.• Knowledge of 21CFR820 and ISO 13485 is preferred.• Design for Six Sigma is preferred.• Excellent Investigative skills such as analytical problem solving Fishbone/Ishikawa, root cause analysis, 5Y’s, etc. is required.  • Geometric Dimensioning & Tolerancing (GD&T) is preferred.• Knowledge of Risk Management tools like FMEA’s is preferred.• Knowledge of CAPA Systems is preferred.• Excellent interpersonal, organizational, and verbal and written communication skills are required.  • Comfortable working in a matrix environment and have the ability to connect with different functional groups and people who work in multiple levels while embracing and driving change.  •      This position may require up to 10% domestic/international travel.BE VITAL in your career, Be seen for the talent you bring to your work. Explore opportunities within the Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies. J2W: LI NAPrimary LocationUnited States-Ohio-CincinnatiOrganizationEthicon Endo Surgery Inc (6041)Job FunctionQuality (Eng)",Personal and Household Services,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-quality-engineer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174874636.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=12,,,a0365f203fd99230ca23feb9ad9dfa55
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:07:44:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Cincinatti, OH - YBEED06S-POS_75062977-1DescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Sanofi Genzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on specialty areas including: immunology, oncology and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Sanofi Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Sanofi Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.At Sanofi Genzyme, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Dupilumab Area Business ManagerThe Area Business Manager (ABM) is responsible for engaging Dermatologists and other key customers within an assigned geography and presenting clinically focused selling message to create and grow revenue and to consistently deliver product goals. The ABM will demonstrate initiative, drive, and independence, and take ownership for meeting and exceeding individual business goals. This will be accomplished by driving performance and delivering results in a compliant manner with a high degree of integrity strictly following all Sanofi Genzyme US policies and in compliance with all policies and procedures governing the promotion of pharmaceutical/biological products in the US. Engage Dermatology customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to introduce, launch, grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Partner with multiple collaboration stakeholders: Regeneron Sales Professional counterpart, Reimbursement and Access Specialists, and Clinical brand and corporate objectives in assigned territory Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts in the Dermatology therapeutic area to generate product utilization.Develop strong working relationships with Atopic Dermatitis experts and all additional Dermatology specialists in assigned geography as well as nurses, office staff and other important health care personnel and key patient advocacy support groups as directed. Coordinate with other Dermatology field specialists such as Regional Science Liaisons, Field Account Specialists, Account Management and Nurse Educators in their territory to ensure optimal account success. Coordinate and communicate with other field-based and home office personnel teams to proactively address customer needs, market dynamics and trends and develop strategies which support brand and corporate objectives within their assigned geography. Participate and help lead initiatives to support sales success as assigned (e.g. participate in industry related congresses, local and regional meetings and medical conferences).Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Plan, organize, and sponsor local promotional speakers programs and activities.Effectively executes short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish relationship with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Allocate resources in accordance with business opportunities.QualificationsBasic QualificationsBachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university5+ years of healthcare sales experience (pharmaceutical, biotech or medical device), with 2+ years Dermatology experience strongly preferredDemonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related informationAbility to travel to meetings/trainings/programs as necessary - additional travel may be required within the assigned territoryProven success and positive track record of consistent sales performance in complex markets with diverse customer segments operating with a high degree of integrity within compliance guidelines Ability to operate as a “team player” in cooperation with collaboration partners and internal colleagues to reach common goalsValid Driver’s LicensePreferred Qualifications2 years selling sub-cutaneous self-injectable (or office administered IV) biologics 2 years of selling experience for Atopic Dermatitis, or other Immunology disorders such as, Psoriasis, Multiple Sclerosis, Crohn’s Disease or Ulcerative Colitis and others strongly preferred.Demonstrate advanced clinically-based selling skills Results oriented with a proven track record of success with product launchesExperience with in-servicing and training office staff, nurses and office managersDemonstrate a passion and learning aptitude for science and is proactive in strengthening knowledge related to disease-state, treatment options and healthcare trends #LI-GZJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob Posting:Sep 14, 2016, 4:51:49 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Cincinatti,,"Cincinnati, OH",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/dermatology-dupilumab-area-business-manager-cincinatti-oh-ybeed06s-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174611306.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,3eecd47e1598b89708db7f890b668872
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:07:45:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  706031Title: Systems AnalystLocation: Columbus, OHContract: 1-2 yearsApex Systems is currently seeking a Systems Analyst for a multi-year contract in Columbus, OH. The qualified candidate will have the following skills:J",Systems Analyst Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  706031Title: Systems AnalystLocation: Columbus, OHContract: 1-2 yearsApex Systems is currently seeking a Systems Analyst for a multi-year contract in Columbus, OH. The qualified candidate will have the following skills:J",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/systems-analyst-job-columbus-oh-us-175318260.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f24d1843bec2959ab7bbd999ba96c1ad
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:08:24:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Musculoskeletal Specialty Manager - Cincinnati-POS_70075661-0002DescriptionSanofi, an integrated global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in the field of healthcare with seven growth platforms: diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and the new Genzyme. At Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health. Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, Sanofi US is part of a leading global healthcare company that is dedicated to improving health and driving back disease by making innovative medicines accessible to people around the world.Our extensive research and development efforts encompass a wide range of therapeutic areas that are in line with public health issues, trends and the most pressing health needs.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together.Territory: Cincinnati, OHThe Musculoskeletal Specialty Manager (MSM) will be responsible for selling Synvisc-One/Synvisc in the territory. The MSM will be responsible for all customers and sales in the territory. Call points will focus on Orthopedics, but will include Rheumatology, PM&R, and Primary Care providers. In addition the sales representative will be responsible for developing a business plan and managing resources that will be used to achieve individual goals. You will represent Sanofi Biosurgery as a leader in the health care industry through demonstration and provision of dependable and credible education, information and professional assistance. Job expectations will include: Communicate Sanofi Biosurgery product features, advantages and benefits related to customer priorities. Effectively use promotional aids to compare with competition and increase buying behavior. Cultivate and develop relationship with customers to ensure a successful environment. Develop effective, sustainable relationships and provide excellent customer service and follow-through skills. You will create and implement business plans to achieve territory and business sales goals.QualificationsBasic Qualifications: BA/BS degree and 5 years of previous sales experience in either medical device, pharmaceutical or B-to-B product sales or 2 years of previous sales experience in the viscosupplement market. Preferred Qualifications: Orthopedic sales experience. Injectable sales experience. Complex account and territory management experience. #LI-GZJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob Posting:Oct 13, 2016, 9:14:15 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",Musculoskeletal Specialty Manager - Cincinnati Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/musculoskeletal-specialty-manager-cincinnati-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175156900.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,General/Other: Sales/Business Development,b05ada951bc03d6f1ca8a2ccee828c8c
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:08:44:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: The Off Hour Stock Clerkis responsible for maintaining a well-stocked appearance in the store whichhelps ensure the best customer experience is achieved.  This individualwill work closely with the Store Management team to ensure company standardsare met during the stocking process.  The hours for this shift are commonlyearly morning, however in certain locations or during holiday seasons,overnight shifts may be available. Responsibilities:Replenish a shelf, bin or pegged area with stock and transporting merchandise by hand/pulling. This also includes picking up loose pieces of merchandise from the floor.The physical removal of goods from a truck and putting empty pallets, security cages, and transfers back on the truck. Requires the use of various material-handling equipment.Re-merchandise any selling space, to regroup items, or to make space for new merchandise.To read both written and numerical verbiage, comprehend spatial relationships, and have the ability to set merchandise according to the layout.Take empty cardboard cases from the sales floor to the baling machine.Safe operation of a blade-type instrument designed for opening cased merchandise, as well as returning the blade to its non-operational position when not in use.Returning merchandise to its proper location on the sales floor as designated by aisle layouts. This requires knowledge of sales floor locations and proper merchandising techniques, and can be accomplished either by hand or pushing a sales cart.Manually placing price shelf labels on lip below merchandise or on scanner peg hooks.Moving merchandise to and from the perimeter and gondola overstock areas and requires climbing a ladder up to 12 feet.May also be assigned other duties within the store at the direction of the store management team. Qualifications Knowledge of shipping and receiving process in a Retail environmentAbility to lift up to 25 poundsAbility to climb ladders, up to 12 feetAbility to multi task and prioritize projects **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Dueto the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected forinterviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest inToys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn,Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY TRU 7960 Connector Drive  Florence 41042-1433 Schedule: Flexible",Toys R Us Seasonal Stock Crew Team Member Job in Florence,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary: The Off Hour Stock Clerkis responsible for maintaining a well-stocked appearance in the store whichhelps ensure the best customer experience is achieved.  This individualwill work closely with the Store Management team to ensure company standardsare met during the stocking process.  The hours for this shift are commonlyearly morning, however in certain locations or during holiday seasons,overnight shifts may be available. Responsibilities:Replenish a shelf, bin or pegged area with stock and transporting merchandise by hand/pulling. This also includes picking up loose pieces of merchandise from the floor.The physical removal of goods from a truck and putting empty pallets, security cages, and transfers back on the truck. Requires the use of various material-handling equipment.Re-merchandise any selling space, to regroup items, or to make space for new merchandise.To read both written and numerical verbiage, comprehend spatial relationships, and have the ability to set merchandise according to the layout.Take empty cardboard cases from the sales floor to the baling machine.Safe operation of a blade-type instrument designed for opening cased merchandise, as well as returning the blade to its non-operational position when not in use.Returning merchandise to its proper location on the sales floor as designated by aisle layouts. This requires knowledge of sales floor locations and proper merchandising techniques, and can be accomplished either by hand or pushing a sales cart.Manually placing price shelf labels on lip below merchandise or on scanner peg hooks.Moving merchandise to and from the perimeter and gondola overstock areas and requires climbing a ladder up to 12 feet.May also be assigned other duties within the store at the direction of the store management team. Qualifications Knowledge of shipping and receiving process in a Retail environmentAbility to lift up to 25 poundsAbility to climb ladders, up to 12 feetAbility to multi task and prioritize projects **Please note that werecruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent poolof potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will reviewapplicants at that time. Dueto the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected forinterviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest inToys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn,Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY TRU 7960 Connector Drive  Florence 41042-1433 Schedule: Flexible",,http://jobview.monster.com/toys-r-us-seasonal-stock-crew-team-member-job-florence-ky-us-173672276.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=20,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,c55dc9056259e5c2df697966e9dd8b87
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:08:45:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are searching for a Logistics Coordinator to work with a leading food manufacturing company in Cincinnati, OH. This is a contract position that is expected to last at least a year but could be longer based upon performance. This is a third (3rd) shift role. Responsibilities for the Logistics CoordinatorMonitor warehouse automated management systemMaintain inventory accuracyOccasional supervision of dock activityRequirements for the Logistics CoordinatorWarehouse experience in a management or clerical roleComfort with computer systems & general office filing & data entryComfortable with systems in a warehouse environmentBenefits for the Logistics CoordinatorMedical, Dental, PTOThis Job is located in Mariemont, OH -> United States",Logistics Coordinator - Manufacturing /Warehouse/Management System Job in Mariemont,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Mariemont, OH 45227",,http://jobview.monster.com/logistics-coordinator-manufacturing-warehouse-management-system-job-mariemont-oh-us-174330997.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=2,18.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,,634617a217c193e798df8420f9cf9ff5
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:09:41:22,No,jobs.monster.com,".TAD PGS, INC. is currently seeking an Mechanical Engineer for one of our clients in Cincinnati, OH. Company Description: Go Beyond. It’s more than a phrase. It’s the way our client lives and the way they work, the way they are seen by our customers and our employees. They never compromise on their promise to Go Beyond. It is who they are, for more than a decade they have delivered superior performance. They are known for our ability to combine know-how and technology quickly and effectively to create solutions. Join their team and their proven promise of integrity, accessibility and continuity. They want you to join them and Go Beyond. Job Overview: Applies mechanical engineering principles to components, subsystems and systems, including assembly, analysis, simulation, testing and documentation; constructions of developmental assembles, sub-assemblies and components. Major Responsibilities:Conduct failure analysis with minimal oversight;Investigate and test vendor’s components,Perform design selection;Create documentation of design/product-drawings, specifications, compliance matrices,Test plans and test reports.Participate in and prepare materials for internal design reviews (IDR).Procure parts for development.Create design verifications with minimal oversight.Contribute to the completion of milestones associated with specific projects.This individual will frequently use and apply technical standards, principles, theories, concepts and techniques.Represent department as primary contact with internal company customers on assigned programsRequired Qualifications: The successful candidate will be a good problem solver,Able to handle a variety of technical problems of moderate scope and complexity; have a sense of urgency,Be proactive toward achieving goals and setting priorities, andBe adaptable.Basic design skills and understanding of GD&T (geometric design and tolerance) and CAD/CAE tools are required.SolidEdge or equivalent 3D modeling tool capabilities preferred.Proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, Outlook, Excel, and PowerPoint).Bachelor’s Degree in Mechanical or Aerospace5-8 years of previous relevant experience with BS,3-6 years’ experience with Master’sTAD PGS, INC. specializes in delivering secure, reliable and rapidly implemented workforce solutions to the U.S. Federal marketplace, including U.S. Government agencies and their prime contractors. With more than 50 years of experience, TAD PGS, INC. has earned a reputation for accountability, a value that government agencies and prime contractors both demand and deserve.TAD PGS, INC. sources professionals for the full spectrum of federal positions, from administrative to management, and those contracts requiring extremely niche-oriented technical skills and the highest levels of security clearance.Apply Online $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Mechanical Engineer Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45245",,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanical-engineer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173786379.aspx?mescoid=1700184001001&jobPosition=5,,,38bf8b9e263d8d1e23af93aa91ced7d7
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:09:41:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in Cincinnati,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175169997.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e2e6a1125fc8595cfd717d4bc769c007
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:09:57:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"SERVICE MANAGER,   KITCHEN MANAGER,    RESTAURANT MANAGER ARE YOU LOOKING FOR THE HOTTEST CASUAL DINING CONCEPT IN 10 YEARS? WE HAVE IT!  AVERAGE SALES $5M, COMPLETELY FROM-SCRATCH KITCHENS, FUNKY VIBE, HUGE GROWTH PLANS AND FUN ENVIRONMENT!Yet again, RMS brings the hottest opportunities in the hospitality industry directly to you!Our Mission: Help you navigate the minefield of career opportunities, and put you on the path to long term success. We are conducting a search for Salaried Restaurant Managers in your area.  Our Client is the fastest-growing Casual Dining company in the US, and will open over 200 new locations in the next few years!!!We work very closely with top leadership from companies who are hiring in the region. We specialize in QSR, Fast-Casual and Casual Dining Restaurants and if you are a leader in this niche of the industry considering a career change - contact us today for an eye-popping view of the landscape of opportunities available to you right now.PLEASE DO NOT APPLY UNLESS YOU MEET THESE NON-NEGOTIABLE CRITERIA:    At least 2 years of Salaried Restaurant Operations experience with a Casual Dining concept    Able to lead and inspire business owners towards successful completion of goals    Strong math, verbal and written communication skills    Excellent communication and people skills    Strong organizational skills    Ability to lead by example using hands-on, shoulder-to-shoulder work ethic    Able to work a flexible work schedule and meet business demands, including weekends and holidays We take pride in our reputation of moving fast with top candidates. You will hear from us within 24 hours if your experience is in line with the expectations of these searches. Apply today for IMMEDIATE and CONFIDENTIAL consideration. There are NO FEES for you and CONFIDENTIALITY is ASSURED!",Restaurant Manager Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/restaurant-manager-job-florence-ky-us-175182586.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=10,"40,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Food Services/Hospitality,7f3b8f8b99d315caa95f59947250c876
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:09:57:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:   Rack electronic equipment in cabinets.  Responsible (but not limited to) the installation/wiring of multiple Headend/Hub network devices such as Satellite receivers, Demodulators, EAS, Ad Insertion, Modulators, RF combining,  Optical Transmitters/Receivers and Power/Fuse panels.  Able to organize, square bundle and terminate coax wiring utilizing tie wrap and/or lace methods.Put connectors on coax cables and audio wires.  Label wires as needed. May provide help for outside plant activities such as mounting equipment on the side of house or putting connectors on cables.  The position will also perform unskilled task, handling, loading, unloading and other tasks as needed to complete a project.  These tasks will be done at both the company facility and the customers’ site.  Set of tools are necessary to perform job.  Major duties to be performed:  Rack and install headend equipment Install and neatly dress all associated wiring Connectorize and terminate coaxial and audio wires Perform other functions as outlined by the Lead Technician, Project Manager and Projects Director Must be able to travel when required Maintain and submit all documentation (expense reports, timesheets, etc.) in a timely manner Perform material handle tasks  Required Skills, Education and Experience:  CATV or DBS installations Telephone wiring Minimum 6 months CATV wiring experience High School diploma or equivalent Valid Driver’s License Able to lift 50 lbs.  Good driving record Must provide own required tools Organized, self-motivated, ability to problem solve Attention to details  RJ6 Connectors and RJ6 Coax experience OR experience working in a Headend",Headend Technician Job in Columbus,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Columbus, OH",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/headend-technician-job-columbus-oh-us-175320250.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,be11e644af242686608d27d9224e03f4
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:09:59:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695016Description:Shift:We-Sa 730pm-6am Contract: Through end of the year with a possibility of extensionPay Rate: 10/hrPosition Summary: Picking, labeling, and otherwise preparing the finished prescription as well as other light warehouse duties.  Duties:Key Responsibilities: Prep for the day; set up totes Fills daily drug orders accurately and efficiently in a timely manner, under the supervision of a pharmacist.Assists in processing returned drugs and recycle/dispose per procedure.Review facility pre-list and prepare 30 day cards with the appropriate drug for the full fill.Assists in monthly fills by delivering and exchanging medications to scheduled nursing home. Assist in pre-packing frequently ordered medications, label, and store, as needed during low volume times.Packages materials and products manuallyReceives packing order and pull items to be delivered from order sheetsDetermines that the correct packing materials are available at packing station Checks packing list for accuracyApplies labels, and stack boxes according to directions Coordinate STAT deliveriesShip UPS ordersKeeps record of departure times and items packed and attaches to order Follow all applicable government regulations including HIPAA. Other duties as assigned; Job duties may vary by location.Physical Demands: May sit, stand, stoop, bend and walk intermittently during the day. May sit or stand seven (7) to ten (10) hours per day. May be necessary to work extended hours as needed. Finger dexterity to operate office equipment required. May need to lift up to twenty-five (25) pounds on occasion. Visual acuity to see and read fine prints.Specific vision abilities required by this role include close vision, color vision and the ability to adjust focus. Must be able to hear normal voice sounds. The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this role. Work Environment: Work in a climate-controlled, smoke-free internal environment.  TO APPLY: PLEAS SUBMIT YOUR RESUME AND CONTACT INFO TO ABOGNAR@APEXSYSTEMSINC.COM EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",OMNI - Picking Technician Job in West Chester,Full Time Employee,"West Chester, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/omni-picking-technician-job-west-chester-oh-us-174643073.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),edf6c5a70bd0a285bdbd0de7ae312bd3
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:09:59:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Superior Environmental Solutions, Inc. (SES) is an environmental services company that can craft solutions to meet any customer’s need, which includes routine scheduled maintenance, plant outages, plant shutdown projects and emergency response services.Based on our significant growth, SES is seeking an Administrative Assistant to join our Cincinnati, OH operation. This is a full time, fully benefited (medical, dental, vision & paid vacation) position that pays $15 per hour.Essential Job FunctionsProvide administrative support to the SES Human Resource Department.Schedule candidate interviews and coordinate training classes.Data entry into the SES applicant tracking system.Facilitate onboarding functions such as background checks, drug tests and application processing.General RequirementsThe ideal candidate will have 1+ year experience supporting recruiting and staffing functions but willing to train the right motivated candidate.Outgoing personality with demonstrated ability to build strong relationships across diverse population of teams.Highly self-motivated and self-disciplined with ability to work effectively with little or no supervision.Excellent communication and organizational skills.Strong business software skills (Word, Excel and web-based systems).",Administrative Assistant Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45246",Waste Management,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174239154.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=8,,Administrative/Clerical,917676abdc30a968936ee89deefa871d
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:10:37:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Maintenance Technician (MT) will be responsible for assisting in the installation, maintenance, and repair of the automated packaging and distribution equipment.A successful candidate in this role will accomplish the following: Perform preventative/ predictive maintenance of conveyance equipment using the appropriate job plans, procedures, and manuals Maintain and repair distribution center racking Complete preventative maintenance routines, documentation and procedures Track and store department inventory, including spare parts Develop and maintain positive working relationships across all levels of the organization Conduct maintenance and basic troubleshooting of robotics and robotic work cells Troubleshoot electrical and mechanical problems related to all material handling equipment components Maintain and troubleshoot motors, photo eyes, relays, proximity sensors, solenoids, motor starters, tachs, etc. Assist in mentoring junior technicians by providing guidance and directions to help them develop their skill set Assist with basic electronics/ Programmable Logic Controls troubleshooting  Physical Demands (Must be able to perform with or without reasonable accommodation):  Lift and move totes up to 49 pounds each Regular bending, lifting, stretching and reaching both below the waist and above the head Occasionally push and pull wheeled dollies loaded with products up to 100 pounds during site visits Engage in full manual dexterity in both hands and wrists Walking in the FC and around area with great frequency; facilities are over a quarter mile in length Ability to climb ladders and gangways safely and without limitation Dexterity in eye/hand coordination, feet (foot pedals), manual (picking, pinching, holding, grasping), and wrist motion (repetitive flexion/rotation) Working conditions may include small spaces, dust, fumes/odors, hot/cold temperatures, inside/outside noise, vibration, standing on concrete for long hours and wet or uneven surfaces Must be able to stand/walk for up to 10-12 hoursBasic Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent Able to work all days and shifts, including overtime (24 hours a day, 7 days a week operation, including holidays) PC competency, Word & Excel and Windows OS Experience in the following areas: Automated conveyor systems and controls Repair of material handling equipment Predictive/ Preventative maintenance tools and procedures Metal and wood fabrication Blueprint and electrical schematic reading Electrical and electronic principles Preferred Qualifications: Degree from a vocational school or college with a focus in the Mechanical or Electrical field 2+ years apprenticeship or equivalent experience in the Mechanical or Electrical field Experience with Material Handling Equipment (MHE) safety standards accordance with Original Equipment Manufacturer (OEM) and Safety standards Project Management experience Experience with a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS) Experience with robotic operation/ maintenance Able to troubleshoot basic Input/Output functions  Amazon is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer – Minority / Female / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation. ",Maintenance Technician Job in Hebron,,"Hebron, KY 41048",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-technician-job-hebron-ky-us-175189407.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f997e481adb63135a12026d25a5ae7f8
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:10:38:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Fairfield,Full Time,"Fairfield, OH 45014",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-fairfield-oh-us-174728394.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c09e1fdc72cc9d3bb970845be8d2db80
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:11:34:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionOverview: The Seasonal Fine Jewelry Associate is responsible for providing outstanding customer service, meeting hourly sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, demonstrating superior product knowledge to customers, and creating a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable during the holiday season. Additionally, the Fine Jewelry Sales Associate is responsible for becoming an expert on the product in the department as well as developing and impacting the sales of the business in the department. Performs other duties as assigned. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Fine Jewelry Associates arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! Essential Functions:Acknowledge customers in a friendly and helpful manner within 30 seconds of their entry into the areaHandle all returns courteously and professionallyDetermine customer needs based on personal features and other customer preference related factorsDemonstrate knowledge of store products and services to build sales and minimize returnsSuggest additional merchandise to compliment customer selectionDemonstrate knowledge of store products and services to build sales and minimize returnsMaintain a professional attitude with sincerity and enthusiasm reflecting Macy’s commitment to our customer – the most important person in our storesBe proficient in POS and MPOS systems including Search and Send, My Client and More@ Macy’s tablet appProactive in assisting customers who are using devices to shop and compare, whether Macy’s devices or their ownAssist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment (i.e. BOPs), and have the ability to qualify customer needs, figureout what's right for them, and then get them in touch with the right associate, MBA, or Personal ShopperRegular, dependable attendance & punctuality Qualifications: Education/Experience: High School Diploma or equivalent. Previous selling experience is required, preferably in fine jewelry. Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret product knowledge books. Ability to effectively communicate with customers, peers, and management. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American monetary units. Other skills: Superior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to multi-task in a fast-paced environment. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Must possess a thirst for knowledge Work Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule, including mornings, evenings, and weekends, and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving, special Big Event days, and the day after Christmas, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an EqualOpportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Commissioned Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Commission Sales Fine Jewelry** Part Time: Macy's Northgate OH Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-commission-sales-fine-jewelry-part-time-macy's-northgate-oh-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174966504.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,df8c6ac17e72b0e98eb3c53ba1dd4576
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:11:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are searching for Quality Technician in Cincinnati, OH to work in a food manufacturing environment. This third (3rd) shift contract position with a leading food manufacturing company that is expected to last a year. Responsibilities for the QA/QC TechnicianHelping the Quality Department maintain compliance to the SQF System Food Safety and Quality PlansMaintaining quality assurance documentation, identifying and correcting documentation deficiencies, and ensuring proper quality checks are performedEnsure that all manufacturing products released for sale are safe, wholesome and meet company specificationsEnsure product throughout production process is carried out in accordance with plant HACCP, SSOP and GMP procedures. Performing quality control tests in the lab as well as on the production floor.Perform testing and calibrating lab equipment in preparation for specific tasks. Assures on-line Quality Control Instruments are functional and properly calibrated. This includes, NIR, computrac, Salt Analyzer, PH Meter and Hunter.Perform quality control tests on ingredients, completed products and product samples. Requirements for the QA/QC TechnicianAssociate's degree (Preferable in food technology, biology, life science, microbiology, pharmaceuticals).1-3 years of experience in food manufacturing plant preferred.Experience in working in a quality department. BenefitsMedical, Dental, Vision, PTO, etc. This Job is located in Cincinnati, OH -> United States",QA/QC Technician - Quality Compliance /Food Safety /GMP / Manufacturing Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Cincinnati, OH 45227",,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-qc-technician-quality-compliance-food-safety-gmp-manufacturing-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175123133.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=4,20.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,,e81186bde82c4f730e10c83589fae7ee
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:11:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc., we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! And that means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, while providing our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever and however they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do it alone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re an enthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle, godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a fun place to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team – become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kids everywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hear straight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary:Store Team Members will work regularly with customers to find and sell products that match their needs. In this position, Team Members will be responsible for greeting and engaging Customers to determine the type of Customer they are assisting: first time expectant parents creating a registry, a returning registrant or a gift-giver purchasing items.Responsibilities:             Demonstrate the use of selling skills by becoming familiar with all of the product offerings:Assist the Customer with product choices and suggest add-on items to increase items per transactions and average sale, as well as Buy Protection Plan, Loyalty and Instant Credit programsUse acquired knowledge to suggest additional products to complement Customer's purchaseCommunicate product safety requirements to CustomersInteract heavily with customers on sales floor and cash registerUtilize company selling approaches to create an enriched customer experienceAssist in maintaining a well-stocked and neat store appearanceAct quickly to address customer concerns and provide resolutionsMay be assigned to work in multiple departments to help customers and the store team to achieve daily results Qualifications Passion for excellenceAbility to multi-task and prioritize projectsSuperior customer service skillsPositive attitudeHigh degree of interpersonal skills with an outgoing, friendly, pleasant personality that represents the “R”Us brandAbility to lift and carry merchandise weighing up to 40 pounds and to climb/descend ladders **Please note that we recruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent pool of potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will review applicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-OH-CincinnatiWork Locations: Cincinnati, OH SBS 7800 Montgomery Road  Cincinnati 45236-4388 Schedule: Flexible",Toys R Us and Babies R Us Seasonal Sales Team Member Job in Cincinnati,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc., we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! And that means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, while providing our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever and however they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do it alone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re an enthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle, godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a fun place to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team – become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kids everywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hear straight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary:Store Team Members will work regularly with customers to find and sell products that match their needs. In this position, Team Members will be responsible for greeting and engaging Customers to determine the type of Customer they are assisting: first time expectant parents creating a registry, a returning registrant or a gift-giver purchasing items.Responsibilities:             Demonstrate the use of selling skills by becoming familiar with all of the product offerings:Assist the Customer with product choices and suggest add-on items to increase items per transactions and average sale, as well as Buy Protection Plan, Loyalty and Instant Credit programsUse acquired knowledge to suggest additional products to complement Customer's purchaseCommunicate product safety requirements to CustomersInteract heavily with customers on sales floor and cash registerUtilize company selling approaches to create an enriched customer experienceAssist in maintaining a well-stocked and neat store appearanceAct quickly to address customer concerns and provide resolutionsMay be assigned to work in multiple departments to help customers and the store team to achieve daily results Qualifications Passion for excellenceAbility to multi-task and prioritize projectsSuperior customer service skillsPositive attitudeHigh degree of interpersonal skills with an outgoing, friendly, pleasant personality that represents the “R”Us brandAbility to lift and carry merchandise weighing up to 40 pounds and to climb/descend ladders **Please note that we recruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent pool of potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will review applicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-OH-CincinnatiWork Locations: Cincinnati, OH SBS 7800 Montgomery Road  Cincinnati 45236-4388 Schedule: Flexible",,http://jobview.monster.com/toys-r-us-babies-r-us-seasonal-sales-team-member-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173675401.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,81e2506aa581fb28a5a4f1c6ee6c81b9
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:12:44:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionDICK'S Sporting Goods is seeking Sales Associates to join our store team for the holiday season.  Part-time positions are available in permanent as well as temporary capacities.    Every associate at DICK'S Sporting Goods is united by a common thread - our PASSION for the sports we love.  Associates joining our team have an opportunity to be a part of a growing Fortune 500 company that makes lasting impacts on our communities through sport and activity.   Apply Now to be Considered for any of the Following Available Positions:   Part-Time Sales Associates (Permanent and Temporary Available) Cashier Operations Associate - Freight Flow, Operations Sales Associate - Apparel, Bikes & Exercise, Team Sports, Golf, Footwear, Lodge Specialists - Customer Service, Lacrosse Service, Running Technicians - Bike, Golf   Sales Associate Duties Include: Create a world-class customer experience by providing passionate customer service and selling through customer engagement Uphold DICK'S Sporting Goods' standards for merchandise presentation of the best apparel and equipment brands in sporting goods Demonstrate ability to genuinely interact with customers to show passion, knowledge, dedication, and commitment in their sport or activity Ability to meet Federal requirements for handling and processing firearm transactions Cash Register/POS Ringing and Cash-handling Promote company programs including warranty sales, Scorecard (loyalty program), private-label credit cards, and other seasonal promotions As business needs arise, other tasks may become necessary Operations & Freight Flow Associate Duties: Maintain cleanliness of all areas of the store including offices and restrooms Assist with unloading trucks and processing freight Adhere to all safety policies and procedures Ability to bend, stoop, reach, stand, push, pull, and lift cartons/bins weighing approximately 10-50 pounds each repetitivelyQualificationsSuccess Profile : Flexible availability - including nights, weekend, and holidays 1-2 years of Retail Cashier, Retails Sales or cash-handling experience preferred, but not required Passion for Sports and/or Outdoor Activity Click HERE to review our Rewards & Benefits Information   Depending on position, candidates seeking employment with DICK'S Sporting Goods should be prepared to successfully complete a pre-employment background check prior to beginning employment.    Interviews are by appointment only.   DICK'S Sporting Goods is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Seasonal Sales Associate Job in Cincinnati,,"Cincinnati, OH 45201",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-sales-associate-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175277902.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=11,,,c70b2787777204d7d7b15a8bd703f82e
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:12:45:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary Provides guidance and direction to the store team in the areas of guest satisfaction, team/associate development, merchandising, inventory, cash control, human resources, safety, loss prevention and expense control, so that the store will operate effectively and profitably. Accountable for financial results, guest service, operations and human resource management for that location. Serves as a role model and as a coach. Builds a strong team by helping associates understand policy and strategy to ensure consistent and standard execution of Company initiatives. Provides leadership and develops and maintains a highly efficient profit center, appropriately balanced between business objectives and effective human relations. Ensures the continued fiscal success of the Company, as well as the satisfaction of its guests and associates. Responsible for creating a supportive culture where there is a partnership commitment among the team, which includes:·         Assuming positive intent when working with partners·         Listening actively and demonstrating mutual respect·         Communicating proactively to those who need to know - no surprises·         Working collaboratively to facilitate agreement and resolve conflict·         Exchanging feedback on behaviors to seek closure·         Publicly and privately supporting decisions once they have been made. Maintains open lines of communication with all Regional Store Support Center Departments and Store Staff to ensure a steady flow of information, as well as ensure that required tasks are completed on time and accurately. Key Tasks and Responsibilities Coaches and develops Assistant Managers, other staff members and associates. Holds staff meetings, daily meetings and ""all attend"" meetings with associates following the communication SOP. Clearly communicates Company vision, goals and strategies. Energizes and encourages selling skills and guest delight. Develops these skills through coaching, following-up and interacting with guests on the floor. Manages the financial performance of the business unit including sales, profitability and key metrics through proper and ethical in-store operations. Ensures all initiatives are rolled out and completed in a timely manner in accordance with all Company (SOP) policies, standards and procedures. Drives sales through proper standards in guest service, merchandising, promotional activity and well-trained associates. Responsible for the quality of store associates. Actively participates in the recruiting, selection and orientation of all new team members. Actively recruits quality candidates for the company. Networks and works effectively with other store, district and regional teams to seek information, resolves problems and communicate issues. Maintains awareness of retail trends and competition and provides feedback to DM and/or regional leadership. Ensures that store standards and conditions are, at all times, consistent with the ""Store Standards of Excellence"" guidelines. Actively develops and maintains the Talent Management process using the company succession planning guidelines involving the store and regional management teams.   Requirements 5 years Retail management experience Familiar with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures. Relies on extensive experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Leads and directs the work of others.",Store Manager- Cincinnati,Full Time ,Location:,,http://jobview.monster.com/store-manager-cincinnati-oh-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175202917.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,c44a475fefd1827a1c210a160a476ed4
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:13:43:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc., we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! And that means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, while providing our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever and however they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do it alone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re an enthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle, godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a fun place to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team – become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kids everywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hear straight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves!The Seasonal Order Management Coordinator is responsible for leading a team in maintaining the standards and expectations as outlined in the Seasonal Order Management Coordinator Routine Action Plan. This position is expected to perform a wide variety of activities aimed at driving fulfillment of orders and promoting and managing the training and development of associates that deal with Order Management activities. The SOM Coordinator is a temporary full time position (requires full time availability during season) working the overnight shifts. This position reports directly to the Assistant Store Manager and is expected to coordinate and deliver department training to associates. The SOM Coordinator will spend the majority of their time managing and processing the fulfillment of all orders through all Order Management channels, while ensuring SLA is met and procedures are followed. Responsibilities:Ensures proper processing of all Order Management activities (see below)Manages all Order Management reporting and follow upPromotes department goals:Sales & profitGuest service excellenceSLA / Fill RateTrains all Team Members on all Order Management activities, such as:Guest Fulfillment Systems (GFS)In Store Pick Up (ISPU)Alternate Store Pick Up (ASPU)Ship from Store (SFS)Ship to Store (S2S)LayawayRain ChecksStore Ordering System (SOS)Pre-sellsExhibit an ownership attitude by promoting partnerships with store management.Proficient in decision making and problem solving skillsAble to effectively follow-up with Team Members as needed and provide appropriate feedbackPerforms eLearning coaching verifications with all Team Members.Conduct training for administrative procedures:IntranetInventory screensRF applicationsProvide input and assistance to Store Manager in motivating, evaluating, coaching and counseling Team Members.Involved in scheduling for department Team Members; provides feedback and suggestions to management team to optimize department coverage.Review e-mail, Impact Planner, Order Management Dashboard, “R” Numbers, ISPU Customer Service report, sales reports and metrics (GFS, S2S, Raincheck, RF alerts).Execute all safety and Asset Protection standards. Responsible for incorporating training programs and business objectives. Qualifications BOH CertifiedExceptional leadership, communication & training skillsAbility to handle/prioritize multiple projectsAble to identify others’ strengths & assign work accordinglyAble to effectively problem solve and follow up as neededPassion for Guest Service, product knowledge and results ownershipOrganization knowledge – know the business. Use technical/functional expertise.Commitment to delivering the promises we make in our Mission StatementAbility to lift up to 25 poundsAbility to climb ladders, up to 12 feet**Please note that we recruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent pool of potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will review applicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest in Toys""R""Us! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY TRU 7960 Connector Drive  Florence 41042-1433 Schedule: Full-time",Toys R Us Seasonal Order Management Coordinator Job in Florence,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc., we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! And that means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, while providing our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever and however they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do it alone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re an enthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle, godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a fun place to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team – become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kids everywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hear straight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves!The Seasonal Order Management Coordinator is responsible for leading a team in maintaining the standards and expectations as outlined in the Seasonal Order Management Coordinator Routine Action Plan. This position is expected to perform a wide variety of activities aimed at driving fulfillment of orders and promoting and managing the training and development of associates that deal with Order Management activities. The SOM Coordinator is a temporary full time position (requires full time availability during season) working the overnight shifts. This position reports directly to the Assistant Store Manager and is expected to coordinate and deliver department training to associates. The SOM Coordinator will spend the majority of their time managing and processing the fulfillment of all orders through all Order Management channels, while ensuring SLA is met and procedures are followed. Responsibilities:Ensures proper processing of all Order Management activities (see below)Manages all Order Management reporting and follow upPromotes department goals:Sales & profitGuest service excellenceSLA / Fill RateTrains all Team Members on all Order Management activities, such as:Guest Fulfillment Systems (GFS)In Store Pick Up (ISPU)Alternate Store Pick Up (ASPU)Ship from Store (SFS)Ship to Store (S2S)LayawayRain ChecksStore Ordering System (SOS)Pre-sellsExhibit an ownership attitude by promoting partnerships with store management.Proficient in decision making and problem solving skillsAble to effectively follow-up with Team Members as needed and provide appropriate feedbackPerforms eLearning coaching verifications with all Team Members.Conduct training for administrative procedures:IntranetInventory screensRF applicationsProvide input and assistance to Store Manager in motivating, evaluating, coaching and counseling Team Members.Involved in scheduling for department Team Members; provides feedback and suggestions to management team to optimize department coverage.Review e-mail, Impact Planner, Order Management Dashboard, “R” Numbers, ISPU Customer Service report, sales reports and metrics (GFS, S2S, Raincheck, RF alerts).Execute all safety and Asset Protection standards. Responsible for incorporating training programs and business objectives. Qualifications BOH CertifiedExceptional leadership, communication & training skillsAbility to handle/prioritize multiple projectsAble to identify others’ strengths & assign work accordinglyAble to effectively problem solve and follow up as neededPassion for Guest Service, product knowledge and results ownershipOrganization knowledge – know the business. Use technical/functional expertise.Commitment to delivering the promises we make in our Mission StatementAbility to lift up to 25 poundsAbility to climb ladders, up to 12 feet**Please note that we recruit for this position on an on-going basis in order to build a talent pool of potential candidates. When a position becomes available, we will review applicants at that time. Due to the volume of resumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for interviews will be contacted. Thank you for your interest in Toys""R""Us! Stay connected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube @ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY TRU 7960 Connector Drive  Florence 41042-1433 Schedule: Full-time",,http://jobview.monster.com/toys-r-us-seasonal-order-management-coordinator-job-florence-ky-us-173672267.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,9a308037b2bd7e0edf0b149a3a77c21f
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:13:44:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our winning team as a retail demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store demonstrator is responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.          Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines   Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales Job in Columbus,Part Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-job-columbus-oh-us-175243945.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=10,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,762fadd6ef911433f69a4385efc86e39
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:14:14:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Bakery team, your primary responsibility will be preparing and decorating the products and cakes in the department to ensure only the freshest are available. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by greeting customers in the department and ensuring they are able to locate the products they are looking for. Bakery team members are also expected to have sufficient knowledge to answer questions and make suggestions to our customers. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Smile and greet customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Prepare and decorate product for the Bakery cases and displays, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed and only the freshest product is available for sale. Accurately record special orders on bakery products to ensure the customer is delighted with the finished product. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room, coolers and freezers. Assist in maintaining bakery backroom, cooler and freezer efficiency by unloading deliveries. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Licenses / Certifications Required Must have experience in cake decorating and perform all types of cake decorating Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cold Prep Rooms Cooler Freezer Hot Ovens Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Pulling Pushing Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Twisting Typing Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Knives Safety Cutter Shrink Wrapper Slicer Sheeter Oven Mixer Dough Divider",Cake Decorator (Part Time) E Broad St Giant Eagle Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/cake-decorator-part-time-e-broad-st-giant-eagle-job-columbus-oh-us-175132844.aspx?mescoid=5100921001001&jobPosition=19,,Food Services/Hospitality,6b51fff37a3eb23c799abe61a13dcf1f
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:15:43:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Customer Service Representative in West Chester, OH.  This is a temp to hire opportunity paying $38K - $50K annually.  Summary: • Receives and processes customer orders.  • Confirms order status back to customer.• Communicates customer requirements to organization to ensure meeting customers satisfaction.• Sends credit applications to customers who are interested in receiving terms.• Works with Sales to open new accounts in Oracle and advises Accounting of this information.• Works closely with shipping department to ensure products are shipped on time• Works with Quality and Regulatory departments to ensure proper documentation is sent to customers• Enters complaints into computer system and generate return authorizations when necessary• Processes billing adjustments when necessary• Sends literature to customers when required.• Performs any other functions as requested by the Customer Service Director• Retrieve voice messages from the customer service extension on a rotation basis.• Retrieve orders from fax machine and distributes as needed.• Work with Accounts Receivable to process Credit Card payments on new orders• Scan and attach supporting documents into Oracle as an electronic filing system• Assist Accounts Receivable to help collect or resolve past due issues• Tracks shipments when requested by customer. Qualifications: • Familiar with Oracle system.  • Experience in a customer service environment.  Food or Flavor experience is a plus. • Strong written and verbal communication skills.• Proven ability to manage and organize multiple priorities.  • Customer focus and sense of urgency.• Professional and friendly demeanor to customers and co-workers.   If you are interested in this position and meet the minimum qualifications for this position please apply now! To view all of our open positions, please visit www.ajilon.com and apply! ",Customer Service Representative job in West Chester,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"West Chester, OH 45069",,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-in-west-chester-oh-job-west-chester-oh-us-173553356.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=8,,Customer Support/Client Care,394e12e7b7bc17f091335a9788a4b72e
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:15:43:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary: Sells products for distributor to restaurants and caterers, hotels and retail, establishments or individuals at place of business by performing the following duties. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. * Compiles lists of prospective customers for use as sales leads, based on information from newspapers, business directories, industry ads, trade shows, Internet Web sites, and other sources. * Travels throughout assigned territory to call on regular and prospective customers to solicit orders, or talks with customers or by phone. * Displays or demonstrates product, using samples or catalog, and emphasizes salable features. * Quotes prices and credit terms and prepares sales contracts for orders obtained. * Estimates date of delivery to customer, based on knowledge of own firm's production and delivery schedules. * Prepares reports of business transactions and keeps expense accounts. * Works with inside sales representatives to keep account activities and literature up to date. * Tracks inventory. * Enters new customer data and other sales data for current customers into computer database. * Develops and maintains relationships with purchasing contacts. * Investigates and resolves customer problems with deliveries. * Mentors with Senior to obtain institutional knowledge concerning products, processes and systems. * College Degree desired but not required. * One to two years of related experience in restaurant, food sales, or professional catering. * Past experience working as a Chef highly desired * High Energy and enthusiastic * Must live in the Nashville area. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Sales Associate Job in Cincinnati,,Position Information,,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-associate-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174987236.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,,,951009191ec20f8168874b0bb9861aeb
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:16:42:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Description:   Crown Equipment Corporation, one of the world's largest lift truck manufacturers, offers local support on a global scale with more than 15 manufacturing facilities worldwide and more than 500 retail locations in over 80 countries. Our global sales and service network provides our customers with a local resource for a wide variety of quality material handling equipment, fleet management solutions, warehouse products and support services to meet their needs anytime, anywhere.   Customer Experience Representative   Job Responsibilities: Answer incoming sales inquiry telephone calls. Provide information by phone, through email or by mail. Pre-qualify customer inquiry and disseminate call information to appropriate sales person or department. Make outbound telephone calls.  Log, track and communicate sales call information. Follow-up on sales leads and record sales results. Participate in training activities locally, in the field, & occasionally at the New Bremen, Ohio corporate headquarters. Work within various departments within the branch as needed.   Qualifications: Bachelor degree preferred. Strong communication, organizational, & time management skills required. Strong problem-solving capabilities, strong sense of responsibility & self-motivation, & ability to work in a team environment are necessary. Must be proficient in Microsoft Office. Valid driver's license, good driving record, & the ability to safely operate lift trucks required. Completion of a background check, drug screen, & physical required.   Compensation and Benefits:   Crown offers an excellent wage and benefits package for full-time employees including Health/Dental/Vision/Prescription Drug Plan, Flexible Benefits Plan, 401K Retirement Savings Plan, Life and Disability Benefits, Paid Holidays, Paid Vacation, Tuition Reimbursement, and much more. EO/AA Employer Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Customer Experience Rep () Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-experience-rep-19510-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174051009.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=11,,Engineering,4311cc5d4e0ee3445aaf9db3ac9fbd28
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:16:42:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionSurprise. Delight. Engage. Amaze. As a seasonal retail sales associate, you're the cornerstone in bringing the magic of Macy's to life for our customers - engaging, interacting, and delighting them with smart merchandise recommendations and outstanding customer service. You'll work independently and as part of a high-performance retail team using your enthusiasm and your great attitude to amaze our customers and help your team members create the kind of memorable shopping experience that has made Macy's America's choice for finding the best holiday gifts. The JobHere's what you'll do as a Macy's seasonal retail associate:Greet customers quickly and warmly as they enter the area - let them know you're glad they're thereProvide outstanding customer service that's sincere, enthusiastic, and professionalMaintain a great attitude that reflects our commitment to the customerQualify customer needs, figure out what's right for them, and help them get it through one of our shopping channels - either in store or onlineShare your knowledge of store products and services to build sales and minimize returnsRecommend additional merchandise that complements customer selectionsUse our in-store technology and tools to enhance the shopping experience: this make include Search and Send, the More@Macy's app, Buy Online Pick Up in Store, and more (don't worry - we'll train you!)Use point-of-sale and mobile point-of-sale systems to process customer purchases (we'll train you on these, too!)Handle returns with courtesy, ease, and professionalismBe at work and be there on time - your team is counting on you! ScheduleIt takes a lot of time to create that magical shopping experience, so many of our associates arrive in the early morning hours while others stay later to set the stage for the next day. You'll have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a part time temporary basis, which may include mornings, evenings, weekends, and busy events like Thanksgiving, Black Friday and the day after Christmas. Generous Employee Discount: Bigger, Better, Faster, More!Just in time for holiday shopping, you'll receive a generous employee discount of up to 20% on most items starting your first day - and that's on top of other specials, coupons, promotions, and special offers - so your holiday dollars go farther, faster. QualificationsYou don't necessarily need retail experience or a degree, but you'll need to be a self-starter with good time management skills, and be able to work independently and as part of a team. And a few other things:Excellent communication skills - written and verbalBasic math functions (addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division) and ability to use a calculatorPossess a strong sense of urgencyEnjoy meeting and working with customersComfortable with technology, such as point of sale registersHave a love of learningNo experience required, just a great attitude!Physical DemandsYou'll be on your feet a lot - this job involves a lot of moving and standing (at least two consecutive hours). You'll need to be able to lift at least 30 pounds, and may occasionally need to reach, stoop, kneel, crouch, climb ladders, and reach above eye level - it's not cardio, but it's a lot of movement! The job also involved close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Apply NowBecome a part of our Macy's seasonal retail sales team and start making magic - apply now! Click here to see the complete Seasonal Retail Sales Associate job description This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Kentucky-FlorenceJob:Non-Commissioned Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Sales** Part Time: Macy's Florence Mall Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-sales-part-time-macy's-florence-mall-job-florence-ky-us-175311401.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=2,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,34c4b0894de898057c35c562648aeb35
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:16:49:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position Information:Sales Support Representative position with a company that gives back and works one-on-one with families in your community. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.We Need:Entry level and senior level applicant or applicant with business-to-business sales experience who wants to help people, gain experience and earn the money they need.You Will Help Your Community By:- Supporting the needs of people in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Providing customer service and communicationYou Only Need:- A high school diploma or equivalent- Be a people-person that likes interaction among others- Be independent-minded and flexible- Outstanding communication skillsWho Is Liberty National?We are Liberty National Life Insurance Company. We have been helping working-class people fulfill their benefit needs since 1900. That's over 100 years of making a difference in lives of people across the United States.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at www.lnlcareers.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":"" //media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Liberty National Insurance Company Job Application for Interviewing Right Now – Customer Service Position | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-6522,All,http://jobview.monster.com/interviewing-right-now-%E2%80%93-customer-service-position-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174957574.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=1,,,452ef78fe9e2e0ab75345047b13a756b
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:13:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Description:   Crown Equipment Corporation, one of the world's largest lift truck manufacturers, offers local support on a global scale with more than 15 manufacturing facilities worldwide and more than 500 retail locations in over 80 countries. Our global sales and service network provides our customers with a local resource for a wide variety of quality material handling equipment, fleet management solutions, warehouse products and support services to meet their needs anytime, anywhere.   Company Description:   Crown Equipment Corporation, one of the world's largest lift truck manufacturers, offers local support on a global scale with more than 15 manufacturing facilities worldwide and more than 500 retail locations in over 80 countries. Our global sales and service network provides our customers with a local resource for a wide variety of quality material handling equipment, fleet management solutions, warehouse products and support services to meet their needs anytime, anywhere.   FIELD SERVICE TECHNICIAN   This position is based out of Crown’s Cincinnati branch location and will provide coverage to the surrounding areas.   Job Responsibilities:   Troubleshoot, diagnose and repair Crown and all other makes of lift trucks. Perform all assigned planned maintenance on customer lift trucks. Maintain a service van and its inventory. Process paperwork after completion of each job.   Qualifications:   High school diploma or equivalent. Good mechanical and electrical aptitudes, knowledge of electrical/electronic systems and hydraulics and internal combustion engines, and the ability to read and understand electrical and hydraulic schematics. Good written/verbal communication and customer care skills. Valid driver's license, good driving record, and ability to safely operate lift trucks. Technical degree, previous lift truck repair, welding experience, and knowledge of various types of testing equipment preferred.       Compensation and Benefits:   Crown offers an excellent wage and benefits package for full-time employees including Health/Dental/Vision/Prescription Drug Plan, Flexible Benefits Plan, 401K Retirement Savings Plan, Life and Disability Benefits, Paid Holidays, Paid Vacation, Tuition Reimbursement, and much more. Crown also offers Service Technicians: Award-Winning Service Training Company Vehicle for Field Service Technicians Tool Insurance No Flat Rate 40 Hours Per Week plus Overtime Uniforms Specialty Tools Primarily 1st Shift Solid Support Network Career Advancement Opportunities   EO/AA Employer Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Field Service Technician () Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-technician-10903-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173405479.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,8701e5dcde57a1edcc95fc8b7996a0ed
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:13:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile US, Inc. (NYSE: TMUS) is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company""s advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Wash., T-Mobile US operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and MetroPCS. It currently serves approximately 58 million wireless subscribers and provides products and services through 70,000 points of distribution.Be Fearless. Be Aggressive. Be Ambitious.Welcome to a different kind of sales role, and a different kind of company. As America""s Un-carrier, T-Mobile is redefining the way businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. Thanks to an advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network that delivers outstanding wireless experiences, we""re proud to serve approximately 65 million wireless subscribers and growing. We""re looking for bold, uncompromising outside sales hunters to bring our products and services to market. In the process, we can turn the wireless industry on its head, un-limit what customers expect, and unleash your true potential.So what does it take to succeed in this role? We""re looking for fearless cold callers who can combine intense self-motivation with well-developed time-management skills. You should also have: Proven track record of verifiable new customer acquisition sales experience in a quota driven business environment is key Effective negotiators and closers wanted If you""ve got experience preparing, delivering and following up on proposals and pricing quotes, you""re someone we want to talk to! Demonstrated experience delivering superior customer service and attention to detail Because this position requires local travel you need valid license, a clean driving record, and proof of insurance Proficient using a computer, typing, using Outlook, and solid business writing skills Experience using a CRM such as Salesforce is a huge plus High School Diploma/GED required. Bachelor""s Degree PreferredOkay. You""ve got all the makings of a top performer. Here""s what we can offer you in exchange for your amazing work: Competitive base pay plus commissions with lucrative earning potential Ongoing sales training to keep you at the top of your game Medical, dental and vision benefits Matching 401(k) Generous paid time-off programs Phone service discounts Education reimbursement Serious growth potential for your careerThis is more than your average sales role. It""s a chance to build your own territory selling products and services you can believe in. And in the process, you can set the bar for your own success. So what are you waiting for? It""s time to explore an opportunity that could change the direction of your career. We invite you to apply today.Serious ambition welcome. Come build winning relationships with customers as you offer them T-Mobile""s unparalleled product and service line. This is a true hunter role! You""ll target businesses and recommend wireless solutions by suggesting service plans, data and other enhanced services, and successfully negotiate and close business. So bring your passion and determination and get ready for some very big upside. Here are the details: You will be given a generous area to prospect, full of potential new business clients, where you can maximize your hunting ability You bring an aggressive, and persuasive approach to generating and qualifying sales leads through prospecting, cold calling, door knocking, and networking Devise creative and effective sales approaches to negotiate and close deals While this is your territory where you call the shots, the T-Mobile team has your back every step of the way, with leadership and internal partners committed to giving you the support and resources you need to give the best customer service and sales experiences possible Fully utilize all sales force automation, funnel management and prospecting tools Manage sales funnel and generate reporting on sales activities and forecasting With base plus commission, your earning potential is up to youWe Take Equal Opportunity Seriously - By Choice T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, marital status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with our Company values and will not be tolerated. Furthermore, such discrimination or harassment may violate federal, state, or local law. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Account Executive,,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/account-executive-tmobile-at-work-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175128733.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,,,6f22df7d702ac41d032cf6c1cc5446e1
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:13:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO) GENERAL DESCRIPTION: This Market Vice President position is  accountable to provide operating leadership for the Kentucky and Indiana regions.  The Market Vice President is  accountable to provide operating leadership to assigned region; business planning, direction and solution based leadership for developing and implementing logistics initiatives focused on new business development, client relationships, re-engineered business opportunities, systems, cost improvements and operational efficiencies that support the company’s overall corporate values.  Also ensures compliance with all company policies and procedures, ISO guidelines, and any applicable regulatory requirements. ESSENTIAL DUTIES: Manage client relationships to improve service and expand businessIntimately know and understand the territory, including competitors and social and economic trends impacting the territory, in order to identify and prioritize opportunitiesMonitor financial metrics to identify trends and anticipate future outcomes.  Use financial discipline to guide business decisionsRegularly monitor the regional performance against agreed upon performance commitments and initiatives and identify and implement specific initiatives to address performance shortfallsManage expense accurately and meet P&L budget goalsDevelops new business in assigned regionUnderstanding of warehouse/cross dock functions and processesConduct internal audits to assure compliance with written procedure EDUCATION/COMPETENCIES:Minimum Required Education: Bachelor’s DegreeMinimum Required Experience: 10 yearsDesirable Education/Experience: Master’s degree in a business related field with 15 years’ experience in Carrier Development, delivery, distribution logistics and facility/warehouse managementAnalytical SkillsIdentifies opportunities to increase accuracy and optimize resources and develops/recommends/implements solutions.Performs complex analysis of data, processes, policies, procedures and/or systems.Develops insightful, value-added and actionable analyses with detailed explanations regarding drivers of those results.Communication SkillsWrites clearly and informatively. Edits work for spelling and grammar.Presents organized and thorough information and data appropriate for intended audience.Excellent negotiation skills to deal effectively with individuals and groups within and outside the organization.Time Management SkillsDemonstrates strong organizational and time management skills.Prioritizes regular workload, special tasks and concurrent projects, allocating time and resources to ensure that work is completed accurately and efficiently within established time frame.Leadership Skills (for Managers/Supervisor)– Strong business focus with demonstrated ability to act in partnership with management teams.Proven leadership and collaboration skills with the ability to effectively supervise, coach and influence employees.OtherSelf-motivated.Team-oriented. Consults with Team members and management as needed to complete assigned responsibilities.Establishes and maintains effective, collaborative work relationships both internally and externally. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Market Vice President Job in Newport,"Full Time, Employee","Newport, KY 41071",,http://jobview.monster.com/market-vice-president-job-newport-ky-us-173757791.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,4602564fb22df455de80fa6109f5fc78
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Peaceful and picturesque, Madonna Manor is located on 28 acres overlooking the Ohio River. Madonna Manor has been a leading Catholic senior living community in Northern Kentucky for more than 40 years. We currently have open positions for full-time, night-shift Registered Nurses to join our team.  Qualified candidates will be able to demonstrate a daily commitment to Madonna Manor’s values of Reverence, Service, and Stewardship. The candidate will be dependable with outstanding leadership skills. We are currently offering a hiring bonus to qualified Registered Nurses. Benefits offered to employees include:•PTO for all full-time and part-time employees•Employer contributions to a 403(b) plan•Medical, dental, vision, life, short-term disability, and long-term disability insurance for all full-time employees Our team of Registered Nurses completes the following job responsibilities:•Promoting the values and practices of Person-Centered Care throughout daily life in the household.•Encouraging and assisting all residents in achieving spiritual well-being and an optimum quality of life.•Developing and maintaining a good working rapport with inter-departmental personnel, as well as other departments within the facility to ensure that nursing services and activities can be adequately maintained to meet the needs of the residents. Creating and maintaining an atmosphere of warmth, personal interest, and positive emphasis, as well as a calm environment throughout the unit and shift.•Directing the day-to-day functions of the nursing assistants in accordance with current rules, regulations, and guidelines that govern the long-term care facility, written policies, and procedures established by this facility.•Assisting physicians in reviewing resident treatment regime. Ensuring physician orders are appropriately carried out according to policies and procedures governing the facility.•Ordering prescribed medications, supplies, and equipment as necessary, and in accordance with established policies. Ensuring that narcotics are counted each shift and are accurate.•Demonstrating the ability to chart on all residents receiving acute or skilled care.•Using Point Click Care provide thorough documentation of residents’ status on a shift-to-shift basis in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s response to the care.•Making written and oral reports/recommendations concerning the activities of your shift as required. (e.g., 24-hour report sheets)•Requisitioning and arranging for diagnostic and therapeutic services, as ordered by the physician, and in accordance with our established procedures.•Administering professional services, such as catheterization, tube feedings, and suction. Applying and changing dressings/bandages, packs, colostomy and drainage bags. Successful candidates must be: • A graduate of an accredited School of Nursing• Currently licensed in the state in which you practice nursing. If you are interested in completing these goals with our dedicated team, applications can be completed in-person or résumés can be emailed to nancyp@madonnamanor.org and amic@madonnamanor.org.",Registered Nurse (RN) Job in Villa Hills,"Full Time, Employee","Villa Hills, KY 41017",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-job-villa-hills-ky-us-174564996.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,2d24b85a9321faeeb742dc545ebe19a1
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time (Evening shift)Brookdale Springdale 11320 Springfield Pike Springdale, OHJob #: BSL000156102We're looking for a nurse (LPN or LVN) who's ready to make an impact at our senior living community. This position offers a family-friendly schedule, opportunities for advancement, and the chance to form meaningful bonds with our residents and their families.You'll experience life affirming moments as you ensure our residents receive the best care possible. You'll assist with writing care plans, administering medication and treatments, reviewing treatment sheets for accuracy, and supervise nursing assistants. You'll help our residents look and feel their best.Benefits: Part-time associates enjoy:• Retirement savings plan (401k) with company matching• Commuter benefit for public transportation and parking (PRN not eligible) • Brookdale Perks (savings on restaurants, movie tickets, cell phones, cars and other products)• Participation in the Good People referral program which awards bonuses• Discounted senior living costs for you and your family membersBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Required skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Springdale,Part Time Employee,"Springdale, OH 45246",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-nurse-lpn-job-springdale-oh-us-175257962.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,36a4865841e1f881eb4d6f21495e929f
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialist is responsible for providing outstanding customer service, meeting personal sales and Star Rewards goals on a personal and departmental basis, demonstrating superior product knowledge to customers, and creating a shopping experience that will make the customer feel welcome and comfortable. Additionally, the Fragrance Specialist is responsible for becoming an expert on fragrances as well as developing and impacting sales through the growth and implementation of the preferred customer list. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. In order to present our customers with the best holiday shopping experience, many of our Seasonal Sales Fragrance Specialists arrive prior to store opening and remain after closing to ensure we are ready to make Macy's magic. Seasonal associates will have the opportunity to work a flexible schedule on a temporary basis, which may include early mornings, evenings, weekends and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving and the day after Christmas. And don't forget - just in time for holiday shopping, you will receive an employee discount of up to 20% starting your first day! Essential Functions:Assist customers in all aspects of service fulfillment by demonstrating proficient use of proprietary devices and applications; proactively create enhanced shopping experiences through the heightened use of tools, technology and collaborationExplain and demonstrate use of cosmetics through actual application Be knowledgeable of and perform sales support functions related to POS procedures Alert Fragrance Counter Manager or GSM of Cosmetics and Fragrances of inventory and other inaccuracies Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQualifications: Education/Experience: High School degree or equivalent. Previous selling experience is required, preferably in fragrances.Communication Skills: Ability to read, write, and interpret labels including warnings and ingredient lists on products. Ability to effectively communicate with customers, peers, and management.Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Must be able to calculate percentages and ratios. Must be able to make change using American monetary units.Other skills: Superior organizational and time management skills. Must be able to multi-task in a fast-paced environment during constant periods of high volume. Must be able to build relationships and influence others. Must possess a thirst for knowledge. Must be flexible in regards to hours workedWork Hours: Ability to work a flexible schedule, including mornings, evenings, and weekends, and busy events such as the day after Thanksgiving, special Big Event days, and the day after Christmas, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy’s, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Cosmetics Sales.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Sales - Fragrance Specialist** Full Time: Macy's Tri-County Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-sales-fragrance-specialist-full-time-macy's-tri-county-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175140761.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=5,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,0206bee01d02562f402bbdcccbb15bc7
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"25C Radio Operator/Maintainer Job ID: 775534 Job Views: 270 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Signal and Military Intelligence Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionWith the Army National Guard's thousands of personnel and countless missions, the need for communications goes beyond vitally important to absolute necessity, because without ongoing and reliable communications, systems fail, orders do not get relayed, and missions come to a grinding halt.That's why the Army National Guard fields the communications maintenance team – to keep the Army National Guard talking. Guard Radio Operator/Maintainers are primarily responsible for all maintenance checks and services on assigned radio communication equipment, allowing the Army to track and direct troop movements.Become a Radio Operator/Maintainer and you will also gain the skills necessary for a future with civilian companies or Government agencies that design, repair, or make communications and electronic equipment. You may even get the opportunity to expand your certifications and credentials to make you that much more attractive to civilian employers.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to learn. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Radio Operator/Maintainer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 13 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",C Radio Operator/Maintainer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"25C Radio Operator/Maintainer Job ID: 775534 Job Views: 270 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Signal and Military Intelligence Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionWith the Army National Guard's thousands of personnel and countless missions, the need for communications goes beyond vitally important to absolute necessity, because without ongoing and reliable communications, systems fail, orders do not get relayed, and missions come to a grinding halt.That's why the Army National Guard fields the communications maintenance team – to keep the Army National Guard talking. Guard Radio Operator/Maintainers are primarily responsible for all maintenance checks and services on assigned radio communication equipment, allowing the Army to track and direct troop movements.Become a Radio Operator/Maintainer and you will also gain the skills necessary for a future with civilian companies or Government agencies that design, repair, or make communications and electronic equipment. You may even get the opportunity to expand your certifications and credentials to make you that much more attractive to civilian employers.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to learn. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for a Radio Operator/Maintainer consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 13 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/25c-radio-operator-maintainer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174503632.aspx?mescoid=2700448001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,59d7a19c0ac39b73c3f94423e355a238
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:The Netezza Database Administrator is responsible for the design, development, installation and performance of our Netezza appliances. Experience with Multi-Rack Netezza Administration is required. The successful candidate will be part of a team responsible for all appliance support, monitoring, performance, and documentation of all Netezza databases. Data management tasks including: User/Group/Permissions maintenance; Work Load Management; Database/Schema/Table design and maintenance; monitoring and performance; installs and upgrades of all related appliance software; collaboration with IBM Netezza support. You will support primarily Netezza appliance environment that will include configuration, administration and maintenance of business-critical 24x7 non-production and production environments. The DBA will work with project teams and collaborate with the Database Team to deliver successful implementations. A general understanding of underlying operating system, storage technologies, memory management, disk arrays, NAS/SAN, networking is needed to perform the job functions. Strong analytical and troubleshooting skillset required. Ability to work within a cross functional team environment required. Ability to self-prioritize workload and manage deadlines effectively required. Strong communication skills, both written and verbal required. EDUCATION / EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor''s degree, preferably in Computer Science/Technology or Engineering, or equivalent relevant work experience At least a minimum of 3-5 years of experience in Netezza Extensive experience with different backup/restore and disaster recovery solutions. Expert level experience in administering large databases in mission critical environment. Must have Netezza Hardware and Network component knowledge. Develop and define administrative and operational standard practices using Netezza utilities (Groom, Distribution, statistics, Zone Maps Solid experience in Netezza system configuration and setup with its utilities and tool sets. Strong knowledge and experience with computer hardware including Servers, Network, SAN technologies, I/O subsystems. Strong communication, organizational, and time-management skills. Self-starter, positive attitude, problem solving skills and self-initiative are must qualities.",Netezza Database Administrator Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Employee","Cincinnati, OH 45242",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/netezza-database-administrator-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174422673.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,4c3a0724bc6ddd360aa9b7eeb203a5f7
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695022Description:   Shift: Tu-Fr 2pm-1230am Contract' Through end of the year with possible extension Pay Rate: 10/hr  Position Summary: Picking, labeling, and otherwise preparing the finished prescription as well as other light warehouse duties.  Duties:Key Responsibilities: Prep for the day; set up totes Fills daily drug orders accurately and efficiently in a timely manner, under the supervision of a pharmacist.Assists in processing returned drugs and recycle/dispose per procedure.Review facility pre-list and prepare 30 day cards with the appropriate drug for the full fill.Assists in monthly fills by delivering and exchanging medications to scheduled nursing home. Assist in pre-packing frequently ordered medications, label, and store, as needed during low volume times.Packages materials and products manuallyReceives packing order and pull items to be delivered from order sheets Determines that the correct packing materials are available at packing stationChecks packing list for accuracy Applies labels, and stack boxes according to directions Coordinate STAT deliveries Ship UPS orders Keeps record of departure times and items packed and attaches to orderFollow all applicable government regulations including HIPAA. Other duties as assigned; Job duties may vary by location.Physical Demands: May sit, stand, stoop, bend and walk intermittently during the day. May sit or stand seven (7) to ten (10) hours per day. May be necessary to work extended hours as needed. Finger dexterity to operate office equipment required. May need to lift up to twenty-five (25) pounds on occasion.Visual acuity to see and read fine prints. Specific vision abilities required by this role include close vision, color vision and the ability to adjust focus. Must be able to hear normal voice sounds. The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this role. Work Environment: Work in a climate-controlled, smoke-free internal environment.  TO APPLY EMAIL: ABOGNAR@APEXSYSTEMSINC.COM  PLEASE SUBMIT YOUR RESUME AND CONTACT INFOEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",OMNI - Picking Technician Job in West Chester,Full Time Employee,"West Chester, OH",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/omni-picking-technician-job-west-chester-oh-us-174642968.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ae68b9defd96b3bf736cb571a0d74f24
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary RETAIL DATA COLLECTOR PART TIME   Do you want to enjoy the flexibility of a part time job that allows you work at whatever hours of the day you would like? Apply today to become a Retail Data Collector Part Time and enjoy the freedom to work hours that are convenient for you within your assigned work days. The ideal candidate will receive paid training to capture and record data in our client’s retail locations using a simplified handheld system. You will also be expected to perform other retail merchandising tasks as needed. Our data collection jobs are perfect for the self-starter who enjoys working independently. Bring your skills to Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, where you will receive in-depth training and competitive pay rates.   RESPONSIBILITIES:   Collect and record inventory data utilizing existing SKUs. Ensure the placement of new items at all assigned stores. Maintain schematic standards and integrity through consistent communication with Retail Supervisor and other retail personnel. Travel and driving are essential to this position.  QUALIFICATIONS:     High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience required. Strong analytical and research skills. Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment and able to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting from one to another with frequent interruptions and competing deadlines. Excellent written communication and verbal communication skills. Ability to work independently and prioritize duties with minimal supervision, in order to meet deadlines. Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures. Engage in physical activity, lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand, stoop and bend for long periods of time, potential use of cleaning chemicals and work in environments susceptible to temperature changes i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections. Basic computer skills and Internet usage.   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales & Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.    ",Retail Data Collector Part Time Job in Cincinnati,Part Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-data-collector-part-time-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174477728.aspx?mescoid=4300720001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,d87a1f1a863986c1929feab896aa14ad
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:14:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Get your CDL-A in ONLY 21-days. CR England offers Zero-Tuition CDL training at our local truck driving school - a $5,000 value! Classes start EVERY Monday. APPLY Now - take less than 10 minutes! C.R. England trains and hires more drivers than anyone else in the industry. As a family owned company, we have top of the line equipment, routes, and technology that provide you with the best trucking jobs in the country. We offer competitive pay, paid time off, flexible home time, health benefits and stability. Advance your career by joining one of the nations largest refrigerated trucking companies. C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C.R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today!",TRUCK DRIVERS - No CDL? No Problem! We Train,Full Time,"Norwood Heights, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-drivers-no-cdl-no-problem!-we-train-we-hire-we-pay!-job-norwood-heights-oh-us-172909976.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,b86cef79e1f4309f5137afd16e30f569
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:45:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary EVENT Specialist PART TIME SALES   Are you outgoing, friendly and enjoy meeting new people?  Our part time Event Specialist jobs are fun and exciting and could be a great fit for you! Join our Advantage Solutions winning team as a retail event demonstrator promoting best in class products at your local retailers. You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and sales. The in-store brand ambassador job influences the buyer’s behavior through customer education, engagement, and enthusiastically promoting and demonstrating the product.      Responsibilities: Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which creates a positive shoppers experience and generates enthusiasm for the product and event Purposefully move around the event area to actively engage shoppers Responsible for reviewing program materials, set up and break down of the work area, and the preparation and sampling of products on scheduled event days Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines  Qualifications: High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day Able to work independently and as a motivated team player Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday Minimal travel required for training or other scheduled events Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Event Specialist Part Time Sales _PSS Job in West Chester,Part Time Employee,"West Chester, OH",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-_pss-job-west-chester-oh-us-175170235.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,7b1ddadf4e28833d165f9e6a6bc0930c
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:46:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The purpose of this postion is to join and contribute to a service conscious pharmacy team who will consistantly build relationships with patients by exceeding their needs and providing safe, accurate and efficient care to achieve optimal patient, team member and company outcomes. Job Responsibilities Immediately acknowledge and welcome patients with compassion and a smile at all pharmacy entry points. Model excellent patient care by respecting, engaging and enthusiatically meeting or exceeding all patient needs including processing orders in person and by phone, directing patients to products and merchandise and referring appropriate questions concerning prescriptions and over the counter medicine to the pharmacist Adhere to all company, state and federal policies, laws and regulations including Hippa and Pseudoephedrine sales Finalize sales using cash register according to established procedures including the Point of Sale Policies. Maintain a neat and clean work environment to ensure company and government requirements are met Assit with maintaining proper inventory levels by ordering, receiving, stocking and rotating drugs and other supplies per company policy and procedures Answer telephone in a polite and timely manner and ensure accurate information is exchanged and customer is satisfied. Resolve customer questions and concerns by communicating effectively with the customer and the management team/support staff in an efficient manner File written prescriptions daily Assist team members with tasks to ensure department runs efficiently Use the pharmacy computer to complete all actions necessary to maximize efficiency and provide optimal patient care at drop-off, will call, drive thru, phone, filling and order receiving, including but not limited to:- search for patients and profiles- determine dates of fill and pick-up- determine prescriptions sent to Central Fill- quote cash prices of prescriptions- check on-hand counts of medications - enter invoices Have knowledge of all appropriate service and business metrics and assist team on action plans to improve outcomes Assist in the execution of all company initiatives and programs Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 None Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Normal office environment Physical requirements Grasping Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Data Entry Filing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Typing Communication (verbal) Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Cash Register Deposit Safe Drive Thru Fill Station Intercom Ordering Machine Safety Cutter Scale WalkieTalkie",Pharmacy Technician (Full Time) - Clintonville Giant Eagle Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/pharmacy-technician-full-time-clintonville-giant-eagle-job-columbus-oh-us-175324228.aspx?mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,496e1221c90a85b5570af63525117fa0
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:17:53:44,No,jobs.monster.com,PAINTING and/or CLEANING CONTRACTOR Full-time position available at Local Property Management Company. Please call 513-829-7368,Paint / Cleaning Contractor Job in Fairfield,Employee,"Fairfield, OH 45014",All,http://jobview.monster.com/paint-cleaning-contractor-job-fairfield-oh-us-175011281.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),19b9749e5ff4c9be362b3b2a71aa04ad
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:18:41:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Get your CDL-A in ONLY 21-days. CR England offers Zero-Tuition CDL training at our local truck driving school - a $5,000 value! Classes start EVERY Monday. APPLY Now - take less than 10 minutes! C.R. England trains and hires more drivers than anyone else in the industry. As a family owned company, we have top of the line equipment, routes, and technology that provide you with the best trucking jobs in the country. We offer competitive pay, paid time off, flexible home time, health benefits and stability. Advance your career by joining one of the nations largest refrigerated trucking companies. C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C.R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today!",TRUCK DRIVERS - No CDL? No Problem! We Train,Full Time,"Faxon Hills, OH",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-drivers-no-cdl-no-problem!-we-train-we-hire-we-pay!-job-faxon-hills-oh-us-172909953.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,a1e7f643716388d820b42740b4cc57fb
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:18:41:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Primary Duties:·         Alarm surveillance and response to Network Element troubles, including: Central Office Switch (5E/DMS), FTTH, Video, SS7, AIN, Wireless (TDMA & GSM), Voicemail, and all Central Office/Customer Transport troubles·         Pro-actively analyze and assist in resolution of Voice and Transport system troubles, including hardware, software, translations, and chronic problems. Also, track and monitor system performance parameters, and correlate with issues that impact other processes·         Interactively work with Repair, Field Technicians, vendors, and other intra/inter-department personnel to solve Central Office Switch and Transport troubles (hardware and software)·         Respond to Network System outages and Emergency service conditions by following established procedures/protocols. Generate outage reports, including Network Dashboards and SFAR reports.·         Assist other Network departments with testing and turn-up of new Network elements and circuits.·         Respond to 911 emergency security requests, including security traces and assist with maintaining the 911 Network.·         Monitor and respond to fire alarm system and building maintenance alarms.·         Monitor and respond to PBX alarms, working closely with SCC/LBS personnel.·         Monitor and respond to CBT Security alarms using the Pegasys Security support system.·         Utilize Aegis and TIRKS support systems extensively to assist in resolving Network Switching problems.·         Utilize the Network Operations section of AEGIS to generate, update, and dispatch Network trouble tickets. Monitor ticket status and update log sheets daily.·         Answer CBT Emergency lines that appear in the NOC (Critical/Emergency Accident, ACN/NCC, and Amber Alerts) and respond using established procedures.·         May be required to cross train others.·         May be required to assist with the primary duties of other NOC profiles. Experience/Background:·         Direct experience working with Alcatel-Lucent and/or Nortel Switching systems, or Ericsson cell site equipment preferred.·         Experience working with SONET Networks preferred.·         Demonstrated experience working with Synchronous and Asynchronous Transport Network Element repair and maintenance problems, including experience working with all global transmission rates (DS0 through OC192).·         Demonstrated experience reading and analyzing TIRKS and AEGIS WORD documents.·         Demonstrated customer contact skills.·         Demonstrated experience understanding CBT support systems.·         Demonstrated experience working with Fiber based services. Prerequisites:·         2 or 4 year technical degree, or an associate degree in a related technical field, or CBT Technical Education Program -Level II.·         Basic system analysis and troubleshooting skills related to fundamental Switching (Landline and/or Wireless) and Transport Network Elements.·         Demonstrated skills working with PCs.·         Satisfactory performance and attendance in the last 12 months.·         Compliance with department physical requirements Work Environment:·         Work location: Network Operations Center, and Central offices.·         Work performed in a team-oriented customer focused environment.·         Normal tours of 8 hours; facility will be open 24 hours a day. Requires day, evening, or night tours, overtime, emergency callouts, weekends and holidays.·         Work performed in team-oriented and customer focused environment.·         High volume, detail oriented environment.·         Size of office and work group varies depending on location.·         Required to work independently with minimal supervision.·         Required to wear appropriate safety equipment and follows established safety practices and procedures.·         Dress code: casual business attire. Miscellaneous:Note: Actual Tier I / II status will be determined based on the hiring date of the individual selected for this position.Employees who were hired before February 1, 2008 will be Tier I; employees hired on or after February 1, 2008 will be Tier II.",NOC Switch and Transport Technician Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",,http://jobview.monster.com/noc-switch-transport-technician-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175125216.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,2b80bde4a1e2ee4d534965133eadd45a
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:19:30:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Here at Ajilon Professional Staffing, we are another set of eyes helping you to find your next temporary, temporary to hire, or direct hire opportunity! Please see the below opportunity we have available with one of our local clients: We currently have an opening for a temporary to hire Grant Specialist located in Cold Springs, KY.  This position would be Monday to Friday 8:00am to 5:00pm and is paying $16.00 an hour.   Our Client is in need of an individual who: Grants: Review and evaluate grant proposals (Columbia Trust & Charitable Service Trust) to determine feasibility or to identify factors requiring amendment.Evaluate application to determine completeness of application insofar as purpose, signatures, financial documentation or additional data requirements in accordance with grant regulations.  Advise Manager as to status.  Prepare follow-up, as necessary per Manager’s instruction.Analyze data, including audit, IRS Form 990, and budget.Organize data and write draft summary and ballot for consideration of advisory committee/board of directors.Enter applicant and grantee information into computerized tracking programs.Prepare letters of notification to grant applicants/recipients and prepare Grant Agreements.Track grant recipients progress/expenditure reports and prepare follow-up letters.  Administration: Collect, analyze and interpret data and prepare written reports of narrative, statistical and financial nature.Compose letters, memorandums or other correspondence from scratch or rough draft.Interact with auditors during annual audit of entities’ records.Assist in preparation of annual budget – Charitable Service Trust.Maintain grantee databases.Assemble data for boards’ of directors meetings.Organize and maintain permanent records filing system for each entity.Act as liaison with members, donors and others, i.e. oral and written communications including responses to telephone inquiries and requests for materials.    Review incoming mail and prepare draft responses, where appropriate.Perform other duties as requested by director.  To be successful in this position you must be: Possess good organizational, administrative, mathematical, research, report writing and interpersonal skills.  Ability to work independently, with initiative.  Good problem solving instincts.Effective communication techniques, both oral and written, including good telephone etiquette and language skills. Personal computer experience including knowledge of Microsoft Word, Access and Excel.  Ability to organize and process large volumes of work to meet deadlines.  Adaptability to a fast-paced environment requiring ability to multi-task.Knowledge of general office procedures and equipment.High school diploma or equivalent required; 2 years college preferred.Three or more years of experience in an administrative secretarial/clerical position; Non-profit organization accounting experience preferred.Experience in a non-profit organization, including research and report-writing methods preferred.Experience in analyzing grant applications preferred  If you meet the requirements for this position and are interested in this TEMP TO HIRE opportunity, please apply now!    ",Grant Specialist Job in Newport,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Newport, KY 41076",,http://jobview.monster.com/grant-specialist-job-newport-ky-us-173964573.aspx?mescoid=2700440001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,8a472299df428da913a6c01dfcce9456
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:19:42:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"14S AVENGERS Crewmember Job ID: 776579 Job Views: 290 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Armor and Field Artillery Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionDiscipline. Leadership. Teamwork. These are the qualities all employers look for because people who possess them think clearly, remain calm under pressure, and push the organization forward. Join the Army National Guard and you will gain these qualities and take them into your civilian career.The Army National Guard has openings for AVENGER Crewmembers. In this role, you will provide mobile, short-range air defense protection. To do so, you will learn how to prepare, operate, and fire weapons systems, establish and maintain radio communications, and perform target engagement evaluations. Other duties include driving, vehicle maintenance, and securing battle positions.While not directly related to any civilian position, the discipline, teamwork, and leadership skills you develop in this specialty can be applied in any civilian career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for AVENGER Crewmembers consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",S AVENGERS Crewmember Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"14S AVENGERS Crewmember Job ID: 776579 Job Views: 290 Location: CINCINNATI, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45215 Job Category: Armor and Field Artillery Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionDiscipline. Leadership. Teamwork. These are the qualities all employers look for because people who possess them think clearly, remain calm under pressure, and push the organization forward. Join the Army National Guard and you will gain these qualities and take them into your civilian career.The Army National Guard has openings for AVENGER Crewmembers. In this role, you will provide mobile, short-range air defense protection. To do so, you will learn how to prepare, operate, and fire weapons systems, establish and maintain radio communications, and perform target engagement evaluations. Other duties include driving, vehicle maintenance, and securing battle positions.While not directly related to any civilian position, the discipline, teamwork, and leadership skills you develop in this specialty can be applied in any civilian career.Earn while you learnInstead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training for AVENGER Crewmembers consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/14s-avengers-crewmember-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174500296.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,6eb63d00fc645f51d91c759c3d9abb51
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:19:43:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"11C Indirect Fire Infantryman Job ID: 774651 Job Views: 273 Location: HAMILTON, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45015 Job Category: Infantry Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionAs an Army National Guard Indirect Fire Infantryman, you'll be trained and ready to be a vital part of a mortar squad, section, or platoon. You will perform challenging activities that may include parachuting from troop transport airplanes and camouflaging mortar fire positions. Plus, the teamwork, discipline, and leadership skills you learn as an Indirect Fire Infantryman will help you in any civilian career you choose.And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers, lead and control mortar squads, provide tactical and technical guidance to subordinates, and supervise the construction of mortar positions. Advanced Indirect Fire Infantrymen are responsible for receiving and implementing combat orders, directing Soldiers in offensive and defensive operations, and requesting, observing, and adjusting indirect supporting fire.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! As an Army National Guard Indirect Fire Infantryman, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on simulated combat and classroom training where you will keep your skills sharp through frequent squad maneuvers, target practice, and war games.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",C Indirect Fire Infantryman Job in Hamilton,Full Time Employee,"11C Indirect Fire Infantryman Job ID: 774651 Job Views: 273 Location: HAMILTON, Ohio, United States ZIP Code: 45015 Job Category: Infantry Posted: 10.19.2016 Job DescriptionAs an Army National Guard Indirect Fire Infantryman, you'll be trained and ready to be a vital part of a mortar squad, section, or platoon. You will perform challenging activities that may include parachuting from troop transport airplanes and camouflaging mortar fire positions. Plus, the teamwork, discipline, and leadership skills you learn as an Indirect Fire Infantryman will help you in any civilian career you choose.And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers, lead and control mortar squads, provide tactical and technical guidance to subordinates, and supervise the construction of mortar positions. Advanced Indirect Fire Infantrymen are responsible for receiving and implementing combat orders, directing Soldiers in offensive and defensive operations, and requesting, observing, and adjusting indirect supporting fire.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! As an Army National Guard Indirect Fire Infantryman, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend eight weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on simulated combat and classroom training where you will keep your skills sharp through frequent squad maneuvers, target practice, and war games.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",,http://jobview.monster.com/11c-indirect-fire-infantryman-job-hamilton-oh-us-175171352.aspx?mescoid=5501107001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,a1f1503bb58fab96418e9a66074a5afb
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:19:52:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary: Receives, stores, and distributes material, tools, equipment, and products within establishments by performing the following duties. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. * Reads production schedule, customer order, work order, shipping order, or requisition to determine items to be moved, gathered, or distributed. * Conveys materials and items from receiving or production areas to storage or to other designated areas. * Sorts and places materials or items on racks, shelves, or in bins according to predetermined sequence such as size, type, style, color, or product code. * Sorts and stores perishable goods in refrigerated rooms. * Fills requisitions, work orders, or requests for materials, tools, or other stock items and distributes items to production workers or assembly line. * Assembles customer orders from stock and places orders on pallets or shelves, or conveys orders to packing station or shipping department and prepare for shipping. * Marks materials with identifying information. * Opens bales, crates, and other containers. * Records amounts of materials or items received or distributed. * Weighs or counts items for distribution within plant to ensure conformance to company standards. Assists in billing process. * Arranges stock parts in specified sequence for assembly by other workers by location. * Uses computer to enter records. * Compiles worksheets or tickets from customer specifications. * Drives vehicle to transport stored items from warehouse to plant or to pick up items from several locations for shipment. * Completes requisition forms to order supplies from other plant departments. * Prepares parcels for mailing. * Maintains inventory records.The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Education/Experience: High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Language Ability: Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. Math Ability: Ability to add and subtract two digit numbers and to multiply and divide with 10's and 100's. Ability to perform these operations using units of American money and weight measurement, volume, and distance. Reasoning Ability: Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out detailed but uninvolved written or oral instructions. Ability to deal with problems involving a few concrete variables in standardized situations. Computer Skills: To perform this job successfully, an individual should have knowledge of Email internet software. Certificates and Licenses: No certifications needed Supervisory Responsibilities: This job has no supervisory responsibilities. Work Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include Close vision, Distance vision, Peripheral vision, Depth perception and Ability to adjust focus. While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to stand. The employee is frequently required to walk. The employee is occasionally required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; climb or balance; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl; talk or hear and taste or smell. The above job description is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of duties and standards of the position. Incumbents will follow any other instructions, and perform any other related duties, as assigned by their supervisor.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Warehouse Worker Third Shift Job in Cincinnati,,Position Information,,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-worker-third-shift-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175156671.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=4,,,2a46584017623beb167b24cb16386a60
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:20:43:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Consulting opportunity that is likely to extend, possible for conversion to permanent salaried employee at contract conclusion.RESPONSIBILITIES·         Support individual brand activities and ad-hoc analysis·         Evaluate critical KPIs and reporting suites for key online functions·         Identify trends and overall digital landscape to help build forecasting and targeting models ·         Perform health checks (tag audits & post code release benchmark analysis), A/B testing support, testing new vendors, & monitoring activities ·         General troubleshooting around analytics reporting and analysis·         Master channel analytics and regularly present insights to Sr. leadership regarding the health of traffic channels·         Understand the relationships between value (revenue, cost savings, etc), digital engagement (login, site usage, mobile) and customer segments and profitability·         Identify most valuable interaction types and customer segments based on their potential value ·         Align key stakeholders with the process and outcome on an ongoing basis ·         Budget, forecast and track the aggregate annual benefits generated by digital initiatives by brand and in aggregate ·         Identify various data elements and determine how to connect various data ·         Partner with internal and external teams to identify business opportunities and develop robust advanced analytics solutions ·         Contribute to projects that utilize online & offline data (media/behavioral/attitudinal) to build customer centric models and product optimization tools·         Be an expert in advanced analytics and provide thought leadership on analytics roadmap, solutions, and tool setsEXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS·         4-6 years quantitative web analyst credentials with experience doing strategic analysis·         4-6 years with Coremetrics & Google Analytics clickstream data in a retail/transactional environment·         Aptitude for both strategic thinking and tactical execution·         Ability to drive analytics with strong sense of business use cases and focus to drive actionable recommendations·         Strong business acumen and enthusiasm for digital innovation trends·         Experience working with large datasets using SQL and analytical programs ·         Comfortable working with technology partners and engaging in conversations ranging from business requirement to general technology capability discussions.",Data Analytics Analyst Job in West Chester,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","West Chester, OH 45069",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/data-analytics-analyst-job-west-chester-oh-us-174853881.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=4,40.00 - 50.00 $ /hour,Systems Analysis - ITWeb/UI/UX Design,f7f542ef618079ce541e03344969bd72
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:20:44:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are a highly regarded and growing medical device company IN CINCINNATI working in the field of cancer diagnostics. We are adding a Senior Director of Market Development to our team, to focus on Mergers and Acquisitions. On a daily basis we are striving to impact and improve patients' lives through innovation, research and development of technology. Our systems are used in numerous countries, offering early detection and treatment to thousands of individuals, and we provide support, education and information to both clinicians and patients. We are currently seeking a great Strategic Market Developer to help us in our progress!What You Will Be Doing- help set, implement and own and support company growth / business development / Mergers & Acquisitions strategies- identify, evaluate & pursue new market opportunities- coordinate with Marketing to develop and execute growth strategies- support and drive the Mergers & Acquisitions process- negotiate & establish distribution and technology agreements, with support of other teams- support Marketing Department's efforts in launching business developmentWhat You Need for this Position- Bachelor's degree in Business, Marketing or Engineering required- MBA strongly preferred- 10+ years of experience in Mergers & Acquisitions, Business Development, Strategy- experience with Distribution Agreements- experience in medical device, medical equipment or healthcare industry- knowledge and understanding of surgery & biopsy markets or related discipline- ability to travel, domestically and internationally, with overnight stays, up to 50% of the timeWhat's In It for You- competitive salary- strong benefits package- great and growing company in an important field!So, if you are a Market Development, Mergers & Acquisitions, and Strategic Marketing experience and a history in the medical device field, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Sr. Director of Market Development - MEDICAL DEVICES | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Lisa van Horne,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-director-of-market-development-medical-devices-job-cincinnati-oh-us-173864153.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=13,,,6ad7a1cb0f6b3250e3f3d5f233f16824
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:21:37:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Temporary Payroll Associate Job in West Chester Accounting Principals is partnering with a client in West Chester that is looking for a temporary payroll associate to join their team. This payroll associate will collaborate with other payroll team members for the responsibility of Time Keeping administration, daily imports into Kronos, employment verifications and assisting with payroll tasks. Job Duties: • Administer daily import of time files into Kronos.• Review Kronos for time keeping discrepancies.• Work with management, as needed, across companies on time keeping related issues.• Populated Kronos related fields in ADP.  • Administer personality and accrual balance imports into Kronos as needed• Complete employment verifications within specified time frame.• Will be cross trained on several payroll tasks to provide needed support for processing payroll. Requirements: • Associates degree in Business, Accounting, or related degree.• At least 3 years experience with time keeping and payroll preferred.• Candidates with Kronos and ADP systems experience with be preferred• Working knowledge of Microsoft Windows, Excel, and Word is required.• Ability to maintain a high level of confidentiality.• Must be a team player and have the ability to work independently.• Possess strong communication, problem solving, and organizational skills.• Solid work ethic  If you or anyone you know is qualified and interested in learning more about this great Direct Hire opportunity, please send me your resume directly at christopher.riley@accountingprincipals.com or apply directly at www.accountingprincipals.com  ;",Payroll Associate Job in West Chester,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"West Chester, OH 45069",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-associate-job-in-west-chester-oh-job-west-chester-oh-us-174956800.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=9,,Human Resources,a75ab4a2bc75aecb19c42cbbc2f425e9
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:21:42:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Service Technician Level IIIA Service Technician is responsible for providing service to our customers while maintaining exceptional customer service. This can include: cleaning, maintenance, visual inspection, and removal of parts and attachments. Installation with the help of proper manuals, report writing, disassembly, assembly, parts reuse evaluation, and reconditioning.Rush Truck Centers is a premier provider of quality products and services to commercial equipment users. We are customer-focused, people-oriented, and financially motivated to deliver excellent outcomes for customers, shareholders, vendors and our people.We offer a rewarding career with a leader in the transportation industry. Grow with us as we continue to expand our network of locations and services. Rush Enterprises is always looking for good people to join our team.Responsibilities1. Provide technical service to vehicles and equipment.2. Perform general and detailed repair of all trucks, engines and components.3. Overhaul gas or diesel engines.4. Install injectors, pistons, liners, cam shafts, cylinder heads, rod and main bearings, oil pans, clutches, fan hubs, differentials, fifth wheels, brakes, change or recharge batteries, and replace transmissions and other parts.5. Read job order, observe and listen to vehicle in operation to determine malfunction and plan work procedures.6. Examine protective guards, loose bolts, and specified safety devices on trucks, and make adjustments as needed.7. Lubricate moving parts and drive repaired vehicle to verify conformance to specifications.8. Tag all warranty parts and returns to warranty clerk.9. Attend training classes and keep abreast of factory technical bulletins.10. Develop and maintain positive relationships with customers to increase overall customer satisfaction.BenefitsWe offer exceptional compensation and benefits, 401K and stock purchase, incentives for performance, training, and opportunity for advancement - all in a culture that appreciates and rewards excellence, a positive attitude and integrity.",Diesel Mechanic Level III Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/diesel-mechanic-level-iii-job-columbus-oh-us-175194827.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=5,,Logistics/Transportation,9e5b69f5dc801d54d9fde40be6de2475
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:21:43:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary:Store Team Members willwork regularly with customers to find and sell products that match theirneeds. In this position, Team Members will be responsible for greeting andengaging Customers to determine the type of Customer they are assisting: firsttime expectant parents creating a registry, a returning registrant or agift-giver purchasing items.Responsibilities:             Demonstrate the use ofselling skills by becoming familiar with all of the product offerings:Assist the Customer with product choices and suggest add-on items to increase items per transactions and average sale, as well as Buy Protection Plan, Loyalty and Instant Credit programsUse acquired knowledge to suggest additional products to complement Customer's purchaseCommunicate product safety requirements to CustomersInteract heavily with customers on sales floor and cash registerUtilize company selling approaches to create an enriched customer experienceAssist in maintaining a well-stocked and neat store appearanceAct quickly to address customer concerns and provide resolutionsMay be assigned to work in multiple departments to help customers and the store team to achieve daily results Qualifications Passion for excellenceAbility to multi-task and prioritize projectsSuperior customer service skillsPositive attitudeHigh degree of interpersonal skills with an outgoing, friendly, pleasant personality that represents the “R”Us brandAbility to lift and carry merchandise weighing up to 40 pounds and to climb/descend ladders **Please note that we recruit for this position on an on-going basis inorder to build a talent pool of potential candidates. When a position becomesavailable, we will review applicants at that time. Due to the volume ofresumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for interviews will becontacted. Thank you for your interest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stayconnected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube@ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY BRU 4999 Houston Rd  Florence 41042-5126 Schedule: Flexible",Babies R Us Seasonal Sales Team Member Job in Florence,Full Time ,"Description At Toys“R”Us, Inc.,we’re on a mission to be the best toy and baby retail company in the world! Andthat means we are laser-focused on delivering joy to kids of all ages, whileproviding our customers outstanding value and service whenever, wherever andhowever they choose to shop with us. But we can’t do italone. We need everyday “superheroes” to help us succeed.  Whether you’re anenthusiastic toy collector, gaming guru, grandparent (or mom, dad, aunt, uncle,godparent) of some pretty awesome kids, student or someone looking for a funplace to work, then we’re looking for you!  Join more than a team –become part of the “R”Us family and help bring huge smiles to the faces of kidseverywhere. To learn more about who we are and what we’re all about, visit Toysrusinc.com or check out our YouTube channel to hearstraight from the source – our valued Team Members themselves! Job Summary:Store Team Members willwork regularly with customers to find and sell products that match theirneeds. In this position, Team Members will be responsible for greeting andengaging Customers to determine the type of Customer they are assisting: firsttime expectant parents creating a registry, a returning registrant or agift-giver purchasing items.Responsibilities:             Demonstrate the use ofselling skills by becoming familiar with all of the product offerings:Assist the Customer with product choices and suggest add-on items to increase items per transactions and average sale, as well as Buy Protection Plan, Loyalty and Instant Credit programsUse acquired knowledge to suggest additional products to complement Customer's purchaseCommunicate product safety requirements to CustomersInteract heavily with customers on sales floor and cash registerUtilize company selling approaches to create an enriched customer experienceAssist in maintaining a well-stocked and neat store appearanceAct quickly to address customer concerns and provide resolutionsMay be assigned to work in multiple departments to help customers and the store team to achieve daily results Qualifications Passion for excellenceAbility to multi-task and prioritize projectsSuperior customer service skillsPositive attitudeHigh degree of interpersonal skills with an outgoing, friendly, pleasant personality that represents the “R”Us brandAbility to lift and carry merchandise weighing up to 40 pounds and to climb/descend ladders **Please note that we recruit for this position on an on-going basis inorder to build a talent pool of potential candidates. When a position becomesavailable, we will review applicants at that time. Due to the volume ofresumes that we receive, only those candidates selected for interviews will becontacted. Thank you for your interest in Toys""R""Us, Inc.! Stayconnected with us on Facebook, LinkedIn, Instagram, Twitter & YouTube@ToysRUsCareers.  Job Function: Store Team MemberPrimary Location: USA-KY-FlorenceWork Locations: Florence, KY BRU 4999 Houston Rd  Florence 41042-5126 Schedule: Flexible",,http://jobview.monster.com/babies-r-us-seasonal-sales-team-member-job-florence-ky-us-173672264.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=4,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e31dfa6c723f69cd636db115af907634
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:21:50:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary Our Cake Decorator is a key player in making sure our pastries look and taste amazing. In addition to providing unparalleled guest service, you'll be the one we look to create beautiful and delicious art for our guests, and provide the sweets that will be the hit of their parties. This role is for a mover and a shaker in the foodie world!Who You Are:You are a team player at heart. You know that you are only successful when those around you are set up for success. You are eager to support an amazing team, have the drive to grow your career in leadership, and have the ability to inspire those around you. You are creative with cuisine, and love to help others foster their own creativity. An interest in food doesn't quite scratch the surface for you; you're passionate about the business, the trends, and what makes customers tick. You have culinary vision beyond a simple ""What's for dinner?"" and every opportunity to connect with people is an opportunity for you exchange ideas and learn tricks of the trade. Our store leads are the cream of the crop and must ensure that each guest discovers the pleasure of tasting incredible food and our passion for providing it at every turn. Job Responsibilities Maintain safety as the top priority in all aspects of our work, for our Team Members, guests, and products. rovide unparalleled guest service, constantly striving to delight and surprise our guests, vendors, and stakeholders. Cultivate a foodie culture by sharing excitement and passion for food with Team Members and guests. Inspire your fellow Team Members and our guests with a passion for food and a willingness to go the Extra Mile to provide the best product. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, tables, utensils, floor (to ensure safety), and sanitation regulations are met. Maintain proper safety and sanitation methods, emergency procedures, cleanups, steritech, proper lifting and housekeeping to ensure department standards are met. Maintain department procedures, daily setups, order taking, understanding copyright policies and proper product rotation. Constantly stay on top of new product knowledge and procedures, such as product information by category, special orders, cake program, portion control, seasonal items and mixing colors. Ice and decorate cakes by taking prepared icing and applying to cake using spatulas and icing bags. Prepare icing and products for all cakes and other decorated items by reading recipes, measuring ingredients, and mixing product. Operate department equipment, including mixers, scales, airbrush gun, knives, cutgloves and personal protective equipment (anti-slip shoes). Fill tables and cases with cakes by taking product from prep area to sales area. Follow proper procedures to ensure store meets out-of-stock percentage goals. Applies merchandising principles that will help to generate sales as well as wow the guest. Take special orders from guests over the telephone and in person. Maintain quality of product for sale by checking sales area for dates and condition of product. Document and/or record daily known loss. Responsible for controlling some expense within a department. Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Hot Ovens Dust Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Climbing Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Operating Equipment Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Lang Oven Merry Chef (Oven) Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Power Washer Proofer Registers Texlon Ordering Machine Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Conventional Oven Calculator Copier Telephone Cardboard Baler Carts Cash Register Compactor Dumpster Electric/Manual Jacks Intercom Knives Label Gun Microwave Ordering Machine Plastic Baler Power jacks Price Gun Receiving Gun Register Safety Cutter Scale Labeler Scale Slicer Stanley Doors Steam Machine Telxon Trash compactor U-Boats WalkieTalkie Wrapper",Cake Decorator (Full Time) Kingsdale Market District Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/cake-decorator-full-time-kingsdale-market-district-job-columbus-oh-us-175132834.aspx?mescoid=5100921001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,3f7169e2b3b9b9660002f34b046899dd
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:21:50:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Position Information:Sales Support Representative position with a company that gives back and works one-on-one with families in your community. Hands-on training, competitive compensation, performance awards and incentives.We Need:Entry level and senior level applicant who is service-minded and wants to help people, gain experience and earn the money they need.You Will Help Your Community By:- Supporting the needs of people in the community- Managing relationships with new and existing customers- Providing customer service and communicationYou Only Need:- A high school diploma or equivalent- Be a people-person that likes interaction among others- Be independent-minded and flexible- Outstanding communication skillsWho Is American Income?We are American Income Life Insurance Company. We are a significant provider of supplemental insurance and have been helping labor unions, credit unions and associations with their insurance coverage needs. We strive to make a difference in lives of people across the United States, Canada and New Zealand.Apply NowApply here and see success testimonials at www.ailcareers.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","American Income Life Job Application for Finally…A Sales Job That Makes A Difference | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-5591,All,http://jobview.monster.com/finally%E2%80%A6a-sales-job-that-makes-a-difference-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174955154.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,,,e91da04a73415f1741f5ee30ddc9d935
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:22:40:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Seasonal Retail Receiving Associate is responsible for providing a great shopping experience, and driving sales and profit through customer service and accurate processing of merchandise entering and leaving the building. Duties include receiving activities, packing and shipping, reverse logistics, sustainability and other duties as needed. Essential Functions:Provide an exceptional customer shopping experience by ensuring both the in store and online customer are always the #1 priorityService the customer in a helpful and friendly manner Collaborate with Managers, Leads and Associates throughout the store to deliver a clean, neat and easy-to-shop store environment; maintain sales floor and fitting room recovery standards to include checking fitting room stalls, sorting merchandise and ensuring merchandise is worked back to sales floor immediately as time permitsSupport Omni Channel initiativesPerform all functions in an efficient manner; flex between tasks as directed by SupervisorParticipate in the physical inventory process and ensure that shortage prevention initiatives are executedAdhere to Asset Protection and inventory control and compliance proceduresRegular, dependable attendance and punctualityCollaborate with peers to coordinate merchandise movement needs with other tasks (floor moves, seasonal sets, fixture needs, etc.) Execute receiving, merchandise processing, packing/shipping and reverse logistics tasks timely and accurately to include processing inbound merchandise to floor ready standards by removing packaging and placing sensors per MMPS standards; delivery of processed merchandise to appropriate sales floor drop zones, first quality packing standards and processing of fulfillment orders and reverse logistics (damages, transfers, RTVs), accurate outbound trailer execution; collection and sorting of hangers, sensor tags, trash and recycling throughout the store; organization, maintenance and replenishment of supply areas including sales floor, building lamping, and customer carryout and special delivery as neededAssist in other tasks as needed (pricing, signing, merchandising, replenishment, fulfillment, RFID, stockroom maintenance) Qualifications: Education/Experience: No specific educational accomplishments are necessary. Communication Skills: Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Reasoning Ability: Self-starter, able to work independently and as part of a team and must have good time management skills.Physical Demands: This position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs. May occasionally involve reaching, stooping, kneeling, crouching, and climbing ladders. May involve reaching above eye level. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment.Other Skills: Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment.Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays, based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Kentucky-FlorenceJob:Receiving and Merchandising.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Seasonal Holiday Retail Receiving** Part Time: Macy's Florence Mall Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, KY",,http://jobview.monster.com/seasonal-holiday-retail-receiving-part-time-macy's-florence-mall-job-florence-ky-us-175077885.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,9e24192ee09d4561ddcdd8d3327ee03f
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:22:41:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"What is this job about? Good question. Being a trail blazer.  Helping to redesign their infrastructure environment.  Sound cool?   Our client:This is all about rebuilding for a tech transformation for the future and beyond.  It's a pretty exciting time to be a part of this company! They need you to run with this and help add wind in their sails as they are heading in the right direction.  You musn’t be afraid to work – it’s busy! The daily scoop:The role is focused on basically taking a high level view of the current state and documenting/mapping the to-be state. We need someone who can do the high level work and get their hands dirty. ·         High-level network & system analysis·         Creation and reviews of road maps·         Analyzing infrastructure systems·         Analyzing Vendors The much needed technical experience (Yes all of it is required):·         Exposure to architecture/design role ideal.·         Microsoft platforms and Linux (RHEL-based) infrastructures·         Storage devices/concepts experience·         VMware/KVM experience·         Advanced Troubleshooting skills·         Works toward automation·         Understand system integration·         5-7 years of experience·         Works well under pressure·         Public cloud exposure/experience a plus     What every company needs (And so does this one):ABILITY TO THINK INDEPENDENTLY or work in a team.SELF-STARTER …VroomMotivated, confident, adaptable, Agile, resilient, energetic….DESIRE TO DO GOOD IN THE WORLD What now? Send Eric Tanner your credentials, a reason why you fit, and some positive vibes!So, why IBS? Interactive Business Systems Inc, is an IT solutions and staffing company known for being awesome! We are in the business of helping connect great people with great jobs; Plain and simple.Oh, and we offer benefits even to our consultants on contract - Full time W2 pay with benefits to start day one.  And, we will take you to lunch once a month, perhaps twice!           ",Sr. Infrastructure Engineer Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45244",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-infrastructure-engineer-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175195656.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=14,"90,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,d20b52f608e19a5b9a1905de595eab9f
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:23:24:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Talento Search Group has an opening for a Maintenance Manager in Hebron, Kentucky.  The pay rate is from $80,000-90,000 per year, depending on experience.Position Summary:The Maintenance Manager is directly responsible for overseeing the efforts of maintenance workers who install, repair or service property or machinery, maintain proper staffing levels, and negotiate contracts with suppliers. This is a full-time position. No travel is expected for this position.Essential Functions include (but not limited to): Supervises and coordinates the activities of technicians in the routine maintenance and repair of equipment. Trains New Employees. Perform mechanic skills including, but not limited to, mechanical, electrical, pneumatic, hydraulic, troubleshooting and repair of production machines. 100% Satisfaction on all safety, quality and regulatory compliance Immediately address any and all safety concerns, violations and unsafe conditions. Exhibits initiative to address issues without being prompted. Consistently follow and enforce all plant rules/expectations. Participates in preventative maintenance planning. Leads, coaches, mentors and supports team members in using the correct problem solving techniques to solve situational problems. Works with and supports all manufacturing and plant supervisors, staff, business unit managers and associates. Analyze production reports. Create and track work orders.  Required Education and experience: Technical degree in industrial maintenance or related field is preferred Minimum of 6 years of industrial maintenance experience in a manufacturing environment Minimum of 2 years of management experience in a manufacturing environment Electrical certification is preferred  Skills and Qualifications:Equipment maintenance, technical understanding, deals with uncertainty, working knowledge of OSHA regulations, EEO practices/policies and plant safety regulations, power tools, attention to detail, flexibility, mechanical, hydraulic, pneumatic and industrial skills with PLC experience and HVAC, good organizational skills are a must. Must have the communication/interpersonal skills and managerial ability required to directly manage subordinate hourly personnel while providing for their technical training and personal development.About Talento Search Group:Talento Search Group is an executive-search firm servicing the Greater Atlanta and surrounding areas.  All positions with Talento Search Group are on a direct-hire basis, where the applicant has an opportunity to be hired on directly by the company.  Applicants will never be asked to work a temporary or contract position through Talento Search Group.We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Talento Search Group complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment and recruitment in every location. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leave of absence, compensation and training. Report",Talento Search Group,"Full Time, Employee","Contact name Joe Carpenter Phone 770-892-6627 Address 23 Old Atlanta HighwaySuite 110Newnan, Georgia 30263",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-manager-job-hebron-ky-us-174601499.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=19,,,493e4f4323a84a6454d21d65fa16fce0
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:23:24:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Momentum Marketing Group is an innovative company that is transforming the marketing & advertising industry. Our company was founded by dedicated people looking to push the envelope by using cost-effective marketing campaigns and advertising strategies. Our goal is to provide the same advertising as the standard firm but at a fraction of the price. Our success and rapid growth has set new industry standards in customer acquisition and retention. We are actively seeking Entry Level Professionals to fill our Junior Marketing Assistant position! These are competitive positions that start on the ground floor but offer rapid advancement towards a senior management role. Since we consider ourselves an up and coming leader in the area, we are looking for fast paced, high energy, competitive minded professionals to cross train in the following areas: Marketing and SalesAdvertising and Public RelationsEntry Level ManagementCustomer ServicePromotional Events The Junior Marketing Assistant is a vital member of the team and is responsible for driving sales and potential customers to the Account Executives / Sales Consultants in order to ensure a successful sales process. The position is considered to be entry level and full paid training is provided.Responsibilities:Build and manage relationships with potential customers and clientsWork strategically with the sales team in a business development capacityPotentially help manage and oversee a campaign and team of associatesThis position will have the opportunity to advance into an Account Executive roleTraining Includes:Team managementCampaign coordination and managementMarketing and SalesTraining and development of your colleaguesEntry Level ManagementPromotional Sales RequirementsCollege degree preferred or in the process of completion1-2 years experience in customer service, sales and / or marketingAbility to excel in a fast paced, deadline drive environmentComfortable in speaking in large groups / strong presentation skillsAbility to develop strong relationships with others and foster a positive company and brand imageDemonstrated team management and leadership ability is a plusEffective interpersonal skills and strong communication (written and verbal)",Junior Marketing Assistant: Entry Level Marketing and Advertising Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45202",Advertising and PR ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-marketing-assistant-entry-level-marketing-advertising-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175327937.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=10,,Marketing/Product,84e860a121b777422b03146424c07f59
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:23:35:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis Finance, in partnership with one of our clients in Erlanger, KY, has the need for an interim Senior Accountant. This role would start mid-November and is expected to last a minimum of three months.Our client is looking for a well-rounded senior accounting professional that can hit the ground running with limited supervision. Particular emphasis will be in month-end-close. Experience from a manufacturing environment is helpful but not a mandatory consideration.At Experis Finance (www.experis.com), we have built a reputation for results-driven, innovative workforce solutions that help companies create competitive advantage. From basic to complex, we custom tailor our services to fit our clients' needs from interim and permanent professional talent resourcing to complete project solutions in the areas of Risk Advisory, Tax, and Finance/Accounting. Our professionals provide specialized industry and technical experience and expertise to our clients, enabling them to accelerate their business performance. We serve clients, including Fortune 500 and Global 1000 companies, from offices worldwide, leveraging the workforce capabilities of the Manpower Group.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Senior Accountant Job in Erlanger,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Senior Accountant,"Erlanger, KY 41018",http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-erlanger-ky-us-175321437.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=6,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2b9ccf4c1566a57b77fff2dcaaf65871
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:23:46:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"STAFF LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSETriHealth Spine Institute in Cincinnati, OhioFT, days *Montgomery (#110699, #112519)*Clifton (#111979)This position assists physician and/or registered nurse in providing clinical care and/or supervising care delivered by medical assistants and collaborates with physicians and other health care team members in meeting patient/family needs. This position also implements the plan of care by providing direct basic nursing care in accordance with the LPN scope of practice set forth in the Nurse Practice Act and contributes to the evaluation of patient responses to nursing care and documents in an accurate and timely manner.Eligible for immediate benefits--medical, dental, vision; 401K; on-site fitness centers and more!Requirements:EDUCATION: Graduate of an approved technical, professional, or vocational program in Nursing; BLS/CPR (Basic Life Support for Healthcare Providers); Licensed Practical Nurse; Current RN licensure is also acceptableEXPERIENCE: 1-2 years in a related fieldSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE: Ability to work within a multidisciplinary teamApply online at TriHealth.com to job number(s) indicated above.",STAFF LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45242",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-licensed-practical-nurse-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174899609.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=6,,NursingGeneral/Other: Medical/Health,423fca34b304506bc72d12a4e4c9e440
United States of America,US,03/Jul/2016:23:47:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Driver - Box Truck-24ft or 26ft-Owner Operator Cincinnati OH COMPANY: Priority Dispatch Priority Dispatch has upcoming openings for Owner Operators or small fleet owners with 24' or 26' straight trucks, dock high, with pallot jacks. The routes pick up in Hebron Ky or Evendale OH in between 1am and 4am and deliver in the surrounding areas. This is a perfect opportunity to keep your truck on the road and add to your already existing income! Please call 513-615-6039 if interested. EOE/M/F/Disabled/Vet Disclaimer: 1099 Independent Contractors are not classified as employees. Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, disability, or national origin. Desire for referral of veterans Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Cincinnati, OH Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 24142 Vehicle Type: 24 ft. Box Truck Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Cincinnati,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Driver - Box Truck-24ft or 26ft-Owner Operator Cincinnati OH COMPANY: Priority Dispatch Priority Dispatch has upcoming openings for Owner Operators or small fleet owners with 24' or 26' straight trucks, dock high, with pallot jacks. The routes pick up in Hebron Ky or Evendale OH in between 1am and 4am and deliver in the surrounding areas. This is a perfect opportunity to keep your truck on the road and add to your already existing income! Please call 513-615-6039 if interested. EOE/M/F/Disabled/Vet Disclaimer: 1099 Independent Contractors are not classified as employees. Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, disability, or national origin. Desire for referral of veterans Respond online for more information.  Respond online today.​ Location: Cincinnati, OH Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 24142 Vehicle Type: 24 ft. Box Truck Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-cincinnati-oh-us-175281090.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,150d46baf58ca0b4ef2db158c40e288d
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:23:46:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"**BEGIN A REWARDING CAREER TODAY** Peak Enterprises is a leading brand management and advertising company that offers limitless opportunities and growth potential to all dedicated and motivated individuals. No matter the work history, we may be the last stop in your career search with our sales management training program! Currently, we are seeking qualified candidates interested in personal and professional growth to aid us in our goals of expansion and client diversification within our sales and marketing departments. WHAT WE DO:Our clients hire us as a marketing, promotions, and sales office without the headaches, expenses, and overhead that come with doing it themselves. We guarantee results and deliver them with efficiency and integrity. Our company holds itself to the highest standards, working only with industry leaders who share our values. OUR APPROACH:Our method is simple: we apply a customer friendly, face-to-face approach to our promotions and sales strategies. By directly meeting with business customers we can dramatically increase our clients’ sales without dramatically increasing their budget. Our technique is proven to be the most effective way to penetrate a target market and acquire new, profitable customers.  RequirementsRequirements:At this moment, we are looking for 4 energetic, career minded individuals to assist us with our expansion goals. These candidates will be hired as entry level employees but with rapid advancement opportunities into a management position. Our development program is designed to cross-train the right candidate in all facets of a Marketing/Sales Firm. No experience is necessary due to our paid training program. The focus is to prepare them for a position as the general manager of a branch; locally or nationally!• Generate sales leads through direct face-to-face contact with customers• Meet, develop relationships and maintain great customer service• Utilize your customer service skills to prepare and present competitive sales proposals• Account Management• Business development• Territory Management• Unique Marketing/Sales training• Work closely with a variety of individuals to accomplish your goals• Competitive sales team environment We offer GREAT benefits, including:• Uncapped earnings with competitive cash incentives and long term residual income• Attend our sales/marketing training seminars• Phenomenal support through networking opportunities and conference calls• Ongoing training to bring out all individuals' maximum potential• Multiple awards, honors and contests throughout the year• Professional, hands-on, one-on-one training• No out of pocket expenses• Recession-proof, growth industry• NO SENIORITY!  ",Assistant Manager - Entry Level Management - Full Training Job in Sandy Springs,Full Time Employee,"Sandy Springs, GA 30318",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-manager-entry-level-management-full-training-job-sandy-springs-ga-us-172078643.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=19,,Business/Strategic Management,bd72df1bd18b6c042df71f5949440526
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:59:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.The Senior Analyst is responsible for the quality, accuracy, and delivery of business intelligence reports and list pulls to support the Business Solutions organization.  The position is instrumental in helping maximize revenue and profitability through contribution to or ownership of targeting strategies designed to acquire, grow and retain business customers. The position is accountable for a variety of functions that require business acumen, marketing knowledge, understanding/management of internal processes, strong technical acumen, experience with Business Intelligence platform, and a functional understanding of relational databases.  More specifically, day to day interactions include:    Execution of data extracts from primary Oracle/UNIX data environments via SQL Working closely with Database Architecture resources to define database requirements Proactively leading data sourcing and data integration discussions, including vendor/contract management Development of Self Service BI tool sets Assisting  Analytics teams with data access, use-ability, and extracts Consultation with Business end users as the primary SME on data requests and delivery options   Basic Qualifications  Proven delivery track record in database marketing or analytics4 year degree in Business or equivalent experience is requiredAdvanced Skilling in database extracts using PL SQLExpertise in one or several B2B specialties, such as: strategic planning, qualitative & quantitative research, database marketing, IT, segmentation.Proven ability to work effectively in teams and independently; strong organizational and project management abilities, strong analytical and critical thinking and innovative problem solving skills.Working knowledge of relational data mart strategyRequires strong work ethic, ability to work independently and strategically on complex, long-term projects.Strong interpersonal skills are required to help with communication, team support and team effectiveness  Preferred Job Qualifications:Ability to break down complex problems into manageable goals.Experience in analyzing data to support specific marketing plansExperience Developing and or managing in memory BI applications (Qlikview, Tableau, Domo)Knowledge of telecom industryExperience with SalesForce CRM for Marketing and / or Marketo or similar Marketing Automation platformMBA preferredAlternate Location: US-Colorado-DenverRequisition #: 57212 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Senior Analyst Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80202",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-analyst-job-denver-co-us-168234244.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,,eb486db3fdd145b8dcc0fc43797817ee
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:59:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3779BR Mid-Atlantic 301-459-2355 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the  Somerset  area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at  301-459-2355 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Somerset, NJ 08873",Security Officer Job in Georgia US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,GA,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-ga-us-168941569.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=2,,Security/Protective Services,bbf010366d0d73aa965c6d74c055e8e1
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:53:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Jr. Recruiter Job #:  663109.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Jr. Recruiter Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/jr-recruiter-job-dallas-tx-us-168779604.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ecb541e510547e71b443d626b9aaf107
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:53:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Undergeneralsupervision,anemployeeinthis classisresponsiblefor the protectionoflife  and property,preventionofcrime,apprehensionofcriminals,andthe generalenforcementoflaws,and ordinancesintheCounty onanassignedshift oronspecial  assignments.The worknormallyconsists  of routinepatrol,preliminaryinvestigation,and  trafficregulationwhich may beperformedincruisercars oronfoot.Performsrelatedwork  asrequired.Thework involvesanelementofpersonaldanger, and theemployeemust  beable  toact  withoutdirectsupervisionandtoexerciseindependentjudgmentin meetingemergencies. EXAMPLESOFDUTIES: Anyone  positionmay not  includeallthe  dutieslisted,nor dothe  exampleslisted  intheirrelativeorder ofimportanceincludeallthe dutieswhich may befound inpositionsofthis  class.  •Patrolsstreets,roads,andhighwaystoobservesuspiciouscars,persons,oractions.•EnforcesCounty  ordinances,State,andFederal  laws,andmotorvehicleregulations.•  Answerscallsandcomplaintsinvolvingfire,robberies,andother  misdemeanorsandfelonies.•K-9  handlerduties.•Investigates  automobileaccidents,interviewing  witnesses,gatheringinformation,locatinghit­ and-runvehicles,andmakingdetailedreports.•Watchesforandmakes  investigationsofwantedormissingpersonsand  property.•Ascertainsallfacts  availableatthe  sceneofacrimeoraccident,gettingstatementsofwitnesses, gatheringandprocessingevidence,andpreparingreports to  beused  infollow  upinvestigations.•Issuescitations,makes  arrests,andtakes  prisonerstojail.•Assists  attorneyinprosecutingfelonyandmisdemeanorcasesandtestifiesincourt.•  Interviewspersons  with  complaintsandinquiriesandattemptsto  makeproperdispositionor directsthem  toappropriateauthorities.•Counselsindomesticorotherdisputes.•Assists  InvestigativeOfficersandother  law  enforcementpersonnelinthe  performanceoftheir dutiesasrequired.•  Attendstrainingclasses  inlaw  enforcementmethods,first  aid,targetpractice,andrelated subjects.•  Maintainsrelatedrecords  and  preparesreports.•  AdministerstheD.A.R.E.  programtoelementaryandmiddleschool  students.Mayalsoadminister othercommunitypolicingduties,like  McGruff  House,NeighborhoodWatch,SafeandSober Program,etc.•  Servescivil  andcriminaldocumentsasrequestedbythe  courtorbyattorneys.•Handleshazardousmaterialsasneeded.•Anyotherduties  asassigned.  REQUIRED  KNOWLEDGE,SKILLS,  ANDABILITIES:    Anycombinationoftrainingand  experienceprovidingthe  followingknowledge,skills,and  abilities. ForFullPerformance •Knowledgeofcurrentlawenforcementprinciples,procedures,techniques,and  equipment.•Knowledgeofthe  Department'sorganization,policiesand  procedures.•Knowledgeofstreet,road,and  highwaylayout,and  populationpatternofthe  County.•Knowledgeoflocal,State,andFederal  laws,andmotorvehicleregulations.•Skill  inthe  useoffirearms,operationofpatrolvehicles,andlawenforcementequipment.• Abilitytogatherandanalyzefacts. ForPre-Emolovment •  Ability toexhibitmaturejudgment,imagination,initiative,andproblem-solvingcapabilityin dealingwith  avarietyoflawenforcementsituations.•  Abilitytoactwith  tact  andimpartiality.•  Abilityto  react  quicklyandcalmlytoemergencysituations.•  Abilityto  follow  writtenandverbalinstructions.•  Abilityto  communicateeffectivelyverballyandto  writefactualreports.•  Abilityto  performwork  requiringgood  physical condition.•  Abilitytodrive  anautomobilesafely  andefficiently.•  Abilitytoestablishandmaintaineffectiveworkingrelationshipswith  employees,law enforcement,otheragencies,andthe  public.•  Abilitytomeet  necessaryspecial  requirements. ",Deputy Sheriff Job in Winona,Part Time,"Winona, MN 55987",,http://jobview.monster.com/deputy-sheriff-job-winona-mn-us-168923801.aspx?mescoid=3300590001001&jobPosition=13,22.01 - 30.29 $ /hour,,4c7bbdda71c2e896c7bdfa87c0b1129f
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:53:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: AIX & p-Series Admin - Unix Systems Admin Contract: 12 months Location: Dallas Texas Job Description: 1.The qualified candidate will join a team that is responsible for the administration, maintenance, and support of a highly available 24x7 UNIX Enterprise environment. 2.The qualified candidate will be Implement, document, maintain and monitor the AIX operating system instances. 3.The candidate will also be required to deploy and implement enhancements that will improve the reliability, maintainability, and performance of the system and its infrastructure. 4.In accordance with customer's security policies and directives, the candidate will deploy, maintain, and enhance the security of servers through administrative, preventive, detective, and reactive controls, such as change and configuration management, anti-virus measures, patch management, and system scans. 5.Be able to work in an environment that is global and 24x7, and be able to pass and receive work for global peers in different time zones.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Unix Systems Admin (Solaris preferred) Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Title: AIX & p-Series Admin - Unix Systems Admin Contract: 12 months Location: Dallas Texas Job Description: 1.The qualified candidate will join a team that is responsible for the administration, maintenance, and support of a highly available 24x7 UNIX Enterprise environment. 2.The qualified candidate will be Implement, document, maintain and monitor the AIX operating system instances. 3.The candidate will also be required to deploy and implement enhancements that will improve the reliability, maintainability, and performance of the system and its infrastructure. 4.In accordance with customer's security policies and directives, the candidate will deploy, maintain, and enhance the security of servers through administrative, preventive, detective, and reactive controls, such as change and configuration management, anti-virus measures, patch management, and system scans. 5.Be able to work in an environment that is global and 24x7, and be able to pass and receive work for global peers in different time zones.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/unix-systems-admin-solaris-preferred-job-dallas-tx-us-168829178.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,8ce23329bd2e8164ca200549e8dbef47
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:41:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"The past weeks have brought tremendous amounts of severe weather. ADHI is hiring in all areas IMMEDIATELY to assist homeowners in these hard hit areas. Great opportunity to work for a nationally established company. This is an in-field, FULL TIME & PERMANENT position. Travel to the office is limited to ONE DAY per week! No Experience Needed - Over 90 percent of our successful employees have had little or no construction experience! Home Inspectors visit homes and inspect house exteriors and roofs, make recommendations on repairs or replacements that need to be made and assist the homeowner through the entire process.  Prior background in home repair, inspection, estimating, sales, and roofing are all good experience for this position, however anyone with great customer service skills and eagerness to learn are great candidates for this exciting opportunity! Compensation & Benefits:·         Health/Dental/Vision Insurance·         Generous 401k plan·         $500-$2000/week within first month of starting·         Training and Development: Opportunity for quick advancement·         Company vehicles or allowance provided if you have a qualifying one·         Gas/Fuel incentives availableQualifications:·         Must be a ""Closer""·         Sales background a plus but is NOT required·         Must be able to climb a ladder to roof when necessary·         Detail orientated and organization is a necessity·         Must have, or obtain, a smart phone capable of downloading apps and taking picturesDuties:·         Marketing (Materials Provided)·         Qualified cold calls and Lead Generation (some lead generation provided)·         Exterior Home Inspections to diagnose storm damage·         Make recommendations based on findings·         Inspect final work for completeness and quality·         Sales process (system and contracting)·         Responsible for complete customer satisfaction Being a part of our team offers you an amazing opportunity to grow your career. We offer our industry leading training, an opportunity for quick advancement, health insurance, and a 401K plan.ADHI is one of the largest and fastest growing roofing contractors in the country! ADHI has been featured in 2 major publications including Fortune 500 Magazine along with being the top volume contractor in the country with Owens Corning 4 years in a row. We currently operate in 12 states and are looking to have offices open in 18 states by 2017! APPLY TODAY or contact us at 877-988-0588 to join our ADHI Team!",Home Inspector-CNCO Job in Centennial,Full Time Employee,"Centennial, CO 80112",,http://jobview.monster.com/home-inspector-cnco-job-centennial-co-us-168506868.aspx?mescoid=4700828001001&jobPosition=19,"40,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,0096fca45e8df372f994ac924606bed0
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:03:40:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security OfficersPalm Bay, FL FT/PT Positions  JOB SUMMARYObserves and reports activities and incidents at an assigned client site, providing for the security and safety of client property and personnel. Controls access to client site or facility through the admittance process; assists visitors with a legitimate need to gain entry to the facility; screens visitors and client employees in an efficient manner in order to expedite their admittance to the site or facility.  Preserves order and may act to enforce regulations and directives for the site pertaining to personnel, visitors, and premises. A detailed job description is available during the application process when you apply.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: ·         U.S. citizen ·         18 or 21 years of age·         High School Diploma or Equivalent·         Must be able to meet state/county licensing requirements for Security Officer·         Excellent verbal and written communication skills ·         Courteous telephone manner and customer service skills·         Ability to pass a background check, personality assessment and drug screen·         Ability to obtain and maintain a government security clearance·         Military, Security, or Law Enforcement Background preferred  HOW TO APPLYApply Directly Online by following the steps below:1.              Click the “Apply Now” button below2.              Once redirected to the Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services site click the link: “Security Operations Start Application"" 3.              Go to the “Apply to a Location near You” tab. Put in Florida for the state and Palm Bay for the city and click the green arrow next to the city. You will then be directed to the current open positions for Florida.4.              Select the title of the position you are interested in and you will be directed to the “Job Description” for that position.5.              Read and confirm the selection and click the “Apply Now button” at the bottom of the page.6.              Complete the application process as instructed. www.SCISjobs.com  EOE/Minorities/Females/Vets/DisabilitiesDCJS LIC.  # 11-2919  ",Security Officer Job in Palm Bay,Full Time Employee,"Palm Bay, FL 32905",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-palm-bay-fl-us-168806889.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=3,11.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,Security/Protective Services,da72e4bd1c76b3308978f48342dafaf6
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:02:44:16,No,jobs.monster.com,".Denali Advanced Integration is one of the nation’s leading technology integrators by volume and capacity with experience in Data Center, Unified Communication’s, Mobility and Virtualization. Denali has more than 400 dedicated employees focused on design, architecture, implementation and operations. From Client End Devices to the Cloud, Denali provides service to retail, healthcare, industrial and government environments both domestically and abroad. We are seeking an HR & Office Coordinator to join our busy team. In this role you will be responsible for administering the front desk, plus human resource and payroll related duties at the Plano, TX facility. Customer service is a priority, and this position typically is the first point of contact for visitors in an office setting. Responsibilities range from managing the reception area, events coordination, assisting with the new hire onboarding process and acting as a back-up for company payroll activity and other site administrative functions. Additional primary responsibilities include operating the site multi-line telephone station and ensuring that all visitors have the proper credentials to enter the facility. Other responsibilities may include assisting the Plano, TX sales team with customer contacts and scheduling tours of the Plano, TX facility. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:Functions and operates multi-line telephone system to answer incoming calls and directs callers to appropriate personnelManages the office reception areaOrders office suppliesOrder catering for customer meetings or for departmental needsAssists with company event planning and facilitationInitiates employee background checksMaintain onboarding status reportHandles new employee coordination and preparation for paperwork and orientationComplete new hire checklistEnters new employee information into HRISSend new hire report updatesAssists with payroll activities such as time review and manual check processingAddress employee’s pay-related concerns and provide accurate payroll informationComplete verifications of employmentManage the ad-hoc facility maintenance requests Provide assistance with customer billingSchedule and communicate facility cleaning activity and worksite inspectionsMaintains employee confidence and protects payroll & Human Resource operations by keeping information confidential. REQUIRED EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:High School Diploma or equivalent. A minimum of two years of college education in a related field. Prior experience using HRIS software preferred. Previous experience with payroll administration preferred.Willingness to take on new projects and provide assistance with worksite functions highly desired.Experience and understanding of federal and state garnishment processes is preferred.Four years of office administration experience preferred. COMPETENCIES & ATTRIBUTES:InitiativeTime ManagementCommunication ProficiencyConfidentialityOrganizationDetail OrientedSelf-StarterProblem SolverCharismaticMotivatedGeneral Math SkillsEvent CoordinationCustomer Service Work Environment: This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines. Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or listen. This position requires the ability to occasionally lift office products and supplies, up to 20 pounds. Apply Online $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",HR & Office Coordinator Job in Plano,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Plano, TX 75023",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-office-coordinator-job-plano-tx-us-168766669.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,11414c5531a23bf7ae755ec7603b3cf1
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:02:43:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Medical Science Liaison - Midwest (Minnesota, Nebraska, Colorado)-POS_75064673-1DescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Genzyme Corporation (a Sanofi company) and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.Job Title: Medical Science LiaisonThe Medical Science Liaison (MSL) will be responsible for providing non-promotional scientific, educational, and research support for the Genzyme Rare Disease portfolio in the respective territory.The MSL position is a field based member of the Medical Affairs team. The MSL should be highly trained in a health care field and well versed in clinical practice and basic science. The MSL should be able to deliver cutting edge data and technical/practical education to Health Care Professionals (HCPs).The MSL will be responsible for developing and maintaining relationships with key Rare Disease experts and building a well-informed advocacy base for Genzyme's Rare Disease franchise, including compounds in the development program. The MSL will act as a conduit for providing accurate and updated clinical, scientific and medical information to Rare Disease Experts, health care professionals, treatments decision makers and other members of the scientific, provider and payer community (private insurance, payers, medical groups, government agencies, and health systems with drug formularies), in compliance with all relevant company policies.This territory is based inthe Northern California/Nevada areaJob Responsibilities•Maintains business and clinical knowledge of the Rare Disease treatment landscape including current treatment strategies, current and pending competitors, and new therapeutic developments. •Increases Genzyme's visibility among leaders in the therapeutic field of Rare Diseases including Genetics, Cardiovascular, and Endocrinology. Identifies, establishes and maintains collaborative relationships with key experts, investigators and institutions strategic to product development. •Participates in medical education for healthcare professionals through presentations at office visits, investigator meetings, advisory boards, medical meetings, and other appropriate venues to enhance product and disease state knowledge. •Collaborates with clinical team and CRA's to coordinate and optimize educational and research support for sites/investigators participating in Genzyme's clinical trials. •Responds to unsolicited requests regarding interest in investigator sponsored studies (ISS), and supports ISS submissions through appropriate internal processes. •Responds to unsolicited request for medical information associated with supported products and disease state areas. •Provides effective clinical presentations to internal and external audiences and tailors presentations to meet specific needs of the audience (appropriate response to unsolicited requests). •Identifies and communicates key clinical and research issues and insights from industry leaders to appropriate departments to help shape company research, development, and strategies for investigational and commercialized products.•Facilitates the identification of medical community educational needs around disease state management, including awareness and understanding of appropriate/inappropriate use of company products. •Collaborates with internal and external stakeholders in support of needs of Key Opinion leaders (KOLs).•Maintains clinical expertise through comprehensive education including attendance at relevant symposia, scientific workshops, and review of key journals. Participation in required internal training, presentations and journal clubs.•Maintains appropriate communication with Medical, Regulatory, and Legal personnel within the company to ensure appropriate timelines and procedures are met. •Adheres to regulatory and compliance guidelines and company policies in all aspects of scientific dissemination of information to include responses to unsolicited requests for medical information. •Enhances clinical/scientific knowledge of customers and colleagues through education and appropriate scientific exchange. •Works collaboratively with relevant internal stakeholders to identify local/regional educational gaps/needs and apply appropriate field medical support that is aligned with medical strategy. •Provides field updates regarding topics of interest.•Addresses administrative and reporting needs on a timely basis or as requested by management.•Provides clinical presentations to Payer groups as requested.•Travel 60% or greater, including domestic and international travel as needed.QualificationsBASIC QUALIFICATIONS:Minimum requirements include:Master's degree in a life science subject and 3 or more years related pharma/biotech experience or 5 years in a Rare Disease clinical environment.Bachelor's degree and 5 or more years related pharma/biotech experience or 5 years in an Rare Disease clinical environment.PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:Education:PharmD, MD, PhD, or Master level Genetic Counselor’s degree or other doctoral-level degree preferred and 2 years related pharma/biotech experience.Consideration will be given to candidates with advanced health care degrees and relevant industry/clinical experience. Experience:Knowledge and experience in field medical Rare Diseases (Lysosomal Storage Diseases, Cardiovascular, Nephrology, etc.) preferred.Knowledge and experience in disease area preferred.Preferred previous pharmaceutical industry experience.Clear understanding of regional medical practice and clinical decision making regards to patient care.Ability to identify the unmet medical, educational, and research needs within the regional medical community.Interpretation of key scientific data and ability to translate this information to meet educational and research needs.Demonstrated ability to address educational and research needs through delivery of cutting edge scientific/evidenced based data.Understanding of healthcare systems affecting patient care.Understanding of the design and execution of research studies.Exemplary communication and presentation skills.Ability to think strategically.#LI-GZJob:MedicalPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Colorado-Denver, United States-Minnesota-Minneapolis, United States-Nebraska-OmahaJob Posting:Jun 22, 2016, 2:05:10 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Medical Science Liaison - Midwest (Minnesota,,"Denver, CO",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-science-liaison-midwest-minnesota-nebraska-colorado-job-denver-co-us-168873300.aspx?mescoid=1900254001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,6eb6c0e36971d5d4aecbb48cb21cecba
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:02:24:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Claims Examiner Workers Compensation CLAIM YOUR FUTURE AS A GREAT PERFORMER! Providing both satisfying and challenging work along with a highly professional and friendly work atmosphere, Sedgwick has a strong commitment to its colleagues and its clients. If you are seeking a place where you can do great things for those whose lives you touch while maximizing your own career possibilities, Sedgwick is the place for you. As the largest and most innovative Third Party Administrator in the claims industry and the first and only TPA to receive both recognition as the Best TPA in America and the coveted Employer of Choice designation, we invite you to come be a part of our team and, ""Claim Your Future."" PRIMARY PURPOSE: To analyze complex or technically difficult claims to determine benefits due; to work with high exposure claims involving litigation and rehabilitation; to ensure ongoing adjudication of claims within service expectations, industry best practices and specific client service requirements; and to identify subrogation of claims and negotiate settlements. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Analyzes and manages complex or technically difficult claims by investigating and gathering information to determine the exposure on the claim; manages claims through well-developed action plans to an appropriate and timely resolution.Assesses liability and resolves claims within evaluation.Negotiates settlement of claims within designated authority.Calculates and assigns timely and appropriate reserves to claims; manages reserve adequacy throughout the life of the claim.Calculates and pays benefits due; approves and makes timely claim payments and adjustments; and settles claims within designated authority level.Prepares necessary state fillings within statutory limits.Manages the litigation process; ensures timely and cost effective claims resolution.Coordinates vendor referrals for additional investigation and/or litigation management.Uses appropriate cost containment techniques including strategic vendor partnerships to reduce overall cost of claims for our clients.Manages claim recoveries, including be not limited to subrogation, Second Injury Fund excess recoveries and Social Security and Medicare offsets.Reports claims to the excess carrier; responds to requests of directions in a professional and timely manner.Communicates claim activity and processing with the claimant and the client; maintains professional client relationships.Ensures claim files are properly documented and claims coding is correct.Refers cases as appropriate to supervisor and management.ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Performs other duties as assigned.Supports the organization's quality program(s).Travels as required.QUALIFICATION Education & Licensing Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university preferred. Professional certification as applicable to line of business preferred. Experience Four (4) years of claims management experience or equivalent combination of education and experience required. Licenses as required. Skills & Knowledge In-depth knowledge of appropriate insurance principles and laws for line of business handled, recoveries offsets and deductions, claim and disability duration, cost containment principles including medical management practices and Social Security and Medicare application procedure as applicable to line of businessExcellent oral and written communication, including presentation skillsPC literate, including Microsoft Office productsAnalytical and interpretive skillsStrong organizational skillsGood interpersonal skillsExcellent negotiation skillsAbility to work in a team environmentAbility to meet or exceed Service ExpectationsWORK ENVIRONMENT When applicable and appropriate, consideration will be given to reasonable accommodations. Mental: Clear and conceptual thinking ability; excellent judgment, troubleshooting, problem solving, analysis, and discretion; ability to handle work-related stress; ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously; and ability to meet deadlines Physical: Computer keyboarding, travel as required Auditory/Visual: Hearing, vision and talking NOTE: Credit security clearance, confirmed via a background credit check, is required for this position. The statements contained in this document are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by a colleague assigned to this description. They are not intended to constitute a comprehensive list of functions, duties, or local variances. Management retains the discretion to add or to change the duties of the position at any time. Sedgwick is an Equal Opportunity Employer and a Drug-Free Workplace Additional Information:Preferred experience and licensure for the following states:Arizona (AZ) Colorado (CO) Oklahoma (OK) Texas (TX)",Claims Examiner Workers' Compensation Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-examiner-workers'-compensation-job-dallas-tx-us-168828685.aspx?mescoid=1300071001001&jobPosition=8,,,9a1b65db195a8b1cb176628868866b3e
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:01:45:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3613BR Denver (303)221-4518 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Loveland area – APPLY NOW! For more information, you can also call us at (303) 221-4518.  Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Loveland,CO 80537",Security Officer Job in Colorado US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CO,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-co-us-168941897.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=19,,Security/Protective Services,9317dd10101d04ea41f8c91708e0f3dd
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:01:44:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer - Northern Ohio 3575BR Ohio (859) 957-1774 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Northern Ohio area (Cleveland) – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 541 Buttermilk Pike, Suite 203, Crescent Springs, KY 41017 to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at (859) 957-1774. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Cleveland, OH 44129",Security Officer - Northern Ohio Job in Ohio US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,OH,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-northern-ohio-job-oh-us-168941918.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=13,,Security/Protective Services,30f32160b599d0e8046fc7ddf7182f43
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:00:43:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"WHO WE ARE LOOKING FORAmerican Girl Seattle is looking for dynamic individuals as Asset Protection Associates, who are committed to maintaining a safe environment for American Girl customers and employees, as well as, safeguarding company assets. The individuals we seek are able to multi-task, have outstanding communication skills, and exhibit a high level of compassion and understanding while maintaining a professional detachment.Responsibilities:* Maintain safe environment for American Girl customers/guests and store employees by monitoring/correcting safety concerns and controlling/guiding customer traffic when needed.* Provide external and internal customer service in a positive, friendly and professional business manner and the skill set to diffuse escalated situations.* Prevent the loss of company assets through surveillance, conducting employee package checks and trash checks and is knowledgeable of civil and criminal laws pertaining to retail security.* Serve as a safety mentor for store employees; lead by example.Qualifications:* High school degree or equivalent, preferred.* One to two years of loss prevention, law enforcement, criminal justice, military or security experience, preferred. * State specific license, if applicable.* Working knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook Software programs, preferred.* Demonstrated ability working with a broad and diverse work force and customer base, including working with children, preferred.* Must be available to work evening, weekend, and holiday shifts.",Asset Protection Associate Job in Lynnwood body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Part Time Employee,Lynnwood,All,http://jobview.monster.com/asset-protection-associate-job-lynnwood-wa-us-167268373.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=9,,Security/Protective Services,0a4a0f458d686db28c245e9481caa794
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:00:43:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Estimator / Project ManagerLooking for a highly motivated individual to fulfill a Restoration Project Manager/Estimator position. As Project Manager you are required to work as a liaison between the Insurance Companies, Clients and other Contractors to help restore properties when they have been damaged by water, fire, mold, etc... Previous industry experience and IICRC Certificates are preferred. We are looking for someone with excellent customer service skills, computer experience, organization and someone who pays great attention to details. Applicant must have the ability to estimate jobs and manage dozens of jobs at a time while managing technicians and crews. Ideal candidate will be trained in Xactimate, Xactanalysis, Microsoft Office, Water/Fire Mitigation and Mold Remediation.This position offers competitive Salary plus Commission Pay Structure, Benefits Package, Cell Phone and Vehicle. Must have clean driving and criminal records and valid TX Driver's License.Required experience:• Xactimate, Xactanalysis, Microsoft Office, Water/Fire Mitigation and Mold Remediation: 1 yearRequired license or certification:• Valid Driver's License RequiredJob Type: Full-timeJob Location:• Arlington, TXRequired experience:• Xactimate Estimating: 1 yearRequired license or certification:• Drivers License",Monster,,"Estimator / Project ManagerLooking for a highly motivated individual to fulfill a Restoration Project Manager/Estimator position. As Project Manager you are required to work as a liaison between the Insurance Companies, Clients and other Contractors to help restore properties when they have been damaged by water, fire, mold, etc... Previous industry experience and IICRC Certificates are preferred. We are looking for someone with excellent customer service skills, computer experience, organization and someone who pays great attention to details. Applicant must have the ability to estimate jobs and manage dozens of jobs at a time while managing technicians and crews. Ideal candidate will be trained in Xactimate, Xactanalysis, Microsoft Office, Water/Fire Mitigation and Mold Remediation.This position offers competitive Salary plus Commission Pay Structure, Benefits Package, Cell Phone and Vehicle. Must have clean driving and criminal records and valid TX Driver's License.Required experience:• Xactimate, Xactanalysis, Microsoft Office, Water/Fire Mitigation and Mold Remediation: 1 yearRequired license or certification:• Valid Driver's License RequiredJob Type: Full-timeJob Location:• Arlington, TXRequired experience:• Xactimate Estimating: 1 yearRequired license or certification:• Drivers License",,http://jobview.monster.com/estimator-construction-job-arlington-tx-us-168757265.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=5,,,7b710cb312c281fab950592f1092ddca
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:00:10:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3360BR Arizona 928-429-3523 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Kayenta, Arizona area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local  office located at Mile Post 8 Navajo RT 41  to apply in person.  For more information, you can also call us at 928-429-3523. Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say!At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one?Kayenta, AZ 86033",Security Officer Job in Arizona US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,AZ,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-az-us-168941803.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=9,,Security/Protective Services,5e9c701eb2689138382c4c06dcda1dbb
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:00:41:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Associates in the Quality Technician position are responsible for Auditing and Reporting on the Production Quality Control Process to assure to PPT Management and its Customers that quality flexible packaging materials are produced on time in accordance with specific work instructions and applicable safety and quality assurance procedures.Responsibilities and Duties:This job description and performance standard document has been prepared as a guide to ensure better communication and understanding.  All responsibilities, however, have not been included, nor could they be.  Your Supervisor/Manager may from time to time ask you to perform other related duties not specifically included in this description.  Likewise, this description will be revised when required to meet current business needs.·         Per the PPT Quality Manual, promotes and assists with management of the Quality Management System within PPT to including compliance, training, corrective actions, and process improvements.·         Performs audits of production processes and Production Associate quality inspections.·         Conducts laboratory tests as needed (film COF, retained solvents with GC, heat seal testing, Marcon scanning, etc.).  Trains Production Associates on lab test methods as needed.·         Inspects, identifies, root causes and documents internal rejections in the Quality Management module.  Provides samples of the defect, quantity, job number and operator number(s) for evaluation and to initiate Corrective Action Responses (CARs). Ensures quality hold tags are filled out and affixed correctly to defective material.·         Removes all Quality Control Records from completed job jackets, organizes and files records by customer and date.  Purges Quality Control records older than three years, except Becton-Dickinson and any other medical device customer, which records are held for ten years.·         Organizes roll stock and pouch retains in a neat, orderly manner in the QA hold location.  Purges retains older than six months.·         Maintains raw material supplier roll tags on file by job number for traceability.  Purges roll tags older than three years.·         Assists the Quality Manager with training of Production Associates toward Quality Certification.·         Enter customer returns and assist with rework.·         Maintains laboratory equipment and surrounding areas in the lab office.·         As a support role to the production centers that moves freely between departments, this position is expected to maintain a steady and urgent pace to positively impact and inspire the pace of the Associates in the plant. ·         Ensures that all responsibilities and functions performed are in accordance with quality standards in place and that they meet the customer’s requirements.  Participate in quality programs and be aware of changes and standards within the systems.·         Generates improvement ideas and embraces improvement projects to better the business.·         Perform other duties which may be assigned as part of the essential functions of the position.·         Be Safe!  Encourage all employees to engage in safe working behaviors.  Skills and Qualifications:·         Able to follow directions, work with little or no supervision, good math skills, ability to read a tape measure, micrometer, and test equipment, and possess good people skills.·         Detail-orientation required for auditing completion of required paperwork and information system’s inputs with a high degree of accuracy. ·         Able to read and understand job tickets, and accept verbal direction to successfully complete procedures and assigned tasks.·         Basic knowledge of our product and processes. Previous experience in quality assurance is preferred.·         Good verbal and written communication skills required, and proven experience with effective teams and continuous improvement methods strongly preferred. Working Conditions and/or Physical Requirements:·         Able to lift 30 to 40 pounds.·         Able to stand on feet for most of the shift.·         Able to tell differences in printed colors and compare to color standards for quality control audits.·         Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.·         Willingness to be trained in the proper handling and disposal of Hazardous waste. ",Quality Assurance Technician Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, KS 66111",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-technician-job-kansas-city-ks-us-167793945.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6031d31b4466157a9a53b2545488f161
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:00:42:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Planning and Energy Efficiency Analyst The Empire District Electric Company is seeking qualified applicants for a Planning and Energy Efficiency Analyst at its Corporate Headquarters in Joplin, MO. This position requires a BS degree or equivalent with strong analytical background and mathematical or statistical skills. This individual must be proficient in the use of computers and related software programs. One of the primary responsibilities is to use statistical methods to develop and analyze the companys sales and revenue forecasts. Must have the ability of understanding load, capacity, rates and energy-related issues. Applications can be obtained at The Empire District Electric Co. web site at https://www.empiredistrict.com/Careers/UploadPDFApp.aspx . Applications are accepted either electronically or printed and mailed to the address below: The Empire District Electric Co. Attn: Human Resources PO Box 127 Joplin, MO 64802 The Empire District Electric Co is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and Individuals with Disabilities This job listing brought to you by The Joplin Globe $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Planning Analyst Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,64801,Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/planning-analyst-job-joplin-mo-us-166852015.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b607fbf79e1a5094e9298a47e2f7cfac
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:01:41:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstd is hiring a General Laboratory Technician to join the team at Brady Corporation, 2230 W. Florist Ave. Milwaukee, WI. This person would prepare and test samples, handle chemicals, and keep a laboratory notebook. This is a temp to perm opportunity for the right person. The ideal candidate will show initiative and willingness to learn.Pay: $17 - 18 / hourJob Summary:The Lab Technician will perform laboratory and other technical work under the direction of professional staff (e.g. a chemist, engineer or project manager) in accordance with specified instructions and procedures. This position involves work of a technical nature requiring the use of judgment, analytical ability and independent thinking to complete assignments. Such work can be routine or sometimes non-routine in nature and typically encompasses printing, material testing, chemical compounding, coating of substrates, analysis of materials, and monitoring of scale up coating and converting trials. Essential Duties:Prepare and mix coating formulations using laboratory mixing equipmentPerform drawdowns of formulations using drawdown and drying equipmentTest material properties and performance of coatings, adhesives and films Compile results and document in laboratory electronic notebookCommunicate results to professional staffAssist the chemist in preparing for pilot scale coating trialsPerform all work in compliance with laboratory environmental, health and safety rulesWorking hours: 7am - 4pmSkills:Requirements:Required: High School Diploma with a minimum of 6 months working in a laboratory environment. Preferred: Individuals who are working towards an associate degree in chemical science/technology are strongly encouraged to apply. The individual should have excellent communication and organization skills.Interested candidates should apply directly to this positing or submit their resume to Tiffany at tiffany.anderson@randstadusa.com Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",General Laboratory Technician - Brady Corporation Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Employee,"Milwaukee, WI 53223",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/general-laboratory-technician-brady-corporation-job-milwaukee-wi-us-167896064.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=12,17.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,,0ae7074afa95b4cf626129e836b4e3c8
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:01:42:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network. Senior Enterprise Relationship ManagerLocations: Waltham, MA, Edison, NJ, Florham Park, NJ, NYC Job Description:Exciting position responsible for growing revenue in the Enterprise Accounts sector. The ability to develop long term, consultative relationships with all levels, including ‘C’ level, is critical. The right candidate will possess the ability to create sales in new accounts and cultivate new opportunities within existing accounts. Quota based position with uncapped earnings potential. Past success selling complex technology solutions is required and experience with Voice communications, Data Networking, Managed Hosting, IP and equipment is a plus. Job Responsibilities:The right candidate must provide superior customer service on a day to day basis. Must be self motivated and disciplined and thrive on uncovering customer needs. Must have worked in a quota bearing capacity and understand the various stages of the sale cycle. Must possess the energy, determination and will to aggressively seek new sales opportunities every day. Will maintain up to date account plans and keep organized records of activities. Must have excellent verbal, math and written communication skills and be able to present solutions in both small and large group settings. Acquire and integrate industry knowledge related to general trends, emerging technologies, & competitors. Use a consultative sales approach to understand customer’s business needs, issues, strategies and priorities to deliver a value-adding business solution. Manage sales funnel to analyze and manage pipeline activity and monitor sales activity against assigned quotas. Experience with Sales Force, PowerPoint, Excel to develop and deliver quality presentations.Minimum Qualifications:Minimum of 3+ years of outside Business to Business technology sales experience in ‘named’ accounts.Minimum of 3 years in Telecommunications sales or related high tech industry.Proficiency with the MS Applications Suite of products; Excel and PowerPoint.Must have a valid Driver’s License and a satisfactory driving record.Preferred Qualifications:8 years of outside Business to Business technology sales experience in ‘named’ accounts.Bachelor’s Degree.Familiar with local marketplace, companies and community in geography stated above.Demonstrated stable track record of success in Sales, with 2-3 years consecutive, successful sales experience within one company within the last 5 years. Job Segment: Sales Alternate Location: US-Massachusetts-Waltham; US-New Jersey-Edison; US-New Jersey-Florham Park; US-New York-New YorkRequisition #: 13013 Company StatementCenturyLink is an industry-leading provider of communications, high speed Internet and entertainment services from coast to coast.  Our combination of business and residential service solutions – including home and wireless voice solutions and digital television – provide innovative solutions to our customers.  CenturyLink is proud to be a participant in the U.S. General Services Administration Networx program, the largest communications services contract in the world.  CenturyLink offers you the opportunity to develop and cultivate your career as we lead the communications industry into the future.Disclaimer:The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Senior Enterprise Relationship Manager Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10019",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-enterprise-relationship-manager-job-new-york-ny-us-167192530.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,,07c7713238b13aa8b12c089e640f75af
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:01:46:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"YWCA Madison is hiring for multiple positions within our agency!Please Visit: www.ywcamadison.org/jobsPlease visit our website to view application deadlines and for information on: open position descriptions, compensation package, salary range and application instructions. Candidates should support YWCA's mission: to eliminate racism and to empower women, as well as demonstrate multi-cultural competency and the ability to work with diverse populations. People of color and individuals bilingual/bi-cultural English/Spanish encouraged to apply. AA/EOE madison.com 322287",Multiple Positions! Job in Madison,Employee,"Madison, WI 53703",All,http://jobview.monster.com/multiple-positions!-job-madison-wi-us-167424435.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,,a3b287302106b6c92c7a5dacaffcefd7
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:23:47:19,No,jobs.monster.com," JOB TITLE:                                     Millwright/Industrial Mechanic                        STATUS:                                          Full-Time –Non-Union JOB DESCRIPTION:                   The Millwright/Industrial Mechanic position regularly performs high-level electrical and mechanical installation and maintenance of field & plant equipment and facility. He or she will provide back up on other plant and field production activities as needed. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:         Our Millwright/Industrial Mechanics are responsible for performing a multitude of tasks including maintenance, cleaning, painting, carpentry, plumbing, electrical, and other duties, as assigned.  Troubleshoots and fixes manufacturing equipment.  Installs and maintains power transmission, vacuum, hydraulic and pneumatic systems, and programmable logic controls. Monitors and ensures that the equipment is in excellent condition for operation.  Performs preventive and corrective maintenance on the equipment.  Assist with building & equipment inspections.   Compliance with Quality Plan standards, ISO instructions, safety programs and policies, Company/department/location policies and legal requirements is maintained. Helps organize and plan ahead, including conducting seasonal prep work, prepare equipment, schedule materials, etc.  COMPETENCIES:                        Ability to climb and/or work in elevated areas; standing/sitting for extended periods;Operating machinery, motor vehicles such as trucks and/or forklifts; repetitive motion and/or repetitive lifting (minimal requirement 60 lbs.), exposure to weather and environmental conditions (e.g., heat, dust, cold).  REQUIREMENTS:                       Must have experience working on production equipment and proven ability to troubleshoot & repair machinery.  Familiarity with hydraulics, pneumatics,overhead cranes and electrical is a plus.   Excellent mechanical aptitude.  Works well under pressure.SALARY:                                        Competitive+ Plus Monthly Incentive WORK HOURS:                           1st shift with over-time availableBENEFITS:                                     Free single coverage for: Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance.  Shared cost for additional dependent coverage (50%).  LIFE INSURANCE:                      Ensured for 10K. Additional coverage may be purchased through Nelsen’s AFLAC program.RETIREMENT PROGRAM:       401K Plan. As an added Bonus, Nelsen matches half up to 6%ALLIED FLEXIBLE SPENDING ACCOUNT:         Pre-tax medical expense & child care reimbursement account.COMPANY HISTORYLocated in Franklin Park, Illinois, Nelsen Steel Company is a leading manufacturing company specializing in the production of high quality cold-finished carbon and alloy steel bars.  The Nelsen Family established the Company in 1939 and still going strong after three successful generations.",Millwright/Industrial Mechanic Job in Franklin Park,Full Time,"Franklin Park, IL 60131",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Millwright-Industrial-Mechanic-Job-Franklin-Park-IL-US-164729600.aspx?mescoid=5100938001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e30e2d1e492957970d03e3238017c3d
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:23:46:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"autocad designer / cnc MFG engineer with sheet metalgreat new position for go- getterThe Primary Duties will be to engineer and design custom productsThe ideal candidate must be proficient in AutoCAD, Sheet metal manufacturing and, CNC Programming and Microsoft Office. He/she must have the ability to work independently and within a team environment. He/she must have the ability to provide detailed drawings for other CNC Programmers.Major Responsibilities:Engineer and Design Custom productsProvide CNC Programming on Custom Designed LockersProduce AutoCAD Drawings and suggest solutions for new DesignsHelp Facilitate the approval process with customers, CNC Programmers and Production StaffReview Manufacturing Process to ensure accuracyHelp Design and develop New Product LinesRequirements:Strongly Proficient in AutoCAD – 5+ Years ExperienceStrongly Proficient in CNC winpro or Routercim etc – 5+ Years ExperienceProficient in Microsoft Office, especially Excel and AccessAbility to communicate effectively with customers, co-workers and production staffAbility to work on multiple projects and complete them within required deadlinesSelf-starter who is highly motivated, flexible and able to multi-taskWorks well in a cross functional team environmentAble to prioritize taskshurry!Please send resume in confidence to us @ bw (AT) cadcam recruiters. (dotcom)since 1981we are not on any networks so resume stays with us and confidentialBill Wright 704 541  1100 hurry!keywordsautocad designer  autocad inventor designer  autocad inventor design engineer  mechanical engineersheet  metal design engineer  routercim winpro  trumpf  amada murata  solidworks designer UGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer mold designer mold designer keywordsautocad designer  autocad inventor designer  autocad inventor design engineer  mechanical engineersheet  metal design engineer  routercim winpro  trumpf  amada murata  solidworks designer UGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer mold designer mold designer keywordsautocad designer  autocad inventor designer  autocad inventor design engineer  mechanical engineersheet  metal design engineer  routercim winpro  trumpf  amada murata  solidworks designer UGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer mold designer mold designersheet metal amada murata muratec-usa trumpf routercim winpromastercam programmer edgecam programmer smartcam nc programmer hypermill programmer powerrmill nc programmer powermill programmer bobcad nc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer mastercam post developer manufacturing engineer jobs cnc manufacturing engineer UG CNC roeders high speed machining engraving embossing jobs moldmaker jobs master moldmaker roeders high speed machining lang machines lang engraving featurecam partmaker programmer delcam programmer featurecam nc programmer surfcam programmer surfcam programmer gibbscam nc programmer gibbscam cnc programmer vericut solicam esprit nc programmer esprit cnc programmer dptechnology C++ software developer featurecam sinker edm sinker edm charm,illesprgrammer C++ MILL/lathe software developer murata chiron deckel mazak integrex mazatrol programmer mazak quadrex mazak integrex mori-seki NT series okuma multus IGF programmer winpro IGF programming ironcad teksoft procam nexus 5 axis programmer mill-turns millturn programmer toolmaker moldmaker moldflow willemin willemin mikrons delcam powermill okuma multus open-mind hypermill MORI MATSUURA cimatron cimatroncnc machinist cnc programmer cnc machinist etc mastercam NC programmer mastercam 5 axis programmer cnc programmer router programmer mastercam x4 5 axis cnc programmer hanwha lathes screw machines, screw machine jobs, screw machining jobs, Swiss CNC screw machines, Swiss CNC screw machine jobs, Swiss CNC screw machining jobs, Swiss CNC jobs, CNC machines, CNC machine jobs, CNC machining jobs, and CNC jobs. Swiss screw machines, Swiss screw machine jobs, Swiss screw machining jobs, Swiss CAM screw machines, Swiss CNC Jobs, Swiss CNC careers, Swiss Type Cam screw machines, and Swiss Lathes. candidates include Citizen Cincom, GE siemens ugnx ugnx og/POSTS NX CNC PRGRAMMER cnc mastercam programmer mastercamkeywords cnc repair cnc machine tool repair cnc machine tool repair fanuc repair siemens repair heidenhain repairokuma repair mori seiki repair cnc field service plant maintenance plc repair plc repair electronics technician cnc field service repair haas repair blade and vanes turbines airfoils pratt and whitney pratt & whitney cnc field service esprit cnc prgrammermastercam cnc programmeresprit routercim winpro shears punch presses routercim autocad inventor autoad designer acad designer inventor expert inventor designerThermwoodurrett, Collets, Swiss CAM screw machine jobs, Swiss CAM machining jobs, Swiss CAM jobs, machine tools, machine tool jobs, manufacturing jobs, sales jobs, engineering jobs, precision machining jobs, production machining jobs, Acme screw machines, Acme Gridley and Allen Bradley. We often look for Bechler, Bridgeport, Brown & Sharpe screw machines, Bryant, Chiron, Cimco, Cincinnati, Cincom Citizen, and Citizen screw machines. Resources Group job opportunities, opportunities, Tom Medvec jobs, Other equipment includes Maier, Hanwa, KMX, Cone Blanchard, Conomatic, Davenport screw machines, Deco, Emco, Escomatic, Wire EDM machines, Euroturn automatic screw machines, Fadal, Fanuc controls, Fusion controls,keywords  manager of machining   machining manager  cnc machining manager manager of manufacturing manufacturing manager cnc foreman   machining manager  lead machinist cnc programming supervisor  cnc manufacturing manager  cnc programmer  director of manufacturing  keywords  manager of machining   machining manager  cnc machining manager manager of manufacturing manufacturing manager cnc foreman   machining manager  lead machinist cnc programming supervisor  cnc manufacturing manager  cnc programmer  director of manufacturing  keywords  manager of machining   machining manager  cnc machining manager manager of manufacturing manufacturing manager cnc foreman   machining manager  lead machinist cnc programming supervisor  cnc manufacturing manager  cnc programmer  director of manufacturing keywords  manager of machining   machining manager  cnc machining manager manager of manufacturing manufacturing manager cnc foreman   machining manager  lead machinist cnc programming supervisor  cnc manufacturing manager  cnc programmer  director of manufacturing www.cadcamrecruiters.com    since 1981email to BILL@cadcamrecruiters(dotcom)keywords  mazak machinist  mazak machinist powermill powershape UGNX programmer  ugnx nc programmer ug/postbuilder  post-processor developerUGNX CNC programmer   UG programmer grip nc programmer open api  UG CNC programmerUGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer mold designer mold designermastercam programmer edgecam programmer smartcam nc programmer hypermill programmer powerrmill nc programmer powermill programmer bobcad nc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer mastercam post developer manufacturing engineer jobs cnc manufacturing engineer UG CNC  roeders  high speed machining  engraving embossing jobs moldmaker jobs master moldmaker  roeders high speed machining lang machines  lang engraving featurecam  partmaker programmer delcam programmer  featurecam nc programmer surfcam programmer surfcam programmer gibbscam nc programmer  gibbscam cnc programmer vericut solicam esprit nc programmer  esprit cnc programmer  dptechnology C++ software developer featurecam  sinker edm sinker edm  charm,illesprgrammer  C++ MILL/lathe software developer murata chiron deckel mazak integrex  mazatrol programmer  mazak quadrex mazak integrex  mori-seki NT series okuma multus IGF programmer winpro IGF programming ironcad teksoft procam nexus 5 axis programmer mill-turns  millturn programmer toolmaker moldmaker moldflow willemin  willemin mikrons  delcam  powermill okuma multus  open-mind  hypermill MORI MATSUURA cimatron cimatroncnc machinist  cnc programmer cnc machinist etc mastercam NC programmer  mastercam 5 axis programmer   cnc programmer  router programmer   mastercam x4  5 axis cnc programmer hanwha lathes screw machines, screw machine jobs, screw machining jobs, Swiss CNC screw machines, Swiss CNC screw machine jobs, Swiss CNC screw machining jobs, Swiss CNC jobs, CNC machines, CNC machine jobs, CNC machining jobs, and CNC jobs.  Swiss screw machines, Swiss screw machine jobs, Swiss screw machining jobs, Swiss CAM screw machines, Swiss CNC Jobs, Swiss CNC careers, Swiss Type Cam screw machines, and Swiss Lathes.  candidates include Citizen Cincom, Turrett, Collets, Swiss CAM screw machine jobs, Swiss CAM machining jobs, Swiss CAM jobs, machine tools, machine tool jobs, manufacturing jobs, sales jobs, engineering jobs, precision machining jobs, production machining jobs, Acme screw machines, Acme Gridley and Allen Bradley.  We often look for Bechler, Bridgeport, Brown & Sharpe screw machines, Bryant, Chiron, Cimco, Cincinnati, Cincom Citizen,  and Citizen screw machines.  Resources Group job opportunities, opportunities, Tom Medvec jobs, Other equipment includes Maier, Hanwa, KMX, Cone Blanchard, Conomatic, Davenport screw machines, Deco, Emco, Escomatic, Wire EDM machines, Euroturn automatic screw machines, Fadal, Fanuc controls, Fusion controls, Gatling, rubber molds rubber molds Gibbs, Giddings & Lewis, Gildemeister, Gorton, Greenlee, Griffo Bros,  and Haas.  Medvec Resources Group also looks for Hardinge, Hitachi Seiki, Howa,mazak integrex  Hurco, Hydromat, Index, Integrex, Kingsbury,mold designer mold design  cimtron designer cimatron designer mold designer jobs injection mold jobs vacuum mold jobs cimtron mold designer jobs Kitamura, Kummer, Makino, Matsuura, Mazak, rubber molds injection molds Mazak Integrex, Mazatrol, Miyano screw machines, Mori Seiki, Nakamura, National Acme, National Cold Heading Machines,  and New Britain.  Other equipment also includes Nomura, Okuma, Omni Turn, Peterman, Petermann, Sabre, Schutte  star lathe  swiss lathe  mold design jobs  mold designer  powermill jobs pwershape jobs swiss lathe programmer swiss lathe machinist  traub lathe citizen lathes  star lathes nomura lathes tsugami lathes citizen wincnc marubeni winTS  winpager  a-20 a-16  a-32  fixed barstock bl12/25 lergocad grinding engineer   grinding Manufacturing engineer thermwood router  thermwood programmer esprit cnc programmer esprit nc programmer stra lathes citizen lathes wiss programmer  mastercam programmerstamping dies die engineer stamping engineer trim dies punch dies stamping engineer trim dies cnc supervisor lockheed gneral dynamics  northrup grumman cnc mananger cnc foreman  cnc supervisor swiss lathe citien lathe 5 axis programmer mastercam guru mastsrcam expert  mazak lathe mazak machinistmastercam cnc programmer UGNX CNC programmer   Unigraphics cnc programmer  UGNC programmer MILLTURN PROGRAMMER partmaker partmaker  partmaker mazak integrex  masetrcam programmer  mastercam cnc programmer mazak machinist UGNX programmer  ugII nc programmer ug/postbuilder  post-processor developer UGNX CNC programmer  UG programmer grip nc programmer open api  UG CNC programmerUGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer catia cnc programmer  catia cnc prgrammermastercam programmer edgecam programmer smartcam nc programmer hypermill programmer powerrmill nc programmer powermill programmer bobcad nc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer mastercam post developer manufacturing engineer jobs cnc manufacturing engineer UG CNC  roeders  high speed machining  engraving embossing jobs moldmaker jobs master moldmaker  roeders high speed machining lang machines  lang engraving featurecam  partmaker programmer delcam programmer  featurecam nc programmer surfcam programmer surfcam programmer gibbscam nc programmer  gibbscam cnc programmer vericut solicam esprit nc programmer  esprit cnc programmer  dptechnology C++ software developer featurecam sinker edm sinker edm charm,illesprgrammer  C++ MILL/lathe software developer murata chiron deckel mazak integrex  mazatrol programmer mazak quadrex mazak integrex  mori-seki NT series okuma multis IGF programmer winpro IGF programming ironcad teksoft procam nexus 5 axis programmer mill-turns millturn programmer Mazatrol proficiency MAZAK INTEGREX MAZAK VARIAXIS MAZAK QUICKTURN MAZATROL FUSION MAZATROL MATRIX mazak 300y MAZAK 300hy mazak fh1080 MAZAK eia PROGRAMMER MAZAK camware PROGRAMMER MAZAK qtn-250 mazakeai / iso programming",autocad designer / sheet metal MFG engineer Job in Columbia,Full Time,"Columbia, SC 29202",All,http://jobview.monster.com/autocad-designer-sheet-metal-MFG-engineer-Job-columbia-SC-US-162636346.aspx?mescoid=1700209001001&jobPosition=10,"55,000.00 - 72,000.00 $ /yearOT",,f213b3a57f48351d1cbfa6b8b2246207
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:23:16:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"IT Hardware Field EngineerWe are looking for an IT hardware Field Engineer in The Baltimore, Maryland areawith a minimum of 5 years’ experience, 10 years’ experience is preferred, diagnosing and maintaining multiple server, storage platforms and some printersin Data Center environments.  This individual must be self-motivated and possess an exceptional work ethic with integrity,attention to detailand a mindset for customer satisfaction. This individual must be able to work effectively and efficiently with little or no supervision, while being aware that there are always 24x7 accesses to level 2 and 3 support for the more difficult issues and more complex platforms. He/She must be able to communicate and collaborate well with management,technical support staff, the customer and fellow Engineers. Primary Skill Sets:Knowledge on hardware maintenance and architecture for at least 2 of the following hardware platforms is preferred:      HP Proliant  BL & DL Class Servers      Dell PowerEdge Series Servers      HP 9000 Servers      HP Integrity Servers      HP / DEC Alpha Servers      IBM P-Series Servers Other Skills:All candidates considered for this position must exhibit:      Professionalism      Organizational skills      Time management and prioritization skills      Excellent customer communication skills      Pro-Active mindset  Responsibilities:      Maintain multi-platform servers in Data Center environments      Action and update service tickets on a timely basis      Prioritize work load for efficiency and speed of completion      Maintain levels and organization of spare parts inventory",IT Hardware Field Engineer Job in Baltimore,Full Time,"Baltimore, MD",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Hardware-Field-Engineer-Job-Baltimore-MD-US-164148159.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=15,,,1875393dfde5b557cd049e193e8992df
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:22:59:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"INDUSTRIAL Industrial company seeking qualified individual w/background in industrial mtce, electrical 240V-460V experience. Complete compensation pkg. day shift, no layoffs, matching 401K, health insurance. Apply in person Monday-Friday 9:00am-3:00pm, Chicago Flame Hardening, 5200 Railroad Avenue East Chicago, Indiana",Industrial Maintenance - Electrical Experience Job in East Chicago,Full Time,"East Chicago, IN 46312",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Industrial-Maintenance-Electrical-Experience-Job-East-Chicago-IN-US-165586075.aspx?ch=nwindiana&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,,5271e884aa0678f9fa0148270e2289f4
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:22:41:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance PersonPurpose: Maintenance personnel ensure the safety of their assigned schools through regular maintenance and repair to the facilities, equipment and vehicles as requested by corporate and school management. Essential Duties1.    Perform repair and maintenance on assigned schools ensuring their adherence to government and licensing codes2.    Cooperate with school and corporate management to ensure all work is accomplished in a timely manner3.    Report any observed needed repairs or maintenance to supervisor4.    Attend any meetings as requested5.    Assist in the setup of all new facilities6.    Deliver and store supplies from the warehouse7.    Purchase maintenance supplies in accordance with set policies and procedures at Children of America8.    Be available at all times in cases of emergency and may include weekends and evenings.9.    Utilize computerized maintenance logs and email to document completion of jobs and daily activity10.Ensure that all activities operate consistently and ethically within the mission and values of Children of America11.Passionate about Children of America's mission and able to promote and communicate the philosophy, mission and values of Children of America to coworkers, customers and the community.Other DutiesMaintenance personnel perform other duties as assigned by the Vice President of Facilities Management and other corporate managementSupervisionWorks under the direct supervision of the Vice President of Facilities Management This position may be asked to supervise other maintenance staff at Children of AmericaJob QualificationsSelf-motivationStrong work ethicCooperativeAccountability for time and expensesIntegrityMust have a valid and clean driving recordWork ExperienceAt least two years’ experience in same or related fields such as drywall, painting, plumbing, HVAC and electricEducationHigh school diploma (GED) Job requires travel to each school as assignedWorking ConditionsPhysical Work DemandsAble to stoop, kneel, bend at the waist and reach on a daily basisAble to lift and move up to 75 pounds occasionallyMental Work DemandsRegular and on-time attendanceHours may exceed 40 hours per weekNote: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required and is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities or qualifications associated with this job. ",Maintenance Worker Job in Lansdale,Full Time,"Lansdale, PA 19446",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Worker-Job-Lansdale-PA-US-165012536.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=17,,,5ab8a23fd6b7233a61ff4d498c559ecf
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:22:40:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Assembler/Packager Location: Billerica, MA Type: ContractPay Rate Max: $14.50 USD Job Description:This is a long term contract, but if someone does a good job, you never know what happens.We need to do a DMV verification, so everyone that we send there needs to have a license going forward.   • Criminal County Search (7 Year Address History)• Criminal Federal Search (7 Year Address History)• DMV Driving Records (will still consider candidates if they get a hit for driving, as long as they have a valid driver’s license) • OIG/Sam Combined Search• Drug test 5 panel• Nationwide Sex Offender Registry CheckPay is $14.50. Hours: Monday – Thursday 6:30 AM – 5:00 pm.  The CBGM Meter Assember/Kit Packager is responsible for the assembly, testing and packaging of  Consumer Blood Glucose meters in a fast paced, continuous flow manufacturing environment. Essential responsibilities include: Mechanical assembly of hand-held glucose meters using a variety of hand tools and automated testing equipment using written assembly and test procedures. Testing and serialization of glucose meters using computer, test fixture and barcode scanning equipment. Packaging tested, serialized meters and materials manually. Performing basic quality control checks including weighing, packaging counts and evaluation of product or packaging appearance. Requirements: High school diploma with at least 2 years of manufacturing experience, preferably in assembly. This person must be able to stand for up to 4 hours per day, perform repetitive motion, and must be able to lift at least 10 pounds. Must be able to speak and read English. This is a long term temporary position through October 2016.",Assembler Job in Billerica,Full Time,"Billerica, MA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Assembler-Job-Billerica-MA-US-166035181.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=14,14.50 - 14.50 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),d48d8f34e57fee0bbe130e9c2ad497a4
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:22:08:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"IMMEDIATE HIRE - NO EXPERIENCE NECESSARY - FULL TIME POSITIONS ENTRY LEVEL POSITIONS IN: MARKETING / CUSTOMER SERVICE - RAPID ADVANCEMENT IN OUR NEW OFFICE! We have expanded new offices!!!!  Expanded new divisions!!!! Planning 4-5 more expansions this year in the Northeast!! We provide aggressive marketing and advertising campaigns for national accounts in NEW JERSEY.     We provide customers with the everyday value and uncompromising customer service that has made us so successful.  We are now accepting applications for Marketing Consultants and Entry-Level Managers for our recent office expansions.  Be a part of an exciting, fun work environment while helping to develop the NEW JERSEY market.  Requirements*We are looking to fill 5 retail positions with full training and growth into management!**We are also looking for a few candidates for entry level customer service representatives and account management!* Requirements:·  Ability to work cooperatively as part of a team.·  Interact with customers to provide top notch service.- Upbeat, energetic, positive personality!!!   ",Full Time Position - Immediate Hire / No Experience Necessary Job in Marlton,Full Time Employee,"Marlton, NJ 08053",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Position-Immediate-Hire-No-Experience-Necessary-Job-Marlton-NJ-US-165557450.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,6b4e10de6bac22fc1544b191a2bc3f65
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:21:40:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"CoLiant Solutions, Inc., a National Infrastructure Service Company, is seeking highly motivated and professional Field Service Technicians. The ideal candidate will possess 3 years industry experience in one or more of the following areas:                                    CCTV, Fire, Security, Voice/Data, and Access Control Experience and Certifications preferred NICET certificationBosch Fire & Security PanelsKnowledge of March Networks and Verint recording platformsWheelock Voice Evac systemsLenelSoftware HouseOSHA 30 training preferredCoLiant Solutions values our employees and welcomes those that want to be a part of a positive team environment dedicated to serving our customers with excellence. This job will include travel require, excellent written and verbal communication and the ability to work both self-directed and as a member of a crew team. CoLiant takes care of its team, so our team can take care of our valued customers.CoLiant Solutions offers: Medical, Disability, & Life Insurance, Bonus potential, Paid Holidays, per diem for travel, hotel card, and gas card.CoLiant Solutions, Inc. is proud to be and Equal Opportunity Employer and Drug-free Workplace. ",Low Voltage Technician -CCTV/Access Control / Fire-Technician Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75223",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Low-Voltage-Technician-CCTV-Access-Control-Fire-Technician-Job-Dallas-TX-US-163438277.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),995cef5a22faa62b90dd8a2a15086882
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:21:40:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: We are the maker, marketer and distributor of branded food products that have been American favorites for decades. Our employees located in more than 20 offices and plants across North America rally around our mission, Reinvigorating Iconic Brands. We work to transform our brands to be more profitable for our customers and more enjoyable for our consumers.   At Pinnacle Foods, every employee has the opportunity to make an impact—from marketing and research & development, to manufacturing, finance and sales—each function plays a critical role in our success. By living our values of trust, candor and ownership we create great relationships that help us deliver results and drive meaningful change for our brands and business.   Responsibilities: Operation of Technical Equipment requiring knowledge and/or experience necessary for Production of Quality Products.   Equipment:          Computer terminal, clerical supplies, gloves, smock and any safety equipment required for assigned duty.   Duties:                 Perform one or more of the following duties:   Operation of Dough Blending System involving prep of dry ingredients, mixer and dough sheeters. Set-up and operate Dough Blenders & Sheeters and be able to maintain (lubricate) and troubleshoot potential problems. Operation of Gravy and Veg Prep Blending System which includes prep of minor ingredients and monitoring of blend system to produce gravy, with ability to load ingredients (via pallet jack) into dump station and inspect product for wholesomeness with operation of ribbon mixers and blanch system. Set-up and operate blending equipment and be able to maintain (lubricate) and troubleshoot potential problems.   Operation of Cartoners to allow a continuous flow of product, also responsible for metal detector and weight verification. Set-up and operate cartoning equipment and be able to maintain (lubricate) and troubleshoot potential problems.   Operation of Case Packing Equipment. Set-up and operate casepacking equipment and be able to maintain (lubricate) and troubleshoot potential problems.   Receiving of all inbound materials (i.e. bulk four, cartons, packaging,ingredients) and supply area as needed for production. Trainer/Utility will provide support to all points of the pie system by training operators and providing operator relief and/or support.    For All Areas:         1.   Set-up, clean up of area as required by SOP document for plant sanitation.     2.   Operation of Power Moving Equipment such as forklifts, powerjacks, and walkie stackers.     3.   Perform all tasks in a safe and efficient manner.                    Keep work area clean and orderly. Keep any records or statistical charts required. Be able to train other operators to perform the above tasks. Other duties as assigned.              Training will be provided as required.   Qualifications: Minimum of a High school diploma or general education degree (GED); with a minimum of 1-3 years’ experience working in a manufacturing environment. Candidate must have strong math and computer skills with the ability to write clearly and accurately. Knowledge and understanding of GMP’s and Food Sanitation in a food or dietary supplement manufacturing plant with blending experience is strongly preferred. Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to communicate effectively with both supervisors and co-workers. Ability to accurately calculate figures and amounts such as totals, percentages, and division. Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or any basic diagram format Non-Standard Work Schedule: Must be available to work any shift and extended time. Normal schedule is usually 2:30 a.m. 12:30 p.m. Mon-Thurs   Pinnacle Foods is an Affirmative Action/EEO Employer –qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard toprotected veteran or disability status, race/color, religion, gender, nationalorigin, age, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or anyother legally protected basis.",Specialist Job in Fayetteville,Full Time Employee,"Fayetteville, AR",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Specialist-Job-Fayetteville-AR-US-165998217.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=19,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e49cc9e3c8e2d6d95aa1e9231f38191f
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:21:11:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Picker/Packer Position Features:? Great Benefits? Free Parking? Clean Warehouse? Great Pay to $35KImmediate need for 10 picker/packer's seeking great benefits, free parking and clean warehouse. ?ability to undertake physically challenging jobs, ?ability to stand long hours and lift loads and ?must satisfy deadlines for dispatch by picking an will be keys to success in this growing, dynamic, stable organization. Will be responsible for processing orders, inventory control and quality assurance for Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing company. Great benefits. Apply for this great position as a picker/packer today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1027793 Job Experience:,",Picker/Packer Job in Kent,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Kent, WA 98032",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Picker-Packer-Job-Kent-WA-US-165992655.aspx?mescoid=4300744001001&jobPosition=15,Up to $35000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),af62befa1519d75e34f5a1a11c2b48de
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:20:44:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"HVAC Install TechnicianImmediate- Direct Hire - A company is in need of a HVAC Installation Technician. The HVAC Install Technician will be responsible for providing installation of equipment as directed by contact and HVAC Supervisor based on specifications and codes. The HVAC Install Technician duties may also include start-up testing of equipment. Expected to work Monday through Friday, occasional overtime and weekends as needed.Responsibilities for the HVAC Install TechnicianInstalls and starts-up equipment, meeting deadlines and performing basic troubleshooting.Complete start-up checklists, pre-functional checklist, system readiness checklist, etc.Create material list from drawings.Analyze situations/issues and provide solutions.Requirements for the HVAC TechnicianMinimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in the HVAC trade.Knowledge and understanding of facets of techniques used for heating, ventilation, and air conditioning service and installation.Competent at installing refrigeration systems, air distribution systems and equipment controls (includes fundamentals of electrical wiring)Valid Illinois Driver’s License with clean driving recordAbility to pass pre-employment screening and drug testAble to safely operate a motor vehicle to travel from site to site.Must be able to stand, walk, bend, crawl, twist, bend, push, pull, carry, climb (stairs & ladders), and be able to grip tools (fine motor coordination)Reliability with ability to work a flexible scheduleHVAC Service TechnicianAbout the JobTitle: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: Webb's Heating & CoolingLocation: Southern IllinoisPositions: HVAC Service Technician-------------------We are currently seeking an experienced HVAC professional with service and controls experience to support our growth. HVAC/R Technician- Commercial -You will perform a broad range of maintenance and service on a variety of HVAC systems. We design, install, and service all types of HVAC systems including air source heat pump systems, furnace and air conditioning systems, and water source heat pump systems.  We also handle steam and hot water boiler service, repair, and replacement.Qualifications: • Previous service and controls experience is preferred • Professional appearance• Skilled at troubleshooting system problems• Excellent written / verbal communication skills with ability to interact with customers• Strong attention to detail• Ability to work independently• Ability to climb ladders, work at high elevations and lift objects of 50+ lbs.• Valid Illinois Driver’s License with clean driving record• Ability to pass pre-employment screening and drug test• Reliability with ability to work a flexible scheduleThis opportunity offers an excellent income potential. Ready to join a Great Team? Qualified candidates are encouraged to apply! Please email your resume and cover letter, subject line: HVA-TECH, to:webbsheatingmel@gmail.com.  No Phone Calls Will Be Accepted!",HVAC SERVICE AND INSTALL TECHNICIAN Job in Energy,Full Time,"Energy, IL 62933",,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-SERVICE-INSTALL-TECHNICIAN-Job-Energy-IL-US-164461718.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=11,12.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),108fb4a706281a32e4f09834ba1cc470
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:20:43:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Install and maintain landscapes.  Tasks include: Planting, seeding, raking, spraying, fertilizing, edging, mulching, watering, transplanting, and maintaining inventory & equipment.Exhibit professional work ethic, attire and interpersonal communication.Saturday, holiday and on call work as required.Seasonal. March-November (or early December). Work full time plus additional hrs. as needed to complete jobs in peak season. Qualifications and Required Skills:High School diploma supplemented by practical experience in landscape installation and maintenance.  Associate degree in related field,  Ohio Certified Nursery Technician (OCNT) and or Commercial Pesticide Applicator’s license a plus.At least one year practical experience in landscape installation & maintenance. Ability to adapt to changing priorities, to meet critical deadlines, to work & communicate effectively under pressure.Ability to frequently lift, carry or move 50+ lbs.  Ability to operate various basic tools and equipment, including hand tools, saws, edger, chainsaw, blower, snow blower, stump grinder, and sod lifter. Ability to hitch and drive large truck with trailer.Ability and willingness to perform labor intensive work in hot and humid weather, light rain, snow, and cold. Possess and maintain a valid driver’s license and independent, daily, reliable transportation to and from office.Applicant must be a citizen (or noncitizen national) of the United States, lawful permanent resident, or an alien authorized to work in the USA.Compensation based on education and experience.",Landscape Crew Member Job in Newark,Full Time,"Newark, OH",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscape-Crew-Member-Job-Newark-OH-US-148238625.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=8,10.00 - 12.50 $ /hour,Entry Level,a6fa6619a00273209b35d9015bec539b
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:19:42:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"You belong at Dayton Freight! Join our team of Trailer Mechanics and be a part of The Dayton Difference.   Dayton Freight is a recognized leader in regional LTL transportation services and we are truly different from other carriers. It’s apparent in how we treat our customers, and each other. Our culture is one of teamwork, respect and professional honesty. Dayton Freight appreciates its employees: you are not just a number, you are family. We attribute our growth to the dedication of our employees, and the loyalty of our customers and business partners.Trailer Technicians will master their troubleshooting skills, combining extensive personal experience with broad knowledge of most efficient and economical means to properly maintain and repair trailers.Additional job duties include: Has a fundamental understanding of repairing and rebuilding components on 48ft. and 53ft. dry van trailers and can effectively repairs the following components: Suspension and running gear components Landing gear assembly and components Wheel components and tires Brake and air components Electrical, lighting and wiring components Rear frame and door components Side, nose and roof components Interior and floor components Able to thoroughly perform Preventative Maintenance inspections and repairs Maintains a high level of welding and metal fabrication skills Performs service calls Performs duty requirements of other technicians when necessary Washes and fuels equipment when necessary Road tests vehicles to ensure quality repair services were performed.*Dependent upon having a CDL Perform other maintenance duties or assignments when necessary Consistently positive attitude, interacting courteously and professionally with fellow employees Proactively assist, guide and direct junior technicians Demonstrates professional excellence at all time and sets a good example Be a leading participant in the care and upkeep of the shop, the grounds and all equipment and tools Maintain a clean, safe environment that complies to OSHA and company standards Proficient in recording all work and labor on a computer in the Work with the Parts Department to assure that all necessary materials, parts, service and shop supplies are maintained at proper quantity levels Comply with all Parts Department procedures and rules at all times Work in compliance to EPA regulations as well as DOT and company safety requirements Actively participates in any company-sponsored continuous improvement processesBenefits Stable and growing organization Competitive weekly pay Quick advancementLaundered Uniforms Professional, positive and people-centered work environment Modern facilities Clean, late model equipment Comprehensive benefits package: Health, Dental, Vision, AD&D, 401(k), etc.",Trailer Mechanic Job in Lowell,Full Time Employee,"Lowell, IN 46356",,http://jobview.monster.com/Trailer-Mechanic-Job-Lowell-IN-US-165219522.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=2,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,09dcac445cb53d7eac1ea08c342c51ce
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:19:42:16,No,jobs.monster.com,Manufacturing facility located in Mt. Olive NJ seeks qualified production operators to join current team! Desired Skills: ·         Previous experience working in a manufacturing environment performing basic machine operation duties·         Ability to read and interpret production documents·         Ability to lift up to 75lbs·         Ability to perform basic calculations with use of a calculator·         Attention to detail and safety procedures *Forklift experience a plus*,Production Operator Job in Budd Lake,Full Time,"Budd Lake, NJ 07828",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Operator-Job-Budd-Lake-NJ-US-165274891.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=5,,,ab303d6a5cde5a2bc0bf5a4a034945a6
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:18:42:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"TOP Group is one of the largest Japanese/English recruiting agencies in the country. Our Chicago office works with many global manufacturing companies in the Midwest United States. A global manufacturing corporation in the Arlington Heights, IL area is searching for a Mid-level Service Technician to do a variety of work in maintenance, repairs, and troubleshooting of press machines in the field. Responsibilities Include:·         Perform routine, preventative, and emergency maintenance and repair on Press machinery.·         Frequent traveling to client locations, some out of state traveling may be required·         Follow a predictive maintenance schedule.·         Emergency equipment repair and troubleshooting.  Requirements·         Associate’s Degree or Professional Certification in Electric/Machine Technician or related fields preferred.·         3-5 years’ experience in maintenance of press machines required. ·         Knowledge of Electronic Parts / Mechanical systems.·         Able to communicate fluently in both written and verbal English·         Able to travel on short notice ·         Able to lift up to 50 lbs and perform regular physical activity such as walking, carrying, sitting, standing, and crouching·         Must have a Valid Driver’s License·         This position will not support visa sponsorships·         Direct applicants only·         We do not accept any resumes from any third party organizations or other recruiters If you feel you can make positive contributions to our company, and think this is the position for you, please don’t hesitate to send us your resume right away!  ",Press Machine Service Technician: IL/EN/ Job in Arlington Heights,Full Time,"Arlington Heights, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Press-Machine-Service-Technician-IL-EN-15236-Job-Arlington-Heights-IL-US-165236360.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,"0.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),3ff5ef5586c1de54dcc82e88e70c81de
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:18:41:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"  At STERIS, WE HELP OUR CUSTOMERS CREATE A HEALTHIER AND SAFER WORLD by providing innovative healthcare and  life science product and service solutions around the globe. Our mission is a strong statement of who we are and what we do –  Join STERIS in its vision to see the world free from Infection and Contamination as a Validation Technician Summary Assists in the processing of Customer products. Duties include coordinating production scheduling and performing validations and qualifications. Essential Job Functions 1. Contributes to the accurate and safe processing capability of the company by coordinating and scheduling all Customer validations and dose mappings;    calibrates and maintains proper function of data collection devices used in validations and qualifications; investigates analyzing and reporting procedures and provides solutions to process deviations and Customer complaints. 2. Optimizes processing by coordinating scheduling of Customer product; assists plant management in training operations employees in performing process procedures; assists operations as required to ensure the timely movement of product. May provide guidance and supervision to Irradiator Operators and Material Handlers. 3. Provides Customer service by assisting in the performance and adherence to ISO 11135 and ISO 11137 requirements. 4. Strives for continuous improvement by analyzing new or alternative ways to improve operations; incorporates staff recommendations into analysis; responds to audit activities in a constructive manner and uses findings to improve operations where possible. 5. Contributes in a team effort by performing according to the guidelines outlined in the STERIS Code of Business Conduct, and other directives; supports the directives and decisions of higher level management and accomplishes other duties as assigned. 6. Provides employee protection by promoting and issuing monitoring devices in hazard areas as required by safety rules and laws. 7. Supports the STERIS AST business imperatives of Growth, Operational Excellence, Leadership Excellence and Customer Focus, by acting with integrity, treating everyone with mutual respect, exhibiting a genuine commitment to the success of all employees, and delivering satisfaction to our Customers through teamwork, innovation and continuous improvement; this will be accomplished while acting safely and is defined as ""The STERIS Way."" 8. Exhibits a commitment to the STERIS AST shared values of Customer Satisfaction and Continuous Improvement through ensuring defect-free workmanship, assisting others to meet the customer’s needs, searching for efficient and effective ways to reduce waste, being active and accountable for customer satisfaction, and satisfying the customer’s needs with a sense of urgency.    Education/License Requirements High School Diploma or GED. Associate Degree preferred. Experience Requirements (Skills, Knowledge and Abilities) Requires: 1. A minimum of one (1) year of experience in sterilization or related industry. 2. Ability to effectively write and verbally communicate in English. 3. Ability to work independently under general guidelines and supervision. 4. Effective interpersonal skills as demonstrated through prior management experience. 5. Requires ability to navigate through defined computer screens. 6. Above average organizing and analyzing skills and Level 2 math skills (four basic arithmetic functions in all units of measurement, decimals ratios, rates, percentages) to determine organizational, Customer and regulatory problems and formulate corrective action plans; attention to detail. 7. Ability to adapt to changing duties and responsibilities. 8. Normal hearing range sufficient to hear alarms, bells, horns, etc. Working Conditions  Position primarily requires sitting, standing, talking and walking in an office environment and stooping, climbing,  standing, walking and talking in a processing environment. Nature of work requires depth perception, near- and farsighted  vision, normal color distinction and normal finger dexterity. The work environment includes working in proximity to contained controlled ionizing radiation and / or controlled and contained toxic flammable gas (ethylene oxide) and other treatment/process chemicals of which further information is available through the facility’s Hazardous Communication Standard (Right to Know). Work environment has potential for exposure to subprotection levels of noise, heat and humidity. Hours of work exceed normal business hours, with occasional evening meetings with Customers and Sales Representatives. Requires conducting Customer and regulator tours, meetings and audits. STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.  STERIS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department by phone at 440-392-7047 or 800-548-4873, extension 27047 for assistance.   STERIS Corporation is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants.  Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.  ",Validation Technician Job in Brooklyn Park,Full Time Employee,"Brooklyn Park, MN 55445",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Validation-Technician-Job-Brooklyn-Park-MN-US-166012242.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,8c9214fffe8a988e330be2ebf7dafb70
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:17:45:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate is responsible for building loads for deliveries. In addition, must maintain a safe, clean and well organized lumber yard, load and unload lumber and/or building supplies, and operate a forklift. Other duties as assigned.Essential Functions:Build loads for deliveryLoad and unload lumber and building suppliesOperates forkliftKeeps management aware of any delays or discrepanciesKeeps lumber yard clean, well organized and safeEsta posicion es responsable de mantener un ambiente seguro, limpio y bienorganizado con la madera, de carga y descarga de madera y o materiales de construccion, entrega de cargas de construcci n, y operaci n de un|montacargas. Debe ser capaz de levantar los materiales de construccion a lo largo del dia. Otras tareas que le asigne.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding and carry out simple one or two-step instructionsCapacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia|y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion|de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.High School diploma or general education degree (GED); Or 1 to 3 months related|experience and/or training. Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses|de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. Tiene la capacidad de usar el|sentido comun y puede ejercer simple instrucciones de uno a dos pasos; manejar|situaciones regulares con m nimo o sin ninguna dificultad.",General Laborer (lumber yard/ warehouse) ( E ) Job in Riverhead,Part Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Laborer-lumber-yard-warehouse-0620-9E-001-Job-Riverhead-NY-US-165673134.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,1ba83f4b170457ac5f637d67473f1f2a
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:17:44:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Varec Biogas a Division of Westech Industrial Inc. - Chicago, ILVarec Biogas is an international vendor for the Biogas, Municipal and Industrial markets. We are currently looking for self-motivated, quality minded field technician for our Illinois Area Field Service team. Someone who cares about doing the job right and attention to detail. Must enjoy travel. We offer a very competitive pay scale, medical benefit program, 401K, 401K % matching and a friendly, professional work environment.Salary based on experience.This position will provide installation and field service for the North East United States. At times you may be required to travel to other areas in the U.S. and International destinations such as Australia and South America. A typical day will require travel via plane or car. You would be on the jobsite for a day to week and then back to do paperwork. You must be at least 21 years of age, be able to lift 60 pounds, complete service work and be able to work on high platforms. Mechanical aptitude is a must.You must have good customer relations, communication skills and conduct yourself in safe and efficient manner. You must also pass a drug and background checks.We provide in house industry specific training, laptop, cell phone and all tools and equipment to perform the required duties. The candidate must enjoy travel. Technicians are allowed to begin and end their shift from their home address and work from their home as a base location. Municipal Wastewater Plant experience, electrical experience, and or mechanical experience is a plus but training is provided.If you would like more specific information, please visit our website at www.varec-biogas.com Attn. Field Services Administrator -Mario HerreraJob Type: Full-timeJob Location:• Chicago, ILRequired education:• High school or equivalent",Field Service Technician Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Chicago-IL-US-165861253.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,18.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,Student (Undergraduate/Graduate),473f73105a51468c40af9a0ba0c51b7c
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:16:43:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Designer Assistant SWEET DREAMS INC. – Austin, TXSweet Dreams, a manufacturer of luxury bedding, draperies and home décor is looking for a part time designer assistant in the northwest Austin, TX area.  Position requires approximately 25 hours per week in the pay range of $12-$15 per hour. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:-Organize manufacturing production specifications.-Assist Design Director with development of product line.-Organize fabric and product spec sheets.-Participate in evaluation of product line concepts with designer.-Communicate with current vendors and research new sources.-Maintain fabric sample room. Qualifications:-Candidate will be highly organized with attention to detail and good time management skills.  -Ability to work on several projects simultaneously with multiple deadlines.-Knowledge of basic computer systems, word, excel, photo editing programs.-Understanding of sewing techniques, colors, and pattern names a plus, but can train the right candidate.",Designers Assistant Job in Austin,Part Time,"Austin, TX 78759",Clothing and Textile Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Designers-Assistant-Job-Austin-TX-US-165644337.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=18,12.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,,bac700f8552308c6a43afa3e0b369c23
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:16:42:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"LI manufacturer of electronic components seeks an individual to repair and maintain various types of electronic manufacturing equipment. Must have knowledge to read and understand electrical schematics and equipment service/installation manuals.  Must have ability to perform necessary repairs to return equipment to operational state including, but not limited to, installing and exchanging circuit boards, power supplies, cabling, connectors, sub-assemblies and mechanical components.  Need the ability to troubleshoot electrical/electronic problems to board level (ability to troubleshoot to component level desirable.) Knowledge of PLC and ladder logic a plus.  Must have ability to operate and use DMV, power supplies and hand tools such as soldering iron cutting tools, drill (press and hand) saws (band and hand.)  Must be able to lift and carry 50 lbs.  Required skill set to replace as needed electric motors (up to 2hp.) Main purpose of the job is to be out in the factory, maintaining production equipment, trouble shooting when there are problems and repairing machines as needed. Technical courses and/or degree from technical training institute with 2 years experience repairing electronic equipment.  In lieu of formal education, 3 years work related experience with electronic and mechanical operations. Good mechanical skills essential. Excellent communication skills are necessary. Computer skills required are  Basic knowledge of excel, word and email.Benefits include medical/dental/vision/life insurance, 401(k), paid sick/vacation/holiday time.  Please indicate salary requirements when applying.  Only local candidates will be considered and only those candidates whose background and experience most closely match our job requirements will be contacted for an interview.",Senior Equipment Technician Job in Huntington Station,Full Time,"Huntington Station, NY 11746",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Equipment-Technician-Job-Huntington-Station-NY-US-164084537.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=2,22.00 - 24.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),d9e32b76f32064c05cf0e1fecb2a6e5d
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:16:42:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary FIELD SUPERVISOR FULL TIME   If you enjoy field sales, retail merchandising, and leading a dedicated retail team, then our full time Field Supervisor job will be a great fit within a company that is constantly growing. Our retail merchandising team needs an individual with supervisor experience to oversee merchandising and sales activities in high-traffic retail locations. The field supervisor’s duties will include leading a team of retail merchandisers and cultivating relationships with in-store management while delivering company expectations. Here at Advantage Solutions, we provide competitive pay rates and professional growth opportunity in the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.   RESPONSIBILITIES: Train Retail Merchandisers and ensure they are equipped and prepared to perform all assigned job responsibilities. Track and manage performance to ensure associates meet/exceed the merchandizing requirements as established by the client. Partner with client representatives to conduct in-store training and development days for team members. Assign merchandisers to stores and maintain work schedules for direct reports. Complete store audits to ensure merchandisers are properly performing each task. Complete timely and accurate reporting including: recaps, itineraries, timekeeping, expense and other required reports. QUALIFICATIONS: High school diploma or G.E.D., some college courses or equivalent job-related experience. 2 plus years merchandising experience. 1 to 2 years lead or supervisory experience.                                                                      Ability to hire, train, and develop associates to build an effective team. Ability to develop robust peer relationships. Must be able to present information to store management and to participate in meetings with other business partners.   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Field Supervisor Full Time Job in Montpelier,Full Time Employee,"Montpelier, VT",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Supervisor-Full-Time-Job-Montpelier-VT-US-166044841.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=10,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,68d84c1254dc90817276006559331fcd
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:15:44:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Welcome to the Knowledge Universe family of brands: KinderCare®, CCLC® and Champions®.  Together, we’re setting a powerful new standard for early childhood education and giving children the strongest possible start for a lifetime of learning.     Why Choose Knowledge Universe?   You will find that whether you teach in a classroom, prepare the financials, design marketing material, create educational curriculum, or provide support behind the scenes, you will be surrounded by colleagues who are committed to the mission of Early Childhood Education.  This commitment is a foundational building block in the belief system at KU, and it is one of the driving principles for how we work and succeed. You will also find colleagues that care deeply about making a positive difference in the lives of children and families through the power of education, and that’s what we strive for each day.     If you emotionally connect with the mission of Knowledge Universe, we want to talk with you!     Technicians are responsible for the following: ongoing maintenance at assigned centers; reacting to emergency situations as they arise; completing preventive maintenance as directed by immediate supervisor; and ensuring that centers are maintained in a safe, inviting condition. Technicians are also responsible for engaging local vendors for the purpose of completing repairs they cannot do. Technicians may be called upon to assist in inspections of renovations and new construction.  Job Responsibilities   Essential Functions     Initiate and oversee Center maintenance; Physically complete repairs as needed in the centers assigned to them; Operate a laptop computer and smartphone for the purposes of collecting work orders, producing schedules and submitting time records; Comfortable with the Microsoft Office Suite; Operates a company vehicle for the purpose of completing assigned tasks; Other related duties as assigned. Qualifications     High school diploma required Trade/vocational training preferred College degree preferred Strong maintenance experience in a multi-unit environment One year or more of on the job experience in maintenance under the same or similar working conditions Knowledge of child care helpful but not critical Ability to perform under pressure Strong professional communication skills Must be able to bring multiple projects in on time and under budget. Self- motivated and able to work with minimal supervision Qualify to operate a company vehicle based on a motor vehicle record check and company policy             About Us     Knowledge Universe employs nearly 30,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our three respected brands–KinderCare®, CCLC® and Champions®– unlock the potential of over 130,000 children ages 6 weeks through 12 years, each day. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to Nurture Greatness™. Learn more about careers at Knowledge Universe today.     Knowledge Universe is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.            Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 50%",Facilities Maintenance Technician Job in Clark,Full Time Employee,"Clark, NJ 07066",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Clark-NJ-US-165275933.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,53b0f0a133e74736bf412449a76352bb
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:15:43:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leading automotive assembly plant located in Chattanooga, TN is looking for an Industrial Engineer with 5+ years of automotive experience. This is a direct hire position. This is an opportunity to join an established, rapidly growing company. Relocation assistance could be offered to qualified candidates. APPLY NOW!Responsibilities for the Industrial EngineerDevelop, implement and support effective manufacturing/assembly processes and associated systems, controls and procedures. Identify and implement continuous improvement opportunities for product/process quality, cost and safety. Develop work holding fixtures, mistake-proofing devices and material racking/handling systems.Maintain Process Failure Modes and Effects Analyses (PFMEA) and Process Flows in MPACT Requirements for the Industrial Engineer5+ years Industrial Engineering experience in an automotive environment requiredExperience in high volume assembly and sequencing, fixture design, torque monitoring/control, and material handling systems highly preferredMust have experience with product launches.Must be fluent in AutoCADAllen Bradley experience is a plusBenefits for the Industrial EngineerVery affordable medical benefits, 401k match, annual bonus, company paid life insurance and disabilityThis is an exempt positionRelocation assistance for qualified candidates.This Job is located in Chattanooga, TN -> United States",Industrial Engineer - Assembly / Fixture/Automotive/AutoCAD Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN 37401",,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Engineer-Assembly-Fixture-Automotive-AutoCAD-Job-Chattanooga-TN-US-165500462.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=15,"65,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",,9bc1e8527dfcddbdede1fce5d2cd83b9
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:15:40:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"WIde Web Press Operator AssistantSalary: $15.50/HourAs a result of continuing growth, a reputable Schaumburg manufacturing company needs energetic and experienced Wide Web/ Flexographic Print Press Operators for day (6am-6pm) and night (6pm-6am) shift opportunities.Wide Web Press Operator Assistant primary responsibilities:assist with set up and operation of wide web flexographic printing presses, according to customer specifications and quality standardsensure proper tension, weights, roll appearance, colors, ink levels, adhesive levels and repeat lengths are correct and that curl is minimizedassist with changing and installing print cylinders and anilox rolls as well as change deck parts and ink pumpsverify all products meet quality, safety and production standardsmonitor viscosity and enter information into viscosity control logprepare production reports and document shift activitiesset up print cylinders and AVT systemWide Web Press Operator Assistant qualifications:High School Diploma/ GEDminimum 3 years of experience operating wide web/ flexographic print press a mustproficiency working with standard/ metric measuring tapes and quality control toolsgood time management skills; attentive to deadlinesexcellent vision to identify color variancesflexibility to work overtimestrong technical aptitude ability to lift up to 40 lbs.Wide Web Press Operator AssistantEmail carmi@selectadvantage.com your Word formatted resume and daytime phone number for immediate consideration. Your personal information and resume will remain completely confidential.",Wide Web Press Operator Assistant *** $./Hour ***  Hour Day and Night Shifts Job in Schaumburg,Full Time,"Schaumburg, IL 60173",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Wide-Web-Press-Operator-Assistant-15-50-Hour-12-Hour-Day-Night-Shifts-Job-Schaumburg-IL-US-166078243.aspx?mescoid=5100958001001&jobPosition=19,15.50 - 15.50 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),f8f312f787b052e7d53ce3d1b8414785
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:14:32:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Inspect buildings in accordance with state rules and regulations. * Schedule termite re-inspections. * Make termite re-inspections and complete reports. * Complete daily activity reports as required. * Attend technical training seminars to stay abreast of changes. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position you will provide building inspection and state reports as required. Sell, schedule, and follow up on termite control service. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: * High school diploma or general education degree (GED); one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. * Valid driver’s license. At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). We perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Technician / Termite Inspector Job in Mcgehee,"Full Time, Employee","Mcgehee, AR",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-Termite-Inspector-Job-Mcgehee-AR-US-165108048.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=13,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c751ca6f8a208b8d4029f09d097771fd
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:13:55:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Be a part of the world's largest aerospace company and leading manufacturer of commercial jetliners and defense, space and security systems.  If you take pride in your work, want a challenge that inspires your best ideas, and enjoy being part of a winning team, this is the place for you. We are currently searching for the right talent to fill this opportunity: Product Repair/Mod Tech C **Must possess interim Secret Clearance**New Orleans, LA2016-2848 Responsibilities: ·         Performs end-of-runway, postflight, preflight, thru-flight, and phase inspections. ·         Performs integrated combat turns and hot pit refuels. ·         Advises on problems maintaining, servicing, and inspecting aircraft and related aerospace equipment. ·         Uses technical data to diagnose and solve maintenance problems on aircraft systems. ·         Interprets and advises on maintenance procedures and policies to repair aircraft and related equipment.·         Troubleshoots and maintains F-15C aircraft structures, systems, components, and related equipment. ·         Removes and installs aircraft components. Conducts functional tests of repaired components and systems. ·         Adjusts, aligns, and rigs aircraft systems. ·         Supervises and performs aircraft jacking, lifting, and towing operations.Inspects F-15C aircraft structures, systems, components, and related systems. ·         Supervises and performs aircraft and component inspections. ·         Interprets inspection findings and determines adequacy of corrective actions. ·         Inspects and checks components for clearances, tolerances, proper installation, and operation.·         Inspects and operates powered and nonpowered aerospace ground equipment. ·         Inspects and identifies aircraft corrosion for prevention and repair. ·         Reviews maintenance forms, aircraft records, automated maintenance data systems, and historical reports to ensure complete documentation. ·         Inventories and maintains aircraft equipment.·         Performs F-15C flight chief, production superintendent, expediter, crew chief, repair and reclamation, and maintenance support functions. ·         Coordinates maintenance plans and schedules to meet operational commitments. ·         Supervises and assists in launching and recovering aircraft. ·         Reviews maintenance data collection summaries to determine trends and production effectiveness.·         Performs crash recovery duties.·         Additionally, individual must be willing to work nights and overtime as required. Qualification:Because this is a Government Contract, you must be a U.S. Citizen for consideration.Candidate must possess interim Secret Clearance  **Individuals must possess their own personal standard tools and possess personal safety shoes compliant with ANSI standards. ** *U.S. Citizenship is required by law, regulation, executive order, or government contract. Education and Experience:  High school diploma or GED and typically 4 or more years’ related experience or an equivalent combination of education and experience. ·         F-15C experienced preferred; F-15E experience will be considered. ·         Prefer prior engine run experience for 220/229. Conditions of Employment:Applicants selected for employment will be required to pass a pre-employment drug screening and background investigation which may include education, criminal and work history verifications.  About Our Company:Moseley Technical Services, Inc. is dedicated to providing our clients with a high standard of quality products and services. For two decades, our reputation has been built on this dedication and the long-term relationships developed with some of the most prestigious companies in the aerospace and defense industries.  These business relationships give you the opportunity to not only find a job, but to find one you can value and enjoy. We will be dedicated to you and to making your career a success. Accepted applicants will have the opportunity to be eligible for benefits, including medical and supplemental insurance and a 401K. Appreciation and gratitude for employees is a hallmark of organizations with low turnover.  Moseley Technical Services, Inc. is an AA/EEO/Veterans/Disabled Employer. Join a team that values your experience! ",Aircraft Technician - Product Repair/Mod Tech C Job in New Orleans,"Full Time, Employee","New Orleans, LA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Aircraft-Technician-Product-Repair-Mod-Tech-C-Job-New-Orleans-LA-US-165696511.aspx?mescoid=4900865001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,e79c0a01ddf3ae571af449ffde0c5014
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:13:43:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:We are currently looking for a Diesel Engine Specialist for a busy heavy diesel repair facility in San Jose, CA. Primary duties will be to diagnose and repair diesel engines, failure analysis, determine best course of action on repair, and regular schedule maintenance. Other responsibilities will be to complete any additional repairs required such as brakes, wheel seals, air systems, driveline repairs, etc. Experience and training on CAT, Cummins and/or Detroit Diesel engines will be given preference for this role. This is a great opportunity to work with an established company in the area and encourage all who are interested and qualified to apply. Only those being considered will be contacted.Compensation:$28.00 - $34.00/hour. Wage offered will depend on previous experience. Full benefits and a matching 401K are all offered.Shifts:2 shifts available. Days, 5:00am to 1:30pm, Monday to Friday and Afternoons, 12:00pm - 8:30pm, Monday to Friday.We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Diesel Engine Technician Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Engine-Technician-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-164497191.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=7,,,b88a33db2f244c9ff00847853812d091
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:13:43:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"PLUMBERS AND HVAC MECHANICS AND HELPERS NEEDED FOR BUSY NEW WORK PLUMBING AND HEATING COMPANY . MUST HAVE A VALID DRIVING LICENSE . HEALTH INSURANCE, PAID HOLIDAYS, 401K, PAID VACATION AND COMPANY VEHICLE . 610-935-2285",Plumber,Full Time,"Phoenixville, PA 19460",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Plumber-HVAC-Job-Phoenixville-PA-US-165216393.aspx?mescoid=4700814001001&jobPosition=6,"32,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",,64bff83ff139d9439de53e366eadbe4d
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:12:52:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Diesel Truck Mechanics have opportunities in Fairless PA! We are searching out diagnostic mechanics, with a history of safe work practices to perform repairs to all systems. The ideal candidate can repair and rebuild assemblies, components as well as diagnose electrical and mechanical systems. This is primarily a shop role but will include some field work from time to time from during the shift. ""A"" level mechanics will perform complex repairs on the shop floor as well as lead entry level techs to help to bring everyone together in a positive work environment. ""B"" level mechanics are also required to perform external engine component and mechanical repairs. On going training, and certifications opportunities will be provided to all. Anyone with a valid CDL A, AC certification, and PA Inspections License will be given preference. Successful candidates will submit to a background check, MVR, drug screen and physical.Compensation:$24.00 - $29.00/hour. Benefits include health, vision, dental and more plus a matching 401K and matching company pension. Paid holidays and personal days!Shifts:Days, 5:00am-2:00pm OR Afternoons, 4:00pm-12pmWe encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Diesel Truck Mechanic - $ Signing Bonus Job in Fairless Hills,Full Time Employee,"Fairless Hills, PA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Truck-Mechanic-2000-Signing-Bonus-Job-Fairless-Hills-PA-US-165553896.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=15,,,3573f087e315ad75f3b552f0849af273
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:12:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Now Hiring Industrial Mechanic 1st shift and 2nd shift available. Related Experience is required. Pay based on experience. Apply in person Monday - Friday, 8 to 5 24461 County Hwy 10 McKenzie, ND 58572 Or contact: Jessica A. (701) 673-2708 or online at: www.menards com/dccareers",Industrial Mechanic Job in Mckenzie,Full Time,"Mckenzie, ND 58572",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Industrial-Mechanic-Job-McKenzie-ND-US-165885833.aspx?ch=bismarck&mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),84e31f26e0c434778f62220b49e75da4
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:12:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sears Home Improvement Products and Services, a member of the Sears Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ: SHLD) family of companies, is one of America's largest home improvement companies for siding and windows installation with operations in 45 states. Our products include siding, custom manufactured and installed windows, custom home entry doors, kitchen remodeling, custom cabinet refacing and Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC).Join the Sears Home Services team as an HVAC Service Technician!This position has a Sign on Bonus$3000 for HVAC Master License$2000 for HVAC Journeyman LicenseReceive half within 1st 30 days of employment and the other half after 6 months.**MD Journeyman/ MD Master license required**No On Call Work! No Sundays! Join Us Today!  Are you looking for a role that offers you an opportunity to be a part of a dynamic, innovative organization? Then, we have the opportunity for you at Sears. The brand your family has trusted for over 150 years! New culture, New branding, New YOU!  We are seeking an experienced HVAC Service Technician with a great attitude and the ability to help customers with their in-home repairs. This is an exciting opportunity to join the Sears family! Apply today!HVAC Service Technician – Repair Technician – Appliance MaintenanceBenefitsAt Sears, we provide competitive pay and ongoing training in a collaborative, supportive, and team-oriented setting. In the repair technician role, you will enjoy working independently as a representative of a leading retailer and in-home service provider.For the In-Home Service Technician, we provide the following:• Service van• Specialized tools• Uniforms• Laptop computer• Smartphone• Home dispatched (most locations)• Industry training• Various incentive plans• Career opportunitiesPlease take a moment and view our “day in a life of a repair technician video” at this link: Click here to See yourself at sears (Appliance Tech video)  QualificationsJob ResponsibilitiesAs an HVAC Service & Repair Technician, you will have the opportunity to repair ofcustomers' products (Heat Pumps, Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning, Gasand Oil Furnaces & Boilers) while maintaining the highest level of customerservice. HVAC Service Tech responsibilities include:• Providing timely and quality repairs of customers’ products• Maintaining high-quality customer service and care• Promoting and selling additional products and services• Meeting key performance metrics and/or productivity goals• Providing knowledgeable and courteous repair service• Looking for ways to improve business performance and enhance the customer experience• Communicating benefits of the Value Added Services Process to the customer• Maintaining truck stock inventory within the prescribed company guidelines and standards• Following the truck maintenance schedule and keeping a clean, organized truckHVAC Service Technician – Repair Technician – Appliance MaintenanceJob RequirementsAs an HVAC Service Technician, you must be highly organized and possess excellent communication skills. We are seeking a dedicated team player who is able to ensure fast, flexible, and expert service to every customer via excellent time management skills.Requirements of the Service Technician role include:Ideal candidates will have 2+ years' experience in HVAC service and repair. Strongtroubleshooting and problem solving skills required. • CFC Certification & MD Journeyman License is required (applicants holding a master-level trade/occupational license(s), ie HVAC/Mechanical, Electrical, General Contractor, Plumbing may be used to qualify or given hiring preference and additional compensation based on business needs)• High school diploma or general education degree (GED)• Working mechanical knowledge, including the use of tools and test equipment• Ability to perform accurate repair of customer product• Must complete all technician training elements within required timeframes• Ability to follow directions and specific process steps to ensure quality workmanship• Flexibility to work variable and flexible hours, including overtime• Ability to use a computer for parts inquiries and ordering• Must possess and maintain a valid state driver’s license• Must pass pre-employment drug screen and criminal background checkJoin the Sears Home Service family!Apply today! EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",HVAC Journeyman / Master Service tech (Gaithersburg,Full Time,"Gaithersburg, MD 20877",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Journeyman-Master-Service-tech-Gaithersburg-MD-Job-GAITHERSBURG-MD-US-164869401.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,Commensurate with Experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),796ff8409005a4057c013b7942ad3eab
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:12:10:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Diesel Truck Mechanics have opportunities in Swedesboro NJ! We are searching out diagnostic mechanics, with a history of safe work practices to perform repairs to all systems. The ideal candidate can repair and diagnose electrical and mechanical systems. This is primarily a shop role but will include some field work from time to time from during the shift. Mechanics are also required to perform external engine component and mechanical repairs. On going training, and certifications opportunities will be provided to all. Anyone with a valid CDL A, AC certification, and PA Inspections License will be given preference. Successful candidates will submit to a background check, MVR, drug screen and physical.Compensation:$24.00 - $27.00/hour. Benefits include health, vision, dental and more plus a matching 401K and matching company pension. Paid holidays and personal days!Shifts:Afternoons, 4:00pm-12:00am, Monday to FridayWe encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Diesel Truck Mechanic - Signing Bonus Job in Swedesboro,Full Time Employee,"Swedesboro, NJ",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Truck-Mechanic-Signing-Bonus-Job-Swedesboro-NJ-US-165553898.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=14,,,ca806069ced98be9d371187cae17a8d1
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:11:45:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Large food manufacturing company is seeking a Human Resources Director for their corporate office.Minimum BA/BS in business, human resources, or comparable, MA or MBA preferred10+ years progressive multisite HR management experienceExperience in the manufacturing industryFood manufacturing experience a plusCompany will assist with relo expenses.",Director of Human resources Job in Greeley,"Full Time, Employee","Greeley, CO",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Human-resources-Job-Greeley-CO-US-165981678.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=7,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,22eeb09e421e9dc18d34dba42366c27b
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:11:44:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Service TechnicianCompany: ChillTech Inc.Location: Houston, TX 77040Positions: Technician (Chillers); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial-------------------Experienced technician willing to learn and grow with a small commercial service company in Houston, Texas. Business is owned and operated by experienced technicians from the commercial/industrial HVAC field. Company size is small, but the benefits are equal to much larger companies in this industry. Work is in low rise to high rise buildings located primarily in Houston city limits. Some work would be out of the city limits, but close to Houston. This is a great opportunity for the right candidate!",Service Technician Job in Houston  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Houston 77040,All,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-Job-Houston-165387708.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8c93004d080e305d589a45fa25fffad7
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:11:00:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR Hills Properties is seeking a full-time Maintenance Supervisor for our upscale apartment community, Reserve by the Lake, located in Houston, Texas.  Candidates must be HVAC certified and have residential property management maintenance experience. First- hand knowledge of plumbing, electrical, HVAC and small appliance repair required.   Duties include the supervision of the maintenance team along with completing maintenance needs in accordance with company standards. Must have superior communication & customer service skills.  On call hours required. Competitive pay structure& excellent benefits. Apply today!Reserve by the Lake Apartments18600 South Park ViewHouston, TX  77084(281) 398-6633rbl_manager@hillsinc.comEOE/DFWTo see what an exceptional living experience Hills provides, feel free to visit our website at www.hillsproperties.com    ",Maintenance Supervisor Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77084",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Houston-TX-US-161135737.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),62900d1a50aabcc0e5af6bfe15b2964e
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:11:00:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: ConfidentialLocation: Brea, CA 92821Positions: Pipefitter; Technician (Boilers); Technician (Chillers); Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (DDC); Technician (Geothermal); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial-------------------Full time position open for a journeyman level HVACR technician. Company is a dynamic growing service and installation contractor. Best candidate has excellent diagnostic skills in troubleshooting HVACR systems. Can implement repairs/project improvements with good communication skills. Must be able to work with others and able to direct colleagues in task assignment to complete projects etc.Have excellent paperwork skills, clean driving record. Pass physical and drug testing.",HVAC Service Technician Job in Brea  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Brea 92821,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Brea-165037675.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),220d1c6543ba54c5f9cdc3b2147fa2eb
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:11:00:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Purchasing AssistantAssistant to the company purchasing / materials manager for the material supply, inventory control and component staging prior to manufacture for the manufacture of sheet metal electrical enclosures, dry type transformers and power electrical systems in a flexible manufacture business model to customer and industry specifications.Duties IncludeSourcing researching vendorsRequesting bids from vendors and performing bid evaluationsComputer processing of material flows in / out of inventoryWork with project managers for material work schedulingInspecting received materials for compliance to orders and accounting accuracyLight shipping and express shipping logistics domestic and internationalPulling materials from stock room inventory and staging job baskets for unit manufactureWorking with department managers to address quality control issues with vendor partsPrepare spare parts shipments to customers following customer logistic instructions.Work with staff to maintain min / max inventory stock levels of critical materialsCritical SkillAttention to detail & accuracy and well organizedBusiness communication skill both verbally and writtenMust be able to work well with others in a team environment to problem solveMust have a customer satisfaction oriented work ethicHour of work: Monday through Friday 7:30 AM to 4:00 Education: Bachelors in business or organizational logistics & 2 years employment in an electrical or electronic oriented business or military service in supply logistics. Salary based on skills and experience.",Purchasing Assistant Job in Trenton,Full Time Employee,TrentonNJ,Energy and Utilities Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Purchasing-Assistant-Job-Trenton-NJ-US-166073298.aspx?mescoid=4300703001001&jobPosition=7,"45,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Manufacturing/Production/Operations,fea0720a5c3f760acc739fea2bf6087e
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:10:39:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Oversee maintenance and facilities management of two historic, landmarked churches in lower Manhattan, a chapel on Governor’s island in New York Harbor, the future corporate site on Trinity Place, Neale House, the Trinity cemeteries at Trinity Church, St. Paul’s Chapel and at 153rd and Broadway and The Trinity Retreat Center in West Cornwall Connecticut. DESCRIPTION:Oversees the maintenance and inspects church property facilities for safety, cleanliness and repairs.Manages the department’s repair and capital improvement budgets; ensures compliance with budgetary constraints; and forecasts and plans facility improvements. Responsible for weekly and long-term projects: including project design and planning, assuring needed materials are ordered, and project funds are available. Manages ongoing projects, monitor project progress, costs and staffing. Coordinates and monitors status of work orders; estimates, requests, materials, equipment, and estimates labor costs. Directs and oversees the contractor to insure that all properties are properly maintained according to contract specifications, including all custodial tasks, engineering and mechanical systems, fire and life safety systems, emergency procedures, and record keeping.Oversees and assigns work to Cemetery mgmt., Facilities mgmt., third party contractor mgmt., consultants, etc.Maintains current knowledge in the field of facilities management/maintenance/security; establishes, implements and updates facility/security related policies and procedures; complies with federal, state and local laws and regulations; follows all safety precautions.Ensures compliance with applicable building and safety codes, OSHA requirements, etc.Maintains and updates an emergency evacuation plan for all church properties.Other duties as assignedREQUIREMENTS:Knowledge and Skills:Knowledge of budgeting, finance, accounts payable/receivableAdvanced knowledge of building systems (HVAC, Electric, Fire & Life Safety)Advanced knowledge of code complianceFire Safety Director CertificationProven Management skills Excellent computer skills, proficient in Microsoft Office SuitePreferred Education, Experience:BS Engineering or Facilities Management degree or equivalentExperience with historical and landmarked properties5+ years’ experience in building/property managementProfessional certification, affiliation, and membership(s) in the field of facilities management, Building Owners and Managers Association (BOMA), International Facilities Management Association (IFMA), or other applicable certification.",Director of Facilities and Property Management Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10271",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Facilities-Property-Management-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165172289.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=20,competitive salary along with a comprehensive benefits package,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),55c02fc194ccb4045536bd5f5d6ce370
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:10:39:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:   Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner.. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash  Thoroughly mops floors in accordance with established guidelines. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Performs all other related duties. Wash and sanitize all dishes and smallwares Receive all orders, rotate and put away in proper areas Follow weekly cleaning schedule   Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands. Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-03-28",Custodian Service Worker - PCI Job in Philadelphia,"Part Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19114",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodian-Service-Worker-PCI-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165252667.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c4562e888589b0b21455095c74fee35f
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:09:49:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"TelForce Group is looking for a Bosch Certified Technician in the Denver, CO area.Source of Security is seeking a motivated individual to join our growing team as an electronic security technician. The level three electronic security technician will be responsible for the installation and service of electronic security systems on customer sites. Bosch Certified Technician Required Training & Experience:- Bosch Camera Training and Certifications- Axis Camera Experience- Programming of Alarms, Card Access Systems and CCTV Systems- Worked as the lead technician installing new systems and troubleshooting and repairing existing systems.   Bosch Certified Technician Duties & Tasks:- Follow written plans, scopes of work and blueprints to install complex intrusion detection, CCTV and card access systems- Respond to service requests; assess the customer's requirements, determine source of troubles and interact with our customers to clearly advise recommended options- Program & test electronic security systems to the highest level of specification- Work alone or in a pair, supervise other technicians on site in the performance of their duties- Advise and train lower level technicians, as needed- Act as the point of contact for all assigned projects - Track customer changes and submit change order documents to project manager Bosch Certified Technician Other Necessary Qualifications:- Must have a valid driver's license and clean driving record without a DUI in the last five years- Clean criminal background check- Work day and overnight shifts, and travel out of town as necessary.  Bosch Certified Technician Preferred Qualifications:- City of Denver Access Control License- Wyoming Low Voltage License  Candidates mustbe at least 18 years old and be able to pass a Background, Drug and DMV screening to be considered for all job openings. Candidates must have a valid driver’s licenses and be insured and the ability to travel up to multiple weeks at a time. Please send all resumes with certifications and driver licenses to austin@telforcegroup.com. In subject line, please note the position you are applying for, a current resume in Word format is required to be considered with 2 references name, telephone and email. All candidates will receive a call back based on your skills set that matches the job opening. We reserve the right at all times to disclose any information as we deem necessary to satisfy any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request, or to edit, refuse to post or to remove any information or materials, in whole or in part, in our sole discretion. All resumes submitted to TelForce will become the property of TelForce and shall have the right to display to a third party or in our data base for consumption. Call Austin at 615.915.3119 x106.",Bosch Certified Technician Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/Bosch-Certified-Technician-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-165645930.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=8,,,60378d7831a93641ee475e238eba65c8
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:09:42:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Growth. Opportunities. Possibilities.Menasha Corporation is all about possibilities. Our two businesses, Menasha Packaging and ORBIS Corporation, are leaders in their industries, providing corrugated and plastic packaging products and related services to major global companies.Our employees make the difference, proving that great ideas, collaboration and quality turn possibilities into success. Working at Menasha Corporation means that your insights provide cutting-edge solutions for our customers. If you like to make things happen and are passionate about what you do, you’re going to want to be here.Join us and become part of the power behind possible.Position SummaryGrinder Operators are responsible for grinder/aspirator operation and buy back planning, inventory, and storage. Key Duties And ResponsibilitiesOperate grinder and aspirator Record throughput during shift, both on paper and in MES if applicable Disassemble buy back products, identify and remove contaminants (metal, fiberglass, etc.) from all products that will be ground General housekeeping in the regrind area and grinder area Work in a safe and efficient manner using all personal protective and safety equipment and devices that are required, in accordance with all STW documentation (if STW is not developed for any process within this job, proper training techniques must be followed) Be actively involved in Continuous Improvement; is expected to promote and sustain any and all CI, 5S and STW activitiesEducation RequiredHigh School Diploma or Equivalent Education DesiredHigh School Diploma or Equivalent Work Experience Required2 years experience in industry field or related industry Knowledge, Skills, Or Abilities DesiredOperate fork lift in accordance with company safety policies Ability to operate hand tools (hammer, chisel, scraper, bottle opener, drill, etc.) Must be able to read, write, speak and understand English Basic computer skillsPhysical RequirementsMust be able to lift up to 50 lbs. repetitiously Push/Pull up to 200 lbs as needed",Grinder Operator Job in Osage City,"Full Time, Employee","Osage City, KS 66523",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Grinder-Operator-Job-Osage-City-KS-US-165459696.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,0a7651f690d6e0e1906df2c52cb63531
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:09:42:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our company is looking for a part time or full time field technician. Our company is a 35+ year old company we specialize in Burglar Alarms, Fire Alarms, CCTV, Networking, Intercom, and Access Control. We are looking for someone with basic knowledge of computers/ low voltage. Would like someone with experience. Fire license is a plus. We are looking for someone who is able to service or install our systems, and/or someone who can route cables and/or eager to learn.Must haves:reliableclean-cutown transportationable to pass a background and a drug testvalid drivers licenseprovide good customer service skillswork as a team playerBenefits offered.Please send resume Serious inquiries only",BURGLAR AND FIRE ALARM TECHNICIAN Job in Euclid,Full Time,"Euclid, OH 44132",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/BURGLAR-FIRE-ALARM-TECHNICIAN-Job-EUCLID-OH-US-165725007.aspx?mescoid=4900864001001&jobPosition=18,TBD BASED ON EXPERIENCE,,029f2248180c75876dafc0b2092c1500
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:08:46:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sears, Roebuck and Co., a member of the Sears Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ: SHLD) family of companies, is a leading broadline retailer providing merchandise and related services. Sears, Roebuck offers its wide range of home merchandise, apparel and automotive products and services through more than 2,700 Sears-branded and affiliated stores in the United States and Canada, which includes over 890 full-line and more than 1,350 specialty stores in the U.S. Sears, Roebuck also offers a variety of merchandise and services through sears.com, landsend.com, and specialty catalogs. Sears, Roebuck offers consumers leading proprietary brands including Kenmore, Craftsman, DieHard and Lands' End -- among the most trusted and preferred brands in the U.S. Sears, Roebuck is the 2011 ENERGY STAR® Retail Partner of the Year. The company is the nation's largest provider of home services, with more than 11 million service calls made annually.Job Summary:The Quality Maintenance Technician II (QMTII) will provide unit level support for maintenance and safety standards, to include the performance of Preventative Maintenance Checks (PMs), and review of in-store maintenance procedures as assigned, in Full Line Stores (FLS), KMart and off-mall stores. The QMTII assists their store in maintaining the standards and disciplines needed to provide a high level of customer satisfaction and impact energy usage. The candidate for this position will also provide training to support the activities of the Quality Maintenance Technician Level I (QMTI). The person seeking this position should be a self-starter, be proficient in completing tasks in the required time frame and have a strong mechanical aptitude. Daily travel is required. Occasional overnight stays are required in remote areas of the country and as emergency situations require. This position reports to the District Facilities Manager (DFM).Responsibilities:•Maintains HVAC and plumbing needs – roof top units (RTU s), chillers, restroom•Maintains electrical and Communication systems- ballasts, Ethernet•Maintains material handling equipment - Baler, compactors etc.•Maintains interior and exterior of the building•Performs Preventative Maintenance checks requiring technical knowledge•Provide training to support the activities of the QMT1•Perform administrative duties utilizing the Sears Maintenance and Repair Ticket (SMART) system •Perform miscellaneous duties as assigned by the District Facilities Manager (DFM) QualificationsSkill/Experience Requirements:Candidate must be proficient in 4 or more areas of the following:•Knowledge of HVAC and plumbing•Knowledge of Energy Mgt. Systems ( EMS)•Knowledge of Lighting, Power systems and Energy consumption•Knowledge of Communication systems•Knowledge of Alarm systems•Knowledge of basic Interior and Exterior building maintenance•Basic computer and communication skills required•Ability to analyze problems and develop solutions•Valid Drivers License EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Building Maintenance Technician- Buffalo,Full Time,"Buffalo, NY 14226",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Maintenance-Technician-Buffalo-NY-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-165015653.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,Commensurate with Experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),adbfa89c791bed53f58b8f8ccf5b7a9a
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:08:45:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"The role of MRE/PLA encompasses a two-fold role. First, is to receive field survey data and to perform MRE and PLA calculations; Second, is to perform quality control review of the PLA work performed by our off-shore teams and then create the needed make ready applicationsand engineering to allow the OSP Engineers to determine usability of a pole line within theOSP design.The Make-Ready Engineer will perform work associated with make ready engineering insupport of fiber to the home (FTTH) projects. Work will utilize programs, procedures and workprocesses developed and provided by the project along with standard engineering work planning, scheduling and cost estimating to complete project deliverables. The Make-Ready Engineer will drive for quality of deliverables and minimize rework through the application of quality absolutes while working independently and as part of a team.Proven experience and knowledge of make ready engineering processes and proceduresKnowledge of make ready construction practices, and the economics and schedule impacts involved and current and new methods of design and constructionStrong analytical and problem solving skillsExcellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skillsWillingness to accept project assignment in North America to support FTTH projects the right to work and remain in the US without visa sponsorshipDemonstrated outside plant engineering and construction experience with a major telecommunications provider is a plusProficient in Pole Loading Analysis (PLA) and Force Diagrams, specifically Osmose OCalc and Spida SpidaCalc Extensive knowledge of GO95 and NESC",Make Ready Engineer Job in Santa Clara,Full Time,Location:,Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Make-Ready-Engineer-Job-Santa-Clara-CA-US-165671889.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=11,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,cc332894b84832178f03baf8534d6f92
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:08:41:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"   Train and supervise daily activities of package handlers and clerks to ensure that all assigned duties are accomplished safely and timely.  Supervisors typically work Monday through Friday: however, weekend work may be required based upon location and business needs.  Part-time management employees are generally expected to work 5 1/2 hours per day and are paid semi-monthly.  Medical, dental, and vision benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents.  Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock, and paid vacations/holidays.   Job Requirements:   Customer service skills (internal/external) Phone etiquette Abillity to work varying shifts, additional hours and/or overtime depending on service needs Multi-tasking skills Perform general office tasks such as paperwork, typing, and/or use of a computer, filing, calculating and the use of telephone Good cognitive reasoning skills Self motivation Microsoft Office knowledge (ie. excel, word, wordperfect) Work cooperatively in a diverse work environment The ability to work in adverse weather conditions Ability to direct the work of the other employees effectively Verification and submittal of timecards Perform other functions that may be assigned ",UPS Redmond Part Time Preload Supervisor Job in Redmond,,"Redmond, WA 98052",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Redmond-Part-Time-Preload-Supervisor-Job-REDMOND-WA-US-166083194.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,6bcc1b566e6e919b12a9c04869bb3442
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:08:33:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a new and exciting opportunity to use your skills in a successful and growing company? Do you desire a fast-paced, casual work environment that is driven by employees who thrive on innovative thinking? If you have a desire to work in an energetic, collaborative environment, then check out this opportunity at Proto Labs! About Proto Labs: Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Proto Labs Is: #4 on Forbes list of Best Small Public Companies in the United States 2nd fastest growing public company in Minnesota by the Twin Cities Business Journal Top 100 Best Places to Work in the Twin Cities by Star Tribune – 4 times!   Position Overview: Utilizes expert knowledge to set-up, and operate a variety of CNC Lathes to timely and efficiently produce complex prototype and production parts to required specifications.   *We have shifts available on the Weekday Days, Weekday Nights, Weekend Days and Weekend Nights. Specific duties include: Set-up, and operate CNC lathe machines in a safe and efficient manner to produce prototype and production parts to specifications, including complex or difficult part. Set up and operate numerical control (CNC) lathe machines that hold to the high quality machine standards required within the organization. Set up fixtures and tooling to run CNC lathe production processes Starts and observes machine operation to detect malfunctions or out-of-tolerance machining, and adjusts machine controls as required. Ensures operation of equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements; following manufacturer's instructions; troubleshooting malfunctions; calling for repairs. Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed. Select, align, secure holding fixtures, and set offsets for, cutting tools, attachments, accessories, and materials on lathes with minimal assistance. Select tooling, set up machines, and operate CNC lathes, to produce quality parts. Understand the concept of tool wear and cutter compensation. Recalibrate Lathe mills after maintenance was completed. Works with a wide variety of materials, tooling, and machine operations Inspects precision parts and makes necessary adjustments to maintain accuracy Install, adjust and maintain fixtures. Assist in new Lathe set up and changes. Adhere to all quality and safety standards within the department. Maintain clean and organized work area with emphasis on safety, quality, efficiency, and utilization. Continually seek to improve work processes and individual performance. Adhere to all company policies and operational procedures. Perform additional tasks as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Must have four years’ experience either in a production or job shop environment, setting up CNC equipment (lathe-machining) doing comparable work. Knowledge of CNC Lathe setup and operation is required Skilled in the use of measuring instruments such as indicators, gage, dial bores, and plate inspection methods, and in-process inspection of precision machined parts. Ability to maintain close tolerances (within .001”) of all processes required. Knowledge of cutting feeds, speeds, and tool life. Basic working knowledge of geometric dimensioning and tolerances (GD&T) preferred. 3 and 4 axis lathe setup and operation, and basic understanding of G & M code. Able to safely operate hand held and stationary power tools. Able to use a computer and calculator. Ability to comprehend and follow printed and computer-screen instructions, and direction from supervisors or technical leads. Able to read and write in English, and do basic arithmetic. Must have good Shop Math skills. Able to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment. Must be punctual and have good attendance. Strong attention to detail is required. Good written and oral communication skills",CNC Lathe Specialist - Weekday Day Shift Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Lathe-Specialist-Weekday-Day-Shift-Job-Plymouth-MN-US-165979007.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,96c37a98bba39317e37c28a1007995b9
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:07:46:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:STS AeroStaff Services is seeking A&P Mechanics for positions in Marana, Arizona. Applicants should have at least three (3) years of heavy maintenance experience to be considered. We offer our staffing services to you at no cost!Essential Job Functions: Researches technical data and performs disassembly, repair, cleaning, adjustment, assembly, testing and calibration of aircraft components and company special tools and ground equipmentRepairs, replaces and rebuilds aircraft structures such as wings and fuselage, and functional components including rigging, surface controls, plumbing and hydraulic unitsReads and interprets manufacturers and airlines maintenance manuals, service bulletins, and other specifications to determine feasibility and method of repairing or replacing malfunctioning or damaged componentsCompletes appropriate identification, routing tags and forms and makes appropriate entries into the Component Removal LogInspects turbine blades to detect cracks or breaksDisassembles and inspects parts for wear, or other defectsRepairs or replaces defective engine parts and reassembles and installs engine in aircraftAdjusts, repairs, or replaces electrical wiring system and aircraft accessoriesPerforms miscellaneous duties to service aircraft including flushing crankcase, cleaning screens, greasing moving parts, and checking brakesOther duties assigned as neededRequirements: High School diploma or equivalent requiredPost-secondary education or training in aircraft maintenance or equivalent combination of education, training or experience requiredThree-to-five years’ experience performing heavy C and D checksMust have maintenance experience on Boeing 757, 767, 747 and 777A&P License and valid driver’s license requiredMust be able to operate aircraft ground servicing equipment, including tugs, tractors, hi-lifts, trucks, servicing carts and test equipment, hand tools, rivet guns and drillsBenefits:STS AeroStaff Services offers direct deposits / electric payroll, an awesome medical insurance program, cash advances and the opportunity to refer a friend for compensation.We know it takes great people to do great work, and if you’re interested in joining the STS Aviation Group family, we encourage you to apply on this page or to give us a call at 1-800-359-4787.Thanks for taking the time, and we look forward to hearing from you soon. ",A&P Mechanic - Marana,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Marana, AZ 85653",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/A-P-Mechanic-Marana-AZ-Job-Marana-AZ-US-165182579.aspx?mescoid=4900865001001&jobPosition=3,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,6d022557de8dbbbbe9fcaba22923f4a5
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:07:45:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse LaborerImmediate Opening!  Temporary to PermanentAlachua, FLSchedule: Full Time, M-F, 6 PM – 3AM, 40+ Hours (Mandatory Overtime) Start date: ASAPPlease email resumes to Rose Crane – rcrane@tempforce.net JOB DESCRIPTION:The associate is responsible for handling merchandise within and outside of the warehouse and supports all parts of the warehouse, as needed.RESPONSIBILITIES: Moves merchandise throughout warehouse by hand, truck, or forklift.Audits merchandiseMeets safety standardsFills ordersReports damages and discrepanciesPerforms other duties, as assignedQUALIFICATIONS: Good communication skillsAble to understand written and verbal instructionsBasic math and computer skillsReliable transportationAble to work Full Time and Over Time hoursAble to work in a warehouse facilityAble to lift up to 65 lbs.Able to use Radio Frequency Unit (preferred)   ",Warehouse Laborer Job in Alachua,Full Time,"Alachua, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Laborer-Job-Alachua-FL-US-159535023.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=19,0.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,,09894892104955fe18a4bacb3d1ec0fe
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:06:41:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance Technician Overview:Looking for a Maintenance Technician to maintain all machinery and power units on site for a plant with up to 100 team members.This positions shift asignment is to be decided based on selected candidates skill package. Maintenance Technician Responsibilities:Maintain and repair all machinery and power units on site, Maintain and repair electrical panels, Maintain and repair fixtures Maintain and repair pneumatic and hydraulic components of machines, Maintain and repair forklifts Upkeep of building inside and outside including but not limited to plumbing, carpentry, painting and light (limited) snow removal Welding and the use of cutting torches Keep accurate log record and order parts as necessary Support and communicate company core values Benefits:Performance bonus, 401(k) Retirement Plans, Group Health and Life available. Starting hourly rate will commensurate with experience and knowledge We are looking for maintenance technicians with the following experience/skills:Ability to work safely with 480V and lower electrical equipment Experience with arc and torch welding Experience with pneumatic and hydraulic repair Ability to work with VSD's Working knowledge of PLC troubleshooting Additional Requirements: Must be organized, a self starter with excellent problem solving skills and able to work in a fast paced environment. Must work well with others, and must be self disciplined. Must be precise and pay attention to details. Must communicate effectively both verbally and in writing. Must be willing to work overtime, on call, must be flexible. Must be able to keep a clean and orderly work area. Most tools provided; must have own tool box and “specialty tools"" Various Shifts Available Travel for training may be required Overtime may be necessary LOCAL CANDIDATES only – RELOCATION is not available.",regional maintenance (midwest) Job in Melrose Park,Full Time,"Melrose Park, IL 60163",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-maintenance-midwest-Job-Melrose-Park-IL-US-165859040.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5ccb70f6712c8fbdf44f2a5698155ca9
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:06:40:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Meet DOT requirements and / or CDL qualified as required by job assignment.Bend, stoop, crouch, squat, crawl, climb, stand, sit and turn / pivot.Part-time: Up to 5 1/2 hours per day, 5 days a week.Extended hours may be required as necessary.Report to work on a regular and timely basis.Ability to work varying shifts and extended hours as business needs require.Must be able to travel by car and plane to attend meetings at other locations and call on non-UPS locations and customers.Must be able to supervise and train employees effectively.Perform office tasks using simple hand grasping, fine hand manipulation associated with assigned task such as paperwork, use of computer, filing, calculating and use of telephone.Have a sufficient ability to communicate, through sight and hearing, to perform assigned tasks and maintain proper job safety.Work in an environment with variable temperatures and humidity. Exposure to dust, dirt and noise. Enclosed work areas. Outside inclement weather. Elevated heights and uneven surfaces.Work cooperatively in a diverse work environment.Demonstrate cognitive ability to follow directions and routines. Work independently with appropriate judgment. Exhibit spatial awareness. Read words and numbers. Concentrate, memorize and recall. Identify logical connections and process up to 2-3 steps ahead.Other job functions that may be assigned. ",UPS PT Offshift Preload Supervisor Job in West Sacramento,,"West Sacramento, CA 95691",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-PT-Offshift-Preload-Supervisor-Job-WEST-SACRAMENTO-CA-US-164912614.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,89e369f9584eca206004664861c571b4
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:05:45:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:                  To support QCT US solution center initiative. The Solution Center Microsoft specialist must fully understand QCT cloud solution and products, and works closely with the sales team to win and support partners and customers.                                                                                                                                                                                                                        Experience Required:Minimum 5 years IT Industry  experience requiredKnowledge/Skills Required:Strong know-how and experience with virtualization technologies and data center technologyFamiliar with Microsoft virtualization products portfolioMultiple platform experience with Linux and WindowsExperience with storage, networking and systems managementUnderstand all aspects of virtualized cloud computing solutions (with focus on Microsoft virtualization technology) including software defined storage and software defined network.Strong communications and negotiation skills to find creative and effective solutions from QCT and partners.Understand industry trends in cloud computing, IOT, Big Data and challenges of large-scale systems.Hands on experience with virtualization software installation and configuration.Need to be familiar with cloud computing hardware platforms.Certification in OS (Linux, Windows), Microsoft/VMware certified professional is a plus Essential Functions: Support industry leading hybrid and private cloud solutions by integrating with well-known virtualization technologies Microsoft, based on QCT’s data center virtualization offerings.Work with QCT HQ Solution Center team to deploy, update and install new solutions at QCT US solution centerPresent QCT cloud solution to customers and partnersSupport QCT sales team and work with Customers and Partners to use the solution centerPerform performance benchmark testing and proof of concepts (POCs) and create solution white paperOther duties as assigned Special Physical Requirements:         The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to stand; walk; sit and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception.",US Solutions Center Microsoft Specialist Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95131",,http://jobview.monster.com/US-Solutions-Center-Microsoft-Specialist-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-164945326.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),40b84ead746b5f5fc846d448ef63486b
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:05:44:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Newport Corporation: Is a globally recognized leader in advanced technology products and solutions for fields such as Research, Life & Health Science, Aerospace & Defense, Industrial Manufacturing, Semiconductors, and Microelectronics. Our nearly 45 years of industry knowledge and expertise crosses a broad range of technologies, allowing us to continually deliver innovative products and solutions in a myriad of areas such as: Lasers and Light Sources, Opto-mechanical Components and Mounts, Optical Filters and Gratings, Spectroscopic and Photonic Instruments, Vibration Control, Motion Systems, Robotics and Automation, Advanced Packaging and Customized Systems. Job Description: Machine Components with high degree of accuracy with uniform finish & cosmetics. Work on assignments requiring independent action & a high degree of inititive to resolve issues.                          In depth knowledge of both general & specialized job functions. Setup & Inspect / maintain high degree of accuracy / work independently with minimal supervision. Duties & Responsibilities:   8 Years Minimum of related experience Abilitiy to read and interpet blueprints  Proficient with Solidworks & Mastercam Extensive knowledge of CNC Verticle machining Centers: Haas/ Fadal/ Lathe Setup/ Inspect/ Operate CNC Machining centers Tooling experience Able to work with mathematical concepts, including basic trigonometry Field of Study/ Area of Experience: H.S or GED/ Some college Previous machining assignments or graducate of a machining training program such as NTMA. 5S Teamwork Flexability Newport Corporation is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer and does not unlawfully discriminate on the basis of any status or condition protected by applicable federal or state law.  M/F/D/V    Req. Code : 70002620 Division/Department : Photonics",Machinist V Job in Irvine,Full Time,"Irvine, CA 92606","Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg",http://jobview.monster.com/Machinist-V-Job-Irvine-CA-US-166082279.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e595ab0a158463bf6adabd9388292b36
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:04:49:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description We're currently seeking Satellite Installation Technicians to join our DIRECTV technician teams in one of the following areas: Cheyenne, WY. As a DIRECTV Satellite Technician, you will be responsible for providing our customers excellent service through installing, troubleshooting, and upgrading satellite TV systems. You’re probably not here to read about DIRECTV’s Fortune 500 ranking, annual revenue or latest products and services. Those things matter, of course, and you can get the details at www.directv.com. More important is what a career with DIRECTV can do for you. Here, product innovators, technology mavens, customer service champions, master technicians and business leaders of tomorrow find their home. We seek the brightest minds in an evolving workplace. The A-listers of our industry. The quarterbacks of the next generation. And those who get drafted to the team will walk a red carpet of rewards. After all, you’ll help us transform what TV means to the world. And in turn, we want you to imagine who you can become with the support of DIRECTV. Sure, we win awards, give back to our communities and delight our millions of customers worldwide. But right now, we’re asking you to join us. Grow your career. Grow your network. Grow with DIRECTV. And ENTERTAIN YOUR FUTURE®. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include: Preparing for installations by reviewing installation orders, gathering equipment, supplies and tools and coordinating schedules with customers. Planning installations by evaluating location, locating access and laying-out equipment and wiring plan. Establishing satellite TV systems by installing equipment, running and pulling cable, programming and calibrating equipment while adhering to codes, regulations and standards. Verifying satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance by testing equipment and connections and identifying and correcting any issues. Maintaining accurate records through documenting installations, services and repairs. Maintaining and improving service and rapport with customers through listening to their descriptions of problems, answering questions and resolving issues through diagnosing, troubleshooting, repairing, replacing and/or upgrading components. Referring to schematics, manuals and manufacturer's instructions as needed. Maintaining a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies. Ensuring adequate supply levels by inventorying stock, placing and verifying orders. Updating and improving job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities and reading technical publications. Enhancing the organization's reputation through personal accountability for accomplishing new and different requests and always striving to add value. Other duties as assigned. Qualifications Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement. High school diploma or equivalent required. Must possess a valid driver's license in the primary state of residence. Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner. Solid written communication skills required. Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required. Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check. Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SW iM, and Ka/Ku, as required. Must be able to expect and embrace change. Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred. SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred. Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred. Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred. Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40feet in length. Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces. Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations. Must be able to stand for extended periods of time. An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers ‘homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI)to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment)of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual's weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. *To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The qualifications and requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we entertain the Future. Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Cheyenne WY Job in Cheyenne,"Full Time , Employee","Cheyenne, WY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Satellite-Installation-Technician-Cheyenne-WY-Job-Cheyenne-WY-US-165866173.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=14,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4c69d58c279987e5f8aa4cc287918492
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:04:40:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Purpose:Learn all aspects of pest/termite biology and control and provide related services to residential and commercial properties, to protect people and maintain structural integrity.Reports To:Service SupervisorWork Schedule:Monday thru Friday, w/ rotating SaturdaysWork Hours:Typically 7:30 AM to 5:30 PM, with variable starts and finishes per customer needsCompensation:Average yearly earnings $28k to $35k, comprised of production and commissionsBenefits :Paid Time Off; Simple IRA; Major Medical (offered); Supplemental (offered)Licensing:TN driver's licenseCertification:Have (or be able to obtain) state-specific certifications in Category 7 (pest/termite)Work Experience :No experience requiredTasksPerform inspections for pests, pest harborages, and pest entry ways; termites, and other wood destroying organisms.Determine, recommend, and provide required pest management services, termite/WDO elimination services.Help customers reduce pest pressures, termite/WDO pressures through proper sanitation, storage, landscaping, and moisture control.Up-sell customers when appropriate, and/or refer sales opportunities to supervisor, and support sales efforts as much as possible.Prepare written reports for customers, and explain services provided when possible.Operate and maintain service vehicle, and other service equipment per government, and company guidelines.Utilize, secure, and store products and materials in strict accordance with labels, and government and company guidelines.Document service activities as required, and complete and submit paperwork as directed.Maintain licenses, certifications, and/or registrations as required, and participate in company training as directed.Ensure required equipment, products, and materials are on service vehicle to perform scheduled services.",Pest Control Technician Job in Pigeon Forge,Full Time,"Pigeon Forge, TN 37862",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-Job-Pigeon-Forge-TN-US-165553782.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=17,"28,000.00 - 35,000.00 $ /year",Entry Level,09dcab21af7e6aff4c2027a82ec5f46c
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:04:40:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Shop ForemanWe are a growing Defense Contractor located in North Wales, PA. seeking an assistant foreman to help their shop foreman manage the production personnel. The potential candidate must be a leader in the machining trade. Experience with wire EDM, CNC milling, CNC turning, and CNC swiss are preferred, but not required. You must have at least five years of experience in a leadership role, having led setup machinists and operators. The role of this position will consist of executing the weekly production schedule and assisting in the daily tasks that are needed to keep the shop productive, clean and organized. 60-95K depending on experience & a full comprehensive benefits package available, company provided breakfast and lunch, our benefits can’t be beat. Email resume to: jobs@gwyneddmfg.com Click to apply by EMAIL=",Assistant Shop Foreman Job in North Wales,Full Time,"North Wales, PA 19454",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Assistant-Shop-Foreman-Job-North-Wales-PA-US-165428352.aspx?ch=norristown&mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=20,,,98fc364750af8fcef20a548d3e0064f1
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:04:28:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Entry Level Service Technician WHV, Inc., An Equal Opportunity Employer, is looking for an entry level Service Technician. Experience is preferred but will train the right individuals. Applicants will assist Journeyman Service Technicians with fabrication and installation of control systems, preventative maintenance, and service. Service experience is beneficial but not necessary. Wages are commensurate with experience and competitive benefits are available. Qualified candidates should have a strong background in math, a positive attitude and should be mechanically inclined and team focused. Women and minorities are encouraged to apply. Please send you resume to: nvonhaden@whvr.com , apply at 374 East 2nd Street, Winona, MN 55987 or online at www.whvr.com",Entry Level Service Technician Job in Winona,Full Time,"Winona, MN 55987",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Entry-Level-Service-Technician-Job-Winona-MN-US-165585986.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,b661f7964a814bef41f078c242b37665
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:03:44:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOIN A WINNING TEAM!NOW HIRING EXPERIENCED LUBE/TIRE TECHS!!FULL AND PART TIME POSITIONS AVAILABLE! Great PayFlexible SchedulesAdvancement opportunityTraining from Master Technicians/Continued education provided Closed major holidaysPaid VacationMedical, Dental, Prescription, and Vision Insurance available   Experience and Skills:Minimum Requirements:Basic tools for oil and lube servicesMinimum 3 years of good driving record - MVR's will be ranTeam PlayerCustomer Service OrientedClean cut with good personal hygeineNo felony convictionsCurrent Emission/State inspector certifications a MAJOR PLUS Keywords: General Service, Service Technician $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Lube/Tire Tech Job in Parker,Full Time,"Parker, CO 80134",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Lube-Tire-Tech-Job-Parker-CO-US-166088380.aspx?mescoid=4900880001001&jobPosition=12,,Entry Level,bda32509d765f235f13ad5063b3b2097
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:03:44:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTION: GENERAL DESCRIPTION OF POSITION: ·         Responsible for coordination of electronic commodity strategies across the organization. Coordinates supply base management with Commodity Manager. ·         Understands technology trends and market influences. ·         Assists with overall business ownership of the electronic commodity to include managing, facilitating, and monitoring suppliers including new supplier development. ·         Supports new product development and value improvement strategies through Franklin Electric PDP and VIP programs. ·         Coordinates sourcing activities across functional areas and teams within Franklin Electric. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: ·         Serves as a resident expert on factors relevant to the assigned commodity, including product knowledge, applications/usage, processing knowledge, cost structure, global market, supplier capabilities, supplier market share, supplier benchmarking, etc.·         Utilizes contract negotiation, process changes, and implementation of sustainable cost controls, including collaboration with finance, to validate the impact of proposed projects and drive stakeholder approval.·         Drafts supply agreements where appropriate, for assigned commodities; gains feedback and buy-in from appropriate departments such as legal, engineering, marketing, operations, quality, and from senior leadership.·         Uses strategic sourcing tools to proactively conduct spend analysis, maintains cost models and metrics by supplier and commodity, and communicates overall supplier performance, trends in technologies, and market conditions with respect to assigned commodities.·         Builds and maintains business relationships with assigned suppliers.·         Supports multiple Franklin Electric manufacturing sites to optimize sourcing and supplier management activities to enhance Franklin Electric's 5 key factors for success.·         Performs other related duties as required or assigned.·         Assists Commodity Manager as directed. SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES: ·         None POSITION QUALIFICATIONS: Skills and Abilities: ·         Knowledge of electronic components, assemblies and manufacturers.·         Knowledge of manufacturing best practices such as statistical process control, value analysis and corrective action.·         Knowledge of Material Requirements Planning systems·         Knows arithmetic, algebra, geometry, calculus, statistics, and their applications.·         Analyzes information and evaluates results to choose the best solution and solve problems.·         Identifies the underlying principles, reasons, facts, or information by breaking down information or data into separate parts.·         Effectively communicates information and responds to questions in person-to-person and group situations with customers, clients, the general public, and other employees of the organization.·         Maintains confidentiality and uses discretion with business information.·         Reads and understands drawings, electronic schematics, policy manuals, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.·         Writes routine reports and correspondence.·         Utilizes common-sense understanding in order to carry out written, oral, or diagrammed instructions.·         Problem analysis and resolution through root cause analysis, development of alternative solutions, and implementation of best practice.·         Plans the time, method, manner, and/or performance sequence of own work; may also occasionally assist in planning work assignments performed by others within a limited area of operation.·         Frequently makes decisions of both minor and major importance in support of meeting and enhancing Franklin Electric's 5 key factors for success.·         Completes some moderately repetitive tasks. REQUIREMENTS: POSITION QUALIFICATIONS: Skills and Abilities: ·         Knowledge of electronic components, assemblies and manufacturers.·         Knowledge of manufacturing best practices such as statistical process control, value analysis and corrective action.·         Knowledge of Material Requirements Planning systems·         Knows arithmetic, algebra, geometry, calculus, statistics, and their applications.·         Analyzes information and evaluates results to choose the best solution and solve problems.·         Identifies the underlying principles, reasons, facts, or information by breaking down information or data into separate parts.·         Effectively communicates information and responds to questions in person-to-person and group situations with customers, clients, the general public, and other employees of the organization.·         Maintains confidentiality and uses discretion with business information.·         Reads and understands drawings, electronic schematics, policy manuals, safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.·         Writes routine reports and correspondence.·         Utilizes common-sense understanding in order to carry out written, oral, or diagrammed instructions.·         Problem analysis and resolution through root cause analysis, development of alternative solutions, and implementation of best practice.·         Plans the time, method, manner, and/or performance sequence of own work; may also occasionally assist in planning work assignments performed by others within a limited area of operation.·         Frequently makes decisions of both minor and major importance in support of meeting and enhancing Franklin Electric's 5 key factors for success.·         Completes some moderately repetitive tasks. Education and Experience:·         Bachelor's degree in business, management, or a related technical field (required).·         Five plus years of experience in electronics sourcing and supplier development.·         Demonstrated proficiency in support of new product development and value improvement initiatives.·         Master of Business Administration degree or a master's degree in a related field (preferred). Computer Skills: ·         Intermediate: Word processing/typing, presentation/PowerPoint.·         Basic: Alphanumeric data entry, spreadsheet. Certificates and Licenses: ·         APICS (American Production and Inventory Control Society) or CPSM (Certified Professional in Supply Management) or similar preferred. Travel: ·         Domestic and International travel may be required in support of this position. PHYSICAL ACTIVITIES: ·         While performing the functions of this job, the employee is:·         Regularly required to sit, use hands to feel, and talk.·         Occasionally required to reach with hands and arms, stand and walk, and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.·         The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.·         Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.·         The company will make reasonable accommodations to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions and expectations. ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS: ·         This position is not subjected to harmful environmental conditions.·         The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled.   ",Commodity Leader -- Electronics,Full Time,"Fort Wayne, IN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Commodity-Leader-Electronics-Global-Product-Supply-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-165963913.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),850d543d8e9b2fea849c55d91071cf89
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:01:57:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Dietitian- PRN- Kindred Hospital Spring ( Job Number: 275449 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a hospital setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it. You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare. Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve. Join us! Summary: Responsible for the assessment and planning of the nutritional care of the patients in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local standards, guidelines and regulations, policies and procedures, and in coordination with the Nutrition Services Supervisor/Manager to ensure that qualify food service and nutritional care is provided to the patients. Qualifications Qualifications: Education: Bachelor’s degree in Dietetics, Nutrition, or related field Licenses/Certification: Registered Dietitian with the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the American Dietetic Association; Membership in the American Dietetic Association strongly preferred; License or certification as mandated by the state in which employed; ServSafe Food Safety Certification preferred Experience: Experience in acute clinical care, nutrition support, and disease-specific nutrition preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Food Services Primary Location : TX-Houston-Kindred Hospital-Spring Organization : 4858 - Kindred Hospital-Spring Shift : Day",Registered Dietitian- PRN- Kindred Hospital Spring Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Dietitian- PRN- Kindred Hospital Spring ( Job Number: 275449 ) Description IT'S SIMPLE. You want to work in a hospital setting where you are valued and appreciated - where you receive respect from your superiors and co-workers as well as the patients you treat. You want to be challenged by your job without being overwhelmed by it. You want to play an instrumental role in helping a patient recover, sometimes against strong odds, and go home. What you want is Kindred Healthcare. Our mission is to promote healing, provide hope, preserve dignity and produce value for each patient, resident, family member, customer, employee and shareholder we serve. Join us! Summary: Responsible for the assessment and planning of the nutritional care of the patients in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local standards, guidelines and regulations, policies and procedures, and in coordination with the Nutrition Services Supervisor/Manager to ensure that qualify food service and nutritional care is provided to the patients. Qualifications Qualifications: Education: Bachelor’s degree in Dietetics, Nutrition, or related field Licenses/Certification: Registered Dietitian with the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the American Dietetic Association; Membership in the American Dietetic Association strongly preferred; License or certification as mandated by the state in which employed; ServSafe Food Safety Certification preferred Experience: Experience in acute clinical care, nutrition support, and disease-specific nutrition preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Food Services Primary Location : TX-Houston-Kindred Hospital-Spring Organization : 4858 - Kindred Hospital-Spring Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-dietitian-prn-kindred-hospital-spring-job-houston-tx-us-169913693.aspx?mescoid=2900460001001&jobPosition=17,,Food Services/Hospitality,dc83ab548fe42f4d073060460184ff56
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:01:42:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"You’re looking for an opportunity to do something incredible, right? As an industry leader we’re dedicated to connecting the world in groundbreaking and entertaining ways. And that’s when our Technology team members can really shine, combining your passion for innovation and drive towards the future. From mobile apps to products and services, here’s your chance to create and develop life-changing innovations. As a Senior Sourcing Specialist you will be in an individual contributor role and you’ll have responsibility for: Developing and administering contract administration policies, systems, procedures and methods. Providing interpretation of terms and conditions of contractual obligations and may negotiate contract modifications, follow-up quotations, revisions, terms and conditions with vendors. Reviewing and administrating long-term and/or blanket purchase contracts Commercial contract issues, negotiations and/or administration of licensing agreements including renewal, new business, invoicing, credit holds, receivable issues and consolidations. This position may be responsible for contributing to AT&T's compliance with environmental laws and regulations as applicable to its job function. This may include, but is not limited to, work related to fuel tanks, emergency and stand-by generators, boilers, hazardous waste, hazardous materials, batteries, manholes and vaults, water wells, linear and other construction projects, water discharge, or air emissions. Additional Responsibilities: Administering contracts in accordance with company and customer policies and procedures, provide interpretation and analysis of contract documents and reviews and evaluation of customer requests for changes in or revisions of contracts that involve technical specifications, cost, or schedule impact on the company Use skills as a seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of industry practices and company policies and procedures including resolving a wide range of issues You’ll earn an amazing benefits package including: Employee discounts and perks Paid time off Learning and development opportunities to help you along your career path Tuition aid 401(k) savings plan Medical, dental, and vision coverage and MORE AT&T is leading the way to the future - for customers, businesses and the industry. We're developing new technologies to make it easier for our customers to stay connected to their world. With a network that covers 225 countries, including more than 120 million customers, we’d say we’re well on our way. Together, we’ve built a premier integrated communications company and an amazing place to work and grow. Team up with industry innovators every time you walk into work, building the world you always imagined. So what do you say? Let’s do great things together. Our employees say it best, watch here! Apply now and in case your email filter doesn’t recognize us, please keep an eye on SPAM and junk folders so you don’t miss a message. We’ll Require: Strong verbal and written communication skills Strong organization and project management skills Strong experience with Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access) Ability to gather quantitative data from a variety of systems Strong knowledge of Outside Plant Engineering and Construction processes Ability to analyze complex data from a variety of sources and make appropriate recommendations Commitment to teamwork and quality The most successful new hires have had: Four year degree in Business Administration or Procurement Two or more years experience in the construction industry Working knowledge of time reporting systems and procedures Strong cost/efficiency focus and knowledge of the competitive environment",Senior Sourcing Specialist Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-sourcing-specialist-job-houston-tx-us-169992906.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=9,,,728c5033e53a16ee4f828b74b6fe4fee
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:01:41:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-houston-tx-us-169614099.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),66f05fcdb9ac6739ce7e1afa90bce0d2
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:00:41:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279631 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Night",Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse Full Time Nights - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279631 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Night",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-full-time-nights-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913329.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,56c61f6ad5e7beeed58451eb6dc775d1
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:00:41:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cardiovascular Sales Representative - Houston E, TX - V155201S-POS_75018260-0001DescriptionSanofi, a global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme.At Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, Sanofi US is part of a leading global healthcare company dedicated to discovering, developing and distributing therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme. Sanofi US employs approximately 17,000 people across the country all dedicated to protecting health, enhancing life and responding to the hopes and potential healthcare needs of seven billion people around the world.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together?Sanofi US endeavors to make our career center accessible to any and all users. If you are experiencing difficulty and need assistance applying online, please call 1-800-207-8049 Option 7, then Option 3.Cardiovascular Sales Representative:This position is responsible for identifying key players and decision makers in their territory. CV Sales Representatives are expected to possess a high level of product, competitive, customer and territory knowledge, as well as an entrepreneurial drive and spirit to expand, grow and own their business. They will deliver sales calls that consist of pre-call planning, driving “brand” messaging, and closing, with the use of visual aids and/or reprints. They are responsible for planning, implementing and taking ownership of their territory plans to enhance key relationships and drive territory results. Sales Representatives are also expected to attend all company, regional and divisional meetings as well as company sponsored promotional programs which can occur during evening hours and/or weekends. Various administrative duties are also required, after regular field based time, which includes entering all calls into the company computer with relevant post call notes, sample activity, etc. Candidates are responsible for passing all product and market assessments. Candidates must complete all fleet safety training and must maintain an acceptable driving record regarding accidents and incidents. Key Responsibilities and Accountabilities:Engage cardiovascular customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Develop and maintain strong working relationships, through collaboration with colleagues, as well as internal and external contacts.Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Demonstrate initiative and drive.Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts to establish, generate, and expand market share.Develop and maintain strong working relationships with local cardiovascular experts, nurses, other identified important healthcare personnel, and key patient advocacy groups in assigned geographic territories. Effectively develop and execute short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish and maintain relationships with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Qualifications· Consistent track record of quantifiable/documented sales accomplishments· Solid business acumen including excellent and persuasive business communication · Demonstrated ability to plan, analyze and act upon sales data within an assigned geography· Demonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related information · Demonstrated ability to manage territory budget· Demonstrated ability to work in a matrix environment · Driving a company car in a safe manner to daily meetings and appointments is required· Responsible for operating the motor vehicle using safe driving practices, knowledge of and compliance with all company policies, and obeying all traffic laws.· Demonstrated ability to work independently and exercise good business judgment and discretion and to analyze and address territory opportunities by building key customer relationships· Experience selling biologics/injectable products preferred· Specialty pharmacy experience preferred· Business to business sales experience preferredSanofi US Services, Inc. and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.Job:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Texas-HoustonJob Posting:Jul 12, 2016, 2:30:58 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",Cardiovascular Sales Representative - Houston E,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/cardiovascular-sales-representative-houston-e-tx-v155201s-job-houston-tx-us-169708124.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,General/Other: Sales/Business Development,469dda5d5bbc4359486adb356a062553
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:58:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Healthcare Superintendent for ground up projects in Houston, TX. Competitive salary and career growth options Our client, one of the largest, most diversified builders in the United States are nationally recognized for their exceptional and innovative construction solutions across multiple market sectors, with a mixture of both public and private work across the country. Due to an expanding project portfolio they are looking for an experienced Healthcare Superintendent in Houston, you will find yourself working within a well-developed and experienced team. To be successful in this role you will be required to be flexible with ability to manage multiple tasks and projects. Must be resourceful, with respect to identifying problems and finding resolutions, have the ability to operate in a fast paced environment with minimal direction from Senior Management, review subcontractor and vendor drawings and submittals for adherence to plans and specifications, attend coordination meetings with Architects, Engineers and multiple subcontractor trades, Must have a proven track record for successfully completing projects in the Medical side. In return for your Healthcare construction experience, our client provides a competitive salary package along with full benefits, 401K and employee wellness programs. Take the initiative to move your career closer to your personal objectives and ensure that 2016 and beyond is your most successful yet. If however you are not looking for a new opportunity right now but know of someone that is with the right experience, please pass on my details and have them get in touch with me.",Healthcare Superintendent Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/healthcare-superintendent-job-houston-tx-us-169691812.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=1,"90,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,9892ad3ca76d25dbb7a7ab29add4d947
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:55:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Training Department plays a crucial role in connecting our customers to our software. The main purpose of this position is to help our customers make a smooth conversion to the Reynolds and Reynolds system and provide training and customer support throughout the process. You will be responsible for installing and upgrading Reynolds and Reynolds software solutions in all parts of the dealership. When working with the customers, you will not only be a trainer but also a project manager. You will be responsible for coordinating all parts required for the install and making sure that all team members are on the same page in order to successfully convert the software.You will typically be given at least 1 month advance notice about upcoming trips. You will travel both individually and with a team installing and converting our software for customers. This requires excellent presentation and communication skills as you will meet with dealership management to understand the needs for each dealership. Based on these requirements, you will customize the system and train key dealership personnel on how to use the solution. While in the office you will support current customers, prepare for future trips, and conduct follow-ups with recently installed customers.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor’s degree preferred Outgoing, friendly personality Strong written and verbal communication skills Ability to travel 80% of the timeTRAINING:Training lasts approximately 4 months and includes department observations, classroom instruction, and on-the-job training with a mentor during travel trips. Classroom instruction includes product training as well as automotive dealership operations. You will focus on one area of the software during your product training and assist experienced representatives with customer set-up and implementation. In addition, you will have the opportunity to see Reynolds’ solutions “in action” by visiting car dealerships that already utilize our solutions on a daily basis.BENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401k with 100% matching up to 6% of compensation Referral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hirePaid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Discounted membership to local area fitness centersOn-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, softball, volleyball, bowling, and more! Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine optionsCredit Union membershipOpportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunities Reynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Customer Training Professional Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-training-professional-job-houston-tx-us-168829437.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,Customer Support/Client Care,e62e09cae52564669ab690b07eb9cdf7
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:20:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Occupational Health/Urgent Care Center Medical Director needed for a permanent opportunity with Yoh's client located in Deer Park, TX. Top Skills You Should Possess: - Physician License in State of Texas (Active and in Good Standing) - Minimum of five (5) years of directly applicable experience preferred - Certified in BLS and ACLS preferred - Ability to work well in a very fast paced environment What You'll Be Doing: - Manage your day-to-day through the holistic integration of business leadership within a clinical setting - Work with sales and operations team on new business development and center financials - Facilitate efficient and effective center operations by balancing the dynamics of patient care and leadership within a clinical environment - Leadership that focuses on people development, specifically mentoring, training, and developing clinical staff and colleagues to increase performance and retention - Execute daily effective and optimal patient care management - Ensure optimal execution of clinical model playbook as well as identify indicators for clinical improvement while also confirming accurate records/billing - Create appropriate treatment environment throughout the center that is compliant with State Practice Act/Rules and Regulations/WC Regulations - Primarily clinical (see patients every day) but also will have additional responsibilities in terms of helping manage the clinics, budget analysis/financial review, and training/development of new colleagues What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Board Certification in Primary Care or Emergency Medicine - Medical degree from accredited university - Work overtime as required - Occupational Medicine experience preferred What's In It For You? - Competitive salary based on experience - Training provided with a World-Class Occupational Medicine Process Management Model - Minimal travel - Medical Malpractice Coverage - 401(k) with Employer Match - Medical/Vision/Prescription/Dental Plans - Life Insurance/Disability - Paid Time Off/Holidays What are you waiting for? Apply Now! Recruiter: Hana Brown Telephone: 818.587.4475 Email: Hana.Brown@yoh.com Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: HC MONJOB CB1 J2WBRHOURef: 1074701SFSF: HCCB1Nearest Major Market: HoustonJob Segment:Medical, Manager, Urgent Care, Business Development, Patient Care, Healthcare, Management, Sales#TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Occupational Health/Urgent Care Medical Center Director Job Job in Deer Park,Full Time Employee,"Deer Park, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/occupational-health-urgent-care-medical-center-director-job-job-deer-park-tx-us-169969170.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,d2777a3c6f846e474d21ef964881c44f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:19:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that better care begins at home.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families.As an Area Director of Operations, you will: Manage Branch Directors in all operational areas including process and personnel management, sales growth and achieving financial goals. Develop annual branch budget and monitor expenditures. Analyze gross profit factors, market conditions, business volume/mix, competition and operational costs. Partner with Sales counterpart to ensure continued branch growth by expanding new and existing client base. Partner with clinical team to ensure quality deliverables designed to oversee patient intake and inquiries and assess patient needs. QualificationsBachelors Degree or the equivalent Minimum of eight years multi-site healthcare operations experience with strong focus on sales and business development Current or recent experience managing a minimum of 5M in healthcare revenue Previous homecare or hospice operations experience strongly preferred Success in revenue growth and in the development and execution of market planning Outstanding leadership, managerial skills Good organizational, interpersonal and communication skills keywords: RN, Registered Nurse, Nurse, nursing, homecare, home care, healthcare, health care, home health, RN manager, Medicare, r.n., rn, Executive Director, Branch Manager, Administrator, Branch Administrator, Nurse Administrator, General Manager, director of professional services, director of clinical services, director of operations, area director of operations, regional director of operations, homecare manager, home care manager, clinical director, clinical administrator, AVP, operations, healthcare operations, home health operations, Senior Director of Operations, Regional Director Operations, VP of Operations, Division VP of Operations, Director of Regional Business Development, Territory Manager, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.",Area Director of Home Health Operations Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/area-director-of-home-health-operations-job-houston-tx-us-169428845.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,b806f33cf8464ec1abe55a9954d974ed
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:17:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic career working up to 40 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. When you choose a career in retail operations with Murphy USA, you are choosing to work at the heart of our business. To be successful as an Assistant Store Manager (ASM), you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will interact with our valued customers, lead our sales associates, and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Supporting the Store Manager in all store operations. Helping lead the team to exceed the store’s performance goals and objectives. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: Murphy understands that a career is about much more than a paycheck and benefits. That’s why we do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",ASSISTANT MANAGER Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169614095.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e438b1e1c54fe67844daacb22b0d5ff6
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:16:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/VeteranWaste Management (WM), a Fortune 250 company, is the leading provider of comprehensive waste and environmental services in North America. We are strongly committed to a foundation of operating excellence, professionalism and financial strength. WM serves nearly 25 million customers in residential, commercial, industrial and municipal markets throughout North America through a network of collection operations, transfer stations, landfills, recycling facilities and waste-based energy production projects.To enable our business to expand our lead in a market increasingly enhanced by technology, Waste Management is undertaking a substantial technology transformation. We are seeking talented Information Technology professionals to join the Waste Management team who are motivated to help us transform the way we design, build and use technology. With your skills and experience, we look for you to combine your technical expertise with industry best practices in an effort to align information technology solutions with Waste Management business strategy.I. Job SummaryDirects the efforts of a team in the design, development, implementation, and support of various information technology/systems applications and/or projects.II. Duties and ResponsibilitiesTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each duty satisfactorily. Other ancillary duties may be assigned.Directly manages the enterprise data operations team.Focuses on the day to day administration of the enterprise data networksResponsible for managing data needs for the companyManages incidents tickets function and handles escalated issues as needed.Benchmarks, analyzes, reports on, and makes recommendations for the improvement and growth of the IT data infrastructureManage financial aspects of the departments, including purchasing, budgeting, and budget reviewDevelop business case justifications and cost/benefit analyses for IT data spending and initiativesDevelops and implements enterprise data operational policies and procedures, including those for security, disaster recovery, standards, purchasing, and service provisionConducts research and make recommendations on products, services, protocols, and standards in support of all data infrastructure procurement and development effortsKeeps abreast of new technologiesCoordinates with business owners to determine business needs or requirementsPlans initiatives and projects, establishes priorities, manages risk, and monitors progress throughout the projectActs as a team leader or project manager and/or establishes and communicates common goal and direction for the team.Evaluates status and resource utilization and implements changes to improve the team's effectivenessCoordinates with other managers to integrate project with applications and/or initiativesCoordinates and oversees career development, performance management, team communication and recommends pay determinationIII. Supervisory ResponsibilitiesDirect supervision of full-time employees including team leads and individual contributorsIV. QualificationsThe requirements listed below are representative of the qualifications necessary to perform the job.A. Education and ExperienceBachelor's Degree in Computer Science, MIS, Business Administration or similar area of study with six years of relevant IT experience and three-year prior leadership experience required. An additional four years of related experience may substitute for the Bachelor's degree.Master's Degree, seven plus years of relevant IT experience and five plus years of experience managing a department is preferred.B. Certificates, Licenses, Registrations or Other RequirementsNone required.C. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities RequiredBasic knowledge or skills in one or more of the following is required:Management of technical software development and deployment projectsEmployee management and developmentProgram and project management, budget development, and monitoringOrganizational change and developmentExcellent communication and presentation skillsProject management of programs or a portfolio of projects, ensuring all risks are mitigatedDevelop, implement and maintain sound business practicesStrategy Development and Roadmap ManagementLead role in building strong relationships with business sponsors to identify business needs and develop strategic solutions to innovate business processesEnsure that direct reports, project teams, business sponsors and superiors are well informed of relevant changes and newsworthy events within the company and related programs.Serve as a technical expert representative across teams, both business and information technology.Effective at bridging between technology and business needs, while considering value, cost, and organizational impact associated with change management.Technical Knowledge, Skills or Abilities:Routing and Routing protocols (EIGRP, BGP)Switching and switching technologies (Cisco Catalyst, 802.1q, LACP / Ether channel, HSRP)Experience in a large enterprise environments (> 500 sites)Sniffer / packet capture capabilityRemote site performance investigationUnderstanding of TCP and how TCP operates (windowing, congestion avoidance, window scaling, bandwidth-delay product, selective acknowledgement, etc)24x7 on-call rotation based on the number of people on our teamHands-on experience with networks including physical layer infrastructure, Cisco based LAN, WAN, IPT, WLS, Firewall hardware, SNMP based software, and interconnecting devices.Proven knowledge and practical application of network security across firewalls.Demonstrate the ability to formulate sound solutions based on formal training, research, and expertise with little guidance from management.Possess a high degree of professionalism, customer service, and dependable.Strong LAN, WAN, Security, Wireless, and VPN troubleshooting capabilities.Ability to apply a comprehensive and in-depth knowledge of technical concepts, practices and procedures.Solid written and verbal communication.Must present exceptional leadership, problem solving, decision making, and time management skills.Ability to work in a remote capacity.Ability to work in a team environmentKnowledge, Skills or Abilities that Contribute to Success:F5 Load-balancersApplication FirewallsFirewalls with multiple contexts, and with failover configurationsCisco Nexus 7000 / 5000 / 2000 productsCisco VSSJUNOS / Juniper EX switchesCisco Stackwise & FlexstackIntrusion Prevention SystemsWeb Filtering / IronportTCP expert / Application performance expertCisco WAAS / WAEEIGRP & BGPNetQos productsHP Network AutomationWildPackets OmniPeakNetwork drawings & design documentationV. Work EnvironmentListed below are key points regarding environmental demands and work environment of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the job.Normal setting for this job is: office setting and/or landfill/outdoor.BenefitsAt Waste Management, each eligible employee receives a competitive total compensation package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance and Short Term Disability. As well as a Stock Purchase Plan, Company match on 401K, and more! Our employees also receive Paid Vacation, Holidays, and Personal Days. Please note that benefits may vary by site.If this sounds like the opportunity that you have been looking for, please click ""Apply.""",Data Network Services Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Computer HardwareComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-network-services-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169836281.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,5c2d4de85cf07f98725ce550a2f0b569
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:23:08:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"KinderCare Education is the nation’s leader in early childhood education. We nourish curiosity through purposeful experiences to create a future full of lifelong learners. From our National Support Center, to the classrooms where learning comes to life, we’re united by a passion to create a world of learning, joy and adventure for more than 161,000 children ages six-weeks through 12 years every day.   Our Teachers bring warmth, patience, and understanding to the classroom every day, encouraging children to learn and grow. They inspire children to be lifelong learners using our nationally recognized curriculum that promotes social, physical, verbal, and cognitive development. Our Teachers are committed to making their center successful and know that creating meaningful relationships with children, families, and their team play a crucial role in that success. When you join our team as a Teacher you will: Implement KCE’s curriculum in a way that is consistent with the unique needs of each child Create a safe, nurturing environment where children can play and learn. Partner and communicate with parents, with a shared desire to provide the best care and education for their children.   Support your center’s success; partner with center staff and leadership to achieve goals around enrollment, accreditation, and engagement. Cultivate positive relationships with families, teachers, state licensing authorities, community contacts and corporate partners. Required Skills and Experience: A love for children and a strong desire to make a difference every day.  Ability to build relationships with families and coworkers and create a dynamic environment where play and learning happens. Outstanding customer service skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to multi-task and manage multiple situations effectively Must possess active Child Development Associate (CDA) Credential and meet NAEYC candidacy requirements (or willing to obtain) CPR and First Aid Certification or willingness to obtain 1+ year Early Childhood Education Experience (preferred) Must meet state specific guidelines for the role Must be physically able to use a computer with basic proficiency, lift a minimum of 40 pounds, and work indoors or outdoors.  Must be able to assume postures in low levels to allow physical and visual contact with children, see and hear well enough to keep children safe, and engage in physical activity with children. Ability to speak, read, and write English.   The benefits our career professionals enjoy: In addition to a rewarding career where you help shape children's futures, KinderCare Education provides a competitive compensation package. Benefits include:   Medical, dental and vision Discounted child care Generous paid time off Education assistance and reimbursement Medical expense reimbursement/ Life insurance/Disability benefits/ Health and wellness programs 401(k) savings and investment plan with employer match   KinderCare Education employs more than 32,000 team members across 1,700 locations nationwide. Our devoted family of education providers leads the nation in accreditation and includes KinderCare® Learning Centers, CCLC®, Champions® Before- and After-School Programs, Cambridge Schools™, Knowledge Beginnings® and The Grove School®.   KinderCare Education is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, age, sex, religion, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, military or veteran status, gender identity or expression, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal law.",Afterschool STEM Teacher Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77083",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/afterschool-stem-teacher-job-houston-tx-us-169910250.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=17,,Education/Training,c7993bc3783af8dfcfa01c9086484403
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:22:56:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reynolds and Reynolds is looking for experienced sales professionals for our Telecommunication Solutions sales team. Our superior software solutions, our award-winning sales, service, and support have made us one of the most recognized and respected companies in the automotive industry.As a Territory Sales Account Manager, your primary focus will be to promote the sale of Reynolds’ telecommunication products to automotive dealerships within your territory. As the subject matter expert on our Reynolds Integrated Telephone System (RITS), you will work with the local Account Manager to demo and close the sale. RITS is a part of the Retail Management System (RMS) which allows the dealerships to integrate their dealer management system (DMS) to their phone system to help manage the communications between customers and staff. In this role, you are eligible to receive a company car for both business and personal use. In addition, you will be provided with an iPad, iPhone, laptop and home office equipment. If you have a desire to excel and succeed in technical sales within a reputable company this is the job for you!Our training consists of time with experienced representatives in the field, online courses completed in your home office, and classroom instruction at Reynolds University, our award-winning internal learning institution in Dayton, Ohio. Topics covered will include training on sales techniques, negotiations, dealership operations, and in-depth product training.REQUIREMENTS: ·         Bachelor’s degree or equivalent ·         3+ years experience in sales ·         Strong presentation skills ·         Persuasiveness and sales-closing abilities ·         Technical Knowledge as it applies to networking systems and/or telephony systems ·         Ability to travel 40-50% of the time BENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: ·         Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance ·         401(k) with up to 6% matching ·         Company car for business and personal use ·         Working remotely with an iPad, iPhone, laptop, and other provided home office equipment ·         Professional development and training ·         Promotion from within ·         Paid vacation and sick days ·         Eight paid holidays ·         Referral bonuses ·         Associate discounts for cell phones, cars, computers, entertainment, and much more   Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Territory Sales Account Manager – Outside Sales Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",AllTelecommunications ServicesAutomotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-sales-account-manager-%E2%80%93-outside-sales-job-houston-tx-us-169632940.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,4dbd0a354243852332d62b5f91b333a9
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:22:56:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"The role of the Promoter Manager is to supervise a team of Brand Ambassadors in the South Central areas of the US. He or she is expected to have management skills and excellent relationship building combined with team management.Travel:There will be out of town traveling involved and overnight stay in your territory (Houston, Dallas, Austin, New Orleans, Atlanta, Jacksonville, Orlando, Tampa, and South Florida.) Travel is approximately 75%Base Location: Candidate must reside in Houston, TXDescription of activities:Candidate will report directly to the Marketing Manager while supervising a team in the areas described. The team will be comprised of approx 20 Promoters and/or Brand Ambassadors.Hire, train or terminate Brand Ambassadors in assigned areas when necessary.Monitor performance on daily basisReport daily/weekly to Marketing ManagerReview timesheets prior to payment processingWork promotions in assigned territories along with the area Brand Ambassadors at store locations weeklyOn the job coaching and training of Brand Ambassadors to improve their overall performanceWork national events when requiredThis is a salaried position. Base plus bonus and full benefits including a company vehicle (or allowance), laptop, cell phone and expenses paid weekly.Qualifications/Requirements:College degree preferredKnowledgeable and experienced in the promotions/brand ambassador field is requiredCandidate must pass background and drug tests as required by employerCompetencies:Good verbal and written communication skillsIntermediate Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel and Microsoft OutlookReliable transportationImpeccable follow-up and follow-through skills to meet company deadlinesTeam management and recruitment of staff",Monster,,"The role of the Promoter Manager is to supervise a team of Brand Ambassadors in the South Central areas of the US. He or she is expected to have management skills and excellent relationship building combined with team management.Travel:There will be out of town traveling involved and overnight stay in your territory (Houston, Dallas, Austin, New Orleans, Atlanta, Jacksonville, Orlando, Tampa, and South Florida.) Travel is approximately 75%Base Location: Candidate must reside in Houston, TXDescription of activities:Candidate will report directly to the Marketing Manager while supervising a team in the areas described. The team will be comprised of approx 20 Promoters and/or Brand Ambassadors.Hire, train or terminate Brand Ambassadors in assigned areas when necessary.Monitor performance on daily basisReport daily/weekly to Marketing ManagerReview timesheets prior to payment processingWork promotions in assigned territories along with the area Brand Ambassadors at store locations weeklyOn the job coaching and training of Brand Ambassadors to improve their overall performanceWork national events when requiredThis is a salaried position. Base plus bonus and full benefits including a company vehicle (or allowance), laptop, cell phone and expenses paid weekly.Qualifications/Requirements:College degree preferredKnowledgeable and experienced in the promotions/brand ambassador field is requiredCandidate must pass background and drug tests as required by employerCompetencies:Good verbal and written communication skillsIntermediate Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel and Microsoft OutlookReliable transportationImpeccable follow-up and follow-through skills to meet company deadlinesTeam management and recruitment of staff",,http://jobview.monster.com/promoter-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169514848.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=8,,,9963376909df6ecac3143734fb7d8848
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:22:54:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"""HOUSTON'S FIRST""A New Era in the Life of a Houston LandmarkSt. Joseph Medical Center has provided quality healthcare to the ever-expanding Houston community for 125 years. Our Trauma Center, Center for Behavioral Health, a dedicated Women's Medical Center and the full-service acute care hospital are supported by the specialty inpatient and outpatient services that you'd expect from the Houston's first teaching hospital. Our mission matches your expectations - to delivery compassionate healthcare to the communities we serve. With 792 beds, St. Joseph physicians and staff are ready to care for you at any hour.St. Joseph Medical Center in the Heights opened as an extension of Houston's first hospital - St. Joseph Medical Center in downtown Houston. RN TRAVELER ASSIGNMENTS ARE AVAILABLE IN: Behavioral Medicine Case Management ICU/CCU Emergency Room Medical/Surgical Surgical Services Telemetry Women's ServicesAssignments are up to 12 weeksAvailable shifts: 7a-7p; 7p-7a rotating weekendsHousing allotment available for out of town travelers. Please Ask for details! Dual campus:  1401 St. Joseph Parkway, Houston, Texas 77002 1917 Ashland, Houston, Texas 77008NO AGENCIES! MINIMUM KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES REQUIRED:  Work Experience:3-5 years in area of specialty; acute care hospital experience License/Registration/Certification: Current RN licensure issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas to practice professional nursing. Current American Heart Association Healthcare Provider certification required in the following areas:BLS Behavioral Medicine; Medical/SurgicalBLS, ACLS, PALS Emergency RoomBLS, ACLS ICU/CCUBLS, ACLS Surgical Services; TelemetryBLS, NRP Women's ServicesEducation & Training:Completion of an accredited school of nursing program resulting in an Associate Degree, Diploma or Baccalaureate degree in nursing.Skills: Technical, clerical, critical thinking and interpersonal skills relevant to total patient care/area in order to safely and efficiently treat patients. Good verbal and written communication skills necessary in order to be clearly and easily understood by patients, families and members of the Health Care team. Writes/prints legibly in order to document accurately and understandably, and to provide direction to support staff and others. Demonstrates a pleasant, helpful and caring demeanor in order to be an effective patient advocate.EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER MINORITIES / WOMEN / VETERANS / DISABLED",Registered Nurse (RN) - Traveler -  to  Week Assignment,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-traveler-8-to-12-week-assignment-emergency-department-pm-55-per-hour-job-houston-tx-us-169639509.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,124575a96e019163c2e2446f35e51390
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:22:14:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/VeteranWaste Management (WM), a Fortune 250 company, is the leading provider of comprehensive waste and environmental services in North America. We are strongly committed to a foundation of operating excellence, professionalism and financial strength. WM serves nearly 25 million customers in residential, commercial, industrial and municipal markets throughout North America through a network of collection operations, transfer stations, landfills, recycling facilities and waste-based energy production projects.I. Job SummaryServes as support person for Territory or Vertical. Activities include: implementation of new contracts, assisting with special projects, and staffing existing contracts as needed. May also assist Business Development and Territory/Vertical Managers with site walks, proposal development, and contract renewals. Significant travel is required (75%+).II. Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Other minor duties may be assigned.Coordinate logistics for transportation of hazardous and non-hazardous waste from client site including profiling, scheduling, manifesting and physically loading bulk and drum loads.Consult with client and prospective clients to identify, design and implement cost saving opportunities and proposals.Ensure compliance with client and government regulations by performing necessary inspections and reporting. Resolve all issues in a timely manner.Administer client and vendor financial obligations including invoicing, reporting and contracts.Promote culture of safety by ensuring site personnel are properly trained to perform assigned duties and comply with safety, environmental, federal, state & local regulations.III. Supervisory ResponsibilitiesThe highest level of supervisory skills required in this job is the management of non-supervisory employees. This includes:Direct supervision of approximately 0 to 5 full-time operations level employeesIV. QualificationsThe requirements listed below are representative of the qualifications necessary to perform the job.A. Education and ExperienceEducation: Bachelor's Degree (accredited) in Environmental Sciences, Accounting or Business, or in lieu of degree, High School Diploma or GED (accredited) and 4 years of relevant work experience.Experience: 7 years of relevant work experience (in addition to education requirement).B. Certificates, Licenses, Registrations or Other RequirementsNone Required.C. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities RequiredAn entrepreneurial skill set is highly valued with the ability to creatively achieve stretch goals and provide new services and value to existing customers.Supervisory and team building skillsCreative problem solving and innovative thinkerEffective and concise communicationAdept decision makingStrategic thinkingStrong leadership and relationship building skillsStrong business acumen and financial knowledgeSelf-motivated and directed with a keen sense of urgency to deliver resultsCustomer-focusedV. Work EnvironmentListed below are key points regarding environmental demands and work environment of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the job.Normal setting for this job varies depending on the client.BenefitsAt Waste Management, each eligible employee receives a competitive total compensation package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance and Short Term Disability. As well as a Stock Purchase Plan, Company match on 401K, and more! Our employees also receive Paid Vacation, Holidays, and Personal Days. Please note that benefits may vary by site.If this sounds like the opportunity that you have been looking for, please click ""Apply.""",Operations Support Manager - HOUSTON/NOLA/BATON ROUGE/CHICAGO Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials Waste Management,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-support-manager-houston-nola-baton-rouge-chicago-job-houston-tx-us-169838519.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=13,,Project/Program Management,cc1a464bee9661d4f48c03bc5910e82a
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:22:09:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Licensed Practical-Vocational Nurse Full Time - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279578 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Summary: Under direct supervision of Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN job provides nursing care within the scope of licensure for assigned patients according to established nursing standards and hospital policies and procedures. ·         Under direct supervision of a Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication, performs treatments and patient care responsibilities as prescribed. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN consults with and keeps Registered Nurse informed of activities, symptoms, reactions, and changes in the patient's condition with regard to assigned patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN provides appropriate pain management techniques and educates the patient and family regarding pain management. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication following the five rights of medication administration within scope of practice. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with the rehabilitation and treatment of patients in accordance with the medical plan of care, updates, and revises plan of care under the supervision of Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists physicians with examinations, treatments and special procedures and performs services requiring technical and manual skills as directed by the Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN treats patients and their families with respect and dignity.  Identifies and addresses psychosocial, cultural, ethnic and religious/spiritual needs of patients and their families. ·        The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN interacts professionally with patient/family and involves patient/family in the formation of the plan of care. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with admitting, discharging and transferring of patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN identifies and addresses psychosocial needs of patients and family; communicates with Social Services/Discharge Planner regarding both in-hospital and post discharge needs. Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse, LPN, LVN, Nurse, Practical Nurse, Vocational Nurse, Hospital, Clinical Nurse, Medical, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduate of an accredited program for Licensed Vocational/Practical Nurses. Licenses/Certification: Licensed Practical/Vocational Nurse License. BCLS Certification. Intravenous Blood Certification preferred. Experience: Minimum six months prior experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : LPN/LVN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Licensed Practical-Vocational Nurse Full Time - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Licensed Practical-Vocational Nurse Full Time - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279578 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Summary: Under direct supervision of Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN job provides nursing care within the scope of licensure for assigned patients according to established nursing standards and hospital policies and procedures. ·         Under direct supervision of a Registered Nurse, the Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication, performs treatments and patient care responsibilities as prescribed. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN consults with and keeps Registered Nurse informed of activities, symptoms, reactions, and changes in the patient's condition with regard to assigned patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN provides appropriate pain management techniques and educates the patient and family regarding pain management. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN administers medication following the five rights of medication administration within scope of practice. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with the rehabilitation and treatment of patients in accordance with the medical plan of care, updates, and revises plan of care under the supervision of Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists physicians with examinations, treatments and special procedures and performs services requiring technical and manual skills as directed by the Registered Nurse. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN treats patients and their families with respect and dignity.  Identifies and addresses psychosocial, cultural, ethnic and religious/spiritual needs of patients and their families. ·        The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN interacts professionally with patient/family and involves patient/family in the formation of the plan of care. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN assists with admitting, discharging and transferring of patients. ·         The Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse / LPN / LVN identifies and addresses psychosocial needs of patients and family; communicates with Social Services/Discharge Planner regarding both in-hospital and post discharge needs. Licensed Practical Vocational Nurse, LPN, LVN, Nurse, Practical Nurse, Vocational Nurse, Hospital, Clinical Nurse, Medical, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduate of an accredited program for Licensed Vocational/Practical Nurses. Licenses/Certification: Licensed Practical/Vocational Nurse License. BCLS Certification. Intravenous Blood Certification preferred. Experience: Minimum six months prior experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : LPN/LVN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-vocational-nurse-full-time-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913391.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,43786b688ccca159295ed4913cd2e698
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:54:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sasol (USA) Corporation is expanding its existing Louisiana Chemical Operations with the development of a world-scale ethane cracker that will produce 1.5 million tons of ethylene and other downstream derivatives per year.  The ethane cracker will enable Sasol to expand its differentiated ethylene derivatives business, while helping to strengthen U.S. manufacturing, boost exports and spur economic growth.Due to our tremendous growth we are recruiting for a Sales Manager Adhesives, North America, reporting to the Manager of Sales and Marketing Adhesives, Polymers and Asphalt Additives , USA and is located in Houston, Texas.  Sasol offers a comprehensive total rewards package with market-related compensation and benefits that are consistent across our sites in the USA.  The total rewards package is competitive within our industry and is designed to attract and retain our most valuable assets - our employees.  Come be a part of our Growing Team!!! Aerial View of Construction on Sasol's US Mega Project - YouTube https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-K_b5I-Eb_o   Position Requirements:   Implements all sales and marketing efforts related to the business in the relevant Market Segment in North America Executes M&S strategy and market development plans for the relevant Market Segment in North America. Implements commercialization and sales while maximizing the revenue and profit potential. Promotes the establishment of strong customer relationships to ensure continuing relationships and future growth Chairs in important customer negotiations. Obtains and communicates market intelligence information on competitive products, demand and supply development Uses IT tools and P2PR methodologies in order to maximize margins and optimizes customer and product portfolio Lead the development of Pre-negotiation documents in case of corresponding contract negotiations Works closely with the product managers to implement the relevant strategy for the application responsibility. Manages the sales of products into the region. Responsible to work within the agreed operational budget. Achieve business plan for North America Present sales budgets, volume and pricing forecasts and competitor activities. Manage customer complaints and ensure alignment of solutions with customer expectations.   Experience and/or Educational Requirements:   Bachelor's Degree in Chemistry, Science or Engineering 5 plus years of experience in the chemical industry required Commercial background in the NAFTA region (preferred) Industry specific knowledge particularly Hot Melt Adhesives (products, applications, customers, competitors) Analytical skills Thorough communication, relationship building, selling and presentation skills (e.g. interacting with customers, negotiating, building trust, partnerships and decision making) Ability to identify value adding opportunities in the region. Customer- service and solution-oriented personality (e.g. self-motivation, delivering high quality solutions and services, demonstrating flexibility) Successfully work in a global cross-functional environment Good knowledge of MS Office software Fluency in English, basic Spanish communication (a plus)   Sasol treats work-authorized job applicants equally in recruiting and hiring without regard to their citizenship status or national origin unless required by law, regulation, executive order, government contract, or determination by the Attorney General.   Please note Sasol will not sponsor, obtain, and/or petition for temporary visa status (for example, E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, or TN) for candidates for this position and/or personnel hired for this position.   We are not accepting unsolicited resumes from 3rd party recruitment agencies, therefore we will not a pay a fee for resumes submitted.  ",Sales Manager,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-manager-adhesives-wax-17581-job-houston-tx-us-169802421.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=6,,Engineering,db12b59b657c94e9e1b4b1adab5528bb
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:54:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description This position will work in our Memorial City 24/7 Nurse Triage Center. A registered nurse who is responsible for triaging incoming calls from clients, assessing needs, giving appropriate clinical dispositions and facilitating referrals to primary providers, specialists, healthcare facilities and community resources. This nurse will also educate the client when appropriate regarding immediate care advice and preventive behaviors. Will demonstrate the knowledge and skills necessary to provide patient care that is appropriate to the ages of the patients served. Special projects, initiatives, and other job duties as assigned.Minimum Qualifications:Registered Nurse (RN) required; Bachelor of Science in Nursing (BSN) preferred.Current State of Texas license/permit to practice professional nursing.Minimum three years of clinical experience in acute or ambulatory care.Excellent written, verbal, strong inbound and outbound telephonic and interpersonal communication skillsSuperior nursing process, critical thinking and problem solving skillsStrong computer skills and technical aptitude, with the ability to navigate a Windows environment and type and talk at the same timeWorks effectively with minimum supervision and as a member of a teamDemonstrates commitment to the Partners-in-Caring process by integrating our culture in all internal and external customer interactions; delivers on our brand promise of “we advance health” through innovation, accountability, empowerment, collaboration, compassion and results while ensuring one Memorial Hermann.Principle Accountabilities:Demonstrates thorough knowledge and use of the nursing processConducts sound nursing assessmentsAble to develop, implement and evaluate a plan of care for each callDocuments all inquiries according to department standards to medico legal/statistical purposesMaintains a sense of pride and ownership for the programPerforms data entry at time of callMaintains confidentiality of all interactionsDetermine needs of the client by listening, asking open-ended questions and responding positivelyAble to prioritize multiple competing tasks within a highly structured/scheduled environment with defined goals and expectations for performance.Reference the appropriate triaged guideline for 100 percent of clients. Select the first positive guideline question/statement. Facilitate appropriate disposition based on assessment information, triage parameters and clinical judgmentSchedule a callback within 24 hours for 10 percent of all emergency referrals, as specified by site policy, to determine compliance with recommendations.Ensures safe care to patients, staff and visitors; adheres to all Memorial Hermann policies, procedures, and standards within budgetary specifications including time management, supply management, productivity and quality of service.Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education and skills competency; supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor and resource to less experienced staff.Other duties as assigned.Must be able to demonstrate knowledge and skills necessary to provide care appropriate to the patient served.  Must demonstrate knowledge of the principles of growth and development as it relates to the different life cycles. MNTRCK ",Consulting Nurse Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/consulting-nurse-job-houston-tx-us-168841187.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),497517b22e5362bf217595d98810c054
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:53:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description TITLE: Director, Clinical Service Line Marketing IIJob Number: MK1510Overtime Eligible: NoPTO Status: ExemptBASIC FUNCTION:  This position will support the Women's and Children's Service Line Marketing for the System.  This position directs targeted service line marketing efforts from strategic planning to tactical execution, leveraging the department’s integrated marketing, sales, and customer service model (Public relations, advertising, internal communications, www.memorialhermann.org, market research, employer sales, physician sales, call center, membership program, and customer relationship management) to grow top line net revenue, improve payer mix, and grow net contribution margin for assigned clinical services across Memorial Hermann.Success is measured by increasing the business measures of the assigned system-wide clinical services and other programs and directing marketing activities through a complex integrated structure. The service line director has matrix accountability to the System Executive, Marketing and the business unit executive(s) or service line leader(s).Must be able to demonstrate knowledge and skills necessary to provide care appropriate to the patient served. Must demonstrate knowledge of the principles of growth and development as it relates to the different life cycles. Specific age groups that are served by this position are circled:NeonateInfantPediatricAdolescentAdultAdult/Geriatric Minimum Qualifications 1. Bachelor’s degree in Business, Public Relations, Marketing, Communications, or related field. Master’s degree (MBA, MHA, or MS in related field) preferred.2. Eight years experience in market management with bottom line accountabilities for business results. Product marketing experience.3. Demonstrated significant results at achieving growth targets of similar business volumes.4. Ability to understand and influence the supported business’ operations, strategic direction, and customers.5. Excellent analytical, problem-solving, leadership, interpersonal and communication skills.6. Demonstrates commitment to the Partners-in-Caring process by integrating our culture in all internal and external customer interactions; delivers on our brand promise of “we advance health” through innovation, accountability, empowerment, collaboration, compassion and results while ensuring one Memorial Hermann.Principal Accountabilities1. Develops complex marketing strategy and manages the ongoing implementation of fact based, goal focused, measurable marketing programs which are consistent with the Memorial Hermann strategic vision of the focused clinical service line(s) to produce a return on investment (ROI).Memorial Hermann 2Job Description – Director, Clinical Service Line Marketing II2. Collaborates with business unit executives, councils, and/or physicians and other identified departments to achieve marketing objectives. Provides strategic direction, leadership and motivation ensuring that all parties work together to achieve the bottom line measured results.3. Provides guidance for and/or resolves complex problems or conflicts.4. Initiates and directs the annual marketing planning for the assigned clinical service line(s) by reviewing demographic, socioeconomic, competitive, competitor position and other internal/external forces affecting continued business success.5. Develops and manages complex short and long term marketing objectives to capitalize on identified opportunities. Leads and manages the process of identifying clinical service lines (products) that should be formalized and optimized at Memorial Hermann. Works with upper management to implement integrated marketing model for these new services.6. Guides development and placement of advertising, PR, internal communications, research, web content, collateral, and call center initiatives related to the focused clinical service line(s).7. Ensures that marketing initiatives are tracked and measured in order to monitor their effectiveness. Reports outcomes to senior management.8. Recruit, hire, train, manage, and mentor the necessary staff to support marketing goals and objectives.9. Maintains financial accountability over their operational budget, monitoring expenses and taking measures to reduce costs as necessary.10. Clinical service line marketing subject matter expert and resource for others.11. Ensures safe care to patients, staff and visitors; adheres to all Memorial Hermann policies, procedures, and standards within budgetary specifications including time management, supply management, productivity and quality of service.12. Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education and skills competency; supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor and resource to less experienced staff.13. Other duties as assigned.MNTRCK ",Director Clinical Service Line Marketing Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-clinical-service-line-marketing-job-houston-tx-us-168841211.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1bf54820ad467796b0252581185492d8
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:46:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt Workforce Solutions is seeking an experienced Project Buyer for our large Pearland client that manufactures and services process compressors and mechanical drive steam turbines for the U.S. markets, which have seen an increase in demand driven by rapid growth in shale gas and oil development.If you want to be part of their growth story, here is what you can expect to work on in year one. For a strong, creative, growth oriented, and self-motivated Procurement Professional this is the dream - helping to build a world-class Procurement organization from the ground up:Assist Manufacturing, Engineering, New Unit Business, and After Sales Business with their daily Procurement needs, including RFP/RFQ, purchasing, QA/QC and expediting activities. As part of this, you will create a strong image of Procurement in the business and slowly bring all spend under Procurement's Control.Actively manage procurement contracts for major equipment for our US and Japan offices cradle to grave. You will also have the ability to design a lean, efficient and transparent Source-to-Pay process, develop detailed Procedures and Work Instructions, and support the roll out to our stakeholders for compliance.Support global and strategic initiatives that we are developing rapidly. You can involve yourself actively in strategic sourcing initiatives, SAP projects, and other programs that will transform our company and accelerate our growth.They are searching for a procurement professional with a Bachelor's degree in Supply Chain Management, Business, or other related field, and at least ten (10) years of progressive buying experience, of which at least two (5) years were spent as a Project Buyer supporting Capital Projects with a major Original Equipment Manufacturer, Owner/Operator, or EPC company. A technical degree and/or technical work experience is not required but would add credibility, as you will be working closely with many technical professionals.General Tasks:Work with Discipline Engineers, Project Management, Sales Professionals, and Manufacturing staff. Some of the staff may be located in Japan.Prepare Requests for Information, Quotation, or Proposal documents in accordance with the specifications, including all technical, commercial, and quality requirements.During bid evaluation cycle, coordinate requests for technical clarification, commercial communications and bid clarification meetings, as required.Expedite timely bid submission, obtain and control quotations and proposals.Prepare complete commercial bid evaluations and enable the technical colleague to prepare the technical bid evaluation. Compile the technical and commercial bid evaluations and prepare the Sourcing Recommendation for approval.Conduct commercial negotiations and ensure properly documented achievements with regard to cost and terms & conditions.Provide input to the Project Schedule and prepare Procurement Master Schedule.Organize and coordinate necessary Kick-Off Meetings, Pre-manufacturing Meetings and subsequent inspections.Execute and manage the expediting, inspection and forwarding activities and intervene as required.Lead the pre-qualification process for Suppliers and Contractors.Provide feedback to the Engineering and Manufacturing Departments as to cost data, equipment/material lead times and respective trends.Work with IT and other departments on continuous improvement projects.Coach and may supervise less experienced buyers and support staff.Support the development of policies, procedures, and work instructions, and provide relative training to internal stakeholdersMost important, however, will be your ability to demonstrate how Procurement adds value to a business, and your aptitude to drive change and innovation in a start-up environment that is lacking the structure of more mature companies. If you can do this, you will be successful in this role.Volt is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Needs to have a manufacturing background. Compressor and turbine will be a plus!Qualified candidates will possess a Bachelor's Degree in Supply Chain Management, Business or a related field with preference given to candidates having an advanced degree.Candidates should have at least ten (10) years of progressive buying (Procurement, Sourcing, Strategic Sourcing, Project Buyer, Commodity Buyer) experience in the oil and gas sector, of which at least two (5) years were spent as a Project Buyer supporting Capital Projects with a major Original Equipment Manufacturer, Owner/Operator, or EPC company.Excellent written and verbal skills along with strong computer skills (e.g. SAP, MS Office including Excel, Word and Outlook) are essential.Advanced knowledge of commercial terms, including Incoterms, and contract law (aka terms and conditions) is required.Advanced knowledge of sureties, export guarantees, performance bonds, parent company or bank guarantees, letters of credit is preferred.Advanced knowledge of import/export regulations and international trade compliance procedures is desired.Recognized Certifications in Procurement/ Supply Chain are preferred.Team player and able to build and maintain relationships both internally and externally.Change Agent with the ability to lead cross-functional teams without direct authority.Strong organizational and interpersonal skills.Travel percentage 0% to 20%.",Senior Project Buyer Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-buyer-job-houston-tx-us-169660026.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=7,,Other,9cf472cb55e6b12c2231d1ae0380e504
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:39:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeHouston, TXJob #: HHC1houTX062145  A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division. Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.We are looking for a dynamic Home Health Marketing Coordinator who holds a current medical book of business of Physician/Case Managers and Discharge Planners in and around West (Memorial City/Katy), TX. A background in Home Health, Hospice or Durable Medical Equipment Sales and Marketing is an essential requirement of this position. Your responsibilities:* Visit and establish effective rapport with physicians, office staff, discharge planners and other referral sources * Participate in external marketing, including building relationships with referral sources, supporting marketing functions sponsored by the communities to engage in community networking, conducting physician visits, and meeting with discharge planners as needed * Responsible for community home health program development* Integrate efforts with community marketing team to ensure efforts are coordinated and in line with the community's goals* Participate in the planning for expansion of patient referrals * Create and present business plan to target physicians, Assisted Living Facilities and other key referral sources Required skills and qualifications: * Bachelor's Degree with a major in Marketing, and/or Licensed Nurse preferred * Minimum of two years of experience in sales or public relations, preferably in a home health care company or a minimum of three years of nursing experience * Must have a car with current insurance coverage and a valid driver's license If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Home Health Coordinator/Sales and Marketing Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77082",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/home-health-coordinator-sales-marketing-job-houston-tx-us-168963556.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,45aada048af19cac5807c1afaf365110
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:24:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experienced Financial Advisors Only Why Spend 80% of your time prospecting and only 20% of your time advising? What if you could spend 80% of your time advising and only 20% of your time calling existing clients of the company you work for? Look no further… * Calling Orphaned Clients of AIG with the focus of upselling new investment solutions and cross selling Life Insurance and New Deposits * Comprehensive Company training program * Base salary plus commission * Full benefit package starting your 1st day of employment to include health, dental, vision, life, 401(k) and Paid Time Off. ABOUT AIG American International Group Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in 130+ countries. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the U.S. Summary: The primary purpose of the job is to: Manage between $25MM-$30MM in VALIC assets over the phone by making proactive outbound calls to VALIC clients. Engage client's regarding current investment objectives, investment strategy & financial/distribution plan to identify and close ""up sale"" opportunities with existing VALIC investments as well as ""cross sale"" opportunities resulting in additional premium or deposits to VALIC. Major Responsibilities: Sales - Utilizing our Financial Planning resources and Investment Analysis tools, engage clients regarding their current investment objective and provide specific education and guidance surrounding investment solutions available at VALIC. Assist clients in optimizing their current investment strategy by determining appropriate level of risk and asset allocation to meet clients intended investment objective. Client Service & Investment Education - Assist existing VALIC clients in the determination of appropriate investment strategy; educate clients on investment options available within current retirement account. Provide general service assistance with required minimum distributions, loans, transfers of value, enrollments, beneficiary changes, assistance reading VALIC client statements. Client Contact Management - Utilize phone, email, mail and client search tools to contact clients and update client investor profile, address and contact information in VALIC systems. Territory Performance - Develop tactical sales plan that outlines specific daily, weekly and monthly action steps required to meet individual insurance & new deposit goals. This plan must be specific and detailed, with clear goals, deliverables, and timelines. Retirement Specialists are expected to meet or exceed goals for sales, calls and contacts. Education/ Experience /Job related skills: * 3-5 years of experience in the Financial Services industry or MBA/CFA/CFP * Bachelor's degree from an accredited college and or university * State Life & Health License, FINRA Series 6 and FINRA Series 63 Required * AIG Background check includes credit, criminal, drug test, education & employment verification. #LI-TR1About AIGAmerican International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Licensed Inside Sales Financial Consultant Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-inside-sales-financial-consultant-job-houston-tx-us-169063424.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,,9659e2168e81b0869435e6bc73d16eb2
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:19:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Position responsible for serving as a clinical expert in the delivery and management of comprehensive patient care, utilizing research and evidence-based practice as necessary; for expertly caring for patients from multiple services/specialties, and for more complex diagnosis.Full Time Neuro IMU (High Acuity Step-down)RN 7p - 7a MHSWRN in the state of Texas with 1-2 years Neuro and/or IMCU/IMU experience preferred.ACLS, BLS requiredNeuro Certification or PCCN preferred but not required.Will consider high acuity Med Surg / Tele experience.Strong communication skills required.Education: Graduate of an accredited School of Professional Nursing.Experience: One or more years of nursing experience in area of intended practice.Licenses/Certification: Current State of Texas license/permit to practice professional nursing.Certified in Basic Life Support;Additional certifications will be required based on discipline and/or nursing unit requirements.Demonstrates commitment to the Partners-in-Caring process by integrating our culture in all internal and external customer interactions; delivers on our brand promise of “we advance health” through innovation, accountability, empowerment, collaboration, compassion and results while ensuring one Memorial Hermann.Principle Accountabilities:Delivers appropriate care to patients, at a competent level, according to the RN skills inventory and the age and needs of the patient/population served.Coordinates the planning for delivery of nursing care with a multidisciplinary team and administers appropriate clinical decisions in the delivery of patient care.Collaborates and directs healthcare team in attainment of positive outcomes based on data, research, evidence and professional standards of care. Meets treatment goals; develops/implements discharge and/or transfer plans; evaluates the quality of patient care and contributes to the revision of standards of care.Participates in a systemic, interdisciplinary, and ongoing evaluation of programs, process improvement, and desired client-centered outcomes.Ensures safe care to patients, staff and visitors; adheres to all Memorial Hermann policies, procedures, and standards within budgetary specifications including time management, supply management, productivity and quality of service.Promotes individual professional growth and development by meeting requirements for mandatory/continuing education and skills competency; supports department-based goals which contribute to the success of the organization; serves as preceptor, mentor and resource to less experienced staff.Other duties as assigned.MNTRAM",RN Neuro IMU Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/rn-neuro-imu-job-houston-tx-us-169098115.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),404aae4d41332f4a3eb429314a66dbe0
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:21:17:33,No,jobs.monster.com,".Superior Group is looking for a Corporate Paralegal for our client here in Houston. Duties included but not limited to:3 DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES: (not listed in any particular order) · Maintain ultimate responsibility for and corporate minute books of certain domestic and foreign subsidiaries and affiliates, including the preparation of: articles of incorporation; bylaws; minutes and consents; stock certificates; share ledgers; organizational charts; director / officer appointment and resignation; annual meetings; and, timely and accurate filings of statutory filings and local register updates. · Update, maintain and audit information in a global entity management system for all assigned legal entities, entity branches, project offices or tax registrations in countries outside of the country of formation. · Perform periodic audits of minute books and corporate files to ensure corporate compliance. · Incorporate new entities, register and de-register in domestic and foreign jurisdictions and, merge and/or dissolve/liquidate them as required. · Prepare and/or finalize powers of attorney (“POA”) to ensure compliance with corporate policies and guidelines, maintain the files of POAs and an updated log so files of expired POAs can be retired. · Research, analyze and draft secretary certificates, resolutions, legal documents and agreements pertinent to corporate transaction and corporate secretarial work. · Coordinate and work directly with the Tax Department on entity restructuring/reorganization, and intercompany matters. · Maintain filing and electronic records in relation to assigned legal entities via the company’s document management system. · Assist other paralegals and attorneys with any company secretarial requests, · Provides guidance and support to subsidiary directors on all company secretarial related matters. · Assist corporate and international offices and outside counsel with the collection of authorized signatures on legal documents, as well as legalization of documents. · Other duties as assigned. Required Skills / Qualifications:Associates degree or Paralegal degreeMinimum 3 years experiene in corporate paralegal entity management Minimum 3 years of Tax RestructuringMinimum 3 years Intercompany Contracts and managing entitiesPreferred Skills / Qualifications:Bachelors Degree Go Beyond. www.superiorjobs.com EEO Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity.",Corporate Paralegal Job in Houston,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX 77056",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-paralegal-job-houston-tx-us-169541171.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=5,,Legal,fe3194a50844c4b085c89f0062a1cdda
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:55:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  674740Location: Houston, TXResponsible for contributing in the RF Design of the existing regional LTE network and aid in getting these capital projects regulatory complete. Responsibilities: Preparing FCC/FAA submissions in a timely manner; performing radio engineering evaluation for system planning and site acquisition; file E911 for all LTE Carriers for VoLTE, understand how to read and create RFDS and Plumbing Diagrams. Update all project trackers, and work closely with local RF Engineer and Regulatory Specialist to prepare necessary zoning/regulatory filings for sites ensuring that compliance is met. Utilize propagation tools and other RF related equipment for propagation, coverage review, zoning and regulatory. Conduct RFE analysis, generate required reports and documents, and ensure 100% compliance to RFE mitigation standards within the allotted time frame.BS in Engineering or Computer Science or equivalent work experience required 2+ years of experience in the cellular or telecommunications? industry. General understanding and or working knowledge in one or more of the following platforms and/or technologies: LTE, VoLTE and/or Voice cells infrastructure including: Nokia (Lucent) and/or Ericsson. Operating systems and applications including: UNIX, Windows, MS Office Wireless data service including: LTE and CDMA.TOOLS EXPERIENCE (an added bonus): Geoplan, ATOLL, Siterra, MapInfo, FCC ASR and ULS databases other desired tools (a plus). Should have a good understanding of engineering concepts, and must show aptitude and desire to learn and advance in a technical field. Highly proficient in office computer applications: Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and Access Good analytical, interpersonal, and communication skills.Candidates must be able to work on company W2If interested in applying, please contact Stephanie Brand at sbrand@apexsystemsinc.com with an updated copy of your resume and a number where you can be reached.  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Associate Engineer-RF (Net) Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  674740Location: Houston, TXResponsible for contributing in the RF Design of the existing regional LTE network and aid in getting these capital projects regulatory complete. Responsibilities: Preparing FCC/FAA submissions in a timely manner; performing radio engineering evaluation for system planning and site acquisition; file E911 for all LTE Carriers for VoLTE, understand how to read and create RFDS and Plumbing Diagrams. Update all project trackers, and work closely with local RF Engineer and Regulatory Specialist to prepare necessary zoning/regulatory filings for sites ensuring that compliance is met. Utilize propagation tools and other RF related equipment for propagation, coverage review, zoning and regulatory. Conduct RFE analysis, generate required reports and documents, and ensure 100% compliance to RFE mitigation standards within the allotted time frame.BS in Engineering or Computer Science or equivalent work experience required 2+ years of experience in the cellular or telecommunications? industry. General understanding and or working knowledge in one or more of the following platforms and/or technologies: LTE, VoLTE and/or Voice cells infrastructure including: Nokia (Lucent) and/or Ericsson. Operating systems and applications including: UNIX, Windows, MS Office Wireless data service including: LTE and CDMA.TOOLS EXPERIENCE (an added bonus): Geoplan, ATOLL, Siterra, MapInfo, FCC ASR and ULS databases other desired tools (a plus). Should have a good understanding of engineering concepts, and must show aptitude and desire to learn and advance in a technical field. Highly proficient in office computer applications: Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and Access Good analytical, interpersonal, and communication skills.Candidates must be able to work on company W2If interested in applying, please contact Stephanie Brand at sbrand@apexsystemsinc.com with an updated copy of your resume and a number where you can be reached.  EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-engineer-rf-net-job-houston-tx-us-169708866.aspx?mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),980288b148d3a5fcf1c26e9ce900a471
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:52:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field Sales RepresentativeDirect Hire opportunity for a Field Sales Representative located in Houston, TX.Company Profile:Company that specializes in Anticorrosion solutions for the Oil & Gas IndustryInternational Company that is establishing its’ North American presenceHas been in business for 20 yearsFeatures and Benefits:This is an opportunity to be the first US employeeBenefit package will be offeredCommission/Bonus opportunityYour Role:Present and sell company products and services to current and potential clients.Prepare action plans and schedules to identify specific targets and to project the number of contacts to be made.Follow up on new leads and referrals resulting from field activity.Identify sales prospects and contact these and other accounts as assigned.Prepare presentations, proposals and sales contracts.Develop and maintain sales materials and current product knowledge.Establish and maintain current client and potential client relationships.Prepare paperwork to activate and maintain contract services.Manage account services through quality checks and other follow-up.Identify and resolve client concerns.Prepare a variety of status reports, including activity, closings, follow-up, and adherence to goals.Communicate new product and service opportunities, special developments, information, or feedback gathered through field activity to appropriate company staff.Coordinate company staff to accomplish the work required to close sales.Background Profile:Bachelor’s degree2 to 5 years of experience and a proven track record and expertise in sales and business development gained within the oilfield services or oilfield equipment supply segments. Attuned to operating in the North America cultural environment, familiar with the dynamics and challenges of doing business across the region with broad exposure to the complexity of delivering high sales performance within an oilfield services business of scale. Will be in a position to demonstrate strong, current and relevant networks in the North American exploration and production communities and must be prepared to embrace extensive regional travel and some international travel when needed. Excellent communication and interpersonal skills. Will demonstrate a natural flair for influencing people at all levels, internal and external, to achieve common purpose and collective success.Commercially-astute.Must display high business ethics.Ambitious and career orientated.Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/customer-service.html Improve your job search reach with www.sumry.me/?afmc=ftl and let potential employers see you beyond just your resume.  It’s a smart way to invest in your search and the hottest trend in making a successful job transition. Frontline Source Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/houston-galleria.html  ",Field Sales Representative Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/field-sales-representative-job-houston-tx-us-169201815.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f10ccfe9db19b4e08020077cd3797710
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:32:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse Full Time Days - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279629 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Registered Nurse Full Time Days - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land Job in Sugar Land,"Full Time, Employee","Registered Nurse Full Time Days - Kindred Hospital Sugar Land ( Job Number: 279629 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Registered Nurse / RN The Registered Nurse / RN job provides planning and delivery of direct and indirect patient care through the nursing process of Assessment, Planning, Intervention, and Evaluation.  The Registered Nurse / RN develops nursing care plan in coordination with patient, family, and interdisciplinary staff as necessary. The RN / Registered Nurse will communicate changes in patient's clinical condition with Physicians, Nursing Supervisor/Manager, and co-workers as appropriate. the Registered Nurse / RN will also participate in discharge planning process. Registered Nurse / RN, RN, R.N., Registered Nurse, Med Surg, Med Surge, Medical Surgical, Medical/Surgical, Med/Surg, Med/Surge, ICU, CC, CCU, Critical Care, telemetry, acute care, intensive care unit, post-acute, emergency room, E.R., ER, step down, transitional care, nurse, nursing, Clinical Nurse, Critical Care Nurse, Hospital, Healthcare #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Graduation from an accredited Bachelors of Science in Nursing as Registered Nurse / RN or Associate Degree in Nursing or Nursing Diploma program as a Registered Nurse / RN. Licenses/Certification: Current state licensure as Registered Nurse / RN. BCLS certification is required. ACLS preferred.   Experience: A Minimum six months as a Registered nurse / RN with Medical/Surgical experience in an acute care setting preferred. If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : RN Primary Location : TX-Sugar Land-Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Organization : 4818 - Kindred Hospital-Sugar Land Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-full-time-days-kindred-hospital-sugar-land-job-sugar-land-tx-us-169913331.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,e3e11313e7510dca9accc02303c644e7
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:32:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regional Account ManagerCompany:Cogent Communications is a multinational, Tier 1 facilities-based ISP, consistently ranked as one of the top five networks in the world and is publicly traded on the NASDAQ Stock Market under the ticker symbol CCOI. Cogent specializes in providing businesses with high speed Internet access and Ethernet transport services. Cogent's facilities-based, all-optical IP network backbone provides IP services in over 190 markets globally. Since its inception, Cogent has unleashed the benefits of IP technology, building one of the largest and highest capacity IP networks in the world. This network enables Cogent to offer large bandwidth connections at highly competitive prices. Cogent also offers superior customer support by virtue of its end-to-end control of service delivery and network monitoring. A generous base salary, structured tenure pay increases and an uncapped commissions plan offers you an unlimited earnings potential. A full benefits package takes effect within 30 days of employment. Matching 401k and stock options are also included.Responsibilities:Hunting to identify new business opportunities within a Regional Sales Territory and target market segment of SMB and Mid-Market corporate customers (up to 499 employees)Through direct calling, email and other contact efforts you will identify, qualify, and generate these new business opportunities by working directly with Key Decision MakersCompliment prospecting and selling efforts through field work such as building walks, lobby events, property management relationships, and customer face to face meetingsLeverage consultative and relationship building selling techniques you will identify current and future connectivity solutionsHelp Cogent customers and prospects by positioning our services for new businessAchieve monthly revenue goals by selling into the nation's largest commercial and retail buildings; office parks and professional campusesQualifications:1-4+ years of solid, sales experience, preferably B2B in the technology fieldPrevious sales experience (recent experience strongly preferred) with a track record of success is requiredStrong oral and written communication skills are a mustAbility to work in a fast paced, team environment with revenue deadlinesWorking knowledge of computer applications such as Microsoft Office and Salesforce are a plusA college degree is preferredTo apply for the Regional Account Manager position, please submit your resume and cover letter to careers@cogentco.com .Cogent Communications is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Regional Account Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-account-manager-job-houston-tx-us-159328741.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=15,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e9f01d978540f36102139acd0ed2f3e6
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:31:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  669536Position Title:Sr. PeopleSoft AnalystDuration:PermanentLocation:Houston, TX (Texas Medical Center)Pay:Negotiable, based on experienceState Date:ASAPSummary:We are searching for a Senior Systems Analyst - someone who works well in a fast-paced hospital setting. In this position, you’ll organize and administer the configuration and development of Integrated Delivery Systems; devise and design functional/technical requirements of systems; and be charged with the documentation and development of well-defined methods, procedures, programs, and configurations in the delivery of systems.Responsibilities:Analyzes and conducts the design and modification of Integrated Delivery System systemsImplements and controls the configuration and development of systemsAdministers program and system testsDevelops system documentationMaintains systemsCoordinates activities and information dissemination with manager, other Information Services personnel, users, and vendorsDevelop and maintain effective relationships with business stakeholders to understand business needs and translate them into systems and reporting solutionsParticipates in strategic planning and Hospital-wide data planningQualifications:Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related fieldA minimum of three (3) years of major system design and implementation experienceA Master’s degree or an equivalent combination of education and related work experience may be substituted for those specified aboveMaster’s of Science Degree preferredExperience in PeopleSoft Supply Chain Management working with eProcurement, Purchasing, Inventory modules requiredComplete understanding of the interaction between Purchasing/ePro, Inventory, and General LedgerFunctional Design, Configuration, Systems Integration, Test Script DevelopmentWork with other analysts to coordinate the production support, configuration, setup, maintenance, customizations and enhancements of PeopleSoft Supply Chain applicationProject management or project leadership experience preferredKnowledge at expert level of current application and system development techniquesKnowledge of relational databases, appropriate programming languages, data structures, associated computer hardware, computer networking, a variety of operating systems, and client/server data processing techniquesAbility to demonstrate logicPlease contact Ryan Tepera at rtepera@apexsystemsinc.com to apply.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.",Sr. Systems Analyst Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  669536Position Title:Sr. PeopleSoft AnalystDuration:PermanentLocation:Houston, TX (Texas Medical Center)Pay:Negotiable, based on experienceState Date:ASAPSummary:We are searching for a Senior Systems Analyst - someone who works well in a fast-paced hospital setting. In this position, you’ll organize and administer the configuration and development of Integrated Delivery Systems; devise and design functional/technical requirements of systems; and be charged with the documentation and development of well-defined methods, procedures, programs, and configurations in the delivery of systems.Responsibilities:Analyzes and conducts the design and modification of Integrated Delivery System systemsImplements and controls the configuration and development of systemsAdministers program and system testsDevelops system documentationMaintains systemsCoordinates activities and information dissemination with manager, other Information Services personnel, users, and vendorsDevelop and maintain effective relationships with business stakeholders to understand business needs and translate them into systems and reporting solutionsParticipates in strategic planning and Hospital-wide data planningQualifications:Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related fieldA minimum of three (3) years of major system design and implementation experienceA Master’s degree or an equivalent combination of education and related work experience may be substituted for those specified aboveMaster’s of Science Degree preferredExperience in PeopleSoft Supply Chain Management working with eProcurement, Purchasing, Inventory modules requiredComplete understanding of the interaction between Purchasing/ePro, Inventory, and General LedgerFunctional Design, Configuration, Systems Integration, Test Script DevelopmentWork with other analysts to coordinate the production support, configuration, setup, maintenance, customizations and enhancements of PeopleSoft Supply Chain applicationProject management or project leadership experience preferredKnowledge at expert level of current application and system development techniquesKnowledge of relational databases, appropriate programming languages, data structures, associated computer hardware, computer networking, a variety of operating systems, and client/server data processing techniquesAbility to demonstrate logicPlease contact Ryan Tepera at rtepera@apexsystemsinc.com to apply.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-systems-analyst-job-houston-tx-us-169861091.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a00bcab5920cf117e07044873a564ad7
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:26:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Houston E, TX YBWBD07S-POS_75063102-1DescriptionSanofi Genzyme focuses on developing specialty treatments for debilitating diseases that are often difficult to diagnose and treat, providing hope to patients and their families.Sanofi Genzyme has pioneered the development and delivery of transformative therapies for patients affected by rare and debilitating diseases for over 30 years. We accomplish our goals through world-class research, collaboration with the global patient community, and with the compassion and commitment of our employees. With a focus on specialty areas including: immunology, oncology and multiple sclerosis, we are dedicated to making a positive impact on the lives of the patients and families we serve. Sanofi Genzyme's portfolio of transformative therapies, represent groundbreaking and life-saving advances in medicine. As a Sanofi company, Sanofi Genzyme benefits from the reach and resources of one of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies, with a shared commitment to improving the lives of patients.At Sanofi Genzyme, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Dupilumab Area Business ManagerThe Area Business Manager (ABM) is responsible for engaging Dermatologists and other key customers within an assigned geography and presenting clinically focused selling message to create and grow revenue and to consistently deliver product goals. The ABM will demonstrate initiative, drive, and independence, and take ownership for meeting and exceeding individual business goals. This will be accomplished by driving performance and delivering results in a compliant manner with a high degree of integrity strictly following all Sanofi Genzyme US policies and in compliance with all policies and procedures governing the promotion of pharmaceutical/biological products in the US. Engage Dermatology customers within assigned geographical territory and deliver clinically focused message to introduce, launch, grow brand-share and revenue, and to consistently deliver on product goals.Partner with multiple collaboration stakeholders: Regeneron Sales Professional counterpart, Reimbursement and Access Specialists, and Clinical brand and corporate objectives in assigned territory Develop strategy and execute tactics within key accounts in the Dermatology therapeutic area to generate product utilization.Develop strong working relationships with Atopic Dermatitis experts and all additional Dermatology specialists in assigned geography as well as nurses, office staff and other important health care personnel and key patient advocacy support groups as directed. Coordinate with other Dermatology field specialists such as Regional Science Liaisons, Field Account Specialists, Account Management and Nurse Educators in their territory to ensure optimal account success. Coordinate and communicate with other field-based and home office personnel teams to proactively address customer needs, market dynamics and trends and develop strategies which support brand and corporate objectives within their assigned geography. Participate and help lead initiatives to support sales success as assigned (e.g. participate in industry related congresses, local and regional meetings and medical conferences).Provide site level in-service training as required by account.Plan, organize, and sponsor local promotional speakers programs and activities.Effectively executes short and long term strategic plans.Maximize budget allocated to the geographic territory assigned to support execution of strategies and tactics developed to generate and grow the business.Drive results by identifying key opportunities and developing strategic plans to enhance and grow territory business.Own business opportunities within respective geographic area, which includes coordination and calling upon large group practices and other key targets to drive overall product results.Establish relationship with thought leaders in assigned territory. Primary objective is to drive industry leading customer value. Lead cross-functional teams in the implementation of Sanofi US programs and brand specific strategies in assigned geography.Allocate resources in accordance with business opportunities.QualificationsBasic QualificationsBachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university5+ years of healthcare sales experience (pharmaceutical, biotech or medical device), with 2+ years Dermatology experience strongly preferredDemonstrated ability to learn and apply technical and scientific product-related informationAbility to travel to meetings/trainings/programs as necessary - additional travel may be required within the assigned territoryProven success and positive track record of consistent sales performance in complex markets with diverse customer segments operating with a high degree of integrity within compliance guidelines Ability to operate as a “team player” in cooperation with collaboration partners and internal colleagues to reach common goalsValid Driver’s LicensePreferred Qualifications2 years selling sub-cutaneous self-injectable (or office administered IV) biologics 2 years of selling experience for Atopic Dermatitis, or other Immunology disorders such as, Psoriasis, Multiple Sclerosis, Crohn’s Disease or Ulcerative Colitis and others strongly preferred.Demonstrate advanced clinically-based selling skills Results oriented with a proven track record of success with product launchesExperience with in-servicing and training office staff, nurses and office managersDemonstrate a passion and learning aptitude for science and is proactive in strengthening knowledge related to disease-state, treatment options and healthcare trends #LI-GZJob:SalesPrimary Location:United States-US Remote-US RemoteOther Locations:United States-Texas-HoustonJob Posting:Jul 13, 2016, 11:52:55 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Dermatology (Dupilumab) Area Business Manager - Houston E,,"Houston, TX",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/dermatology-dupilumab-area-business-manager-houston-e-tx-ybwbd07s-job-houston-tx-us-169746068.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,8be69018816a026f13e5deb1942bbfb5
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:20:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO   The fun and exciting world of event sales is calling for you! Will you answer? Our part time Event Specialist jobs give you the opportunity to represent the best brands on the market today! You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and retail sales. As a part time Event Specialist, you will work in one of the following locations: Albertsons, Albertsons Market, ACME Markets, Amigos, Carrs, Jewel-Osco, Market Street, Pavilions, Randalls, Safeway, Shaws, Star Market, Super Saver by Albertsons, Tom Thumb, United Supermarket, and Vons. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.        Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products. Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines. Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery preferred. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Access to reliable transportation. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods.  Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers.  We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales and Marketing LLC, dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO Job in Houston,Part Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-aco-job-houston-tx-us-169627896.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=19,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,77dc6c525791d9dad257074d1c38e54b
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2015:20:18:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is seeking a Field Engineer with in depth experience with Nokia market upgrades and sector add experience, for our client in the Houston, TX area. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Field Engineer IILocation: Houston, TX 77046Work Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US; ability to pass a drug and background screeningCompensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableResponsibilities / Expectations:Management of general contractor job quality, safety standards, and punch lists.Perform cell site audits after site is built to evaluate GC work qualityProvide reports to Construction ManagersInteract with outside governmental agencies, consultants and vendorsMaintain database of design walks, contacts, unique addressesCoordinate with utility companies for construction work and other situations as they ariseBuild and maintain superb relationship with clientDay to day completion of assigned work orders and trouble ticketsPerforming required maintenance on assigned sitesMonitoring site KPIs and troubleshooting with RF EngineerPerforming On Call duties at least one week per monthAddress defective Repair & Maintenance parts for marketOversee LTE deployment and integration of new technologies on assigned sitesRespond to Sales Team issues and customer complaintsDesired Experience:At least 3 years relevant experience required.Candidates experienced with Nokia market upgrades is a plus. ie- L700/L1900/ and sector add construction experienceExperis also has many other opportunities with this client in other markets.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Field Engineer II Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Experis is seeking a Field Engineer with in depth experience with Nokia market upgrades and sector add experience, for our client in the Houston, TX area. This is a long term contract opportunity with the potential for extension or to move into a perm role upon successful completion of the contract. Job Title: Field Engineer IILocation: Houston, TX 77046Work Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US; ability to pass a drug and background screeningCompensation: DOE medical and dental benefits availableResponsibilities / Expectations:Management of general contractor job quality, safety standards, and punch lists.Perform cell site audits after site is built to evaluate GC work qualityProvide reports to Construction ManagersInteract with outside governmental agencies, consultants and vendorsMaintain database of design walks, contacts, unique addressesCoordinate with utility companies for construction work and other situations as they ariseBuild and maintain superb relationship with clientDay to day completion of assigned work orders and trouble ticketsPerforming required maintenance on assigned sitesMonitoring site KPIs and troubleshooting with RF EngineerPerforming On Call duties at least one week per monthAddress defective Repair & Maintenance parts for marketOversee LTE deployment and integration of new technologies on assigned sitesRespond to Sales Team issues and customer complaintsDesired Experience:At least 3 years relevant experience required.Candidates experienced with Nokia market upgrades is a plus. ie- L700/L1900/ and sector add construction experienceExperis also has many other opportunities with this client in other markets.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Houston, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/field-engineer-ii-job-houston-tx-us-169832323.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=2,,Engineering,6fbad11b825c32a7055862490b6522bc
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:02:43:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  677198Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsHadoop AdminExperience with Hadoop (Hortonworks) Cloudera and MapR is ok.Core troubleshooting skills within hadoop environmentAbility to configure, monitor, deploy nodesArchitecture and Troubleshooting Experience.Excellent Linux ExperienceQualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Hadoop Administrator Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  677198Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsHadoop AdminExperience with Hadoop (Hortonworks) Cloudera and MapR is ok.Core troubleshooting skills within hadoop environmentAbility to configure, monitor, deploy nodesArchitecture and Troubleshooting Experience.Excellent Linux ExperienceQualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hadoop-administrator-job-houston-tx-us-169796650.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d0ead3301c503731ed99e4ff630afd26
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:02:44:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Houston TX Top of FormThe Applications Support Specialist – PeopleSoft  Financials Expenses provides application support to end users on a variety of issues/support for PeopleSoft Modules – Expenses, Travel Authorizations and Norwegian Expenses System, Unit4.  Duties & Responsibilities Lead the configuration, setup, maintenance, customizations and implementation of PeopleSoft Financial application to company specifications.Lead all worldwide business units & service lines to ensure compliance with overall company PeopleSoft Financial application initiatives.Develop and maintain executive approved PeopleSoft Financial application business programs.Define business requirements to meet PeopleSoft Financial application business imperatives.Lead executive approved PeopleSoft Financial application initiatives/priorities with management, end users, IT and other support organizations.Lead testing of all PeopleSoft Financial application solutions, process and functionality to ensure delivery of quality solutions.Interface with the Business to resolve PeopleSoft Financial application related issues, including data quality and system performance.Proactively develop “best practices” and standards.Develop systems’ interfaces with other enterprise system owners to ensure that business processes are streamlined and business goals are achieved.Lead document configuration and testing of financial modules to company specifications.Ensure effective organizational change management for PeopleSoft Financial application including training, communications and organizational alignment.Maintain a website dedicated to the PeopleSoft Financial system which provides information to financial end users and Core Team on matters related to PS System financial policies and procedures, end user problem resolution, frequently asked questions (FAQs), etc.Measure and report on the impact of the PeopleSoft Financial application on business process efficiency, effectiveness and user satisfaction.Participate in upgrade teams.Possible travel both domestically and internationally.Work closely with both internal and external customers, as required. QualificationsBachelor’s Degree in Finance or related field and at least five (5) years of very strong and highly detailed knowledge of PeopleSoft 9.X, experience on PeopleSoft version 8.8 or higher required, or equivalent combination of education and experience.  Master Degree a plus. Required: Experience and knowledge with PeopleSoft Financials ExpensesA general knowledge of additional PeopleSoft Financials modules: Accounts Payable, Accounts Receivable, Asset Management, Cash Management, General Ledger, Project Costing, Billing and Contracts.Highly competent in business process development, analysis and continuous improvement with the PeopleSoft domain. Experience with software lifecycle including data conversion and system testing.Experience with PeopleSoft Financials multi-currency environment(s).Knowledge of multiple international currencies in PeopleSoft Financials is required. Desired: Working knowledge of interfacing with other PS production environments and third party applications.Solid team leadership and management skills.Prior experience working with multiple cultures and nationalities.Prior experience with SQLCOMPENSATION Base Salary - $ DOEFull BenefitsRelocation Assistance Available - Yes  Commission Compensation - No  Bonus Eligible - No  Overtime Eligible - No  Interview Travel Reimbursed – yes depending CANDIDATE DETAILS5+ to 15 years experience Management Experience Required - No Minimum Education - Bachelor's Degree Willingness to Travel - NeverSKILLS AND CERTIFICATIONS [note: bold skills and certification are required] PeopleSoft 9.xExpense Module PeopleSoft Financials PeopleSoft 8.8 or higher ADDITIONAL DETAILS Location: Houston Industry: Manufacturing & Production Job Category: Information Technology - System Support Hours Per Week: 40 Visa Candidate Considered: NoBottom of Form ",Applications Support Specialist Peoplesoft Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/applications-support-specialist-peoplesoft-job-houston-tx-us-169544783.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=1,"115,000.00 - 124,500.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,0463a1616785d05792a4355c0d6bb949
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:03:43:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of our Clients, a specialty chemicals producer in the Houston, Texas area, has an immediate opening for an Environmental Manager.Primary ResponsibilitiesProvide overall leadership and direction to the company’s environmental policies and strategic initiatives.Identify, develop and implement programs to drive improvements that support environmental excellence, consistent with the company’s goals.  Lead project teams, as appropriate.Supervise other members of the environmental team.  Provide coaching and mentoring to encourage personnel development.Continually improve the company’s policies, plans and procedures to promote compliance with applicable environmental requirements under Federal, State and Local regulations.Maintain working knowledge of all applicable environmental laws, regulations, and industry standards.Provide leadership and support with incident investigation, emergency response planning, employee training, process hazard analyses, and contractor evaluation efforts.Provide guidance and leadership to all levels of the organization with respect to the company’s HES compliance tools and strategies.Enhance relationships with outside entities, including governmental and non-governmental organizations that are part of the company’s success in its HES programs.Provide direction in air pollution, potable water, storm water discharges, spill prevention & response, hazardous substance management & release reporting, and pollution prevention.Apply state-of-the-art and innovative management techniques and engineering solutions, including information systems and engineering approaches to resolve HES issues and to achieve program objectives on schedule.Utilize a real-time, data-driven approach to track, monitor, and improve environmental performance, consistent with company goals and objectives.Loss control responsibilities which include: conducting inspections and audits related to the Loss Control program as assigned, participating in Hazard Reviews as needed, recommending safety improvements, completion of safety action items as assigned, completing required regulatory training, and compliance with all applicable regulations.Actively/routinely monitors facility conditions and plant operations and maintenance activities to ensure HES compliance. Maintain visibility among plant personnel at all levels.RequiredBachelors degree or higher in Chemical Engineering, Environmental Engineering, or related discipline.Minimum of fifteen years of plant experience with relevant industrial experience.Working knowledge of federal, state, and local environmental related laws and regulations as they affect the plant.Class D Potable Water Operator Certification.RCRA/DOT Certification.EPA Method 9 Certification.Our client offers competitive compensation, an excellent benefits package, a 9/80 work schedule, and much more.Please send your resume in Word.doc format to Reed Rogers at reed@parkwoodintl.com and refer to Job No. 10764.",Environmental Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/environmental-manager-job-houston-tx-us-169648646.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=14,,Engineering,c487d506c73ae9575521077dd6e5bd91
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:03:44:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Engineering Manager Required Skills: Oversee the design / fielding of the Outside Plant Fiber Network to a fully constructible “LightGig” job package and maintain the highest standard of deliverables qualityManage the production of efficient designs for new developments, network construction, and network upgradesPerform Quality reviews and all fielded projectsPerform a Quality compare of the OPTI prints to the fielding prints for full matchMeet or exceed client delivery schedules and quality standardsAttend face to face meetings with client Establish and maintain positive relationships with local customer representatives and third-parties and ensure efficient processes are in placeSupport finance metric development, reporting and dashboard reportingLead and provide managerial insight and direction to a technically oriented workforce dealing with large volumes of projects driven by dynamic customer needsAdditional duties as assigned/needed  Additional Requirements: Seven years minimum of technical and management work related experience in the telecommunications industry with emphasis on transmission methods, OSP, optical networks, project management and direct customer interface.",Engineering Manager (LG) Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77092",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/engineering-manager-lg-job-houston-tx-us-169844193.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=20,,Engineering,49898e0a558b54c7a7036cbe3378b74e
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:04:00:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ambitious Commercial Superintendents needed in Houston TX. Our, Client, an established company that represents integrity in the construction industry has been widely recognized in Houston for three generations. They have quickly developed a reputation for providing customers with innovative solutions, establishing themselves as one of the largest and most diversified construction organizations in the nation. Having secured a number of projects in Houston, they are looking for an experienced construction superintendents to join the team and deliver complex, high quality ground up construction projects up to $50 million in value. As the lead superintendent you will review plans, manage schedules, build rapport with subcontractors as well as owners and architects on the project . Daily inspections of work completed as per the job specs, as well as maintaining the working hours and making sure safety on site is held at the highest priority. A competitive salary package along with full benefits, 401K and employee wellness programs will be negotiated on experience. Take the initiative to move your career closer to your personal objectives and ensure your future to be successful. If however you are not looking for a new opportunity right now but know of someone that is with the right experience, please pass on my details and have them get in touch with me.",Commercial Superintendent Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-superintendent-job-houston-tx-us-169439988.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=17,"85,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,cfe2bc9b687fdcaf1113a9ee67c53756
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:04:40:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Great opportunity with stable global logistics company in North Houston with full benefits package! Entry level position that offers hands-on training for the right candidate!The Export Coordinator is an administrative support role with emphasis on data entry. Candidates to be considered must have the following skills: ? Data Entry (Minimum of 45 WPM)? Microsoft Word & Excel proficiency? Bilingual fluency (Japanese a plus!)If you are excited about taking the next step in your career and growing with a dynamic team, then this Export Coordinator role maybe just for you!Please note that each candidate will be given assessments to confirm data entry, MS proficiency and bilingual fluency / skill level. Must have verifiable references. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1055693 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Bilingual Export Coordinator - Great Benefits Package! Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77032",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-export-coordinator-great-benefits-package!-job-houston-tx-us-169851103.aspx?mescoid=1300096001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),45b266a03dabe9172eaa3f7202491633
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:04:41:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you love Babies? Do you enjoy taking pictures with your camera or cell phone? Are you looking for a part time job with great earning potential?  Are you confident and enjoy meeting new people?  If you answered yes to these questions, working for Mom365 as a Newborn Sales Photographer may be a perfect fit for you. We will teach you our sales approach to help you be successful. Apply today and join our Family! Develop and foster an excellent customer service relationship with Mom,  Families, and Mom365 Hospital Partners (including the hospital staff) Photograph newborn babies in a hospital setting with Mom365 photography equipment and meet company expectations for photo per hour Photograph newborns in accordance with the Mom365 Official Approved poses Maintain professionalism when adjusting work routines to accommodate any special emotion and/or physical conditions of Moms’ and babies Comply with hospital policies, HIPAA regulations, security, safety, sanitation, and infection control guidelines Present and sell Mom365 products by using Mom365 Official Bedside Presentation Meet sales goals and targets Perform maintenance of camera equipment to avoid service problems Organize and maintain supplies and marketing material Develop and maintain a team player relationship with co-workers, the District Manager, and Hospital Partners. 2+ years of sales or customer service experience preferred. 18 years of age Able to work weekends and holidays (when required) Looking for part time position Must be comfortable holding newborn babies Comfortable working in a hospital environment Reliable, professional demeanor, disciplined, and an outgoing personality Excellent Time Management skills Display good judgment Work the scheduled hours and meet the staffing demands of the position Excellent verbal and written communication skills Basic computer skills Requires a high school diploma or GED depending upon work location Must have reliable internet access Completion of background checks and health screenings. #INDEED",Bilingual Newborn Photographer/Sales Representative (Part-Time) - (Houston,"Part Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-newborn-photographer-sales-representative-part-time-houston-tx-job-houston-tx-us-169540552.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,81f8682c9dfcfcc2dce0408982bf016a
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:05:44:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  671391Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsParticipate with team of technical staff and business managers or practitioners in the business unit to determine systems requirements and functionalities needed in large/complex development project.Assess and develop high level design requirements for project and communicate in writing or in meetings with development team. Assess detailed specifications against design requirements.Review coding done to advance application upgrade, extension, or other development. Analyze application for data integrity issues.Develop test protocols or plan for testing revised application and review test results.Serve as project lead or lead technical staff in course of application development projectMay mentor less experienced technical staff; may use high end development tools to assist or facilitate development process.QualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Hadoop Developer Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  671391Role: Hadoop AdministratorIndustry: Oil & GasLocation: Houston, TXDuration: Direct HireJob Requirement for Big Data DeveloperDevelop, modify, or update Big Data applications used by business or infrastructure units for high speed Data ingestion.Participate in or review all of the steps in the software development life cycle to create and modify the software.Key Job FunctionsParticipate with team of technical staff and business managers or practitioners in the business unit to determine systems requirements and functionalities needed in large/complex development project.Assess and develop high level design requirements for project and communicate in writing or in meetings with development team. Assess detailed specifications against design requirements.Review coding done to advance application upgrade, extension, or other development. Analyze application for data integrity issues.Develop test protocols or plan for testing revised application and review test results.Serve as project lead or lead technical staff in course of application development projectMay mentor less experienced technical staff; may use high end development tools to assist or facilitate development process.QualificationsMINIMUM EXPERIENCE7+ years of related experienceSPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS6+ years of hands on experience and strong and deep knowledge of Java application development5+ years of hands on experience in LINUX, Java/J2EE & SOA platformsExperience processing large amounts of structured and unstructured data. 2 years of building and coding applications Using Hadoop Components –  Kafka, Storm, HDFS, Hbase, Hive, Sqoop etc1 year coding Java MapReduce, Python, Pig programming, Hadoop Streaming and HiveQL5 plus years implementing relational data models1 year experience developing REST web servicesExperience with Agile/Scrum development methodologiesExperience leading and managing large scale, complex applications with high performance needsVendor management experience leveraging staff augmentation and/or outcome based project delivery models as well as statement of work planning and incremental demand forecastingExperience managing on-site and off-site staff and demonstrated ability to collaborate and influence others to ensure timely and effective completion of project tasksExcellent written and verbal communication skillsIf you are interested in applying to this opportunity, please contact Chris Barry at 713-266-6557 or cbarry@apexsystemsinc.com EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hadoop-developer-job-houston-tx-us-169894024.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4a207fe8fdd61bd6fdc9a1896c495281
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:05:44:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staff Development Manager DescriptionSummaryEnsures facility is in compliance with regulatory requirements relating to staff credentialing and education. Provides services associated with ongoing professional development of staff at the facility.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesConducts new employee orientation and coordinates competency completion.Ensures for or delivers annual mandatory and continuous education for staff using internal or external resources according to state and federal regulations and company policy.Teaches certain in-house courses, such as the NA training program, special care unit training, etc.Coordinates employee health program (immunizations, flu shots, physical exams, etc.)Monitors and ensures current licensure and certifications of facility staff.Maintains employee education, training and health files.May assist in the screening and hiring of nursing staff.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. Staff Development Manager RequirementsQualificationsOne to three (1-3) years experience in health care field, teaching, or training and development.May be filled by Registered Nurse, LPN, or a non-nursing individual who otherwise qualifies by way of experience or education.Physical Demands & EnvironmentEmployee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee will occasionally lift objects weighing up to 50 lbs. Employee may occasionally be exposed to blood or other body fluids. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Staff Development Manager RN - Jacinto Nursing Home Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-development-manager-rn-jacinto-nursing-home-job-houston-tx-us-169959558.aspx?mescoid=1100029001001&jobPosition=13,,,48d88470aab8e192bf501676bcd7ee23
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:06:40:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:                Serves patients – adolescent and adults, ages 12 -54 with a variety of socioeconomic and cultural backgrounds   PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Assesses and manages laboring woman’s physical condition/parameters and progress through the labor and delivery, including significant other in the process Assesses fetal well being by means of electronic fetal monitoring and other standard parameters Immediate stabilization of the neonate  Maternal recovery after delivery (vaginal or cesarean section)  Assumes circulating role for vaginal or cesarean section delivery Assesses for and in collaboration with medical staff, stabilizes and evaluates effectiveness of interventions for obstetrical/medical complications such as:·         Pre-term Premature Rupture of Membranes (PPROM) ·         Pre-term Labor (PTL) ·         Pregnancy Induced Hypertension (PIH) ·         Hemolysis Elevated Liver Enzymes and Low Platelets (HELLP) ·         Diabetes ·         Placenta Previa ·         Placental Abruption   Initiates parent infant bonding promoting a baby-friendly environment Assesses learning needs and teaches patient and familyScope of Care: The Family Birth Center (FBC) comprises of 2 floors of the Women's Center. The third floor has twenty-eight (28) beds and a Transition Nursery. The fourth floor has twenty-two (22) beds with the capability to flex up to twenty-eight (28) beds. The fourth floor has the capability of a Transition Nursery. Work Experience: One year experience in high risk L&D.   License/Registration/ Certification: Current RN permit or licensure issued by the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of Texas to practice professional nursing.Current American Heart Association Healthcare Provider certification required. Current NRP certification required.  Education & Training Completion of an accredited school of nursing program resulting in an Associate Degree, Diploma or Baccalaureate degree in nursing.   Electronic Fetal Monitoring education annually.Skills: Technical, clerical, critical thinking and interpersonal skills relevant to total patient care/area in order to safely and efficiently treat patients.  Good verbal and written communication skills necessary in order to be clearly and easily understood by patients, families and members of the Health Care team.  Writes/prints legibly in order to document accurately and understandably, and to provide direction to support staff and others.  Demonstrates a pleasant, helpful and caring demeanor in order to be an effective patient advocate.    EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER MINORITIES / WOMEN / VETERANS / DISABLED",Registered Nurse (RN) - Labor & Delivery (L&D); FT; Days; A-P Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77001",,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-labor-delivery-l-d-ft-days-7a-7p-job-houston-tx-us-169634031.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,c98b7031f04e7585783edaf91c55d750
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:06:41:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a law firm in West Knoxville, is seeking a Paralegal to work in its Social Security department.  Qualified candidate will have prior experience with social security.  Job duties include filing appeals, initial consultations, preparing hearing notebooks and completing medical summaries.  This is a temporary-to-hire opportunity with a full-time schedule.  Hourly pay for this role is $15 to $22, DOE.  To apply for this opportunity, please send your resume to: resume@argjobs.com.ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Paralegal Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/paralegal-job-knoxville-tn-us-169838548.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=9,15.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,Legal,d6494a8c8ddafb3e31300430a57bfe95
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:06:41:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assistant Superintendent needed to join a growing team Our client, one of the largest, most diversified builders in the United States are nationally recognized for their exceptional and innovative construction solutions across multiple market sectors, with a mixture of both public and private work across the country. Due to an expanding project portfolio and commitment to delivering quality services, they are looking for an assistant superintendent with experience on projects from $10-30 million. You will find yourself working with a team of experienced professionals focusing on growth and continued success as time progresses. As you progress in this company you will be responsible for not only the day to day running of the job but also assisting the superintendent by managing designated field activities associated with the project and supervision of designated field construction work by subcontractors and employees. Assists the project team to ensure the project is built on time, within budget, and in accordance with our clients policies & procedures . Along with the 2 + years of construction management experience your success in the role will require you to have ability to direct the work of others, including subcontractors and suppliers. Working knowledge of the construction process. Well-versed in safety and government regulations. In return for your commercial construction experience, as well as your on-going development within the company you will have excellent earning potential and career growth, with top benefits available for the right applicant.",Assistant Superintendents Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-superintendents-job-houston-tx-us-169691935.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=20,"60,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,7d27333576a944976f5eaa9d89ae4cbb
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:07:45:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reynolds and Reynolds is looking for experienced automotive professionals to join our consulting team. Our superior software solutions, our award-winning sales, service, and support have made us one of the most recognized and respected companies in the automotive industry.                                                                           As an Automotive Business Consultant your primary focus will be to establish professional relationships with customers and help their businesses become more efficient, effective, and profitable.  You will work with dealership personnel to identify trouble areas within the dealership and then use established and proven consulting services programs, as well as your industry knowledge, to help solve these issues.  Once a project is complete, you will follow-up with customers to maintain relationships and provide ongoing ‘fee for service’ support and problem resolution.   By helping these customers become successful in the different areas of the dealership, you will build trust that will further drive consulting services sales. If you are looking for an opportunity to utilize your automotive skills and make a difference for automotive dealerships across the country, please apply today!Training: Our training consists of time with experienced consulting and sales representatives in the field for approximately 90 days, online courses completed in your home office, and classroom instruction through our offices in Dayton and Houston.Requirements:·         High School Diploma or equivalent; Bachelors preferred but not required·         3+ years of automotive dealership experience (sales associate/representative, service advisor, parts counter, controller, marketing associate)·         Must be willing to travel extensively overnight (up to 5 nights per week)·         Dealership management experience is a plus (sales manager, internet sales manager, business development manager, F&I manager, marketing manager, marketing director,  parts manager, service manager, fixed operations manager)Benefits:·         Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance·         401(k) with up to 6% matching·         Professional development and training·         Promotion from within·         Paid vacation and sick days·         Eight paid holidays Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age. ",Calling all Automotive Professionals (Management,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",AllAutomotive Sales and Repair ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/calling-all-automotive-professionals-management-sales-parts-service-job-houston-tx-us-169373268.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,fa8d7d5ec845f63b72f8e3982ba9a0ef
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:07:45:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the Online Education Designer, you will develop, revise, and publish self-guided courses that teach customers and associates on how to use Reynolds and Reynolds software. Our Online Education Designers use HTML, Adobe Flash Creator, Adobe Edge, and other tools to create interactive simulations that captivate learners and help them retain what they learn. Because our products constantly evolve, Course Designers must be able to learn new things and apply that to existing courses. REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor’s degree required No prior experience with HTML or Adobe products required Effective writing skills and love of learning Ability to think creatively and develop new approaches to problems Ability to work well within a team and follow self-directionGood sense of design and presentation skill TRAINING:Our training process will take you from a student to a working Online Course Designer in three to four months; no previous experience with Reynolds software or course authoring software is required. You will also attend software education classes; complete a detailed checklist of training tasks, and visit customer dealerships. During training you will learn very specific Instructional Design techniques to write course materials, test questions, simulations, exercises, and evaluations.BENEFITS:We strive to offer an environment that provides our associates with the right balance between work and family. We offer a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance 401k with 100% matching up to 6% of compensation Referral bonuses with the opportunity to earn up to $7,000 per hirePaid holidays, vacation and sick days Professional development and training through Reynolds University Discounted membership to local area fitness centersOn-site medical clinic staffed by a Nurse Practitioner Company-sponsored events and sports leagues including: company picnic, softball, volleyball, bowling, and more! Gourmet cafeteria, open for breakfast and lunch, that features a salad bar and a variety of made-to-order cuisine optionsCredit Union membershipOpportunities to participate in charitable endeavors, such as our annual Bike Build for local military families, participation in the Reynolds Associate Foundation, company sponsorship in local charity 5k Run/Walks, and other volunteer opportunities Reynolds and Reynolds promotes a healthy lifestyle by providing a non-smoking environment.Reynolds and Reynolds encourages applicants of all ages and experience to apply, as we do not discriminate on the basis of age.",Online Education Designer Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77040",AllComputer HardwareComputer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/online-education-designer-job-houston-tx-us-169694077.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=4,,Education/Training,03d114b4530a37aa16bfed8d03533a8c
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:08:44:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description:Project Management & Compliance Services oversees ATM installation, reprograms, branding, Compliance with all ATM regulations, mitigates potential liabilities, and helps avoid penalties, sanctions or other legal punishment.  This Logistics Coordinator position is responsible for facilitating the schedule of installs and reprograms for National Accounts and/or the Independent Business Group.  ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned. Establish, maintain and strengthen operational relationships with assigned account contacts. Together with Sales Coordinators, Program Management & Relationship Management teams, understand the strategic and tactical requirements/goals of our retail customers.Provide schedules for Moves/Adds/Deinstalls/Change activities for various portfolio customers and maintain all related system tickets including machine, signage, surround, re-branding rollouts, cash load/pull and ongoing maintenance. Request and coordinate purchase and shipment of materials in support of above initiatives to include machines, signage, decals, etc.Respond & resolve all field issues for signage & surrounds from customer, contractors, etc.Monitor/review machine for first transaction.Review/Approve vendor invoices, and add detailed closeout information for management. Meet or exceed proposed schedule, per customer request.SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:None.EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEHigh school diploma or equivalent required.2+ years business or operations experience required; Logistics experience preferred.Very strong computer skills.Hands-on self-starter with the ability to effectively follow difficult issues to resolution. Ability to handle a moderate degree of stress.Ability to grasp the basics of site specific profit and loss.Ability to work some overtime will be required.Must have excellent communication skills, both written and oral.Solid proficiency in Microsoft Office applications, especially advanced functions of Excel.Ability & willingness to learn new computer software applications as required for the jobExceptional organizational and time management skills with great attention to detail.Ability to quickly respond, prioritize and act amid multiple, conflicting demands.Must be able to successfully pass all applicable background screening tests.EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability",Logistics Coordinator /  Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77042",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/logistics-coordinator-586-job-houston-tx-us-169975026.aspx?mescoid=1100026001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,a39f62bb13076ad373ee6281ca730ceb
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:08:45:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more. We offer a drug free work environment and require a pre-employment drug screen. All Applicants are subject to pre-employment security background checks, and some positions may require pre-employment physical fitness for duty tests. The Catalyst Technician I works closely with the Technical Manager and onsite Project Manager to provide technical assistance for their assigned job scope within the petro chemical environment- providing Process Engineers or Plant contacts with onsite representation of CHCT with expertise in the use of one of the following; Catacde, TurboCat/JE Loader, Safety Rep. RESPONSIBILITIES Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all times. Learn and operating all of the following; Catcade loading, JE Loader, TurboCat and become an Certified Occupational Safety Specialist (C.O.S.S.) Supervise directly the completion of the loading process from start to finish, that may also include work completed by other departments’ workers onsite. (i.e., Catcade load, equipment preparations, transportation logistics of equipment) Read/interpret and closely review simple to moderately complex blueprints/loading documents to understand what is required to complete the job in timely and correct manner. Effectively communicate with onsite Engineers or plant contacts and Project Management the outcome of the job and discuss solutions to problems that may arise to maximize job efficiently and held to the highest standards. Able to calculate mathematical formulas. I.e. loading densities of Catalyst. Able to set up, repair and use any Technical equipment that is used in field operations. Maintain onsite job records via Microsoft Excel/PowerPoint. Maintain all equipment in best working condition and cleanliness. Assist other regions as a Safety Rep on job sites to maintain high quality standards and best practices during project performance, providing safety guidelines for high impact events such as inert catalyst entry or possible contamination issues. ·Proactively monitor assigned jobs, able to identify issues and identify solution options. Coordinate input from other personnel (technical disciplines, Operations, Engineers) to address any issues or questions on job site. Able to follow direction from upper management or Cat Technician II on proper use of equipment. (I.e. equipment set-up, selection of orifice, loading rpm speed, Delta pressures testing.) Performs other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business. *CH EDUCATION/KNOWLEDGE High school diploma or equivalent required. 2+ years chemical, mechanical or electrical engineering industry experience. Proficiency in Windows based applications; Able to use complex spreadsheets using Excel graphs/charts and using PowerPoint Strong working knowledge of most of Catalyst Handling and all aspects of dense loading/Catcade. Must be detail oriented and able to hold constructive meetings with customer onsite. Excellent verbal and written communication skills Strong understanding of the operating procedures Problem solver with mechanical aptitude skills set, able to be a problem solver under stressful situations PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS Requires speaking, listening, and acuity Requires 60-80% travel by all commercial means (air, road, rail, etc.) Requires sitting, standing, grasping, and reaching Requires walking, stooping, and crouching Requires lifting, pulling, pushing, or carrying up to 50 lbs Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen.  Some positions also require a pre-hire medical exam.  Must meet all work eligibility requirements. Environmentally-responsible business. Catalyst, Reactor entry, Technician, Confined-space, PPE, HAZWOPER, SCBA, Safety, laborerPotential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Catalyst Technician I Job in Deer Park,Full Time Employee,"Deer Park, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/catalyst-technician-i-job-deer-park-tx-us-169548609.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=15,,Other,49116200ebb5a6638760974605257d28
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:08:50:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers.  Is responsive to customer needs. Maintain all assigned ancillary areas and department areas in a clean neat and sanitary manner. Maintains all assigned ancillary areas, department areas, and corridors with the correct preventative maintenance procedures as outlined in department policy as requested. Assists in enhancing productivity and efficient operations of the department. Promotes effective interpersonal and interdisciplinary relationships, maintaining professional conduct at all times. Demonstrates commitment to professional growth and competence by adherence to component and departmental annual training commitments. Inspects and utilizes judgment in determining which cleaning techniques outlined in orientation guidelines to follow. Demonstrated efficient and safe use of housekeeping equipment and solutions as observed by supervisor. May disinfect and sterilize equipment and supplies, using germicides and sterilizing equipment. Maintains a clean and orderly environment in the assigned area to protect safety and health of others. Diligently employs universal precautions when disposing of trash and bio-hazardous materials. Thoroughly mops and vacuums floors in accordance with established guidelines. Keeps cart properly stocked with equipment and cleaning supplies; ensures all chemicals are properly labeled, and all equipment is in good working condition. Performs other tasks, as needed, to maintain the assigned area in a clean and orderly fashion. Keeps utility and storage rooms in clean and orderly condition. Cleans rooms, hallways, lobbies, lounges, rest rooms, corridors, elevators, stairways, and other areas. Performs all other related duties. Qualifications Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff. Ability to respond effectively to changing demands.",Event Cleaning Attendant - NRG Park - Facility Services Job in Houston,"Part Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77054",,http://jobview.monster.com/event-cleaning-attendant-nrg-park-facility-services-job-houston-tx-us-169729039.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,08979b26ac99d57e547e796c8e2e5400
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:09:39:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"I believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve.As an Area Director of Operations, you will:Manage Executive Directors in all operational areas including process and personnel management, sales growth and achieving financial goals. Develop annual branch budget and monitor expenditures. Analyze gross profit factors, market conditions, business volume/mix, competition and operational costs. Partner with Sales counterpart to ensure continued branch growth by expanding new and existing client base. Partner with clinical team to ensure quality deliverables designed to oversee patient intake and inquiries and assess patient needs.QualificationsBachelors Degree or the equivalent Minimum of eight years multi-site healthcare operations experience with strong focus on sales and business development Current or recent experience managing a minimum of 5M in healthcare revenue Previous homecare or hospice operations experience strongly preferred Success in revenue growth and in the development and execution of market planning Outstanding leadership, managerial skills Good organizational, interpersonal and communication skillskeywords: RN, Registered Nurse, Nurse, nursing, homecare, home care, healthcare, health care, home health, RN manager, Medicare, r.n., rn, Executive Director, Branch Manager, Administrator, Branch Administrator, Nurse Administrator, General Manager, director of professional services, director of clinical services, director of operations, area director of operations, regional director of operations, homecare manager, home care manager, clinical director, clinical administrator, AVP, operations, healthcare operations, home health operations, Senior Director of Operations, Regional Director Operations, VP of Operations, Division VP of Operations, Director of Regional Business Development, Territory Manager, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.",Area Director of Hospice Operations Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/area-director-of-hospice-operations-job-houston-tx-us-169428815.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,305d2c4962764e34a8b810cf62ae70c2
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:09:39:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils in a clean and sanitized condition.  In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink, and related areas clean.   Tasks & Responsibilities: Able to follow directions Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Qualifications Minimum of one year experience Understanding of basic kitchen sanitation Must be able to work holidays, weekends, and varied shifts Must be able to perform repetitive tasks and stand for extended periods of time",Steward - NRG Stadium Suites Job in Houston,"Part Time, Employee","Houston, TX 77054",,http://jobview.monster.com/steward-nrg-stadium-suites-job-houston-tx-us-169685055.aspx?mescoid=5301040001001&jobPosition=17,,Food Services/Hospitality,66cb633bc5a9bdea96a2c8048a5be7ff
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:10:39:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Area Manager of Private Duty Home Care/May live anywhere!Travel required throughout TX, TN, KS, AL, LAJob # AMPD1mwkWI056047aA career with Brookdale has never been more rewarding! Brookdale is the only national full-spectrum senior living solutions company and committed to providing the best options for our over 110,000 residents we serve. The services that we offer ensure residents continue to live the lives that they want while also meeting all of their needs along the way. Every day our associates collaborate to guarantee this promise is fulfilled in more than 1,150 communities in 47 states. Our Senior Living Solutions include: Independent Living, Assisted Living, Memory Care, Skilled Nursing, Continuing Care Retirement, Therapy, Hospice, Home Health, and Personalized Living.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Manage Personalized Living Programs on an interim basis* Financially responsible for profitability of Personalized Living Program* Continued education of Personalized Living Managers* Assist community with key Personalized Living positions* Continued program growth* Assist community with market development Required skills and qualifications:* RN licensure in good standing* Five years of experience* Private Duty Home Health experience required* Strong organizational and documentation skills * Homecare/Sales/Ancillary skill set critical* Strong marketing experience* Proven management experience* Strong team building and mentoring skills* 80% travel required If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone though the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Area Manager of Private Duty Home Care - RN Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77056",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/area-manager-of-private-duty-home-care-rn-job-houston-tx-us-169738642.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,a1dff0b0baf65a2d95c50cd25be89b6f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:10:39:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Account Representative  Colonial Life, an established leader in the corporate benefits industry that’s been in business for more than 77 years, has an immediate opening for a sales representative to join its market-leading team in Houston, TX. The person in this position is responsible for building and maintaining relationships with business owners and employees by offering financial protection benefits at the worksite. The ideal candidate for this position is an enthusiastic, career-minded, self-motivated individual with a proven record of professionalism and success in fast-paced environments. The individual selected will receive comprehensive sales training along with dependable home office support to grow his/her own business and realize the unlimited growth potential unique to the employee benefits industry and to Colonial Life as a leader in the national market. This position provides:·         Competitive compensation·         Residual and renewal income opportunities for life·         Incentives such as world-class travel experiences offered annually to top performers·         Unparalleled training and support including classroom training, hands-on, field training and a dedicated instructor. Desired skills and experience:·         Energetic, self-starter attitude·         Previous sales experience preferred·         Life and Health Insurance License is required, but can be attained during the onboarding process Learn more about Colonial Life and the specific responsibilities of this position at http://www.coloniallife.com/career-seekers/join-our-sales-team.  Interested candidate should submit resume for consideration to Andrea James at Andrea.james@coloniallife.com",Account Representative Job in Houston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Houston, TX 77079",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/account-representative-job-houston-tx-us-169657201.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,3fdec3f8880fceca0ffb44c39d0b5f02
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:10:47:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sr. Systems Engineer Category:  I.T. Type:  Permanent Description:  Our client is looking for system engineers passionate about critical systems engineering, deployment, management, and monitoring. Their product line covers many diverse areas such as distributed service-oriented architectures, low-latency telecommunications processing, HTML5-driven real time web applications, large-scale data caching and storage, and high availability. Voice interfaces range from analog to VoIP technologies. A strong technical foundation coupled with the desire to learn, grow, and solve problems would make for a strong addition to our team. The engagement with customers for specification, on-site system support and customization, as well as warranty and maintenance activities including 24/7 helpdesk are key areas of their Systems Engineering. Requirements:  Desire Skills• Telecommunications/radio interfacing systems and related technology experience (VoIP, T1, ISDN, POTS, TDM)• Managing and monitoring production software deployments (e.g. Zabbix, Zenoss, Nagios, New Relic)• Experience in routing and networking technologies (Cisco certifications a plus) as well as Network analysis tools (e.g. Wireshark, Ethereal)• System security management (Active Directory Certificate Services, SSL, IPSec/VPN)• System design methodologies, including conceptual, functional, and physical designs.• BS in Information Technology, Information Systems, Engineering or equivalent experience with IT and telecommunications software and hardware.• Minimum 3-5 years’ experience supporting, integrating, and deploying hardware/software solutions.• Experienced in effectively interfacing with customers and partners on a technical level.• Experience in one of our main markets Air Traffic Control or 9-1-1 Emergency Call Handling is a plus.Technologies• Application server deployment, drive imaging, maintenance, and monitoring (Tomcat, Jetty, Nginx, HAProxy)• Scripting languages (Bash, Ruby, Perl, Python)• SQL database deployment, maintenance, and monitoring (PostgreSQL, MySQL, MongoDB)• Installation of virtual machines.Major Areas of Responsibility• Telecommunications engineering & integration, software installation and configuration, network configuration• Participate in remote system monitoring, maintenance, and tier 2 on call support.• Participate in on-site system installation, acceptance testing, go-live and maintenance activities.• Develop and conduct factory acceptance tests, site acceptance tests, and failure analysis. Job Location:  Columbia, MD Synerfac Branch:  Baltimore, MD Synerfac Branch Phone:  (410) 667-3949",Sr. Systems Engineer Job in Columbia,,"Sr. Systems Engineer Category:  I.T. Type:  Permanent Description:  Our client is looking for system engineers passionate about critical systems engineering, deployment, management, and monitoring. Their product line covers many diverse areas such as distributed service-oriented architectures, low-latency telecommunications processing, HTML5-driven real time web applications, large-scale data caching and storage, and high availability. Voice interfaces range from analog to VoIP technologies. A strong technical foundation coupled with the desire to learn, grow, and solve problems would make for a strong addition to our team. The engagement with customers for specification, on-site system support and customization, as well as warranty and maintenance activities including 24/7 helpdesk are key areas of their Systems Engineering. Requirements:  Desire Skills• Telecommunications/radio interfacing systems and related technology experience (VoIP, T1, ISDN, POTS, TDM)• Managing and monitoring production software deployments (e.g. Zabbix, Zenoss, Nagios, New Relic)• Experience in routing and networking technologies (Cisco certifications a plus) as well as Network analysis tools (e.g. Wireshark, Ethereal)• System security management (Active Directory Certificate Services, SSL, IPSec/VPN)• System design methodologies, including conceptual, functional, and physical designs.• BS in Information Technology, Information Systems, Engineering or equivalent experience with IT and telecommunications software and hardware.• Minimum 3-5 years’ experience supporting, integrating, and deploying hardware/software solutions.• Experienced in effectively interfacing with customers and partners on a technical level.• Experience in one of our main markets Air Traffic Control or 9-1-1 Emergency Call Handling is a plus.Technologies• Application server deployment, drive imaging, maintenance, and monitoring (Tomcat, Jetty, Nginx, HAProxy)• Scripting languages (Bash, Ruby, Perl, Python)• SQL database deployment, maintenance, and monitoring (PostgreSQL, MySQL, MongoDB)• Installation of virtual machines.Major Areas of Responsibility• Telecommunications engineering & integration, software installation and configuration, network configuration• Participate in remote system monitoring, maintenance, and tier 2 on call support.• Participate in on-site system installation, acceptance testing, go-live and maintenance activities.• Develop and conduct factory acceptance tests, site acceptance tests, and failure analysis. Job Location:  Columbia, MD Synerfac Branch:  Baltimore, MD Synerfac Branch Phone:  (410) 667-3949",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-systems-engineer-job-columbia-md-us-179123407.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,7b16420e6368149d0a28993e46da8965
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:11:45:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Vero Beach South AL 410 4th Ct Vero Beach, FL 32962 Job #:HWDSEvebFL067869We're looking for a  licensed practical nurse (LPN) who can help us redefine senior living. As our healthcare manager / health and wellness director, you'll ensure our residents receive optimum clinical care. This is a leadership opportunity with the largest senior living solutions company in the country, giving you the potential for career advancement. You'll build meaningful relationships with our leadership team, while also bonding with residents and their family members. Using case management skills, you'll assess the physical and social needs of residents and coordinate with other departments to assure we're providing the best care. Through training and guidance you'll set the course for how our associates provide healthcare. This is your chance to make an impact.Loan Reimbursement ProgramBrookdale provides up to $7,000 in student loan reimbursement to newly hired or promoted healthcare managers/health and wellness directors.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Required Skills and Qualifications: * Current licensed practical nurse in the state of practice* Three years nursing experience, including management experience * Working knowledge of computer systems, databases and Microsoft Office * Ability to effectively listen and communicate verbally and in writing Brookdale is the largest senior living solutions company in the country, with 1,150 communities in 47 states serving  110,000 residents around the country. That translates to lots of career opportunities for you! We offer independent living, assisted living, Memory Care, skilled nursing, continuing care retirement, in-house therapy, hospice, home health, and personalized living.If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Nurse LPN Healthcare Manager Job in Vero Beach,Full Time Employee,"Vero Beach, FL 32962",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/nurse-lpn-healthcare-manager-job-vero-beach-fl-us-172013349.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=1,,Business/Strategic Management,8520f64bb766c937aa9f95b418e731bb
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:11:46:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  683864Description: eBusiness Coordinator IIPrimary Work Duties:Work with subject matter experts to ensure product base, sku detail and imagery is consistent and optimized for search engines.Properly tag assets, complete metadata spreadsheets and check web links for accuracy and functionality.Properly load assets into Celum and train business partners/subsidiaries for easy access. Organize, structure, and manage the tool in order to increase usability across the marketing organizations user base.Help review catalogs and channel partner websites for SKU and data accuracy.Help update master data files and support important unlinked, offline systems and databases.Project management for internal website (Source) updates. Transition site from old platform to Office 365. Work with communications team to make site contact and imagery updatesLoad data into campaign databases on CRM tool - Salesforce.Education: Bachelor's DegreeEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739. $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",MKT eBusiness Coordinator II Job in Maplewood,Full Time Employee,"Maplewood, MN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mkt-ebusiness-coordinator-ii-job-maplewood-mn-us-172023620.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),390bee30866d1c50bc20aee2deb7a5c2
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:12:45:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is looking for Graphic Designers that have a working knowledge of InDesign to assist in transferring specs from a legacy system to InDesign. Candidates should be comfortable working with InDesign and the Adobe Creative Suite, as well as working in a role that will be heavy in migrating documents. Any experience with Quark is a bonus.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",InDesign Assistant Job in Kentwood,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,InDesign Assistant,"Kentwood, MI 49508",http://jobview.monster.com/indesign-assistant-job-kentwood-mi-us-172066243.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=11,,Business/Strategic Management,51c938cddd56cbd9661eea6e38e1fd9a
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:12:45:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This inside Sales Representative Position Features: SALES ? Travel? Flexible Friday Hours? Great Pay to $60kThis is a great job for anyone interested in business development with strong communication abilities. The sky is the limit with this growing marketing firm. This person will be excited to travel, organize meeting with doctors all over the US and create everlasting partnerships and have flexible Fridays. Must have previous medical sales experience with minimum of 6 months (this is nonnegotiable)Qualifications: Experience qualifying leads Track record of success and consistent closerMeeting sales metrics and building a book of businessKnowledge of the Microsoft Office software?sExcellent customer service and communication skills, ability to build report over the phone, with a hunter mentality...Requirements: High school Degree is required, experience in Sales is a must and Bilingual is a bonus but not required If you are ready to join this growing organization as an inside sales representative apply today!!! This company is ready to find their next all-star immediately! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1071680 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",sales professional - Growing Orginization Job in Kirkland,Full Time Employee,"Kirkland, WA 98034",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-professional-growing-orginization-job-kirkland-wa-us-172078498.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3c9ebafadb042629c3ccc0c668452b7c
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:17:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for improving the productivity of assigned group of sales representatives. Implements, coordinates, and presents the new hire training and development program. Provides mentoring, coaching, as well as formal facilitation to new and existing sales group. Partnering with the field leadership team, trains and coaches sales representatives to maximize sales performance. Provides input into the development of specific regional training needs. Assists the Regional Director in the coordination of regional activity. Responsibilities 1. Mentors new sales representatives as prescribed by the training program. Coaches under-performing sales representatives. 2. Maintains training calendar for all sales training. 3. Facilitates, or delegates, various sales school classes each month. 4. Reviews supplied materials from new sales representatives to identify patterns of behavior and identify trainee challenges. Conducts follow-up studies of completed training to evaluate and measure results. 5. Monitors, coaches, and develops training team to provide effective growth and development opportunities. 6. Plans, organizes, facilitates, and orders supplies for associate training programs. 7. Provides product and sales training at all levels (basic to expert) in the field to sales representatives. 8. Works with sales representatives to evaluate and identify improvement opportunities and provides feedback. 9. Communicates with relevant leaders regarding training needs and the performance of individual sales representatives. 10. Maintains communication with other regional training managers to gain broad perspective of market and adapt innovative initiatives. 11. Communicates and coordinates with the IT and Training Departments regarding the usage and issues relating to sales tools/training. 12. In consultation with the Training Department, designs and delivers training programs as needed. Education and Experience Requirements 1. Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience required 2. 5+ years of training experience required 3. 1-2 years supervisory experience preferred 4. Knowledge of training practice and methods 5. Presentation and meeting management skills 6. Skill and ability to facilitate and conduct instructor-led classroom and/or virtual training to support knowledge/learning transfer 7. Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or government regulations 8. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals 9. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers and the general public 10. Ability to maintain valid driver’s license 11. Skill in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook software applications 12. Strong verbal and written communication skills 13. Willingness to travel up to 75% of time Physical Demands and Working Conditions The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. * Regularly required to: * Sit, stand and walk * Use hands and arms to handle, feel or reach * Speak and hear * Use close vision abilities * Occasionally required to: * Lift or move up to 10 lbs * Stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.  Noise level * Low to moderate * Adverse Conditions Minimal ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",Regional Training Manager Job in Sacramento,"Full Time, Employee","Sacramento, CA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-training-manager-job-sacramento-ca-us-172021833.aspx?mescoid=1100029001001&jobPosition=7,,Business/Strategic Management,e772c26e449a544055378a3d7cced88f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:18:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Business Intelligence Developer for Security Company in Mountain View, CA Responsibilities:·        Responsible for contributing to the Reporting and Analytics Framework. ·        Interacting with Business directly, often at the highest level, to understand the reporting needs and challenges and then work on creating solution for the Business. ·        Involve in creating Reports, Dashboards, Universe and other BI components.·        Reports and analytics include those delivered on a periodic basis (i.e. daily, weekly, monthly, quarterly, annually, etc.), as well as those requested on an ad-hoc and as-needed basis.  ·        Reporting and analytical content will vary from the general (e.g. as that prepared for executives and directors) to the very detailed (e.g. as that prepared for managers and staff). ·        Fully understand the data in Datawarehouse and leverage Business Intelligence tools to create standard reports, dashboards and other components.·        Work with different Functional Units to understand their reporting needs, on-board new recruits, do training as necessary and provide BI guidance·        Understand the Business challenges in terms of reporting across the organization and work on standardizing.·        Work with BI Administrator and Architect to leverage the existing Business Intelligence tools and bring value to Business.·        Enhance existing Business Intelligence framework by leveraging/creating Single Sign On, SharePoint Integration, Advanced Reporting·        Capable of handling end user training to better use the existing Business Intelligence Infrastructure Must Have:·        5 years of directly applicable experience (e.g. operational reporting, operational analysis) in the following: Business Intelligence, SAP Business Objects, Web Intelligence, Business Objects Designer.·        Background in Dashboarding tool, Xcelsius, Tableau, QlikView·        Understand the existing BI Deployment (Business Objects + Oracle)·        Working knowledge of ETL, exposure to Informatica  and Data Modelling·        Able to think outside the box and come up with creative solutions·        Experience in Database / Data Warehouse, Oracle, SQL Server, Teradata·        Strong background in writing SQL and PL/SQL·        Exposure to Database Analytical Functions, In-line Queries, Sub-Queries, Aggregate functions·        Understand Star and Snow Flake schema·        Strong understanding of Kimball and Inmon approach Desired: ·        Web Analytics including Google Analytics, Omniture, etc.·        Text Mining & Social Media Mining, Sentiment Analysis·        Exposure to other industry leading BI Tools a plus·        Conversant with Dimensional Modeling·        Understand the BIDW Lifecycle Location: Mountain View, CaType: Full TimeSandra Montes408.550.2800 x108www.OSIengineering.com Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Business Intelligence Developer for Security Company in Mountain View, CA Responsibilities:·        Responsible for contributing to the Reporting and Analytics Framework. ·        Interacting with Business directly, often at the highest level, to understand the reporting needs and challenges and then work on creating solution for the Business. ·        Involve in creating Reports, Dashboards, Universe and other BI components.·        Reports and analytics include those delivered on a periodic basis (i.e. daily, weekly, monthly, quarterly, annually, etc.), as well as those requested on an ad-hoc and as-needed basis.  ·        Reporting and analytical content will vary from the general (e.g. as that prepared for executives and directors) to the very detailed (e.g. as that prepared for managers and staff). ·        Fully understand the data in Datawarehouse and leverage Business Intelligence tools to create standard reports, dashboards and other components.·        Work with different Functional Units to understand their reporting needs, on-board new recruits, do training as necessary and provide BI guidance·        Understand the Business challenges in terms of reporting across the organization and work on standardizing.·        Work with BI Administrator and Architect to leverage the existing Business Intelligence tools and bring value to Business.·        Enhance existing Business Intelligence framework by leveraging/creating Single Sign On, SharePoint Integration, Advanced Reporting·        Capable of handling end user training to better use the existing Business Intelligence Infrastructure Must Have:·        5 years of directly applicable experience (e.g. operational reporting, operational analysis) in the following: Business Intelligence, SAP Business Objects, Web Intelligence, Business Objects Designer.·        Background in Dashboarding tool, Xcelsius, Tableau, QlikView·        Understand the existing BI Deployment (Business Objects + Oracle)·        Working knowledge of ETL, exposure to Informatica  and Data Modelling·        Able to think outside the box and come up with creative solutions·        Experience in Database / Data Warehouse, Oracle, SQL Server, Teradata·        Strong background in writing SQL and PL/SQL·        Exposure to Database Analytical Functions, In-line Queries, Sub-Queries, Aggregate functions·        Understand Star and Snow Flake schema·        Strong understanding of Kimball and Inmon approach Desired: ·        Web Analytics including Google Analytics, Omniture, etc.·        Text Mining & Social Media Mining, Sentiment Analysis·        Exposure to other industry leading BI Tools a plus·        Conversant with Dimensional Modeling·        Understand the BIDW Lifecycle Location: Mountain View, CaType: Full TimeSandra Montes408.550.2800 x108www.OSIengineering.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/business-intelligence-developer-for-security-company-in-mountain-view-ca-job-santa-clara-ca-us-172065673.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,,965da6178f578ebe86d405223653c725
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:22:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: TellerJob ID Number: 5269165-1Location: Houston,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionThis job posting is located at the Buffalo Speedway location for 30 hours. At Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. Tellers are the face of our company and represent Wells Fargo in the community. A Teller position with our team offers an opportunity to be part of one of America s greatest companies. You'll have exposure to a variety of responsibilities, people and experiences in a professional work environment - that's part of the fun! We value what’s right for our customers in everything we do. Everything we do, we do to protect the customer and the bank. Our teller’s role is to warmly welcome customers to our store, efficiently process the customer’s request, and build trust that Wells Fargo can help them with all of their financial needs. We want them to know about all of our innovative services, financial education information, as well as take advantage of the relationships we provide as Wells Fargo team members. Every teller is part of a team that is rated first, and most importantly, on the customers’ experience with the teams’ service. Every teller has her/his own scorecard with performance goals. Our best tellers constantly go the extra mile to greet customers and provide exceptional customer service, make them feel welcome and also engage them to learn about their financial goals. Reliable attendance is essential for success in this role. Your exciting role includes: Going the extra mile to greet customers, show them that we care, and make them feel welcome Asking questions to learn about their financial needs and, when the customer sees the value, introducing them to other Wells Fargo team members. Setting performance goals and working with your manager to increase your customer advocacy effectiveness through feedback and coaching Processing between 20-25 customer transactions each hour with no mistakes through patience, attention to detail, and the ability to follow procedures. Accurately maintaining and balancing a cash drawer. Delivering upon customer needs for products such as safe deposit boxes, merchant/vault, ATM processing, bonds and coupons, foreign currency and night drop. A happy, satisfied customer starts with you! At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others without being asked. We want team members who are committed to the success of the team. Tellers develop and improve their skills through training programs and regular feedback discussions with supervisors, to help them improve in their current role and further their professional development. Many of our managers and senior leaders started their career as a teller. With an organization the size of Wells Fargo, there are multiple opportunities to learn and grow and explore career options over time. Our vision and values supports developing and engaging our team members. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. • Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule(s) for this position is 7am- 7pm and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsCustomer service focus with the ability to stay positive in interactions with customers and team membersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience achieving individual and team goalsCash handling experienceExperience selling products and servicesExperience working in a fast-paced environment Job Expectations Ability to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduled Street Address TX-Houston: 6801 Buffalo Speedway - Houston, TXDisclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Teller Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/teller-job-houston-tx-us-171284506.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),155a556ca56bf89ea90b260a60b48e3d
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:25:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"SEEKING NEW MEMBERS FOR OUR BOARD OF DIRECTORS!United Way of Northwest Michigan is led by hard-working volunteer Board Members, and is looking to add a few more. Do you want to use your skills,networks, and ideas to help the organization thrive and evolve in the coming years?In order to advance our mission -""To connect and mobilize the caring power of our local communities"", we need more help! This year, we are specifically recruiting United Way supporters with non-profit board experience to share different perspectives and connections. Seeking individuals with professional experience in Technology, Business, Legal, CPA, Fund Raising, Resource Development and Communications. Please visit our website, www.unitedwaynwmi.org, to complete an application and find out more about United Way of NWMI and our five county service delivery region. Please submit your application by September 16.This job listing brought to you by The Traverse City Record Eagle",board of directors Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,49684,Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/board-of-directors-job-traverse-city-mi-us-172082343.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),531d9f95be7266f8f0dd6c8e0085be18
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:42:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Nightclub Manager is responsible for developing an environment that creates excitement for guests and team members, promoting and retaining a highly skilled workforce. The Nightclub Manager is also responsible for managing and executing the beverage operation at Ryse Nightclub, including but not limited to the cocktail, beverage and bottle service programs. Furthermore, this position will take full ownership in ensuring that Ryse maintains a profitable operation and that service quality supports Ameristar Casino Resort St. Charles' goals.Hires, trains, motivates, evaluates and directs beverage/nightclub and related management staff in order to ensure that team members receive adequate guidance and resources to accomplish established objectives.Organize beverage operations for effective and efficient service as well as overall coordination and control.Maintain the viability and integrity of all beverage operationsCreates an atmosphere that induces guests to have Pinnacle Entertainment, Inc. as their casino of choice; responsible for actively building and retaining customer relations and acts as a mentor to team members in order to provide superior guest service.Monitors daily scheduling process to ensure appropriate staffing levels to maintain customer service levels and profit goals.Monitors and evaluates all department daily activities in order to ensure the successful day-to-day management of all beverage and related operations.Establishes department standards, guidelines and objectives and maintains other administrative processes, such as budget and staffing, to ensure proper planning and efficient operation of beverage and related functions.Evaluates performance of beverage outlets by reviewing guest satisfaction, volume, revenue and cost of sales, and implementing necessary changes to allow the most successful operation of services and fulfillment of Ameristar St. Charles objectives.Develops and maintains an intimate knowledge of beverage/nightclub performance by monitoring guest satisfactions, volume, cost, marketing promotions and competitors' programs in order to implement necessary and innovative changes to ensure Pinnacle Entertainment, Inc. continues to offer superior product and service.Advises organization in beverage-related issues, such as the planning of special events, in order to provide the expertise needed for successful implementation of plans.Participate and assist in developing training initiatives for the Ladies and Gents program in order to ensure that employees receive proper and ongoing technical and guest service training.Mentor, direct and evaluate Ladies and Gents to ensure program standards are met on a continued and sustained basis.Create and maintain records, reports and other documentation as required to meet company and business expectationsResponsible for ordering and maintaining accurate inventory levels of all restaurant supplies.Conducts inspections of front-of-the-house areas to ensure compliance with procedures, security of company assets, and guest/team member safety.Investigates and resolves guest complaints in order to maintain positive customer relations.Coordinate, plan and communicate with the marketing department to determine talent needs for special events, player development parties, promotions, and advertising.Responsible for scheduling talent appearances as requested and needed by Special Events, Player Development, or Marketing.Assign and schedule Ladies and Gents for all modeling, advertising, public relations and publicity events.These skills and abilities are typically acquired through the completion of a Bachelor's Degree in Business Management or related field and 5 years' experience directly related to food or beverage, two years supervisory experience, or an equivalent combination of training, education and experience which demonstrates the ability to perform the duties of the position preferred. Knowledge of gaming industry and strong public relations skills desired. Prior training, education or experience in dancing, gymnastics, cheerleading, public relations or experience working at a modeling agency preferred, with at least three years in a supervisory capacity preferred. Ability to communicate effectively with all levels of employees, as well as outside contacts.Ability to review and comprehend all necessary documentation.Ability to observe and direct actions of subordinates.Possession of, and ability to obtain and maintain a valid drivers and gaming license within assigned state of employment and other jurisdictions.Must successfully pass background check.Must successfully pass an alcohol and drug screening.Must be 21 years of age. PI95294642Apply Here",NIGHTCLUB MANAGER Job in St. Charles,"Full Time, Employee","St. Charles, MO 63301",Hotels and LodgingEntertainment Venues and TheatersFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/nightclub-manager-job-st.-charles-mo-us-172005549.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,"35,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Business/Strategic Management,eddb61c62fd5b9ccf0fbcd01ac06b101
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:43:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"- Enfield Oaks - Full Time Program Director I - Enfield, NC ( Job Number:   276562 ) Description   SUMMARY STATEMENT: The incumbent may be responsible for providing therapy services including assessment as applicable, treatment planning and therapeutic ",Enfield Oaks - Full Time Program Director I - Enfield,"Full Time, Employee","Enfield, NC",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/enfield-oaks-full-time-program-director-i-enfield-nc-job-enfield-nc-us-172067165.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,,Business/Strategic Management,e9c7d56b748288d3053128e9c88dc6b7
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:13:55:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale Bellevue AL/MC (TN) - 8118 B-Sawyer Brown Rd Nashville, TN 37221 Job #:EDCNnashTN067798We're passionate about serving seniors?are you? Now's your chance to build your leadership career with Brookdale.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Oversee community staff and day-to-day operations* Hire and supervise employees, ensuring adequate staffing of quality associates* Foster creativity among staff to deliver services that maintain and enhance resident stability, independence and satisfaction* Develop and implement an annual business plan to maintain high occupancy and achieve financial goals* Represent community to governmental agencies, professional organizations, community groups, etc.Required skills and qualifications:* Bachelor's degree in healthcare, gerontology, business or related field preferred* Two years executive director or related administrator experience* Ability to read and interpret financial statements and manage a budget* Work history demonstrating strong ability to hire, direct and manage associatesBrookdale is the largest senior living solutions company in the country, with 1,150 communities in 47 states serving 110,000 residents around the country. That translates to lots of career opportunities for you! We offer independent living, assisted living, Memory Care, skilled nursing, continuing care retirement, in-house therapy, hospice, home health, and personalized living.If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Executive Director Job in Nashville,Full Time Employee,"Nashville, TN 37221",Healthcare Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-director-job-nashville-tn-us-172004330.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=14,,Business/Strategic Management,3999b07f5912fcdf7f8e1e0142d5a654
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:14:44:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking to start your career in Retail Management? Our Selling Supervisor role is the perfect place to begin! Join our management team of retail experts who share their knowledge of the latest trends, assist customers with selections, and merchandise new product as it arrives. Our Selling Supervisors lead one or more selling areas to achieve store’s sales and profit objectives. They are also responsible for coaching their team to offer customers a “Customer First” experience. Recent successful hires have worked at Kohl's, Macy's, JCPenney, Sears and other similar stores. We’ll value your: Related retail sales experience Strong leadership and merchandising skills Ability to maintain high visibility on the selling floor Desire to grow within the company    This position is compensated at a competitive hourly rate. Schedules include a variety of day, evening and weekend hours. At Bon-Ton, we want to give back to our associates. We offer competitive pay, great associate discount, 401k plan (once eligible) – including potential company match and great volunteer opportunities. ",Selling Supervisor Job in Newburgh,Full Time Employee,"Newburgh, NY",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/selling-supervisor-job-newburgh-ny-us-172017055.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,Business/Strategic Management,a743a9429e81f9432b92d3a0a37ae86d
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:23:47:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"These positions will support the MILSATCOM Systems Engineering and Integration Contract.The MILSATCOM SE&I contract has responsibility to support the government in assessing the technical products developed by the Hardware developers building these systems. The work will be accomplished in an Integrated Product Team (IPT) environment comprised of government, FFRDC’s, developers, SETA and SE&I team members. The overall scope of this position is to support evaluations of the Tests being done for these systems and providing the government technical assessments of test products and witnessing actual tests. Specifically the job duties include: Overseeing the Test Master Schedule and the integration of Program Integrated Master Schedules, test plans, test objectives, test measures, and evaluation criteria Developing T&E strategy, Test and Evaluation Master Plans, requirements verification and test plans, test objectives, test methodology, and evaluation criteria Collecting, reviewing, analyzing, and reporting T&E data Supporting implementation of common Test and Evaluation database for the program Supporting development of DoD compliant deficiency reporting and resolution system Supporting T&E reviews, audits, Integrated Product Teams (IPTs), Deficiency Review Boards (DRBs), Materiel Improvement Process Review Boards (MIPRBs), and Technical Interchange Meetings (TIMs) Experience working with military or DoD civilian clients and managing professional relationships Strong interpersonal skills, communication (oral and written), and presentation skills Capable in Microsoft Office products (Word, Excel, Powerpoint) COS - Briargate (COS - North) BA or BS degree or equivalent experience 3+ years demonstrated experience in multi-faceted tests and test project teams, to include oversight of scheduling3+ years test and evaluation experience with DoD/USAF test processes and documentation3+ years of experience with MILSATCOM5+ years’ experience in systems engineering3+ years’ experience in DoD and commercial SATCOM and network engineering3+ years’ experience with military space systems and protected MILSATCOM systems3+ years’ experience with ground systems, such as terminals and networks Required Clearance: DOD SECRET Desired: Hands on test and evaluation experience with any/all of the programs in the MILSATCOM portfolio with emphasis on the programs mentioned above. Must be self-driven and work independently. Must be able to work in a team environment as well with strong analytic and personal communication skills. Strong T&E background. AT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Integration and Test\Evaluation Eng (Government) Job in El Segundo,,"El Segundo, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/integration-test-evaluation-eng-government-job-el-segundo-ca-us-170303579.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=10,,,b0ec4668cf501eeee41fab56f2b29f85
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:23:46:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Named Account Executive - Government & Education Specialist - Prescott, AZ Area Area of Interest: Sales Department: 250000 - Direct Sales City: Flagstaff State: Arizona Job Description: Konica Minolta Business Solutions USA, Inc. currently has an exciting opportunity for a NAMED ACCOUNT EXECUTIVE – GOVERNMENT AND EDUCATION SPECIALIST – B2B Outside Sales. Here’s what YOU can count on when you join KONICA MINOLTA!Worldwide, Konica Minolta is one of the top information technology companies. Our proven experience is helping customers streamline workflow, improve output and IT infrastructure, reduce costs and strengthen their commitment to environmental protection. As an employer, our goal is to partner with individuals who want a career - not just a job. We offer a unique combination of competitive compensation; comprehensive product training and professional development programs that will help you enhance your professional skills. You’ll also discover the winning spirit that makes KMBS a great place to work; we offer a fun, energetic and fast paced sales environment where achievement is rewarded.If you’ve been working in outside, business to business sales, have a proven track record and a desire to continue building a successful career, you’ll have that opportunity as a Named Account Executive at Konica Minolta. A career in sales at KM provides opportunities to work in a team environment and is ideally suited to individuals who enjoy networking at all levels. We provide best in class training- in classroom, web-based and on-the job; having earned a college degree will be an asset. If you have strong communication, interpersonal, time management and organizational skills, along with the personal integrity and professionalism needed to succeed, now is the time to consider Konica Minolta Business Solutions.This is what will be expected of you as a Named Account Executive – Government and Education Specialist:Seek out new customers and partner with existing ones by offering a variety of solutions to improve their business; you will have to make it a priority to take exceptional care of your clients.Be able to thrive in a fast-paced environment; you must be driven to succeed and willing to strive to be the best. You must bring a high level of energy and be committed to achieve your sales goals.Be comfortable with cold calling and in-person prospecting for potential and established clients; you must be tenacious and have a desire to grow your knowledge as you build your career.Outbound calling to potential and established clients on a daily basis to set face-to-face appointments, ensuring outstanding customer service though regular follow-ups; you’ll be expected to report regularly to a branch office.Establishing and strengthening relationships with decision makers for current and potential clients.Learning and demonstrating the benefits of all KMBS products, services and solutions for clients.Designing and presenting solutions that will help customers’ businesses.Consistently closing sales and achieving monthly activity and revenue goals. Qualifications: Requirements: Knowledge in government and/or education field is preferred. Must have a minimum of two (2) years of business-to-business outside sales experience, selling to clients in the government and/or education industry OR in the digital imaging solutions or other technology industry College degree preferred A valid driver’s license and reliable transportation is required!KMBS Offers: Competitive salary (base salary + commissions). Strong results are well rewarded; President’s Club winners have earned trips to Ireland, Panama, Banff and this year, Atlantis, Bahamas. Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, vision, life insurance, to name a few) 401(k) plan with matching company contribution Excellent holiday/vacation plans Tuition Reimbursement Program Ongoing professional development training including access to online Harvard Manage/Mentor coursesKMBS is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",Named Account Executive - Government & Education Specialist - Prescott,Full Time Employee,"Flagstaff, AZ",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/named-account-executive-government-education-specialist-prescott-az-area-job-flagstaff-az-us-170363086.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,,,cb128e92fe8bbea2ce507e220e4effaa
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:22:48:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ten or more (10+) years of experience Under broad direction, perform tasks related to the operation, maintenance, trouble shooting, sustainment, and account administration for Exchange, Active Directory Application Mode (ADAM), and the Global Address List (GAL). Assists the Government Lead in the daily engineering duties on systems. Design, develop and integrate mobile solutions to incorporate cellular phones, cellular modems, air cards, personal digital assistant (PDA) devices (i.e. BlackBerries or other approved devices), tethering, and paging into the Enterprise Network. Support Capacity Planning for messaging solutions. Develop and integrate identity and access management requirements such as ForeFront Identity Manager, Oracle/Sun Identity, and Access Management. Monitor security updates in accordance with Government procedures for directory services. Design remote connectivity to unclassified email, calendars and contacts. Design optional data services and peripherals, including support of the enterprise server and DoD PKI or approved hard/soft token encryption. Expert knowledge of Exchange Migration/Upgrade 2003-2008 upgrade, integration and migration and Exchange 2010/2013, Windows 2008R2/2012 R2 upgrade, integration and migration. Perform tasks associated with highly available Exchange solutions utilizing Datacenter Activation Coordination (DAC)/Database Availability Group (DAG). Responsible for Records Retention (Litigation Hold). Perform Messaging Disaster Recovery and Message Classification. Develop Mobile Messaging solutions including but not limited to BlackBerry Enterprise Server (BES) and Bring Your Own Device (BYOD) solutions. Expert knowledge of Outlook Anywhere, Windows PowerShell scripting, Group policy management, and Internet IIS. Perform tasks associated with application networking ports and protocols, Information Assurance (IA), routing and Local Area Network (LAN). Design and perform Global Address List (GAL) for access via Outlook, Outlook Web Access, or other similar product. Perform integration with Public Key Infrastructure (PKI) certificates and network accounts to support two-factor authentication for all Active Directory (AD) domain account categories and eliminate the need for password-based authentication. Execute system integration with WSUS (Windows Server Update Services), System Center Configuration Manager (SCCM) 2007/12, Host Based Security System (HBSS), external storage devices (utilizing Logical Unit Numbers (LUNs), quota distribution and File sharing), and virtualization (specifically but not limited to VMware and Hyper-V). Perform system integration (with but not limited to SQL 2008 r2) and server installation on various server hardware. Complete Backup (Disaster Recovery) using NetbackUp.Must possess ITIL V3. Certified in accordance with DoD 8570.01-M Information Assurance Technician Level III. For IAT III Certs must have one of the following: CISSP, CASP, CISA, GCED, GCIHRequired Clearance: SecretAT&T is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and we are committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/AA/M/F/D/V",Messaging Design Engineer (Government) Job in Quantico,,"Quantico, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/messaging-design-engineer-government-job-quantico-va-us-170368476.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,,e921728d10b0d16cea69b4685d46a4ff
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:22:47:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Government Job/Customer Service Agent Position Features:? Flexible hours/night time hour pay increases? Entry Level Jobs Within Local Government? $150 add'l monthly for Spanish bilingual speakersImmediate need for customer service agents! Are you seeking flexible hours, a healthy and energetic atmosphere, access to jobs within the Government? Good customer service skills are required, positive energy, ability to be present and on time for scheduled hours, typing speed at 35 WPM will be keys to success in this prestigious Government position. Customer Service Agents are responsible for routing calls to different departments, addressing callers concerns, providing excellent customer service, handling calls in a professional manner. This is a Government job and offers insight and access to other jobs within the Government. Great benefits available. Apply for this unique position as a customer service agent today! Candidates must pass a simple typing assessment 35wpm (able to test from home) and pass 2 interviews. Interviews start today! It's not too late!! Contact us NOW in order to be considered. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1058079 Job Experience:,, Clean background checkDiploma / GEDTyping speed of 35wpmYears of Experience Required:",Government Job/Customer Service - Great Opportunity! Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX 78754",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/government-job-customer-service-great-opportunity!-job-austin-tx-us-170141784.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6a6e865be64e94155503c6dc3403e971
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:22:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an immediate opening for aDocket Manager (Intellectual Property) in our fast-paced Special Counsel Dallas, TX office(job). We are seeking a hard-working, dedicated and creative individual to serve as a key team member. Candidates must have an organized approach to work assignments and possess strong proofreading skills. We welcome applicants who are self-starters with a professional demeanor and are able to work independently with minimal supervision. Duties: Docketing of all incoming U.S. and international correspondence, all internal docket slips and postcards and all new intellectual property mattersPreparation and distribution of docket reports; general docketing and database support as required by all other offices. Client status reports; Preparation of filing estimates; Provide assistance to attorneys and paralegals Downloading all new incoming PAIR documents from the USPTO website daily.Run daily reports of all incoming docketing materials Qualifications:The Docket Manager must be proficient and able to adapt to new computer softwareA college degree and or a paralegal certification from an ABA approved paralegal program or equivalent experience is highly valued.High level of computer proficiency, superior communication skills and excellent organizational skillsAnaqua File Management System experience preferredAbility to accurately calculate dates 5+ years docketing experience (Managerial a plus)If you would like to apply for or learn more about our Docket Manager (Intellectual Property) position, please email your resume to dallas@specialcounsel.com or contact the Special Counsel Dallas, TX office via our website www.specialcounsel.com. Follow us on Facebook at https://www.facebook.com/SpecialCounselDallas and Twitter @Discov_Projects  . Equal Opportunity Employer/ Minorities/ Women/ Veterans/ Disabled     ",Docket Manager (Intellectual Property) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX 75201",,http://jobview.monster.com/docket-manager-intellectual-property-job-dallas-tx-us-169701016.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=16,,Legal,08ba930118b8f5b028959b80ab63ed90
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:21:43:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  671767Apex Systems is looking for a Crystal Reports Developer to join their clients team in San Antonio, Texas. If you are interested in this opportunity, please reach out to Abbie Niderberg at aniderberg@apexsystemsinc.com Duration: ContractLocation: San Antonio, TexasPosition: Crystal Reports DeveloperRequirements: Solid experience in Crystal reports development on SAP and non-SAP data sources (Oracle, SQL Server)Solid experience in relational databases (SQL, Stored Procedures, triggers)such as Oracle, SQL Server and ability to analyze application database models/schema to determine source dataAbility to independently interact with non-technical end users to understand application, processes, and report requirements to build pixel perfect, highly interactive complex reportsStrong Crystal Reports Developer w/experience in Crystal 2013 or Enterprise Experience with Change Mgmt Tools and creating tickets Strong communication skills Experience working with the business EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Crystal Reports Developer Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  671767Apex Systems is looking for a Crystal Reports Developer to join their clients team in San Antonio, Texas. If you are interested in this opportunity, please reach out to Abbie Niderberg at aniderberg@apexsystemsinc.com Duration: ContractLocation: San Antonio, TexasPosition: Crystal Reports DeveloperRequirements: Solid experience in Crystal reports development on SAP and non-SAP data sources (Oracle, SQL Server)Solid experience in relational databases (SQL, Stored Procedures, triggers)such as Oracle, SQL Server and ability to analyze application database models/schema to determine source dataAbility to independently interact with non-technical end users to understand application, processes, and report requirements to build pixel perfect, highly interactive complex reportsStrong Crystal Reports Developer w/experience in Crystal 2013 or Enterprise Experience with Change Mgmt Tools and creating tickets Strong communication skills Experience working with the business EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/crystal-reports-developer-job-san-antonio-tx-us-170034028.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e94b11367858efefcb2964f135456a28
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:21:42:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"""We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader.Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationshipsBenefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidatesQualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not requiredAbout UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. Aflac agents are independent agents of Aflac, and are not employees of Aflac. Certain criminal convictions may prohibit you from becoming an independent licensed agent under state and/or federal law.   """,Aflac - Benefits Sales Consultant Job in Ligonier,Full Time,"Ligonier, PA 15658",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-benefits-sales-consultant-job-ligonier-pa-us-168606955.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,,Customer Support/Client Care,f3908e6cb568fdc36b6ad31d115dcf38
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:21:23:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"ProKarma is currently hiring for Senior Project Manager having  Agile / scrum  methodologies/practices experience  along with extensive offshore management/Delivery management experience to join our solution team at a client site in Oakland CA.   Job Description: Project Manager with Offshore deliveryLocation: Oakland, CAJOB SUMMARY The Project Manager is responsible for planning, leading, organizing, and motivating distributed project teams working in an onshore-offshore model, to achieve a high level of performance and quality in delivering projects that provide exceptional business value to users. The PM will be responsible for managing several concurrent high visibility projects using agile methods in a fast-paced environment that may cross multiple business divisions. JOB DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:·         Project Planning and Management – Define project scope and schedule while focusing on regular and timely delivery of value; organize and lead project status and working meetings; prepare and distribute progress reports; manage risks and issues; correct deviations from plans; and perform delivery planning for assigned projects·         Team Management – Assist in team development while holding teams accountable for their commitments, removing roadblocks to their work; leveraging organizational resources to improve capacity for project work; mentoring and developing team members, who will be primarily based in offshore delivery centers.·         Product Owner Support – Support the Product Owner in managing customer expectations for project deliverables, managing stakeholder communications, and helping to implement an effective system of project governance·         Process Management and Improvement – Define and manage a well-defined project management process and champion ongoing process improvement initiatives to implement best practices for Agile Project Management / Scrum framework·         Team building – Promote empowerment of the team, ensure that each team member is fully engaged in the project and making a meaningful contribution, and encourage a sustainable pace with high-levels of quality for the team. ·         Team Communication – Champion clear communication protocols between offshore teams, onshore lead and the client team members.  SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:·         Strong interpersonal skills including mentoring, coaching, collaborating, and team building·         Strong analytical, planning, and organizational skills with an ability to manage competing demands·         Strong knowledge and understanding of business needs with the ability to establish/maintain high level of customer trust and confidence·         Proven ability to lead software development projects and ensure objectives, goals, and commitments are met·         Solid understanding of and demonstrated experience in using appropriate tools:•        Agile Project Management tools such as Jira, Rally, or equivalent•        Microsoft Project, Visio, and all Office Tools·         Excellent oral and written communications skills and experience interacting with both business and IT individuals at all levels including the executive level·         Strong understanding of SDLC frameworks QUALIFICATIONS:·         BS/MS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related subject·         A proven track record of successfully implementing software or web development projects using Agile methodologies including 8+ years of experience as a Project Manager managing large, complex projects in a high-tech development environment with multi-function distributed teams with strong offshore presence.·         Prior experience with SCRUM/Agile methodologies with enterprise-level application development project·         Experience overseeing multi-function project teams with at least 10-15 team members including Developers, Business Analysts, and QA Personnel·         Please formard your resumes to kmarle@prokarma.com Thanks",Monster,,"ProKarma is currently hiring for Senior Project Manager having  Agile / scrum  methodologies/practices experience  along with extensive offshore management/Delivery management experience to join our solution team at a client site in Oakland CA.   Job Description: Project Manager with Offshore deliveryLocation: Oakland, CAJOB SUMMARY The Project Manager is responsible for planning, leading, organizing, and motivating distributed project teams working in an onshore-offshore model, to achieve a high level of performance and quality in delivering projects that provide exceptional business value to users. The PM will be responsible for managing several concurrent high visibility projects using agile methods in a fast-paced environment that may cross multiple business divisions. JOB DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:·         Project Planning and Management – Define project scope and schedule while focusing on regular and timely delivery of value; organize and lead project status and working meetings; prepare and distribute progress reports; manage risks and issues; correct deviations from plans; and perform delivery planning for assigned projects·         Team Management – Assist in team development while holding teams accountable for their commitments, removing roadblocks to their work; leveraging organizational resources to improve capacity for project work; mentoring and developing team members, who will be primarily based in offshore delivery centers.·         Product Owner Support – Support the Product Owner in managing customer expectations for project deliverables, managing stakeholder communications, and helping to implement an effective system of project governance·         Process Management and Improvement – Define and manage a well-defined project management process and champion ongoing process improvement initiatives to implement best practices for Agile Project Management / Scrum framework·         Team building – Promote empowerment of the team, ensure that each team member is fully engaged in the project and making a meaningful contribution, and encourage a sustainable pace with high-levels of quality for the team. ·         Team Communication – Champion clear communication protocols between offshore teams, onshore lead and the client team members.  SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:·         Strong interpersonal skills including mentoring, coaching, collaborating, and team building·         Strong analytical, planning, and organizational skills with an ability to manage competing demands·         Strong knowledge and understanding of business needs with the ability to establish/maintain high level of customer trust and confidence·         Proven ability to lead software development projects and ensure objectives, goals, and commitments are met·         Solid understanding of and demonstrated experience in using appropriate tools:•        Agile Project Management tools such as Jira, Rally, or equivalent•        Microsoft Project, Visio, and all Office Tools·         Excellent oral and written communications skills and experience interacting with both business and IT individuals at all levels including the executive level·         Strong understanding of SDLC frameworks QUALIFICATIONS:·         BS/MS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related subject·         A proven track record of successfully implementing software or web development projects using Agile methodologies including 8+ years of experience as a Project Manager managing large, complex projects in a high-tech development environment with multi-function distributed teams with strong offshore presence.·         Prior experience with SCRUM/Agile methodologies with enterprise-level application development project·         Experience overseeing multi-function project teams with at least 10-15 team members including Developers, Business Analysts, and QA Personnel·         Please formard your resumes to kmarle@prokarma.com Thanks",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-w-delivery-management-experience-job-oakland-ca-us-168704349.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,,53b60bd47b17f192109871700a4f97b9
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:20:44:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking Insurance Representatives. Located in Philadelphia with some travel to locations in the area.•Description:•Requirements:•         PA Accident & Health Insurance License•         3+ years of Health Insurance Sales Experience•         Ability to operate a computer•         Ability to stand or sit for long hours•         Reliable transportation to travel within five county area for field events•         Mileage will be reimbursed for field events. •         Required FFM certified candidates.•         Hours will vary up to 40 hours per week and ALL candidates should be available for weekend and evening workDescription:  This contractor will staff marketing and sales events supporting the public education of Health Care reform and IBC products.  They will present products and assist consumers in completing applications on site. They will also engage consumers to take action by enrolling through the internet or calling the IBC Telesales 800#.   The individual may staff events as a member of a team or as an individual.  Events types will vary from staffing our Walk-In service location and/or the mobile marketing unit known as “Independence Express”, to engaging the public during our station domination campaign in Septa’s Suburban Station, to distributing information from an IBC branded table in CVS stores, and other locations.This person must:•Be able to engage the public in a polite, professional, and persuasive manner•Possess strong verbal and written communication skills•Provide their own transportation to events and, in some cases, be able to store limited collateral materials between events•Maintain a professional and welcoming appearance•Be able to stand, sit, or walk for an extended period •Be able to learn and communicate the basic tenets of health care reform and their impact on the public•Be organized and able to communicate results of events in a clear manner•Schedule will include some evenings and weekends on a consistent basis•Maintain a license to sell Accident and Health Insurance in PA and be able to effectively present IBC products to prospective members•Obtain FFM certification for current open enrollment year",Insurance reps Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/insurance-reps-job-philadelphia-pa-us-173593513.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,d197efb7bc401ebded470a1b622c469b
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:20:43:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695924Apex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest Information Technology staffing firm, has an opportunity for a Network Engineer to work for an enterprise company here in the Tampa, FL Area. This is a 6 month contract to Hire position with a salary in the 70-90k/year range.Applicants must have 3+ years of IT experience with a focus on working with a Promina Network.  Candidates must have experience in a Network Operations environment providing high level support for top tier escalations.  We are also looking for someone knowledgeable in Routing and Switching and general Network Engineering.Overview of Network Engineer:Performs detailed and technically in-depth site survey functions at user locations as required in order to assess/analyze site preparedness, develop implementation plans and associated cost estimates.Coordinates with users, site/base support and or facilities personnel, network manager(s) and controllers, long haul and local carriers for installation, cutover, activation, deactivation planning and execution.Performs installation/de-installation/upgrade/interface actions associated with network components at user locations.Supports senior staff as required and ensures customer requirements and project milestones are metSkills Needed:Network Operations and Maintenance for a Promina networkExperience with one of more: alarm surveillance, fault management, configuration management, LAN maintenance, performance managementExpertise in one or more of the following: IP routing, QoS, traffic engineering, DNS; ATM switching; TDM switching; Optical; Crypto; Network appliances (WAN acceleration, etc)Ability to work in a team focused, dynamic environmentPerforms a variety of difficult assignments associated with monitoring and controlling computer operating systems*Candidates must be able to pass a background and drug test*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; and our Referral Program.*EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 844-463-6178.",Computer Operator Job in Tampa,Full Time Employee,"Tampa, FL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/computer-operator-job-tampa-fl-us-173614439.aspx?mescoid=4300750001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b7aab655dc4140e6a6469c63c2ba54d2
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:20:28:25,No,jobs.monster.com,ASSISTANT NETWORK SYSTEMS MANAGER- INFRASTRUCTURE 40 hours/week Please apply online through WECAN; ID #34549. The WECAN link can be accessed on the School District of La Crosse website: www.lacrosseschools.org CAREER OPPORTUNITIES An Equal Opportunity Employer,Assistant Network Systems Manager - Infrastructure Job in La Crosse,Full Time,"La Crosse, WI 54601",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-network-systems-manager-infrastructure-job-la-crosse-wi-us-173615116.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=10,,,0768b0a793ed352cf3b72b4ab910b2d6
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:20:03:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Interested in working in a Bankruptcy Specialist position in Irving, TX with a dynamic and growing company? This role is with a fortune 500 company. We are looking for someone who is smart, dependable and driven. RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES INCLUDE:  • Manages bankruptcy process and ensures minimal loss on each account• Prepares proof of claims and reaffirmation arrangements• Monitors bankruptcy status and assigns accounts to legal or repossessions as needed.    POSTION REQUIREMENTS: The Ideal Candidate Should Have:  • 5 years related experience • 2 years bankruptcy administration experience with chapter 7 and 13 bankruptcies• Knowledge of current bankruptcy laws  • Knowledge of Fair debt collections practices and compliance• Experience coordinating Lift of Stay and litigation with attorneys • Experience preparing and filing Proof of Claims• Experience with re-affirmation agreements• Experience reviewing accounts for action     • Strong interpersonal skills to interact with customers and team members• Strong communication skills • Personal computer and business solutions software skills   • Ability to work independently and maintain a high level of motivation If you are interested please attach the most current copy of your resume. Also be on the lookout for a 303 area code for a preliminary phone screen!  ",Bankruptcy Specialist-Irving,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Irving, TX 75063",,http://jobview.monster.com/bankruptcy-specialist-irving-tx-job-irving-tx-us-173556604.aspx?mescoid=1300112001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,e8867516e8a565fdee0ed50e261ed86e
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:19:42:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  690685Project Description:This worker will be working in a highly functional team environment responsible for building a UI that enables the future vision of Fanatical Support. This UI will be used to integrate multiple applications in order to create a single user experience for the support and enable the larger development team to execute faster and more reliably. Responsibilities:Developing code, translating requirements, peer reviews, testing their own code, and working with QE. Why should Candidates be interested in this Role/Project: Fast pace environment working on a highly visible for the company. New development on a homegrown system. Opportunity to work alongside experienced developers. Highly collaborative Agile/Scrum environment.",Front-End Developer  Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/front-end-developer-765-job-san-antonio-tx-us-173614302.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),57a174a3f74d526f7037aaf58998e033
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:19:41:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Newark,Full Time Employee,"Newark, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-newark-ca-us-167323022.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,398e54c079a3d5a32834e97380675bb4
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:18:42:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: Ensures building is clean: offices, restrooms, corridors, classrooms, gym, auditorium, library, trash removal, etc. Conserves energy by turning off lights in areas not in use to ensure economical usage of electricity Keeps the school building and grounds, including mats, sidewalks, driveways, parking lots and play area, neat and clean. Follows procedures for storage and disposal of trash (regular, recyclable, and other trash) and transports to designated areas. Wears protective equipment and follows safety procedures Scrubs, strips, sprays, buffs, vacuums and polishes floors with floor machines Washes walls, ceilings, floors, windows, and furniture as directed Changes ceiling, tiles, and light bulbs as needed. Moves furnishing and equipment for the purpose of providing adequate preparations for meetings, classroom activities, and events Attend in-service training (e.g. blood born pathogens, cleaning solvents, floor care, First Aid, etc.) for the purpose of receiving information on new and/or improved procedures Secures the facility, ensuring building is lock/unlocked as required. Reports maintenance concerns (work order requests) to appropriate personnel. Maintains supplies and equipment (e.g. cleaning solutions, paper products, vacuum, and mops, etc.) for the purpose of ensuring the availability of items required to properly maintain facilities. Prepares reports (e.g. safety hazards, work orders, supply requisitions, etc.) for the purpose of documenting and/or conveying information to other personnel. Prepares facilities for daily operations ( e.g. opening gates/access doors, disarming security systems, raising the flag, providing cross walk signs, etc.) for the purpose of ensuring school facilities are operational and safe for occupancy. Responds to immediate safety and/or operational concerns (e.g. facility damage, injury, alarms, etc.) for the purpose of taking appropriate action to resolve immediate safety issues and maintaining a functioning, educational environment. Operates various types of equipment and machinery which may include buffers, automatic floor machines, burnishers, back pack vacuums, Kivacs, wet and dry vacuums, commercial vacuums, buckets, wringers, carts, hand trucks, rotos, blowers, extractors, washing machines, dryers, lifts, ladders, tools, products, chemicals, and supplies. Follows instruction from supervisors; adheres to company and component policies and procedures. Performs other duties as assigned. Qualifications Requires educational achievement equivalent to a High School Diploma. Ability to communicate effectively with clients, senior management, and Aramark support staff.  Ability to respond effectively to changing demands.",Custodial Service Worker - Grady Hospital EVS Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30303",,http://jobview.monster.com/custodial-service-worker-grady-hospital-evs-job-atlanta-ga-us-167684764.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a3d781e9f8ad6e79be8927c52756232a
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:18:42:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our firm has achieved significant growth and has been named as a ""Best Firm to Work For"" every year since 2007 by Consulting Magazine. Our Professional Staffing Practice has been recognized as one of the nation's fastest growing talent acquisition firms since 2011. We work with clients to fill Contract, Contract-to-Hire, and Direct Hire opportunities within Management Consulting, IT, Accounting/Finance, Human Resources, and Marketing areas. We are a collaborative, entrepreneurial firm that takes pride in our people, culture, clients and work-life balance.Project Field TechnicianAs a field technician, you will be part of an outstanding team charged with providing value to one of our largest manufacturing clients. This position will work directly on the rollout of unified communications to 300+ locations in the US as a member of a growing project roll-out team. The ideal candidates for this role is an IT professional with several years of experience working as a helpdesk or field technician, possibly with UC/VoIP experience. A passion for operational integrity and a willingness and aptitude for meeting the challenges of today's evolving technology are a must.What You Need for this Position:Minimum two years successful IT Operations services experience.Self-Starter with proactive problem solving and client service skills.Strong learning aptitude, abilities to learn new technology solutions and deliver on them.Ability to jump in and get the work done with little oversight, but while conforming to project guidelines and standardsRole Responsibilities: Quickly get up to speed on the particularities of the project and the technical solutions to be deployed.Be part of an implementation team of field techs, who will be travelling to 300+ locations in 9 states to implement unified communications.Visit assigned sites and confirm site preparedness, install switch if necessary and verify connectivity, install and test phones, complete cutover to new phones, and test and train with the users.Troubleshoot to identify issues and then liaise with technical lead to obtain a solution.The project is very fast paced and will require nearly 100% weekday travel, with some weekend work required.Qualifications:Minimum of 2 years of basic help desk and/or level 1 technical operations.VoIP/UC - Understanding of the hardware and service and experience with troubleshooting connectivity.Demonstrated ability to think fast, identify issues and work through a resolution.Exceptional interpersonal and customer service skills North Highland is a global consulting firm with a proven record of enabling great returns on our clients' investment. Our high-caliber consultants offer deep experience and expertise across many diverse industries and service areas. We specialize in solving tough business challenges, being easy to work with, and nurturing long-standing relationships with the most recognizable brands in the world. Ask any of our clients, and they'll tell you. North Highland is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, religion, national origin, age, sexual orientation, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or other legally protected status.",Level I Field Technician (UC/VoIP) Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA",Computer HardwareComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/level-i-field-technician-uc-voip-job-atlanta-ga-us-167950975.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=17,25.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,30eb79c1ba557c20d61efffcfd7231e6
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:02:44:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Are you looking for an amazing opportunity with a growing company? I am currently seeking an experienced Compounding Supervisor for a Direct Hire opportunity. This individual will be responsible for overseeing and leading a team of compounders responsible for batching operations in a fast paced manufacturing GMP environment. Offering Up $65K per year!!! 2nd Shift in the Central NJ area Minimum 2-5 years Relative Supervisory experience! Accountable for quality and efficiency of output. Must have cosmetic batching and chemical processing knowledge with the ability to work with and manage a team of pre-weigh and compounding personnel. Apply Today - Looking to Interview This week by 4/15/2016!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1027600 Job Experience:,",$K Compounding Supervisor Opportunity Job in Edison,Full Time,"Edison, NJ 08837",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/65K-Compounding-Supervisor-Opportunity-Job-Edison-NJ-US-165980900.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=11,Up to $65000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),d9b3a5f24373dcf966747c8f3baab69b
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:02:43:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job TitleMotorized Gearbox TechnicianSkills RequiredMechanical and Electrical ability Equipment TypeMotorized GearboxesTravel required10-25% over night travel Midwest RegionBase CityEvansvilleState/ProvinceIN.Service requiredFull Time/Overtime, On Call as requiredJob DescriptionActuator mechanic: Service company that works with power plants, oil refineries, water treatment plants, and pipelines seeks a fast learning technician who has good mechanical ability, basic electrical knowledge, familiarity with electric  actuators or valves would be desirable, but not required.  If you are the type that can fix anything, show up to work on time every day, and are interested in making a better life for yourself we want to talk to you. Job Requirements/ Qualificationselectrical background a plus, should be able to read wiring diagrams, 2-3 years of mechanical work and field service experience required,  Good auto mechanics skills translates well to this job, Demonstrated mechanical ability, valid & clean drivers license; Pass a drug screen, and safety testing.      ",Maintenance Technician Job in Evansville,Full Time,"Evansville, IN 47715",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Evansville-IN-US-164223991.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,18.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),e64cc16e946d3d6bdca6138a2800dfc5
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:01:42:09,No,jobs.monster.com," Corporate Safety Administrator – Houston RECON (Remedial Construction Services, L.P.) has successfully completed over 6,000 environmental remediation, geotechnical and civil construction projects across North America.  Our team of dedicated employees, financial strength and large fleet of equipment empower our company to deliver world class solutions for complex environmental problems.  The people at RECON are what set us apart from every other environmental remediation and geotechnical construction company.  Our success can be attributed to talented employees; we have a diverse and tenured team that has the ability to impact the industry and the environment.  Do you want to discover your potential?  Apply today and join our RECON team.   Job SummaryThis position will report to the Corporate Director of Health and Safety and provide responsive and accurate information to customers, human resources, operations and the safety teams.  Responsible for all weekly and monthly safety reporting and providing support in areas of medical safety and compliance including drug testing programs, physicals, locating clinics and hospitals related to testing for the organization. Manage relationships and communication with third party health care providers and staff related to fit testing, safety orientation and training, drug and medical screening. Essential FunctionsSupport management of all health and safety personnel files and information, inclusive of medical training, safety training inspection and incident recordsEnsure current worker medical and training certifications are up to date and maintain the approved driver’s list for the organizationHelp prepare the Health and Safety sections for all pre-qualifications and bid proposals, including bids going to potential clients and assist in the review of the company Health and Safety Program informationSupport and maintain the Safety Program on the ISNetworld, PICS, PEC and various other websitesManage and coordinate DISA Drug testing; pre, post and “for cause” drug screenings; and RECON’s monthly random drug testing program in tandem with the Corporate Safety Administrative Coordinator and Site Safety Officer team, working closely with the third party health care provider to remain compliant with OSHA regulations, and DOT regulations, at all timesWork with Accounts Payable to process expense reports and invoices, ensuring proper coding and approvals are tracked for timely paymentManage safety supplies and personal protective equipmentPrepare training certificates for in-house training, maintain documentation related to safety training, education and upload documents as needed to the company websitePrepare and manage the daily safety minutes in the automated system, monthly safety reports and set up new projects in the Safety Trends database Assist with employee relations issues related to safety by collecting information, conducting research when necessary, sourcing resources and experts to bring issues to resolution to ensure compliance and mitigate liability  Produce reports, create presentations and perform other administrative support duties as assigned by management Qualifications3+ years related administrative support experience in a health or safety related position and a high school diploma or GED Excellent verbal and written skills with the ability to interact in a helpful and resourceful manner requiredProficiency in MS Office Word, Excel and PowerPoint, advanced skill set in Excel is a plusAbility to prepare correspondence and documents with a high level of accuracy and attention to detail Must demonstrate flexibility when work assignments and priorities change and be willing to do what it takes to ensure the overall effectiveness of the Safety Department and company safety programsAbility to make decisions and take action without having the total picture required, must be comfortable handling risk and uncertainty in a fast pace work environment Excellent organizational skills, the ability to work with confidential information and maintain confidentiality while meeting time sensitive deadlines are critical to this position",Corporate Safety Administrator – Houston TX Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77012",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Corporate-Safety-Administrator-%E2%80%93-Houston-TX-Job-Houston-TX-US-166065835.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cd0341e207350472c1747cd19a144f08
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:01:41:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Company Headquartered in Goodlettsville, Tennessee (Nashville area), Des-Case is a leading manufacturer of contamination control products for industrial lubricants.  The company was founded in 1983 and―now more than 30 years later― markets an array of products and services designed to help companies make equipment investments last longer.  Des-Case has worked with some of the world’s largest companies, both directly and through partners. Its trademarked and patented solutions are marketed through an extensive distribution network, private label distributors, and OEM partners.  For more information please visit us at descase.com. General Summary (not all-inclusive) The Receiving Associate is responsible for unloading and verifying that incoming delivers are accurate. This position works closely with Material Handling and Supply Chain to ensure that product is accurately recorded in the system and moved to its location. Duties include unloading trucks, verifying Supplier paperwork, receiving product in the system, putting product away, and logging the appropriate paperwork. Responsibilities ·       Receive incoming shipments and deliver parts to the proper areas·       Inspects incoming items ensuring that the quantity received is accurate, no damages, or shortages ·       Compare packing list and purchase order and complete receipt in system·       Move materials from receiving area to quality area or storage location·       Load and Unload trucks·       Operate forklift·       Maintain a clean and safe work area·       Support quality control procedures Job Requirements ·       High school diploma or equivalent.·       Maintain position responsibilities with good organization skills.·       Must be a team player.·       Must be able to accurately count.·    Must be able to lift up to 40 pounds.·       Fork Truck experience preferred.·       Ability to work in Microsoft Outlook, Microsoft WORD, and EXCEL.       Notes: The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees, but does not represent a complete list of responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.  Furthermore, the statements herein do not establish a contract for employment and are subject to change at the discretion of the employer.",Receiving Associate Job in Nashville,Full Time,"Nashville, TN 37203",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Receiving-Associate-Job-Nashville-TN-US-165993324.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,665a8e6f3284d8a25d7c5dd25708f5c2
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:00:44:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you highly motivated, organized, and enjoy working in a fast-paced manufacturing environment?  Do you enjoy leading and mentoring a team?  If you would like to grow your career and lead a successful team, then you could be what our client, a global manufacturing leader which develops cutting edge automotive performance products, is seeking in their Engineering Manager.  This is an excellent opportunity with a top tier global organization offering a robust compensation and benefits package.  Requirements for this role include a Bachelor's Degree in Engineering or a related field, a minimum of 6 years engineering work in the manufacturing industry (automotive preferred), robotics & welding experience,  a minimum of 4 years of supervisory experience, and eligibility to work in the US without requiring any type of Visa sponsorship.",Engineering Manager Job in Overland Park,Full Time,"Overland Park, KS",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Engineering-Manager-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-165902249.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=12,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),ff7a40387f650f6bcb089c351bf11ddb
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:00:43:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities About Higher Education When it comes to on-campus dining, facilities services, sport arenas and conference center services, Aramark is the real head of the class. Partnering with close to 600 colleges and universities throughout the United States, we strive to provide the best residential, retail, and catering options, service and facilities for students, faculty and administrator. Our programs are second to none in their innovation, excellence and results. As part of our commitment, we are determined to build and develop the best team of professionals in the industry - people who aren't afraid of spearheading change, who know how to lead and who appreciate endless opportunity.   Position Description: Responsible for supporting the Custodial Manager and/or the Facility Manager, if applicable in the completion of all custodial and housekeeping operations. May also include minor maintenance as well as grounds oversight.   Scope of Role: Accounts vary in size but generally are limited to a single unit in multiple locations. Total managed volume is $0.3 –1.5M. Generally manages 30 employees.   Key Responsibilities: Develop and be accountable for a safety culture that creates a work environment where no one gets hurt. Assist in communication and develops relationships with client and campus community. Uses the Program Audit to constantly upgrade, update, and enhance best practices in custodial operations. Assist in coordinating the activities of employees in custodial services to ensure the effective and efficient utilization of staff, materials, and equipment. Tour and inspect the facility frequently to ensure total quality management requirements in custodial operations. Document inspections in Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).Keep building space inventory updated and schedules current while closing loop with requestors on completed work requests. Assist leadership with compliance with all OSHA regulations and other local, state, and federal government regulations. Assist the Custodial Manager in providing first line safety inspection on campus and guards against slips, trips, falls. Responds to the requests of the client, campus community, Custodial Manager, and Facility Manager, if applicable. Assist the Custodial Manager in the HR function and payroll in regards to all front line employees. Assist the Custodial Manager in inventory control and may assist with supply and equipment orders. Keep management constantly informed of new trends, developments, and regulations within the field of Custodial operations. Must be able to complete “hands on” custodial duties if needed. Attend Tech Week at least every three years. Participate in one-on-one refresher training semi-annually with each member of the custodial staff. Participate in a school committee or group outside of custodial responsibilities. Assist in the development and delivery of monthly training programs on custodial operations and delivers to service personnel. Qualifications Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Bachelor degree in appropriate field with 2-3 years of technical experience the appropriate facility services environment required. Technical knowledge of chemicals and cleaning procedures and the ability to oversee projects, seasonal variances and variable manpower is required. Experience directing skilled, semi-skilled and non-skilled trade personnel in a union and/or non-union environment are also required. Strong financial analysis and interpretation skills and computer skills, P&L accountability and/or contract-managed service experience are preferred. Additional Information:",Assistant Custodial Manager - Higher Education Job in Decatur,"Full Time, Employee","Decatur, IL 62522",,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Custodial-Manager-Higher-Education-Job-Decatur-IL-US-165255690.aspx?mescoid=3700620001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,307c6bd8ce99b29f9dc3c31ded38a181
United States of America,US,05/Jul/2016:00:38:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you working in a position that involves direct, hands-on mechanical, hydraulic, or electrical experience?  Or have you worked with the maintenance and service of wind turbines?  Vestas has opportunities in our service technician group for you to further expand these capabilities in the wind industry.  As a Service Technician at Vestas, the global leader in wind energy, you are part of the biggest team of service technicians in the world, servicing the biggest fleet of wind turbines. Service Technician I - Goodwell, OKVestas Americas, Service - US & CanadaService DepartmentThe Service Technician role is to maintain and troubleshoot complex hydraulic and electrical controls circuits to maintain a wind turbine. The customer relies on our safe work practices, technical acumen, teamwork, leadership and fiscal stewardship to maintain the turbines in their best condition to generate power at the lowest overall cost.Responsibilities   Closely adhere to all safety standards and procedures. Act as a safety role model, encourage and recognize others completing safe acts, and intervene when unsafe acts are being practiced. Identify gaps in safety standards and safety risks in the operational environment, implement effective risk mitigation, and provide recommendations to higher level technical staff and management.  Demonstrate and promote integrity, strong initiative, a no-compromise focus on safety, and quality of work on a continuous basis.  May assist with or perform basic quality audits of less experienced staff.  Perform intermediate level wind turbine maintenance and/or installation tasks as assigned, such as proficient operation and use of tools (including but not limited to specialized calibration, hydraulic, power tools) and basic turbine equipment. Document tasks where required and enters data into company system (e.g. SAP). Effectively gather information regarding turbine performance / issues. May diagnose, recommend, and implement solutions up to intermediate routine issues. Seek assistance when encountering turbine issues outside trained skill level to ensure success in resolution. Follow basic structured problem-solving process to complete troubleshooting and diagnostic tasks to include the use of diagnostic tools (e.g. basic fluke meter functions, hydraulic pressure gauge).  Independently initiate and perform most work tasks, as well as follow defined instructions and maintenance schedules, executing plans as directed, and perform according to written and verbal instruction from higher level technical staff. Effectively promote strong team environment by assisting teammates in accomplishing goals and mentoring lower level technical staff. Visibly support and promote change initiatives and team spirit and cooperation.  Proactively look for improvement opportunities to job appropriate processes and procedures and communicate through appropriate channels or implement improvements using the appropriate control management protocol.  Interface with customer and may respond to customer inquiries. Refer complex customer inquiries to higher level technical staff or manager. Demonstrate strong customer focus at all times. This role will require travel and working overtime, including working a flexible and variable work schedule as needed to meet business objectives.  Perform other tasks as assigned. Applicants must meet and comply with requirements and limitations of relevant PPE and safety equipment.   Qualifications     High school diploma or equivalent Minimum one (1) year technical wind industry experience, OR six (6) months technical wind industry experience and a certificate of completion from a Wind Technician program, OR in absence of technical wind industry experience, minimum three (3) years’ experience working with hydraulic, electrical, mechanical skills and/or composite skills Demonstrated use and understanding of intermediate level power tools such as hydraulic, power torque and diagnostic tools (e.g. fluke meter functions and hydraulic pressure gauge).  Ability to demonstrate intermediate working knowledge of industrial safety practices / protocols (e.g. Confined Space, energy isolation). Valid Driver’s License and ability to obtain a Passport. Strong attention to detail and execution excellence. Good interpersonal and customer relation skills. Able to effectively collaborate with employees at all professional levels and ability to respectfully follow supervision and support initiatives. Basic computer operation skills, familiarity with internet based program navigation, and ability to generate and interpret computer data. Ability to read, interpret and understand drawings and schematics to validate work activity and ensure that risks are identified and mitigated. Internal candidates must be certified to Task-Based Certification (TBC) level 200.  Competencies     Ability to constantly climb stairs and ladders 60-125 meters in height, in order to access work area. Ability to frequently lift, push, pull, and carry items up to 50 lbs in weight. Ability to frequently walk, stand, look up/down, balance, stoop, twist, kneel, and bend. Ability to constantly grip and manually manipulate, often with repetitive motion, items such as, but not limited to, hand tools and turbine parts. Comfort constantly working in confined spaces and at heights over 100 meters. Ability to speak, read, comprehend, and write in English. Ability to successfully participate in all training courses, including controlled decent. Ability to hear and see, including the ability to perceive depth and distinguish colors, sufficient to perform job functions and use close range radios. Able to work in demanding physical and inclement weather conditions. Comfort working remotely in a Turbine as part of a team with limited supervisory interaction. Ability to work in a respirator, including passing a respirator medical evaluation and fit test (required to be clean shaven)  What we offer As a member of the Vestas team, we offer a competitive salary and one of the most comprehensive benefits plans in the industry.  Among the many amenities we offer: healthcare; dental; vision; paid time off (PTO); generous 401(k) plan; tuition assistance; and much more. It is the policy of Vestas to afford equal employment opportunity without regard to age, race, religion, color, gender, or national origin, and to afford equal opportunity to veterans and individuals with a disability, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, provincial, or local law.  Applicants requiring reasonable accommodation to the application and/or interview process should notify a representative within the People & Culture department. Additional InformationThis job is located in Goodwell, OKWIND. IT MEANS THE WORLD TO US. By joining Vestas, you join the only global energy company dedicated 100% to wind energy. Together with our customers, we have installed more the 51,000 turbines in over 70 countries, and we remain committed to increase that number via our superior, cost-effective wind technologies, products and services. Since Vestas was founded in 1979, Vestas has achieved a market-leading position with more than 60 GW of installed wind turbines or around 19% of the total global capacity. Every day, everyone at Vestas works to make Vestas the undisputed global wind leader and the world’s energy mix more sustainable – join us, and be part of ensuring a sustainable future for our planet.              Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",Service Technician I - Goodwell,Full Time,"Goodwell, OK 73939",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-I-Goodwell-OK-Job-Goodwell-OK-US-165859733.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),45f8efc5575b928fcd7766bb58499fa0
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:17:46:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Yourself in the Driver's Seat.DistTech, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Class A CDL Drivers out of Chicago, IL.We know tank truck drivers are an elite group of professionals. The KAG companies believe that safe, qualified drivers are the most important part of our overall team operation.Come join our great family of drivers and thrive!$5,000 Sign On Bonus!Company DriversLocal/Regional Mix Get Home Weekends $25.00/Hour Multi-Compartment Loads, Multi-Stop Runs Class A-CDL + Tank Endorsement Excellent Benefits Including: Medical, Dental and Vision Plans Paid Vacations and Holidays 401K With Company Match Paid Training On Safe Driving and Product Handling Driver Referral Incentive Pay Safety Bonus And So Much More!Drive and Thrive - Professional Driving that Fits Your LifeWe hope your driving career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your driving career, consider professional driving that fits your life with DistTech.We require Class A CDL with18 months recent, verifiable tractor-trailer experience, Tank and Hazmat endorsements (or ability to obtain), TWIC - Transportation Worker Identification Credential (or ability to obtain) and a safe driving record.Call 800-871-4581Option #3 Dawn/Recruiter for more information or apply now!Kenan Advantage Group is North America's largest bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum, merchant gases, cryogenics, asphalt/hot products, crude, propane, water, food grade, chemicals and specialty products industries.Kenan Advantage Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Class A CDL Driver - DTI Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/class-a-cdl-driver-dti-job-chicago-il-us-167862404.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,c6fcdf5a46225c26a987d4f24bdb2e52
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:17:45:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Kyle,Full Time Employee,"Kyle, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-kyle-tx-us-167323728.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,20ffd3f49f3b20487fd779a4d0e2cbf2
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:17:30:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Manager ($60k - $80k)Build-out & Set-up of new dental offices and expansion of existing dental officesFamilia Dental is a multi-state dental practice with the focus on making trips to the dentist easier, accessible, and more affordable to everyone.  Our practice was established in 2008 and has grown rapidly to over 30 offices in 5 states, with further expansion planned in the near future.  Our mission is to provide our patients with the best dental care in modern, state-of-the-art family centers at affordable prices.To support that mission, Familia Dental has an immediate opening for a Project Manager to oversee the build-out of new locations and the expansion of existing offices.The job duties will include:·         Involvement in site selections working with Realtors to select prime locations.·         New office build-out and set-up and expansion within existing clinics.·         Reviewing office plans and specifications and identifying problems, omissions and discrepancies.·         Controlling budget expenditures by soliciting competitive bids, monitoring vendor performance and quality of work, and minimizing over-runs by anticipating problems and communicating any issues in a timely manner.·         Preparing and maintaining the project schedule·         Looking for and implementing cost and/or time-saving solutions.·         Contractor and Vendor management.  Researching and selecting subcontractors as well as evaluating existing contractors/vendors.·         Visiting job sites, assessing job progress and issuing regular progress reports to management.·         Assist with the installation of new dental equipment and office set-up.·         Monitoring work sites for safety concerns.·         Making sure that the correct liability insurance is in place at each jobsite.·         Coordinating independent testing and inspections.·         Issuing final close-outs.·         Reviewing contractor performance to ensure project standards are met. Job RequirementsThe skills and experience required for this position include:·         Ability to define the scope of the project and create a detailed work plan which identifies and sequences the activities need to successfully complete the project.·         Excellent time management and analytical skills.·         Excellent communication skills to keep stakeholders updated on the progress of the project.·         At least two years of project management experience.·         Experience working with contracts.  ·         Experience researching and selecting subcontractors.·         Excellent leadership skills.·         Must be willing to travel extensively. Any two or four year degree OR having a certificate in Project Management is a plus.Familia Dental offers:•         A competitive salary, plus bonus potential.•         Group medical, dental and vision insurance benefits.•         Paid time off.•         A fast paced work environment.•         A team atmosphere and the ability to make significant contributions to the success of the organization.  ",Project Manager Job in Schaumburg,Full Time Employee,"Schaumburg, IL 60173",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-schaumburg-il-us-167208191.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,Project/Program Management,432e7e0983b086b4ade76a47f3d0394b
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:17:23:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description   Candidate for this position should possess excellent communication skills and have prior experience teaching, working with, or mentoring youth on technical topics. The candidate selected for this position will be responsible for teaching, assisting and supporting a six week engineering program for 12 students between the ages of 16 and 18. The Project Lead will assist students with the development, execution and management of the engineering project and prepare students for final presentation. Other tasks may involve the following, but are not limited to: - Communicate and coordinate with Engineering Program Lead - Coordinate with HIP student leads on schedules and daily activities - Teaching basic engineering concepts - Designing and building physical models or structures - Teaching and mentoring students on professional development - Working with outside customer Location: Rolling Meadows, Hours: 3 days/week total of 24 hours/week; 6 weeks in summer   Qualifications   Basic Qualifications: - Bachelors Degree in STEM related field - Understanding of the engineering design process - Demonstrated leadership experience - Demonstrated teaching experience - Communication skills and ability to connect with students, mentors and program team - Demonstrated conflict resolution and group problem solving experience - U.S. citizenship required  Preferred Qualifications:Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",HIP Program Facilitator - Summer Part Time Program Job in Rolling Meadows,Full Time Employee,"Description   Candidate for this position should possess excellent communication skills and have prior experience teaching, working with, or mentoring youth on technical topics. The candidate selected for this position will be responsible for teaching, assisting and supporting a six week engineering program for 12 students between the ages of 16 and 18. The Project Lead will assist students with the development, execution and management of the engineering project and prepare students for final presentation. Other tasks may involve the following, but are not limited to: - Communicate and coordinate with Engineering Program Lead - Coordinate with HIP student leads on schedules and daily activities - Teaching basic engineering concepts - Designing and building physical models or structures - Teaching and mentoring students on professional development - Working with outside customer Location: Rolling Meadows, Hours: 3 days/week total of 24 hours/week; 6 weeks in summer   Qualifications   Basic Qualifications: - Bachelors Degree in STEM related field - Understanding of the engineering design process - Demonstrated leadership experience - Demonstrated teaching experience - Communication skills and ability to connect with students, mentors and program team - Demonstrated conflict resolution and group problem solving experience - U.S. citizenship required  Preferred Qualifications:Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",,http://jobview.monster.com/hip-program-facilitator-summer-part-time-program-job-rolling-meadows-il-us-167865428.aspx?mescoid=2300330001001&jobPosition=18,,Project/Program Management,11976328b7182894b3923fcc10c87328
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:16:44:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"1. Use metallography techniques to evaluate plasma spray coatings, laser welds, electron beam welds, inertia welds, TIG welds, energy dispersive machining, single crystal, braze joints, carburized and nitrided surfaces, carbon fiber/epoxy composites, shot peen, and various coatings to monitor processes and ensure that parts meet blueprint and specification requirements.2. Utilize energy dispersive spectroscopy with a scanning electron microscope to qualitatively and quantitatively analyze oil filter debris as well as perform materials analysis investigations.3. Perform monthly distillations to verify that Zyglo ZL-67 penetrant water content is within acceptable limits per ASTM D 95.4. Titrate Lenium ES vapor degreasing solvent on a weekly basis and recommend booster additions as needed.5. Operate an Instron tester to perform uniaxial tensile or compressive testing to determine mechanical properties of materials.6. Utilize microhardness tester to perform hardness depth profiles via Knoop and Vickers Indenter types.7. Perform Rockwell Standard and Superficial hardness testing on heat treated hardware to verify material acceptance.8. Must be capable of operating the following equipment:Struers Axitom Abrasive wet sawSecotom-10 Precision wet sawStruers CitoPress-20 Dual head mounting pressStruers AbraPol-10 Multi-mount polishing unitOptical microscope Leica MEF4MClemex Vision PE Image analysis softwareInstron Uniaxial test equipmentRockwell Standard and Superficial Hardness Tester Wilson Series 2000Microhardness tester Wilson Tukon 1202SEM JEOL JSM-5410LVDetector Bruker AXS XFlash Detector 4010Requirements: High School or GED and a minimum of three (3) years of directly related experience. May train, provide guidance and assist in developing lower skill level team members. Must be capable of lifting 50 lbs. from floor to waist.(Note must use a lift assist or assistance from other individual(s) when lifting in excess of 50 lbs.)Must be capable of pushing or pulling a weight of 60 lbs.Must have grip strength of at least 50 lbs.Responsible for and accountable for product safety and the quality of work, including, as a minimum, all elements defined in the Company?s Quality Policy.U.S. Citizenship or Permanent Resident Alien status is required.Apply Now!",Metallurgical Lab Technician Job in Ogden,Full Time,"Ogden, UT 84401",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/metallurgical-lab-technician-job-ogden-ut-us-167891516.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,1bc4eb17cadd949d7a9e2e03d8efebb5
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:16:44:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"System One is currently seeking a Project Coordinator II on a 24 month contract position located in Denver, CO.  Responsibilities:Provide support for overall compliance/project management of Substation/Transmission projects.Share Transmission data with internal and external entities including utilities, counties, and state agencies while maintaining compliance with corporate policies regarding Non-Disclosure Agreements and Mutual Confidentiality Agreements, interacting with the Transmission Business Relations and the Legal departments as necessary.As a member of the Data and Records Management team, you will work with all regional Substation/Transmission departments to ensure time sensitive activities are completed and up to date, providing continuity across all regions.You will respond in a professional manner to all inquiries through verbal and written communications and follow up as appropriate.You will proactively communicate with the Data & Records Management Supervisor to manage your work load. Primary responsibilities include:Monitoring compliance of required project documents, noting discrepancies, researching and reviewing with engineering personnel and consultants to determine the appropriate action.Through daily activities, identifying gaps or inefficiencies within existing policies and working with stakeholders and peers to develop business process improvements.Reviewing non-technical aspects of drawing packages to ensure quality, consistency and accuracy of packages being transmitted. This encompasses, but is not limited to metadata around the file, basic appearance, signature verification, file location, and title block information.Performing error tracking and substantive review of content under deadline pressure and ensuring content meets established CAD standards by reviewing the CAD standards compliance report.Ensuring accurate documentation of Legacy Transmission files by scanning and electronically filing older paper files into appropriate locations within the ProjectWise file management system.Creating and publishing regularly scheduled and ad hoc reports to be supplied to management to ensure project compliance.Create/maintain Asset folder structures within ProjectWise.Ensuring the proper distribution of vendor drawing packages to appropriate engineering staff.Completing substation record file transfers following appropriate guidelines.In addition, you will assist in:Researching record data/drawings to aid in the creation of facility ratings.Creating process documentation.Transmitting formal drawings for engineering. Requirements:The ability to partner with business personnel at all levels, both internal and external to the organization.Strong attention to detail and strong organizational skills.Excellent verbal and written communication skills as well as strong interpersonal and customer service skills.The ability to work well under various stressful and time-sensitive situations.The ability to read and interpret engineering drawings.The ability to work in a team-based environment and to be accountable on both individual and team-based assignments.The ability to interpret instructions, learn new skills, and work with minimal supervision.Proficiency in Windows operating system and Microsoft Office applications (Outlook, Excel, Word, Access, etc.).Experience with ProjectWise file management system, Business Objects reporting, Passport work management system and Primavera scheduling system preferred.Familiarity with CAD Standards preferred.    Duration: 24 monthsLocations: Denver, CORate: $30.50-37.50/hr  ",Project Coordinator II Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","System One is currently seeking a Project Coordinator II on a 24 month contract position located in Denver, CO.  Responsibilities:Provide support for overall compliance/project management of Substation/Transmission projects.Share Transmission data with internal and external entities including utilities, counties, and state agencies while maintaining compliance with corporate policies regarding Non-Disclosure Agreements and Mutual Confidentiality Agreements, interacting with the Transmission Business Relations and the Legal departments as necessary.As a member of the Data and Records Management team, you will work with all regional Substation/Transmission departments to ensure time sensitive activities are completed and up to date, providing continuity across all regions.You will respond in a professional manner to all inquiries through verbal and written communications and follow up as appropriate.You will proactively communicate with the Data & Records Management Supervisor to manage your work load. Primary responsibilities include:Monitoring compliance of required project documents, noting discrepancies, researching and reviewing with engineering personnel and consultants to determine the appropriate action.Through daily activities, identifying gaps or inefficiencies within existing policies and working with stakeholders and peers to develop business process improvements.Reviewing non-technical aspects of drawing packages to ensure quality, consistency and accuracy of packages being transmitted. This encompasses, but is not limited to metadata around the file, basic appearance, signature verification, file location, and title block information.Performing error tracking and substantive review of content under deadline pressure and ensuring content meets established CAD standards by reviewing the CAD standards compliance report.Ensuring accurate documentation of Legacy Transmission files by scanning and electronically filing older paper files into appropriate locations within the ProjectWise file management system.Creating and publishing regularly scheduled and ad hoc reports to be supplied to management to ensure project compliance.Create/maintain Asset folder structures within ProjectWise.Ensuring the proper distribution of vendor drawing packages to appropriate engineering staff.Completing substation record file transfers following appropriate guidelines.In addition, you will assist in:Researching record data/drawings to aid in the creation of facility ratings.Creating process documentation.Transmitting formal drawings for engineering. Requirements:The ability to partner with business personnel at all levels, both internal and external to the organization.Strong attention to detail and strong organizational skills.Excellent verbal and written communication skills as well as strong interpersonal and customer service skills.The ability to work well under various stressful and time-sensitive situations.The ability to read and interpret engineering drawings.The ability to work in a team-based environment and to be accountable on both individual and team-based assignments.The ability to interpret instructions, learn new skills, and work with minimal supervision.Proficiency in Windows operating system and Microsoft Office applications (Outlook, Excel, Word, Access, etc.).Experience with ProjectWise file management system, Business Objects reporting, Passport work management system and Primavera scheduling system preferred.Familiarity with CAD Standards preferred.    Duration: 24 monthsLocations: Denver, CORate: $30.50-37.50/hr  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-ii-job-denver-co-us-166718658.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,Project/Program Management,d3f5521d368c024180f9b77770e76a31
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:15:45:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"BASIC FUNCTION SUMMARY·         Responsible for the management of all Quality Assurance Programs from PMO; ensures maintenance performance is according to PAE, FAA, and DoD standards and Technical Orders as appropriate.·         May be designated as Chief Inspector.·         Reports directly to the Site Manager.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND ACCOUNTABILITIES·         Ensures that the performance of required aircraft airworthiness inspections are carried out and that forms and certifications appropriate to both military and general aviation aircraft are prepared.·         Ensure that all assigned aircraft meet required operating standards for flight as well as safety requirements.·         Monitor all required forms and reports related to aircraft, as well as the related parts inventory, parts usage, and associated ground support equipment.·         Review aircraft and engine logbooks.·         Review and monitor engine trend analysis, oil analysis, hydraulic sampling programs, and trends in aircraft material condition.·         Investigate repeat discrepancies, determine the cause(s), and identify the necessary corrective actions.·         Make entries into the Maintenance Records System using the Aircraft Maintenance Report or other reports as required.·         Assist in general housekeeping and clean‑up.·         Coordinate training and safety functions as required at selected sites.QUALIFICATION STANDARDS·         Requires an FAA Airframe and Powerplant (A&P) license with a current Inspection Authorization (IA) with at least one (1) year of experience in a similar full‑time aircraft maintenance environment.·         Have at least five (5) years recent experience working full‑time as an aircraft and powerplant mechanic.·         Must have above average working knowledge of both military and general aviation aircraft and systems.·         Have experience and knowledge in upkeep of aircraft/engines and systems.·         Requires experience and knowledge of aircraft/engine maintenance records and logbooks.·         Have demonstrated a record of successful technical performance, reliability and initiative.·         Must possess analytical ability to objectively evaluate other individual's job performance from the Quality/Safety aspect.·         Must possess thorough knowledge of DS2 Quality Policies and Procedures.·         Must possess a thorough knowledge of those functions which are monitored.·         Must have the ability to communicate clearly and concisely, both verbally and in writing.·         Must be able to obtain a DoD Security Clearance of at least “Secret”.·         Must be able to obtain a passport, visa and be able to perform worldwide travel on short·         Must be a US citizen and completed high school or equivalent.·         Must to able to read, write, speak, and understand English.PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONSPhysical Demands:This classification’s activities range from, an office-like environment with extensive sitting demands to a flight line-like environment with extensive climbing, standing, stooping, bending, pushing, kneeling, stretching, and walking demands. May occasionally be required to lift objects whose weight exceeds 30 pounds. Special vision abilities to perform this job are close vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust and focus.Work Environment:The diversity of work conditions may range from an office environment where there is little or no physical discomfort to a flight line environment where inclement weather may subject the individual to severe changes in temperature, wind, rain, etc. May be required to work in areas where high noise hazards prevail. May be exposed to fumes, airborne particles, and electrical shock hazards.LICENSING, CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS·       Security Clearance·       Hazardous Communication / MSDS·       CPR/Bloodborne Pathogen·       Driver License·       Support Equipment License·       Hazardous Material Handling·       Corrosion Control·       Respirator *·       FCC/A&P/IA·       O2/N2/ABO·       Aircraft  Ground Handling·       Daily Inspection·       Tool Inventory·       Foreign Object Damage (FOD) Prevention·       Freon Servicing·       Electro Static Discharge·       Explosive Handling (CAD)·       Run-Up and Taxi·       Weight & Balance·       Fork Lift·       Portable Fire Extinguishers·       Aviation Gas Free Engineering (SCC & WTU Only)·       Vibration Analysis·       Aircraft Welding**AS REQUIRED",Quality Control Inspector-Laredo Job in Laredo,Full Time Employee,"Laredo, TX 78041",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-control-inspector-laredo-job-laredo-tx-us-167312476.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=8,,Quality Assurance/Safety,625df78c0a69f17c6c05b0b246a18ff3
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:15:44:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"    Position Summary The Project Manager will work independently to lead the planning, scheduling, control and effective coordination of all parallel activities related to the management of multiple projects of moderate to high complexity from concept through close-out.  Essential Duties Ensures that electrical projects are competed timely in accordance with established quality standards and procedures. Scheduling of field personnel and equipment to the various ongoing projects. Managing both small and large complex projects; insuring maximum job safety, efficiency and profitability. Order all parts and materials required for projects. Set-up and schedule projects arrange for required power outages and insure field personnel have all the necessary paperwork and materials to perform the work. Review all completed test reports and write the executive summary with recommendations. Performs job estimates and proposals/quotes for customers. Maintains Work In Progress Reports (WIPs), insures all project invoicing is completed & delivered and assist with AR issues on projects. Assists in training of other employees as directed. Takes emergency calls, assesses situation and calls out technicians as required. Review and approve contractor bids, RFI’s, submittals and change requests. Inspect or direct the inspection of work to ensure conformance to specifications, schedules, and safety regulations. Achieve high customer satisfaction through effective communication of both technical and non-technical topics with all levels of the organization both verbally in writing. Exhibit project leadership, and effective decision making and throughout each project and consistently deliver projects that meet all stakeholder requirements and are fully commissioned, qualified and ready for start-up/occupancy. Ensure all safety regulations are closely adhered to; completes related documentation as required. Works with and takes direction from the Regional Manager. Perform other duties as assigned. Job duties may be modified at any time.   Job Requirements:Bachelor of Science Degree in Engineering or a Business Degree with a minor in Engineering, preferred. Minimum five (5) years project management experience, required. Minimum ten (10) years electrical testing/powder distribution system experience, required. PMP certification preferred, but not required. Must have extensive managerial and technical experience. Strong understanding of engineering principles, procedures and standards. Experience related to computer processing of project costs and schedule information. Experience estimating and making proposals to customers. Well organized with strong planning. Extensive managerial and technical experience. Business development experience Coordinates closely with related departments to maintain schedules and effect necessary revisions as required. Must have experience in preparing detailed electrical equipment specifications, datasheets and submittal packages. Must have the ability to read, interpret, and check the following for construction packages, one-line diagrams. Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and orally with managers and clients Knowledgeable of current IEEE/ANSI/NETA, NEC, NFPA-70E, and other applicable current standards and specifications. Must be willing to travel.    ",Project Manager (Electrical Power Solutions) Job in Baltimore,Full Time Employee,"Baltimore, MD 21227",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-electrical-power-solutions-job-baltimore-md-us-167856692.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,Project/Program Management,1076bcace69c47e998420d2ac426e121
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:14:43:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kraus-Anderson®     Project Manager  – Rochester, MN Rare opportunity to make an immediate impact and partner with an industry leader!  Our Company: For more than a century, Kraus-Anderson has been transforming the American landscape. Founded in 1897 and privately owned and managed by the Engelsma family for more than 70 years, KA is consistently ranked by Engineering News Record among the top 50 general contractors in the United States. Our base of operations in Minnesota is supplemented with regional offices, extending our capabilities coast to coast. We take a highly collaborative approach to our work. We work closely with owners, architects and the entire planning team well before ground is broken; providing cost analyses, scheduling information, and value engineering services to ensure that our client can make informed decisions leading to a timely finish of the highest quality and the best value. Core Purpose: Building enduring relationships and strong communities Integrity – Do the right thing…always be respectful, honest and fair Commitment – Take ownership, work hard, and keep promises Teamwork – Collaborate to foster trust and success for all Value People – Support each other in a safe, positive environment where people are recognized and appreciated for their contributions  Summary Plans, directs, and coordinates activities of designated project to ensure that goals or objectives of project are accomplished within prescribed time frame and funding parameters by performing the following duties personally or through Superintendents and Project Assistants. Evaluates project scope and completes proposals, costs and budgets with accuracy. Develops projects to assure profitability and customer satisfaction. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. Reviews project proposal, plans and specifications to determine time frame, funding limitations, procedures for accomplishing project, staffing requirements, and allotment of available resources to various phases of project. Establishes work plan, scheduling and staffing for each phase of project, and arranges for recruitment or assignment of project personnel as needed. Reads and understands drawings and specifications. Confers with team leader and project staff to outline workplan and to assign duties, responsibilities, and scope of authority. Works with the actual billings on projects and works with Vice President of Accounting to ensure a smooth process on all projects. Is able to negotiate with the Owner and subcontractors on projects in order to maintain an efficient and well-run project. Works with the Project Superintendent, Project Assistant, clients and subcontractors Directs and coordinates project activities to ensure project progresses on schedule, on-time completion and within prescribed budget. Reviews status reports prepared by project personnel and modifies schedules or plans as required. Prepares project reports for management, client, or others. Confers with project personnel and Owners to provide technical advice and to resolve problems. Coordinates project activities with activities of government regulatory or other governmental agencies as necessary. Supervisory Responsibilities Directly supervises the Project Assistant assigned to their project.  Carries out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization's policies and applicable laws.  Responsibilities include planning, assigning, and directing work to the Project Assistant(s); appraising performance; working with HR to resolve any problems or disciplinary issues. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Bachelor's degree (B.A.) from four-year college or university; or 7+years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge of project management, spreadsheet and word processing software. Valid drivers license Able to travel up to 50% of time. Share with us your talent, drive and expertise and we will provide a creative and supportive environment, where valuable contributions are rewarded and celebrated with professional growth, job satisfaction and comprehensive compensation and benefits programs. For questions regarding the online application process, contact the Kraus Anderson TalentAssist Team @ 1-877-856-9755 Kraus-Anderson is an EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability Employer We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin or disability. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the job.     Kraus-Anderson Construction Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer and hereby provides notice of its compliance with 41 C.F.R. 60-1.4; 41 C.F.R. 60-4.2; 41 C.F.R. 60-4.3; 41 C.F.R. 60-300.5; 41 C.F.R. 60-741.5; and 29 C.F.R. Part 471 Appendix A to Subpart A, which are hereby incorporated by reference. We are excited to partner with the HR Professionals at Instigate, Inc. to manage our recruitment efforts for this opening. All responses will be processed promptly on behalf of our hiring team by Instigate.  Please submit your resumes and supporting information directly online for consideration. Thank you for your interest in joining our team. See Job Description",Project Manager - Rochester Job in Rochester,Full Time,"Rochester, MN 55901",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-rochester-job-rochester-mn-us-167822914.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),019ba2cacef3f86ef1eac06b6ac9b055
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:14:42:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"LCC- A Tech Mahindra Company has an opening for a Program Manager who will report to our Access Network Services Lead.   The Program Manager will intuitively understand the compelling need for organization, process and focus. The Manager will be responsible for developing best practices and procedures for large E911 projects.Good understanding of Compliance and Regulatory rules and issues related to E911. Versed with E911 technologies, systems and OEM vendors. The Manager will have responsibility to meet and exceed operational objectives related to large projects.  The ideal candidate will be well versed in wireless communications engineering, be an industry respected individual and have a technical background.   CORE COMPETENCIES Budgets/Cost Control Leadership Managing Diversity Managing for Results Managing Performance People Development People Management Planning Sales Skills Sales Team Support Strategic Thinking ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Plan the delivery of the overall program and its activities in accordance with the goals of the organization Develop and implement long-term goals and objectives to achieve the successful outcome of the program Develop a program evaluation framework to assess the strengths of the program and identify areas for improvement Supervise program staff, providing direction, input and feedback Communicate with clients to monitor compliance and customer expectations Manage activities of team members to meet the program milestones and conduct performance review for core team members Provide management creativity in solving problems. Provide leadership and vision to the program. Develop quality and cost control practices. Interact collaboratively with other groups including HR, Sales, Finance. Guarantee customer satisfaction. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE Bachelor of Science degree in Electrical Engineering (BSEE) or equivalent; advanced degrees highly preferred. 10+ years program management experience with large complex programs 5+ years related industry experience in design and/or optimization of wireless networks  Experience in project management methods and tools. OTHER QUALIFICATIONS Demonstrated record of managing complex programs involving employees and subcontractors Demonstrated record as a leader (technical and personal) Demonstrated ability to establish/implement processes, quality control and cost control Demonstrated ability to be a team builder Demonstrated ability to work with internal and external organizations Demonstrated ability to satisfy customer Demonstrated ability to lead a team of greater than 40 personnel Demonstrated ability to manage fixed price projects of greater than $1M in value with profitable results Sensitive to technical and financial details that breed success and profitability Able to quickly establish credibility, inspire trust and promote confidence Excellent interpersonal skills and customer interaction Strong written and oral communication skills Well organized with good time management Understand fundamentals of managerial accounting and managerial finance Strong computer skills Knowledge of GIS package MapInfo Proficient in Microsoft Office Understanding of Microsoft Outlook and the Internet WORK ENVIRONMENT The work environment characteristics are representative of those an employee encounters while performing essential functions of the job in a typical office situation. Able to work sitting or standing at desk and operate a computer via standard input devices such as using a keyboard and reading information on a monitor.",Program Manager - E Job in King Of Prussia,Full Time,"King Of Prussia, PA 19406",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-e911-job-king-of-prussia-pa-us-167223680.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9acbe66997eb9fc70a27643cbd265203
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:13:43:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThe Development Manager is responsible for donor recruitment, development, cultivation, and activation, leading assigned fundraising events, and meeting fundraising objectives of the March of Dimes in the assigned market.Principle roles and responsibilities include revenue development, volunteer leadership development, and staff development.• Increase overall market revenue by implementing core tactics for fundraising events, resulting in aggressive and sustainable year over year growth.• Identify prospects, research and analyze development options in order to predict business opportunities. Manage a personal portfolio of prospects.• Develop relationships with constituents, referral partners, or existing volunteer leaders in order to obtain personal introduction to prospective constituents.• Develop and present sales presentations in order to educate and sell mission engagement opportunities to prospects or constituents.• Research prospects’ needs, concerns and objectives in order to create effective sponsorship proposals. In many cases, serve as lead staff on all significant sponsorship asks in the market and engage potential national sponsors in a relationship with March of Dimes. Drive all sponsors in the market to activate their sponsorship aggressively.• Identify candidates for top volunteer leadership roles. Create plans to gain access to volunteer leadership prospects and candidates. Recruit qualified candidates and articulate goals, outcomes and objectives for performance in order to enable candidates to make good decisions regarding the acceptance of critical revenue generation goals.• Develop, execute and monitor development strategies to enhance cultivation, solicitation and stewardship of donors.• Make periodic visits, explore specific needs, and resolve problems in order to build and maintain constituent relationships.• Coach and guide staff and volunteers in the execution of the event and achievement of expected outcomes according to core tactics.• Plan performance expectations, monitor and appraise the team member’s job results and performance in order to develop, coach and recognize direct reports. Provide ongoing feedback and guidance to direct reports on overall performance. Provide information, educational opportunities, and experiential growth opportunities in order to develop staff. Focus on the development of leadership skills and business acumen of direct reports.• Communicate the mission of the March of Dimes with staff, volunteers and within the community in order to connect current and prospective donors with Mission outcomes.• Utilize electronic data management tools in order to review and analyze pertinent information and monitor financial and mission related results.• Perform other duties from time-to-time in order to ensure the attainment of market financial goals.• Accountable for all activities within the functional areas of responsibility that support the market goals and objectives, assuring they are met on time and within budget.• Represent the March of Dimes as an official spokesperson and provides a high degree of expertise within his/her area and in broad and organizational areas to internal and external contacts. Contacts are critical to motivating, negotiation with, developing and collaborating with others.• Decisions, or decisions this position leads in making, have significant impact on fundraising success of the market.Position Qualifications• Previous Experience: Minimum of 3 years of directly related work experience in increasingly responsible positions• Education: Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and/or directly related professional skills and experience• Physical Demands: May involve lifting and carrying boxes; may involve traveling by car or plane to meetings and training.",Development Manager Job in Fort Myers,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Myers, FL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/development-manager-job-fort-myers-fl-us-166982296.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,df0b54aaea944058a4a013f2fa4db8fe
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:13:42:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.  Manager Commercial Sales II Location: Denver, CO Job Overview: The Manager Commercial Sales is responsible for all aspects of sales within the encompassing business product portfolio to all small, mid-sized and select large businesses including education and government customers. This position will report to the Area Vice President and will be the sales lead for a team of six to eight sales representatives; prior experience in telecommunication sales with experience leading, coaching, and mentoring other sales professionals in value selling, prospecting, proposal creation, and sales closing skills. Job Responsibilities:• Ensure assigned business accounts across all industry sectors receive professional account management yielding both improved revenue growth and retention for the company and continuous improvement in customer satisfaction.• Development of relationships with key individuals at the CXO level among client base and local business community.• Hire and develop top performing sales personnel• Establish and maintain a true team environment with unified accountability for the client experience.• Create and maintain a dynamic territory management plan.• Direct daily sales activities.• Supervise creation, refinement and implementation of account strategies and tactics.• Assist with deal construction, framework, and approvals.• Serve as an evangelist for our corporate vision and guiding principles.• Create a challenging, empowering, and fun work environment.• Collaborate / provide feedback with supporting corporate departments.• Support business development efforts.• Demonstrate thorough and exact accounting of business metrics.• Ensure the professional growth and success of direct reports. Minimum Qualifications: • Bachelor's degree in business or related field or equivalent experience.• Must have 5+ year’s telecom or related technology sales experience.• Experience in building strategic plans for sales team growth and development including account and activity planning and development.• Experience mentoring, training and developing high performance sales teams.• Proficiency with PC-based applications such as MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint and sales performance/tracking programs.• May require some travel.• Must have a valid driver's license and satisfactory driving record. Preferred Qualifications: • Prior Sales Management experience.• Experience with and knowledge of the customer base in the local market.• Demonstrated stable track record of success in Sales, with 1½ - 2 years consecutive experience within one company within the last 5 years Alternate Location: US-Colorado-DenverRequisition #: 49509 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Manager Commercial Sales II Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80202",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-commercial-sales-ii-job-denver-co-us-167069345.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=12,,,cde0cba213d2bcb7db76e10f8053c930
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:13:10:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Outreach Manager is primarily responsible for providing outreach support and training to Program Managers through development, monitoring and adjusting of work plans. The position will provide monthly activity reporting and analysis, resource and savings forecasting, and coordination to deliver the work plan to Program Managers and provide insight into tactics and strategies according to goal status. The Outreach Manager will also be responsible for driving the development of sales process and adherence to training, on-boarding and ride-a-long processes. Emphasis will be on collaborative communication and working as team within all support departments and require to lead start-up outreach activities, as needed. You will also be working with others who are passionate about energy efficiency and making a positive impact on the industry. * Design outreach plans and collaborate with marketing, engineering, and other support departments to develop and implement comprehensive program plans* Develop outreach training programs to be used with new Franklin Employees and work in conjunction with the Organizational Training Manager to ensure effective training techniques and systems are in place.* Review outreach metrics to Program Managers monthly, at a minimum* Identify and communicate opportunities for program outreach improvement * Serves as a resource for program and department staff on comprehensive and detailed assignments, including outreach activities* From analysis of field results, and in alignment with work plans and individual development plans, develop and provide in-field training of outreach staff with emphasis on closing more projects* Pro-actively identifies areas for application of new sales principles and techniques* Provides implementation insight on marketing and outreach projects* Deliver documentation of trigger tactic opportunities for energy efficiency programs and provide direction as required, by Program Manager* As needed, enter data into databases to determine outreach effectiveness and collaborate with program staff as required* Analyze data retrieved from databases to determine outreach effectiveness and collaborate with program staff as required* Participate in program meetings as needed and agreed to with Program Managers* Provide a professional appearance appropriate for a representative of the team and the utility* Be able to work in a team atmosphere, and willing to collaborate with all stakeholders on continuous improvement of operations year after year* Assist Program Manager in the training of new team members* Lead presentations promoting energy efficiency programs for targeted groupsSpecific Qualification for the role include:* Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university required or equivalent experience* 2-3 years of energy efficiency program experience required* 5-6 years of sales experience with progressively more responsibility and a track record of results* Previous customer service, sales, or marketing experience* Energy Efficiency experience – Preferred* Ability to perform advanced sales processes, procedures, methods and techniques, including contract negations, strategic relationship building and building competitive strategies* Promote the energy efficiency program to customer and trade allies in the assigned territory* Must be self-motivated, organized and have an ability to prioritize workload* Must be flexible to handle a wide work variety and work at a fast pace* Proficient in Microsoft Office, specifically Word, Excel and Outlook* Strong data entry skills in entering information in tracking systems/databases* Ability to communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing with customers, clients and employees* Ability to analyze and interpret data and solve practical problems* Knowledge of mathematical concepts such as fractions, percentages and ratios* Valid driver's license and reliable transportation* Willingness to travel up to 60% of the time, including overnight travel* Position is based in San Antonio, TX with the expectation of at least 3 full days of work in the field for assigned weeks across portfolioPhysical Demands and Work Environment* Required to sit, stand, walk; talk and hear; and ability to touch and handle tools and/or controls* Ability to lift up to 50 pounds* Noise level is typically moderate* May occasionally be exposed to moving mechanical parts; high, precarious places; fumes or airborne particles; toxic or caustic chemicals; outside weather conditions and risk of electrical shockNote: The physical demand and work environment characteristics described above are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Apply HerePI93676615  img.img { width: 0px !important;}",Outreach Manager Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78245",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/outreach-manager-job-san-antonio-tx-us-166671458.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Project/Program Management,b05f6d849364604e95b4922d6534ef05
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:12:44:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThe Senior Development Manager is responsible for donor recruitment, development, cultivation, and activation, leading assigned fundraising events, and meeting fundraising objectives of the March of Dimes in the assigned market.Principle roles and responsibilities include revenue development, volunteer leadership development, and staff development.• Increase overall market revenue by implementing core tactics for fundraising events, resulting in aggressive and sustainable year over year growth.• Identify prospects, research and analyze development options in order to predict business opportunities. Manage a personal portfolio of prospects.• Develop relationships with constituents, referral partners, or existing volunteer leaders in order to obtain personal introduction to prospective constituents.• Develop and present sales presentations in order to educate and sell mission engagement opportunities to prospects or constituents.• Research prospects’ needs, concerns and objectives in order to create effective sponsorship proposals. In many cases, serve as lead staff on all significant sponsorship asks in the market and engage potential national sponsors in a relationship with March of Dimes. Drive all sponsors in the market to activate their sponsorship aggressively.• Identify candidates for top volunteer leadership roles. Create plans to gain access to volunteer leadership prospects and candidates. Recruit qualified candidates and articulate goals, outcomes and objectives for performance in order to enable candidates to make good decisions regarding the acceptance of critical revenue generation goals.• Develop, execute and monitor development strategies to enhance cultivation, solicitation and stewardship of donors.• Make periodic visits, explore specific needs, and resolve problems in order to build and maintain constituent relationships.• Coach and guide staff and volunteers in the execution of the event and achievement of expected outcomes according to core tactics.• Plan performance expectations, monitor and appraise the team member’s job results and performance in order to develop, coach and recognize direct reports. Provide ongoing feedback and guidance to direct reports on overall performance. Provide information, educational opportunities, and experiential growth opportunities in order to develop staff. Focus on the development of leadership skills and business acumen of direct reports.• Communicate the mission of the March of Dimes with staff, volunteers and within the community in order to connect current and prospective donors with Mission outcomes.• Utilize electronic data management tools in order to review and analyze pertinent information and monitor financial and mission related results.• Perform other duties from time-to-time in order to ensure the attainment of market financial goals.• Accountable for all activities within the functional areas of responsibility that support the market goals and objectives, assuring they are met on time and within budget.• Represent the March of Dimes as an official spokesperson and provides a high degree of expertise within his/her area and in broad and organizational areas to internal and external contacts. Contacts are critical to motivating, negotiation with, developing and collaborating with others.• Decisions, or decisions this position leads in making, have significant impact on fundraising success of the market.Position Qualifications• Previous Experience: Minimum of 3 years of directly related work experience in increasingly responsible positions• Education: Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and/or directly related professional skills and experience• Physical Demands: May involve lifting and carrying boxes; may involve traveling by car or plane to meetings and training.",Senior Development Manager Job in Miami,"Full Time, Employee","Miami, FL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-development-manager-job-miami-fl-us-167312132.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=17,,Project/Program Management,bed99c024af9c0250fddd260bf04568b
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:12:43:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Benore Logistic Systems, Inc., we develop a partnership with our clients that enable us to identify supply chain issues and provide integrated logistics solutions that add value. We integrate our clients’ values, systems, and people with ours to deliver a seamless supply chain for optimal performance.  We are currently seeking a Project Manager who will oversee the planning, implementation, and tracking of multiple short- and long-term projects, concurrently, which have a beginning, an end and specified deliverables. Reporting to the Senior Project Manager the Project Manager will establish project planning activities on topics presented by organizational leaders. Identify needs within the organization or client base and promote project activities to address.  Position represents the company in a positive image with employees, customers and the community always performing in a safe and ethical manner to achieve financial success.  The ideal candidate will have project experience in warehousing/distribution or manufacturing environments.  This person will have completed or will be willing to complete their PMP and will have MS Project experience.  ",Project Manager Job in Greer,Full Time,"Greer, SC 29651",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-greer-sc-us-166159416.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4ba4c3e1bb6e5cb58b69d7e53bab1134
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:12:26:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description   Northrop Grumman Mission Systems is looking for a Proposal Manager at our Rolling Meadows, IL facility.   The Proposal Manager 2 provides leadership, proposal development expertise and proposal process training and coaching to teams in pursuit of major proposals. The candidate is responsible for managing and/or supporting teams in all phases of the company’s bid and proposal process in response to US government and commercial requests for proposals.   This individual will manage and participate in the development of the proposal process, structure and format, win strategies, competitive analysis, requirement matrices and proposal presentation. The Proposal Manager will provide guidance to the capture and proposal teams on pre-proposal and proposal activities/methodologies. He/she will work closely with business development and capture managers to understand strategic plans and objectives, communicating the proposal win strategy to the proposal team.   This position is responsible for leading proposal activities, and coordinating all aspects of our submission to the customer. The candidate must have the ability to understand and communicate opportunity and solicitation-related business and technical requirements information, and provide teams with guidance in communicating that information to the customer in proposal artifacts. He/she leads and supports the development of tools, training and processes to improve Proposal Operation’s effectiveness.   Principal Duties and Responsibilities: Manage and provide strategic leadership to capture and proposal teams, represented by diverse functional organizations across business areas, throughout the capture and proposal process. Manage proposal and creative teams to develop customer-focused written content and visual communications that represent the strategic messaging for proposals. Support Capture teams, leading/facilitating strategy and competitive capture assessment sessions. Participate as a key member of the capture team with a focus on proposal preparation in advance of solicitation release. Analyze solicitations and disseminate documentation and guidelines, proposal templates and standards in accordance with company approved processes. Lead and participate in color team reviews. Coordinate with all functional organizations to flow down requirements, assignments, responsibilities and expectations. Prepare detailed plans, outlines, and schedules that ensure a compliant proposal is ready for delivery on time and in compliance with RFP requirements. Provide written analysis and comprehensive editing of proposal content with a focus on customer communication and win themes. Responsible for ensuring compliance to the requirements, monitoring the progress of the proposal, and reporting on proposal metrics. Develop and provide training and coaching on the process and proposal execution. Lead continual improvement efforts of proposal processes and procedures. MSRMM   Qualifications   Basic Qualifications: Eight years’ experience with a Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, English, Communications, Engineering, Science or related field; or Six years’ experience with a Master's degree. Full understanding and application of standard proposal process principles, theories, concepts, and techniques; including branding, corporate identity and customer communication in sales. A thorough understanding of technical, management and communication issues affecting winning proposals and government acquisition approaches. Excellent communication skills to effectively communicate with all levels of the organization on marketing, business and technical issues. Must have strong writing/editorial and visual communication skills Strong organizational skills to effectively organize and prioritize multiple tasks and meet aggressive deadlines. Must have strong computer skills and be proficient in MS Office. Must take initiative and be able to achieve complex objectives independently and with minimal supervision. Ability to present to senior management. U.S. citizenship, and an active or recent DoD security clearance, or the ability to receive clearance, is required. The selected applicant will be subject to a security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Preferred Qualifications: Master's degree. Experience with DoD acquisition process. International proposal experience Association of Proposal Management Professional (APMP) Practitioner Level Certification or higher.  Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action-Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",Proposal Manager  Job in Rolling Meadows,Full Time Employee,"Rolling Meadows, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/proposal-manager-2-job-rolling-meadows-il-us-167866014.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,642c13b4d13d85d0943b9c3557a43407
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:12:18:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:The primary purpose of this role is to lead continuous improvement and quality management functions across multiple manufacturing locations.  The scope of this work will include developing manufacturing best practices to ensure product quality and integrity and value through manufacturing improvements, product design improvements, and cost reduction projects.  The Continuous Improvement Manager must possess in-depth understanding of quality management and lean manufacturing principles with the ability to implement rapid continuous improvement.   Must be able to coordinate project activities and develop work assignments for self and others and work actively in the manufacturing environment with plant management teams, hourly staff, corporate engineering/quality and the customer to ensure quality delivery and reliability. Essential Functions & Key Responsibilities:Drive continuous improvement by developing and implementing systems and process improvements that optimize all phases of the production process; be actively involved in the development and implementation of long term quality improvement plans. Support the business in development and implementation of quality procedures and systems throughout the manufacturing process that support the manufacture and delivery of quality products that meet or exceed customer expectations, provide for efficiency and accuracy in all customer related processes, reduce scrap, and improve plant performance.  Provide technical inputs for root cause analysis and corrective action.  Support quality reporting and responses to customer complaints (CIR’s) within the plant and out in the field at customer stores, warehouses, distribution centers, etc.  Initiate actions to prevent the occurrence of any quality non-conformances related to product, process and systems.  Compile data and prepare regular and special reports including CRM, Syteline, statistical and other reports. Performs a variety of functions necessary for the successful operation of the department, as assigned by the management of the company. Actively supports, participates in and maintains the integrity and ongoing function of the company and facility's safety program, ensuring a safe/healthy work environment.  Candidate Requirements:Bachelor's degree in Engineering Minimum three to five years of experience managing quality in a lean manufacturing environment and leading rapid continuous improvement Standard Work and Quality Systems Documentation and Management Lean certification preferred Black Belt/Six Sigma certification preferred. Value Stream Mapping Visual Management 5S Variation Reduction Kaizen Material Pull System Total Production Maintenance Error Proofing Thorough knowledge and experience with statistical process control methods and software systems. Strong desire to be a working quality manager in partnering with the plant management teams and hourly staff at assigned plants. Analytical skills and understanding of problem solving techniques/tools. Data-driven, disciplined, objective and detail oriented. Strong communication skills.  Demonstrated ability to act as a business partner, “see the big picture,” and work through ambiguity and change. Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without Company sponsorship. Successful completion of pre-employment background and drug screen About the Company:Novolex™ is North America’s leader in packaging choice and sustainability.The leadership of Novolex’s™ packaging brands sprouts from innovation, a diversity of products and markets, and a dedication to sustainability and quality.The family of historic Novolex™ brands includes Bagcraft® Packaging, Hilex Poly®, Fortune Plastics®, Duro Bag®, De Luxe® Packaging, Novolex Custom Film & Bag™, International Converter®, General Packaging® Products, and Heritage™ Bag.Each of the Novolex™ brands brings a unique sustainability and product story in plastic, paper, foil, recycling, or composting applications. Novolex™ is a U.S. based company with a headquarters in Hartsville, SC and 43 manufacturing facilities strategically located across North America including the worlds’ largest closed loop plastic bag recycling plant located in Indiana.  The company has over 6,100 employees in the US, Canada, and Mexico.The company rebranded under the name Novolex™ in November 2014.  The change signifies a number of great companies coming together under a new name focused on delivering value to our customers, suppliers and employees through broader product categories and markets. Novolex’s™ family of packaging brands create value and synergies by covering the full spectrum of retailer and institutional companies packaging requirements. Our MissionNovolex’s™ mission is to continue a tradition of leadership established by our historic brands in the areas of packaging choice, customer service, manufacturing innovation, quality, and sustainability. Our Vision StatementTo be a leading provider of packaging solution that are environmentally friendly, create value for the customer and Novolex™, have excellent quality, and provide superior service. We want to accomplish this with an entrepreneurial culture which drives operational excellence and proactively creates ecological solutions.  Our Environmental MissionNovolex™ sustainability goal is to establish a viable environmental program and product line that:Reduces the impact of plastic and paper on the environment through recycling and increased recycled contentSets a high standard of industry leadership and corporate citizenshipCreates meaningful benefits for the environment and the communityFacilitates environmental action by retailers and the community For more information on Novolex™, visit our website at:    www.novolex.com The Company has reviewed this job description to ensure that essential functions and basic duties have been included.  It is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all functions and responsibilities.  Additional functions and requirements may be assigned by supervisors as deemed appropriate.  ",Continuous Improvement Manager Job in Shawano,Full Time Employee,"Shawano, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/continuous-improvement-manager-job-shawano-wi-us-167895415.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=13,,,0c68a775a868a8707a45a7f55b98850a
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:11:45:17,No,jobs.monster.com," The Project Coordinators work closely with Project Managers, Account Managers, Engineering, Systems Integration and QA, and technical support teams.   Project Coordinators have a direct impact on driving successful results, ensuring timely deliverables, improving quality, and directly impacting customer satisfaction.Position RequirementsQualifications/Skills:·       Bachelor Degree or higher in Computer Science, Management, Information Systems, or related discipline·       Strong written and verbal communication skills·       Strong time management skills.  Comfortable working in a fast paced, somewhat unstructured, and entrepreneurial environment·       Capable of understanding client issues and requests, then translating them into an appropriate deliverable·       Self-starter, quick learner, high energy·       Possess an eagerness to learn the details of the platform and services we provide, both technically (how they work) and from a merchant’s perspective (how they are used)·       MS Project, MS Office, MS Visio·       Agile tools, such as Jira, Rally, VersionOneExperience:·       2-5 years experience working on software development related IT projects across multi-faceted teams·       Demonstrated experience in a highly multi-tasked, concurrent work stream environment·       Comfortable in a fast paced, do what it takes, entrepreneurial environment·       Interfacing with external and internal stake holders and SME’s·       Experience in various software development methodologies, including Waterfall, and Agile SCRUM ·       Experience translating business process and requirements into deliverables.  You will be asked to take detailed notes, document requirements, provide meeting minutes, translate requirements for developers, create stories and tasks, and assist as applicable various other tasks through the SDLC  ·       Experience within the payments and/or financial services industry a plusResponsibilities:·       Help ensure the project and all related processes run smoothly·       Assist in tracking deliverables through software delivery and certification projects through all phases of the life cycle to ensure projects are delivered on time and within budget·       Help foster strong communication and a good relationship with the client, stake holders, partners, and vendors·       Participate in the creation of business requirements, design documents, project plans, tasks, and other project artifacts.  Help organize and manage all artifacts.·       Track all deliverables to the work/project plan.  ·       Establish communication plans and schedules.  Assist in providing frequent project updates to all stake holders within FreedomPay and the client·       Coordinate meetings with clients, partners, integrators, and internal resources such as engineers, system integration analysts, etc.·       Recommend and implement internal process, policy, and quality improvements·       Foster a culture of team work, collaboration, proactive and positive communication·       Project Coordinators work standard work weeks but may be required to work some evenings and weekends to meet project milestones·       Travel, primarily within the U.S., will be occasional to assist project managers on site with clients",Project Coordinator Job in Radnor,Full Time,"Radnor, PA 19087",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-job-radnor-pa-us-167887749.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),372f5e3984c00feac35e30f7212a80fd
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:11:44:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  61821 # Positions  1 State  MI City  Hartford Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  4240 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-167860548.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,0e7a42e1760e2deebd76cd292dd836ca
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:10:40:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company: Evoqua Water Technologies LLC (US)Division: MP & S - MemcorLocation: MA - TewksburyReq ID: 131274Position Title: National Service ManagerExperience Level: Mid LevelEducation Required: Bachelors DegreeTravel Required: YesCompany Description:Evoqua Water Technologies is the global leader in helping municipalities and industrial customers protect and improve the world’s water. Evoqua has a more than 100-year heritage of transforming water and wastewater through innovation and industry firsts, market-leading expertise, and unmatched customer service. Its treatment systems and services enable regulatory and environmental compliance, ensure uninterrupted quantity and quality of water, increase efficiency through water reuse, and prepare customers for next-generation demands. For more information, visit www.evoqua.com Job Description:Evoqua Water Technologies LLC seeks a National Service Manager for its Memcor Segment within the Municipal Division. Memcor is a global leader in the application of micro- and ultrafiltration with activities worldwide. This position will support Memcor’s North American business and the primary functions associated with this position include:- Schedule and coordinate the activities of a group of +/- 10 field service technicians located throughout the continental US.- Apply and promote Evoqua’s Loss Prevention System (LPS) to support and further develop the service group’s safety culture.- Continue to develop the service group’s skillsets, develop training and mentoring.- Support the service group’s continuous improvement program, continually looking for ways to improve productivity, reduce mistakes and improve clients’ satisfaction.- Interface with clients before and after the service group’s intervention to ensure the clients’ needs are fully satisfied.- Develop aftermarket service activities.- Recommend hiring and organizational changes in accordance with company policies and actively manage succession planning.This position will report to Memcor’s Director of Operation Management. Ideally the successful candidate will be able to work out of Memcor’s Tewksbury (MA) office. Other arrangements will be considered. We are seeking candidates with the following experience and qualification:- Experience with service to municipal and industrial clients, not necessarily related to the same technology (membrane filtration). Experience in the water or wastewater field would be an advantage.- A good working knowledge of LPS or similar safety programs.- The capability to assess the service technicians’ skillsets and tailor development programs to continue to develop Memcor’s ability to service its customer base.- Strong organizational skills with the ability to optimize the group’s efficiency, define methods and work flows and maximize clients’ satisfaction.- Basic project management skills, time and task management.- A good track record of implementing continuous improvement programs to improve productivity and employee engagement.- Strong communication skills with ability to build and maintain rapport with customers.Education/ Experience:Bachelor or advanced degree in engineering or project management with 5 to 10 years of experience in a directly related field.Up to 25% domestic travel may be required.#LI-CO1Equal Employment Opportunity StatementEvoqua Water Technologies is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, genetic information, veteran or military status. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. .Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 25%",National Service Manager Job in Tewksbury,Full Time,"Tewksbury, MA 01876",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/national-service-manager-job-tewksbury-ma-us-166756974.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fc5cec9a995a8f525319c1e61c3374b8
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:10:39:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hill International is a U.S. based Project Management and Claims Consultancy firm with offices throughout the World. With over 4,900 employees in 100 offices worldwide, Hill provides program management, project management, construction management and construction claims and consulting services. Engineering News-Record magazine recently ranked Hill as the 7th largest construction management firm in the World.Hill International (Hill) provides project/construction management services for the Native American market at multiple locations across the nation.  Hill is managing the construction of casino/hotel resorts and is looking for qualified candidates with hotel/casino resort experience in the Native American market.  Location is Northern, WI.We are looking for an experienced Project Manager who will take on the management of key client projects with the goal of delivering projects on time, within budget and within scope.Coordinate internal resources and third parties/vendors for the flawless execution of projects.Ensure that all projects are delivered on-time, within scope and within budgetAssist in the definition of project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibilityEnsure resource availability and allocationDevelop and manage a detailed project plan to monitor and track progressManage changes to the project scope, project schedule, and project costs using appropriate verification techniquesMeasure project performance using appropriate tools and techniquesReport and escalate client/project issues to management as neededSuccessfully manage the relationship with the client and all stakeholdersPerform risk management to minimize owner project risksEstablish and maintain relationships with third parties/vendorsCreate and maintain comprehensive project documentationMake formal presentations to Tribal Councils/Owner are requiredMaintain weekly and monthly written reports to the ownerRequirements:BS degree in Engineering, Architecture, Building/Construction ManagementExperience in hotel/casinos (preferably in Native American market)Proven working experience in project management in Native American sectorExcellent client-facing and internal communication skillsExcellent written and verbal communication skillsSolid organizational skills including attention to detail and multi-tasking skillsStrong working knowledge of Microsoft OfficeExperience with construction schedules for various types of alternative delivery methodsExperience with cost control on capital project developmentCandidate must be able to demonstrate excellent verbal and written communications skillshttp://www.hillintl.com/employment/everify/index.htmlHill International is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/D/V",Project Manager Job in Wausau,Full Time Employee,"Wausau, WI",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-wausau-wi-us-167344832.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,7fd0a1cb752a2e78ad9ef66edcf53db9
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:10:23:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Staffing Technology is searching for a Quality Assurance Supervisor on behalf of our client with manufacturing operations in Minneapolis, MN. The ideal candidate will have established themselves as a leader within food manufacturing, who has the desire to grow and succeed within the Management ranks of a world-class food manufacturing organization. The Quality Assurance Supervisor will be primarily responsible for overseeing the inspection and auditing of all incoming raw ingredients and outgoing finished products.  Provide technical assistance for the manufacturing group. Will work closely with and communicate to operations, ensuring all finished products meet specifications and customer expectations. Supervise quality assurance personnel and quality assurance operations in order to reach optimum quality and efficiency. Lead problem resolution activities related to product quality and food safety concerns.  Manage and provide direction to the QA technicians to ensure a safe and quality product is produced. Roles & Responsibilities: Direct and advise personnel in test procedures.Responsible for identifying and resolving quality related problems.Train, develop and manage QA technicians. Manage all employee relations issues with the assistance of the QA Manager and HR Manager. Establish or adjust work procedures to meet testing schedules.Participates in and supports plant and corporate initiatives including GMP and HARPCAssist with maximizing facility efficiencies by proactively addressing situations that could lead to down time or product loss and performing RCAs to ensure concerns do not persist.Assist in development and enhancement of all quality programs and procedures.Calibrate and maintain all testing equipment.Conduct and assist in food safety audits.Manage product holds and work with production to ensure production needs are met. Review, sign-off and process all shift paperwork.Assist with the testing of products for certificate of analysis generation and the distribution of the certificates of analysis.  Analyze finished productActively contributes to the data collection, trend analysis, investigation and improvements to processes, products and systems. Responsible for timely and accurate information.Work closely with production, warehouse, scheduling and sales for all quality needs.Requirements and Qualifications: Bachelor’s Degree required, preference for Biology/Microbiology, Chemistry, Food Science or related2+years’ experience working in food manufacturing with at least one recent year supervising quality programsCritical thinking skillsStrong problem solving skillsStrong organizational and time management skillsWorks comfortably with all levels in the organizationGood communication skillsStrong mathematical skillsFamiliarity with OSHA, FDA, EPA regulationsStrong written and verbal communication skills",Quality Supervisor,Full Time Employee,"Minneapolis, MN",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-supervisor-first-shift-job-minneapolis-mn-us-167498326.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=18,,Quality Assurance/Safety,0ab5bad801cc791fb23835920ebc4028
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:09:43:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job TitleQuality Control Inspector II or IIIJob ID5769LocationEnergy NorthwestFull/Part TimeFull-TimeFavorite JobRegular/TemporaryRegularGeneral SummaryResponsible for performing quality control inspections, surveillances, and observations of work activities to verify compliance with the Quality Assurance Program and implementing procedures and for inspecting structures, equipment, parts, and materials to assure quality standards are maintained. Provide independent oversight of Energy Northwest programs and processes by performing assessments to ensure the Quality Assurance Program is implemented in accordance with regulations and industry best practices. This position will allow personnel with limited education and experience to learn Quality principles and obtain skills needed to perform audits and independent monitoring of station performance. REQUIRED EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE The following minimum education and experience requirements shall be met as specified in ANSI N45.2.6-1978 and Regulatory Guide 1.58, Rev. 1, September 1980: Level II: One year of satisfactory performance as Level I in corresponding inspection, examination, test category, or class; ORHigh school diploma or GED plus three years of related experience in equivalent inspection, examination, or testing activities; ORAn Associate’s degree in related engineering discipline from an accredited college or university plus one year of related experience in equivalent inspection, examination, or testing activities; ORA Bachelor’s degree in a technical field from an accredited college or university and six months of related experience in equivalent inspection, examination, or testing activities.Certified Auditor (ANSI) or required to certify within one year.Level III: Six years of satisfactory performance as Level II in the corresponding inspection category or class; ORHigh school diploma or GED and ten years of related experience in equivalent inspection activities; ORHigh school diploma or GED and eight years experience in equivalent inspection activities, with at least two years as Level II, and with at least two years associated with nuclear facilities; ORAn Associate's degree from an accredited college or university and seven years of related experience in equivalent inspection activities, with at least two years of this experience associated with nuclear facilities; ORA Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university and five years of related experience in equivalent inspection activities, with at least two years of this experience associated with nuclear facilities. Certified Auditor (ANSI) or required to certify within one year.Salary RangeLevel II Salary: $67,540 minimum to $84,425 midpointLevel III Salary: $77,678 minimum to $97,097 midpointTypically, selected candidates are hired at a salary rate between the minimum and midpoint of the range, based on applicable experience and qualifications, market rate, internal equity, and budgetary allowances.Equal Employment OpportunityWe are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to race, color, age, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, ethnicity, religion, national origin, veteran status or on the basis of disability.Position posted through May 30, 2016.",Quality Control Inspector II or III -  Job in Richland,Full Time Employee,"Richland, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-control-inspector-ii-or-iii-5769-job-richland-wa-us-167497708.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=1,,Quality Assurance/Safety,db25988b785ef68c47698c904e84befe
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:09:43:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cobham is seeking a Senior Program Manager. This position is located in San Diego, CA The Senior Program Manager is responsible for all stages of the program life cycle with major customers, with particular focus on the front end business capture activity. The position is also responsible for managing internal engineering and manufacturing plans and status reporting to customer for development orders and production orders, ensuring on time completion of contract line items. This position is located in San Diego, CA. Responsibilities:Direct all phases of programs from inception through completion. Responsible for the cost, schedule and technical performance of company programs or subsystems of major programs.Coordinate the preparation of proposals, business plans, proposal work statements and specifications, operating budgets and financial terms/conditions of contract.Participate in the negotiation of contract and contract changes.Act as primary customer contact for program activities, leading program review sessions with customers to discuss cost, schedule and technical performance. Establish milestones and monitors adherence to master plans and schedules, identify program problems and obtains solutions, such as allocation of resources or changing contractual specifications. Direct the work of employees assigned to the program from technical, manufacturing and administrative areas.Establish a collaborative environment with the customer and look for resolutions with the customer in a collaborative not conflicting environment.Establish design concepts, criteria and engineering efforts for product research, development, integration and test.Develop new business or expands the product line with the customer. May be responsible for business development within current customer base. Minimum Requirements:Completed Bachelor's Degree.Minimum 5 years program management experience with customer interaction and budget, scheduling and financial responsibilities.Experience managing product development program(s) that reflect moderate risk and complexity or deputy responsibility for a 20 mil+ complex program.Experience working collaboratively with customers, suppliers and team members to build and sustain positive business relationships leading to successful program execution and growth. Experience leading people, coaching or mentoring staff. In order to be considered for this opportunity, you must be eligible to obtain and maintain security clearance, which requires USA Citizenship. Preferred:Experience in managing development of RF electronics development and manufacturing environment.Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, Math, Science or Business.Manufacturing, Aerospace and/or defense industry experienceExperience in Technology Development ProgramsExperience with process improvementExperience with implementation of SharePointExperience in RF/Microwave Products Cobham's values of Trust, Talent and Technology have driven us from our launch in 1934 by Sir Alan Cobham, an aviation innovator, to becoming a global leader in state-of-the-art aerospace and defence systems. And it's the insights of our innovators today that will secure our collective future. Innovators like you. Cobham is one of the world's leading companies engaged in the development, delivery and support of leading-edge aerospace and defense systems in the air, on land and at sea. Our clients and partners trust Cobham to deliver the mission-critical technology they need, and we trust our employees to draw on their ingenuity and passion to deliver those solutions. This leads to an empowering culture for our people. Our Leadership team is open, sharing plans for the next five years, driving retention by offering demanding, exciting work, and providing full guidance and mentoring. Cobham is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and embraces diversity in our employee population. It is the policy of Cobham to provide equal opportunity to all qualified applicants and employees without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, or genetic information. Cobham will refrain from discharging, or otherwise discriminating against, employees or applicants who inquire about, discuss, or disclose their compensation or the compensation of other employees or applicants. See all of our latest opportunities at www.cobhamcareers.com or follow us on our LinkedIn page at www.linkedin.com/company/cobham. To be considered you must apply by going to www.cobhamcareers.com.",Senior Program Manager Job in San Diego,Full Time,"San Diego, CA",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-program-manager-job-san-diego-ca-us-166663144.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),51abfdeaf43fbe8b73ca8840c78a6c69
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:09:18:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Assistant Project Manager Location: Barrington, Illinois Join the 2014 Builder of the Year!Toll Brothers, Inc., America’s leading luxury home builder, seeks Assistant Project Managers for future opportunities in the Chicago metropolitan area.We seek Assistant Project Managers whose background clearly demonstrates an ability to successfully direct all business and development facets in a production homebuilding community.In this role, you will gradually assume Profit & Loss responsibility, participate in overseeing new home construction, and also participate in managing land acquisition, the approval process, and sales and marketing operations at our communities.This is an excellent opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!2016 WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6)in Quality of Products/Services Offered(after Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)- FortuneQualifications:We seek candidates with graduate degrees (preferably in relevant fields, such as Real Estate Development, Land Development, etc.) and internship/work experience in homebuilding or construction. Candidates with Bachelor's degrees in relevant fields, as well as experience working for other national homebuilders, are also encouraged to apply. Business acumen is required; sales experience is a plus.This is an outstanding opportunity for a professional looking to grow his/her career with an industry leader!Come see why Toll Brothers has been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry! APPLY ONLINE TODAY! Over 95% of our executives were promoted from within the company. Take advantage of the tremendous growth potential Toll Brothers offers!  As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",ASSISTANT PROJECT MANAGER Job in Barrington,"Full Time, Employee","When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Assistant Project Manager Location: Barrington, Illinois Join the 2014 Builder of the Year!Toll Brothers, Inc., America’s leading luxury home builder, seeks Assistant Project Managers for future opportunities in the Chicago metropolitan area.We seek Assistant Project Managers whose background clearly demonstrates an ability to successfully direct all business and development facets in a production homebuilding community.In this role, you will gradually assume Profit & Loss responsibility, participate in overseeing new home construction, and also participate in managing land acquisition, the approval process, and sales and marketing operations at our communities.This is an excellent opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!2016 WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6)in Quality of Products/Services Offered(after Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)- FortuneQualifications:We seek candidates with graduate degrees (preferably in relevant fields, such as Real Estate Development, Land Development, etc.) and internship/work experience in homebuilding or construction. Candidates with Bachelor's degrees in relevant fields, as well as experience working for other national homebuilders, are also encouraged to apply. Business acumen is required; sales experience is a plus.This is an outstanding opportunity for a professional looking to grow his/her career with an industry leader!Come see why Toll Brothers has been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry! APPLY ONLINE TODAY! Over 95% of our executives were promoted from within the company. Take advantage of the tremendous growth potential Toll Brothers offers!  As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",AllReal Estate/Property ManagementConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-project-manager-job-barrington-il-us-166895344.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,Project/Program Management,da5e026f82a409a556648ef0a8fd61c1
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:08:45:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Atlantic Coast will soon be one of the leading Event Promotions and Event Planning firms in Greenville, NC. Our diverse client portfolio includes market development and events with industry leaders in skincare & cosmetics, health & wellness, and gourmet foods.  We are looking for innovative, team-oriented individuals who enjoy working with others and maintaining relationships with our prestigious clientele. We are a newly expanded office and are hiring for sales, marketing and promotion representatives ASAP! Purpose of PositionThe main focus of this position is to promote our clients brand names by developing and supporting field marketing programs. You will work closely with other Event Marketing Specialists, and corporate marketing and sales organizations to support sales activities (shows, events, campaigns, etc) and utilize your marketing expertise to help develop and execute marketing programs that will increase demand and drive revenue.  Primary Duties   - Impacts sales results by developing, supporting and executing field marketing and segment activities. - Executes Marketing campaigns and Plans Events depending on expertise.- Works with appropriate clients to support campaigns.- Works with various corporate/field marketing managers to determine appropriate customized programs and strategies for various market segments. - Provides coordination and project management to ensure event success.- Once the management capacity is reached, may also attend these events as required.- Monitors use of existing sales tools. - Provides input on requirements for additional tools.- Publicizes event and works with Account Development to raise awareness and drive high levels of attendance and participation by targeted audience.- Advises on new ideas to generate revenue for various clientele- Executes via one on one sales based interaction with customers.Requirements Desired Skills & Knowledge:- 1-2 years experience or training in marketing or sales preferred, but willing to make exceptions for the right candidate - experience in customer service or other people-oriented fields desired - sales experience a plus - exceptional organizational and project management skills - exceptional communication skills to sustain and entertain one on one sales interaction with customers - ability to work independently and within a team environment - desire to succeed   * We are dedicated to fostering a team environment in order to deliver the best results for our clients.  We are always looking for the best and brightest individuals who can bring innovation and energy to our client's campaigns.  Our comprehensive training program is geared towards the entry level and is designed to cross train in all facets of event marketing.  Please submit your resume today for immediate consideration and we look forward to speaking with our qualified candidates soon! *  ",Event Coordinator: Marketing,Full Time Employee,"Greenville, NC 27834",RetailAdvertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/event-coordinator-marketing-advertising-sales-job-greenville-nc-us-167850631.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=2,,Project/Program Management,3218705858323c431dd0380d45a2f480
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:08:45:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Title: Project Manager Location: Mettawa, IL 60045Duration: 6-7 Months (Possible Extension) Job Description·         We are seeking a detail focused individual with the ability to build digestible project plans, drive opportunities creatively and communicate with simplicity.  ·         Responsible for project management, communications and training support.·         The keys to success in this role are the passion to learn, the self-confidence to act and the patience to treat people respectfully.·         Work independently and collectively as a valued member of the team. ·         Learn more about the business application of technology without requiring you to “speak IT.” ·         Enhance communications skills with key internal stakeholders and senior leadership. ·         Focus on simplifying technology to encourage efficiency for our system users.  ·         Take managed risks and incorporate lessons learned to benefit the organization in the long run. ·         Receive mentoring and management, when needed, but not constantly over your shoulder.   Referrals appreciated and welcomed.",Monster,,"Position Title: Project Manager Location: Mettawa, IL 60045Duration: 6-7 Months (Possible Extension) Job Description·         We are seeking a detail focused individual with the ability to build digestible project plans, drive opportunities creatively and communicate with simplicity.  ·         Responsible for project management, communications and training support.·         The keys to success in this role are the passion to learn, the self-confidence to act and the patience to treat people respectfully.·         Work independently and collectively as a valued member of the team. ·         Learn more about the business application of technology without requiring you to “speak IT.” ·         Enhance communications skills with key internal stakeholders and senior leadership. ·         Focus on simplifying technology to encourage efficiency for our system users.  ·         Take managed risks and incorporate lessons learned to benefit the organization in the long run. ·         Receive mentoring and management, when needed, but not constantly over your shoulder.   Referrals appreciated and welcomed.",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-job-lake-forest-il-us-167905105.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,,08b11cacd18e708a625ab8db284b2161
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:07:46:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"ENTRY LEVEL: MANAGEMENT TRAINEE   As an entry level management person, you will learn the operation of our business from the ground up. Working side by side with one of our district training managers, you will get your hands on experience as well as an awareness of our company culture and business philosophy. This paid training program extends for 90 days and will prepare each trainee to run their own facility as the next step in their development process. RESPONSIBILITIESAs a facility manager for Healthcare Services Group, your responsibilities will include:Managing a staff between 10-25 employees Responsibility for daily payroll and budget management Recruitment and training of all front line staff Acting as a liaison between the facility and HCSG Marketing our services to other facilities in the area Developing a strong assistant managerOrdering suppliesDay to day oversee of the operations in the departmentsPROMOTIONAL POSSIBILITIESHealthcare Services group, Inc. has several levels of management throughout the organization, which allows every management person to move on a career path best suited for their skills and talents.Account manager Training managerArea(key) managerDistrict managerRegional managerRegional sales director  BENEFITS:With performance-based promotional opportunities, you have the flexibility to chart your own professional course. COMPETITIVE SALARYComprehensive benefit package includes health, dental, life, disability, 401k, stock purchase plan and awarding stock options",Management Trainee - ENTRY LEVEL Job in Lansdowne,Full Time Employee,"Lansdowne, PA 19050",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/management-trainee-entry-level-job-lansdowne-pa-us-127356621.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,,8debb20ace3082d02c3b52402aa4aed6
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:07:45:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Move, Inc., a subsidiary of News Corp, is a leading provider of online real estate services and operates the Move network of real estate websites and mobile experiences for consumers and real estate professionals. The Move network reaches more than 50 million people per month and includes: realtor.com®, Moving.comTM, SeniorHousingNet.comSM, Doorsteps®, ListHub™, Top Producer® Systems, TigerLead®, FiveStreetSM and others. The Move network also includes mobile experiences through its realtor.com® mobile real estate search applications for iPhone, iPad, Windows Phone 8, and Android, as well as the m.realtor.com website. The Move network provides resources and tools for consumers and real estate professionals to help navigate all stages of the home-buying cycle. These tools give consumers access to the most comprehensive selection of existing homes for sale, property records, rentals, mortgage resources, senior housing options, moving resources and more. The Move network has the deepest consumer engagement among all real estate websites – consumers spend more than 700 million minutes per month on Move websites and mobile experiences. Move has deep local and national advertising relationships with more than 400,000 real estate professionals, as well as numerous high profile display advertisers. On the Move network, advertisers can choose a variety of advertising and marketing solutions including subscription, lead generation, text-link and rich media, directory products, price quote tools and sponsorships. We’re looking for an IT Transformation Program Manager to be part of the Transformation Office driving Enterprise Technology Transformation initiatives. The ideal candidate for this role will have experience in managing large-scale IT Application Development and/ or Infrastructure projects. Your background must clearly demonstrate 14+ years’ management/ delivery experience with experience in leading-edge project involving Cloud infrastructure, SaaS, SDLC and ITIL implementations in medium to large enterprises. You will work closely with the Enterprise IT leadership team and their stakeholders, contributing to their roadmap, and driving delivery of future features and improvements. In this role, you will be highly visible, and will directly impact Move’s success. In addition to your role in the Realtor.com® and Enterprise IT organization, you will become part of our Program Management Office (PMO) and contribute to building PMO best practices and process improvements. Through your leadership, we will deliver results today, while building the foundation for a strong future tomorrow. Over a decade of acquisitions and evolution, we’ve built up a portfolio of people, processes, and technology, sometimes conflicting, and distributed across four locations (including offshore teams). Your role is both critical and challenging: through the program management office, help build consistency and discipline in program and project execution. Duties and Responsibilities: You will partner with Enterprise IT (Applications and Infrastructure) stakeholders and engineering teams to drive the transformation roadmap, plan and execute their programs Direct the efforts of multiple cross-functional project teams to achieve clearly defined results operating within the agreed upon time, and specifications of each project Manage the expectations, deliverables, and results of all project resources, both internal and external, as related to the specific roles and activities defined in the project work plan Education, Skills and Experience:  Bachelor's degree in relevant field 12+ years’ Experience managing large Infrastructure, Cloud migration projects with major public cloud providers (preferably AWS) AND/ OR business process re-engineering and enterprise system implementation projects  Ability to work with the Enterprise IT leadership to define, launch, and drive strategic and operational initiatives Strong understanding of ITIL, SDLC, Agile Methodology and best practices with 10+ projects execution experience across atleast two of those categories Ability to plan, drive and execute the entire IT transformation roadmap to successfully deliver business outcomes Proven experience in enterprise resource planning / management, large program budget management (financial governance) Strong orientation to PMO Tools and best practices to drive operational efficiency and quality across the PMO functions Ability to coordinate internal resources and third parties/vendors for the flawless execution of projects, ensuring that all projects are delivered on-time, within scope and within budget Strong orientation to metrics driven project/program management Effective communication, presentation and reporting skills being able to communicate in a concise manner to an executive audience as well as the delivery teams Self-starter capable of taking initiative and working with minimal direction Solid organizational skills including attention to detail, multi-tasking, and the ability to balance competing demands for resources and adapt to changing priorities Strong leadership, interpersonal, relationship-building, and negotiation skills required with a solid track record for developing internal and external relationships Data center and/or cloud migration project management experience is a strong Plus Understanding of cloud-computing infrastructure for hosted services and Saas products is a strong Plus PMP certification is a plus        See Job DescriptionAdditional Information:",Sr. IT Program Manager Job in Santa Clara,,"Company: Move, Inc",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-it-program-manager-job-santa-clara-ca-us-167132919.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=11,,,c7f70eaf01d0c723ee872bba3ae05aeb
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:07:37:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duration: Contract to Hire after 6 monthsLocation: Omaha, NEStart: Within 2 weeksProkarma is looking to bring on a Project Manager that has a strong background in handling manufacturing, supply chain and or logistics automation projects. IT background is not required- we need someone who  knows how to relate in transferring business knowledge into the IT functional teams. Job Purpose:Accomplishes project objectives by planning and evaluating project activities.Duties: * Accomplishes human resource objectives by recruiting, selecting, orienting, training, assigning, scheduling, coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, appraising, and reviewing job contributions; planning and reviewing compensation actions; enforcing policies and procedures. * Achieves operational objectives by contributing information and recommendations to strategic plans and reviews; preparing and completing action plans; implementing production, productivity, quality, and customer-service standards; resolving problems; completing audits; identifying trends; determining system improvements; implementing change. * Meets financial objectives by forecasting requirements; preparing an annual budget; scheduling expenditures; analyzing variances; initiating corrective actions. * Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations. * Enhances department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Developing Budgets, Coaching, Supervision, Staffing, Project Management, Management Proficiency, Process Improvement, Tracking Budget Expenses, Self-Development, Planning, Performance Management",Monster,,"Duration: Contract to Hire after 6 monthsLocation: Omaha, NEStart: Within 2 weeksProkarma is looking to bring on a Project Manager that has a strong background in handling manufacturing, supply chain and or logistics automation projects. IT background is not required- we need someone who  knows how to relate in transferring business knowledge into the IT functional teams. Job Purpose:Accomplishes project objectives by planning and evaluating project activities.Duties: * Accomplishes human resource objectives by recruiting, selecting, orienting, training, assigning, scheduling, coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, appraising, and reviewing job contributions; planning and reviewing compensation actions; enforcing policies and procedures. * Achieves operational objectives by contributing information and recommendations to strategic plans and reviews; preparing and completing action plans; implementing production, productivity, quality, and customer-service standards; resolving problems; completing audits; identifying trends; determining system improvements; implementing change. * Meets financial objectives by forecasting requirements; preparing an annual budget; scheduling expenditures; analyzing variances; initiating corrective actions. * Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations. * Enhances department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Developing Budgets, Coaching, Supervision, Staffing, Project Management, Management Proficiency, Process Improvement, Tracking Budget Expenses, Self-Development, Planning, Performance Management",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-omaha-ne-us-166891210.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,,,0829ba7316537a76f6e754aa056c9363
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:06:41:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: South Sioux City, NEDescription: Nice opportunity in the South Sioux City, NE area with a successful food manufacturing company.Responsibilities:• Supervising the daily operation of the microbiology and chemical labs;• Training and coaching lab employees in safety and cleaning methods;• Coordinating the personnel who perform inspections and testing;• Ensuring raw materials and finished products hold and release in a timely manner;• Ensuring safe work practices and proper recordkeeping;• Ensuring GMPs, sanitary conditions, product quality;• Verifies adequate inventories.Experience: • 3+ years of quality systems and supervisory experience in a food processing operation lab;• Proven ability to recognize problem situations and take appropriate steps to resolve;• Excellent interpersonal, communication and teaming skills;• Ability to work weekends when needed.Salary: To $58K + BonusEducation: 4-year degree in Food Science or similar disciplines.Relocation: Yes",Monster,,"Location: South Sioux City, NEDescription: Nice opportunity in the South Sioux City, NE area with a successful food manufacturing company.Responsibilities:• Supervising the daily operation of the microbiology and chemical labs;• Training and coaching lab employees in safety and cleaning methods;• Coordinating the personnel who perform inspections and testing;• Ensuring raw materials and finished products hold and release in a timely manner;• Ensuring safe work practices and proper recordkeeping;• Ensuring GMPs, sanitary conditions, product quality;• Verifies adequate inventories.Experience: • 3+ years of quality systems and supervisory experience in a food processing operation lab;• Proven ability to recognize problem situations and take appropriate steps to resolve;• Excellent interpersonal, communication and teaming skills;• Ability to work weekends when needed.Salary: To $58K + BonusEducation: 4-year degree in Food Science or similar disciplines.Relocation: Yes",,http://jobview.monster.com/laboratory-manager-job-south-sioux-city-ne-us-167263273.aspx?mescoid=1100048001001&jobPosition=17,,,919e385f38d23c7cf3622d91821747e9
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:06:40:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:In support of the implementation of a new End-to-End PV (Pharmacovigilance) CAPA Management process across segments and expansion of responsibilities associated with the transfer, the Sr. Project Manager, PV CAPA Management will be responsible to provide CAPA process oversight of PV Deviations and CAPAs associated with audit and inspection findings across the Consumer and Pharm sectorsThe Sr. Project Manager will have direct contribution to the development and approval of compliance strategies required to remediate deviations and observations from audits/inspectionsThe candidate will lead teams of stakeholders and subject matter experts through the process of investigation and CAPA development to ensure that deliverables per the defined process are understood and delivered as requiredThe Sr. Project Manager will work with the record owner and relevant stakeholders to ensure all required actions are identified and executed as outlined in defined timelines and with appropriate deliverables to support the response development for PV observationsWill report to Senior Director, PV CAPA Center of Excellence (CoE) in the Compliance Strategy & Analytics organizationResponsibilities:Oversees the kickoff and execution of activities required for PV CAPA management in coordination with QA auditor or BRQC Regulatory Compliance lead as applicableLiaise with business stakeholders through CAPA Lifecycle managementReviews findings and makes recommendations for Corrective Action plan to ensure robust CAPA that eliminates recurrence of noted issuesTracks CAPA’s through completion and effectiveness monitoring, including trending analysis to the relevant business stakeholders, including updates to senior managementKeeps holistic view of common findings per PV audits, HA inspections and functional observations. 60%Communicate, coordinate, and escalate as needed all activities associated with completion of the investigation or CAPA as per committed timelineTrack progress against schedule. 15%Independently manage and approve minor audit findings as corrections. 15%Monitors and assists with reporting and oversight activities as required for Governance forums. 10%Makes decisions related to defined process and roles/responsibilities as outlined in CAPA management proceduresWill advise record owners on corrections that need to be made to ensure adherence to process/procedureResponsible to refer significant issues to supervisor that require escalationWorking Relationships/Interfaces:Must interface directly with stakeholders in various functions involved in PV CAPA management including Medical Safety, Medical Affairs, Business Quality, Regulatory Affairs, R&D Clinical Operations, Quality & Compliance, Compliance Strategy & AnalyticsPrimary means of communication will be written (email) as well as through telephone (remote meetings with multiple stakeholders concurrently)Must possess excellent written, oral communication, interpersonal skills, diplomacy, and presentation skillsShould be comfortable and capable to interface with stakeholders in senior levels of management for the purpose of leading teams to deliver on timelines for observation response development and root cause investigation/CAPA planningSkills:Ability to independently plan, organize, coordinate, manage and execute assigned tasksCan utilize appropriate initiative and autonomy in achieving objectives; works independentlyRequires management skills for multidisciplinary interactions and coordinationExcellent communication and writing skills demonstrated by the ability to write executive summaries, regulatory and ad hoc reports promptly and clearly as well as compile and present data to other professionalsRequires strong analytical skills to examine data and perform analysisExpert process knowledge in CAPA managementComputer skills: Proficiency in Excel is desired to support data analysis and reporting, must be proficient using databases and software programsAbility to translate data into information and actionable tasksAbility to motivate professional colleagues and stakeholdersAbility to resolve conflict effectively with good negotiation skillsAbility to independently plan, organize, coordinate, manage and execute assigned tasksRequires little supervision and functions independentlyMust be able to effectively and constructively manage conflict and resolve issues with stakeholders requiring excellent interpersonal skills and diplomacyMust be highly organized and able to multi-task and track multiple concurrent, ongoing activities in a timely mannerMust be flexible and persistentKnowledge and experience in pharmacovigilance/drug development processes is an assetMust be able to read, write and speak EnglishMust follow process and procedures and escalate to supervisor any issues arise that require management interventionPerform other duties in support of PV CAPA process lifecycle management as necessaryQualifications:A Bachelor of Science (BSc) or Arts (BA) degree or equivalent degree is requiredA minimum of 6-8 years’ experience in a medium to large scale matrix organization in a regulated environment (e.g. pharmaceutical, medical device or consumer product company) and experience in the management (owner, reviewer and/or approver) of Deviation investigations and CAPA is requiredRequires knowledge of regulatory compliance and health authority regulations, preferred in pharmacovigilance area",Project Manager (Drug Development,Full Time Employee,"Horsham, PA 19044",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesStaffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-drug-development-capa-job-horsham-pa-us-167884603.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,2be8c896e79c3cbf80b16b29849bcd65
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:06:04:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"First Quality Enterprises, Inc. (FQE), founded in 1988, is a global multi-billion dollar privately held company with over 4,200 employees. Its corporate offices are located in Great Neck, New York, with manufacturing facilities and offices in Pennsylvania, South Carolina, Georgia, Canada, and China. FQE is a diversified family of companies manufacturing consumer products ranging from Absorbent Hygiene (adult incontinence, feminine care, and baby care), Tissue (bath and towel), and Industrial (non-woven fabrics, print and packaging materials, thermoformed plastics), serving institutional and retail markets throughout the world. FQE focuses on private label and branded product lines. Our core business philosophy is built on a proud culture driven by safety and quality, respect, humility, integrity, customer focus, and teamwork. With leading edge manufacturing technologies and processes and visionary leadership, FQE is positioned to continue significant growth in the coming years. We are seeking an experienced Quality Engineer for our First Quality Retail Services Group. This position will be located in King of Prussia, PA. Primary responsibilities include:·        Show extreme initiative and take personal responsibility to prevent product quality related issues by establishing quality practices and principles.·        To continually provide ideas to further strengthen our current Quality System and ways to integrate them into manufacturing.·        Responsible for working in a safe manner to define and interpret quality requirements for the organization; evaluate the effectiveness of the organization in meeting those expectations and develop a team approach in addressing any deficiencies. This should be done through strong written and verbal communication skills, good interactive skills and knowledge of scientific, mechanical, and mathematical principles and applications.·        Develop and analyze in-process and finished goods inspection data to identify and resolve problematic processes and to provide trend analysis.·        Work with Manufacturing, Product Development, Distribution and Quality to facilitate a team approach to addressing product quality issues.·        Develop and conduct training to build quality awareness i.e.·        Defect recognition and inspection standards.·        Proper documentation of defects.·        Customer complaint investigations and reporting.·        Develop and execute protocols for validating or revalidating current equipment and processes to assure capability and compliance.·        Participate in continual improvement activities to enhance the quality system such as Lean manufacturing and Six Sigma projects as well as plant initiatives.·        Assist Quality Manager in establishing, implementing and maintaining the quality management system.·        Interface with Engineering, Product Development and Operations, to ensure transfer of new products to Production, are in accordance with approved data.·        Support the Quality Inspectors to ensure that products and processes comply with the relevant requirements of the quality management system.·        Conduct compliance (internal/external) audits including closing out audit findings, audit reports and determine proper corrective and preventive actions.·        Analyze failure, corrective and preventive action to respond to customer complaints.·        Ensure timely resolution of supplier failure, corrective actions and preventive actions·        Frequent interaction with Purchasing, Engineering, Manufacturing, Process Engineering and Product Development Departments.·        Occasional interaction with Marketing, Customers, Finance, and Vendors.·        Other duties as assigned with or without accommodation The ideal candidate should possess the following skills:·        BS degree in Engineering or Science·        Minimum of 2-5 years in QA/Manufacturing environment. Experience in an FDA regulated environment is preferred.·        Strong technical, oral and written communication skills·        Must have strong computer and sound statistical process control skills as applicable to Quality Control in a manufacturing environment.·        Sound knowledge of Validation (IQ,OQ,PQ), Root Cause Analysis and implementation of corrective action for process related concerns, as well as AQL Criteria Definitions·        Knowledge of 21 CFR 820 and ISO 14971 requirements platforms preferred.·        Must have normal mobility, manual dexterity, normal visual and auditory ability. Must be able to speak, read and write the English language and perform basic mathematical skills. Must be able to pass minimum required standard on all competency tests.   Excellent compensation and benefits, which are effective the first day of employment! Equal Opportunity Employer ",Quality Engineer Job in King Of Prussia,Full Time,"King Of Prussia, PA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-job-king-of-prussia-pa-us-167685332.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,Entry Level,bcd2f8c71513709c770102c4461c40e4
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:05:57:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThe Development Specialist is responsible for coordinating and executing cost-effective fundraising events in order to meet fundraising objectives of the March of Dimes in the assigned market. The position acts as a liaison between the March of Dimes and the community by recruiting volunteer and corporate participation in fundraising activities.Principle roles and responsibilities include revenue development and volunteer leadership development.• Identify prospects, research, and analyze sales options in order to identify business opportunities for designated area of responsibility. Develop relationships with constituents, referral partners or existing volunteer leaders in order to obtain introduction to prospective constituents.• Develop and present sales presentations in order to educate and inform top level constituents or prospects.• Accurately sense when and how to follow up and to advance from initial call to the final decision.• Identify, recruit and train qualified candidates for volunteer roles for all event committees within the designated area of responsibility. Manage fundraising volunteers for designated fundraising events.• Work with volunteer committees to effectively manage the execution of all assigned fundraising events, including fundraising and logistics. Be the lead staff for data management, systems management, report generation, etc. for fundraising events and donors.• Adhere to all event budgets, adjust and control expenditures.• Communicate the mission of the March of Dimes with staff, volunteers and within the community in order to connect current and prospective donors with Mission outcomes.• Perform other related duties from time-to-time in order to ensure the attainment of market financial goals.• Represent the March of Dimes with other professionals and volunteers both internally and externally. Contacts are critical to motivating, negotiation with, developing and collaborating with others.• Decisions or decisions this position leads in making, may have important consequences and may directly impact the fundraising success of the market.Position Qualifications• Previous Experience: Minimum of 3 years of experience in fundraising and event execution.• Education: Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and/or directly related professional skills and experience• Physical Demands: May involve lifting and carrying boxes; may involve traveling by car or plane to meetings and training.",Development Specialist Job in Bloomington/Peoria,"Full Time, Employee","Bloomington/Peoria, IL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/development-specialist-job-bloomington-peoria-il-us-167312198.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,Project/Program Management,796bdf2e643b8eff6a3cbf0d9d7c4c30
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:05:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  63863 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Glendale Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6756 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-167860396.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=13,,Project/Program Management,472a68f10bebff007c74169274547ce2
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:05:44:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Public Health Solutions is a nonprofit organization that develops, implements and advocates dynamic solutions to prevent disease and improve community health. Founded in 1957 as Medical & Health Research Association (MHRA), we conduct comprehensive research providing insight on public health issues, create and manage community health programs, and provide services to organizations to address public health challenges.  Programs of Public Health Solutions address critical public health needs such as maternal and child health, nutrition, access to health insurance, HIV prevention and care, and smoking cessation. For government agencies, nonprofit organizations and others, Public Health Solutions provides services to enable them to enhance their effectiveness and strengthen their capacity to have an impact and efficiently manage funds. Contracting and Management Services (CAMS) administers approximately $160 million in federal, CDC, City Tax Levy and other City funding for HIV/AIDS care and prevention and community-based human services under contract with the New York City Department of Health and Mental Hygiene (NYC DOHMH).  CAMS has funded services for people living with HIV/AIDS under the federal Ryan White Treatment Modernization Act (also known as the CARE Act) since 1991 and community human services since 2015. Currently, CAMS manages a portfolio of more than 300 contracts with more than 150 community-based organizations, hospitals, clinics, mental health clinics and other organizations that provide direct health, mental health and community-based services, including care and prevention services targeted to people living with and impacted by HIV/AIDS.  In addition, CAMS assists service providers to meet their program goals through a combination of support, guidance, and direction. It promotes effective service delivery and program and fiscal integrity by setting and communicating standards, and by collecting and analyzing information. CAMS, a program of Public Health Solutions, is seeking a Program Manager to provide management of the day-to-day operations for the Programs Unit, which includes ensuring adherence to performance measures (payments, contract negotiations, site visits and all relevant program operations) and monitoring and reporting specific and global trends/issues impacting the effectiveness of administration and monitoring of contracts. Specifically, the Program Manager will:·         Train and supervise Sr. Contract Managers, Contract Managers and Program Assistants through comprehensive orientation, weekly individual supervision and Programs Unit staff meetings.·         Provide support to Programs Unit staff during site visits, modifications, contractor payments, closeouts, and other areas, as needed.·         Assist contractors and Programs Unit staff in developing contract documents that reflect efficient and appropriate use of available resources.·         Ensure that contractors comply with the RFP and program policies and that the Programs Unit staff complies with monitoring obligations·         Review and approves work (site visit reports, contract documents, modifications, compliance related materials, payments, etc.) of Sr. Contract Managers, Contract Managers, and Program Assistants.  ·         Under direction of Deputy Director, Programs, assists in developing policies and procedures for administering contracts. ·         Update policies to reflect grantee/funding source changes, and ensures staff training regarding funding regulations.  ·         Ensure policies and procedures are implemented correctly by staff. Qualifications:·         Bachelor’s degree in human services/public health/public or business administration, Master’s preferred·         5 years’ experience managing health, social services, or related service programs, 6 years preferred·         Effective problem-solving and negotiating skills; strong leadership/motivational skills; strong organizational skills; ability to multi-task; ability to work autonomously within established precedents; excellent verbal and written communication skills·         Experience with staff management or project management; knowledge of HIV service provision;  familiarity with non-profit organizations·         Budgeting/fiscal skills and related contract, program experience preferred  TO APPLY FOR THIS POSITION PLEASE INCLUDE A COVER LETTER AND CLICK ON THE FOLLOWING LINK:  https://sjobs.brassring.com/TGWebHost/jobdetails.aspx?partnerid=26028&siteid=5334&areq=309BR                                            For more information about working at Public Health Solutions, please visit our website at www.healthsolutions.org.  We accept online applications only. Public Health Solutions is an EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled",Program Manager,Full Time,"Manhattan, NY 10013",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-contracting-management-services-job-manhattan-ny-us-166743746.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,,d285b977ce0f2657b18b3a2dd6c55070
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:04:56:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  63682 # Positions  .. State  NY City  Bridgehampton Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  862 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-167860405.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=10,,Project/Program Management,7764c5ad3b1b316f305194dd74ec5423
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:04:46:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is looking to hire a Senior QA Analyst who can be responsible for evaluating and testing new or modified software programs and software development procedures used to verify that programs function according to user requirements and conform to establishment guidelines. Our client is looking for experience in developing system test plans, documenting and executing test cases, finding and tracking defects, performing retests, managing production releases, and conducting post implementation reviews. The Senior QA Analyst needs to be able to work under either Agile or Waterfall methodology on projects and will be responsible for the overall quality of the product released to production.Duties and Responsibilities: Actively participates in requirement gathering phase and provide feedback to product owner and development team Develops and executes system test cases and test plans for application testing by evaluating requirements and design documentation Tracks and reports defects and conducts retests Records and tracks test results to closure and elimination of defects in production Manages the production release process including implementation plan, roll back plan, and coordination with the infrastructure and/or ops team for production move Conducts post implementation reviews and documents results Categorizes test results into QA metrics Coordinates integration testing with project team when applicable Coordinates user acceptance testing when applicable Participate in client testing with project team Provide assistance and training to fellow team members on software testing techniques and system knowledge Maintain regression test cases and perform regression testing when applicable Works with automation analyst to develop automation plan and maintain automation scripts Assists in the development of software quality assurance standards and process improvement initiativesREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor of Science in Computer Science or related technical field Minimum five years of applied knowledge and experience in Quality Assurance/Software Testing Good oral and written communication skills with both technical and non-technical information Ability to work well with developers, product managers, project managers, and users at all levels within the organization Expert level knowledge of QA best practices and methodologies Strong SQL testing experience Ability to conduct quality assurance audits and track metrics Expert level manual testing of all application layers Working knowledge of automated testing Proficient in writing test cases and developing test plans 1+ years experience working in an Agile Scrum environment preferred General knowledge and understanding of operating systems, database, application development tools, and data processing Methodical, detail oriented, efficient, organized, highly productive, a true self-starter Excellent organizational, analytical, and problem solving skills Intermediate Microsoft Office proficiency expected Must be resourceful, self-motivated, and able to be successful in a professional team-based environment Business and system analysis experience with system design, application development and deployment of corporate and consumer based projects preferred Ability to work under pressure, managing multiple priorities, and complete tasks on time within a fast paced environment -Can do- attitude in approaching challenges",SQA Analyst Job in Lenexa,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Lenexa, KS 66219",,http://jobview.monster.com/sqa-analyst-job-lenexa-ks-us-167556383.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),391e4bfcc28e28a8143cff04ad6ce14f
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:04:41:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Industry:            Financial/ Information & TechnologyJob Title:           Project ManagerJob Location:    Jersey City, NJ - 07302Duration:           1 Year Contract with possibility of extension Job Description:Project Manager for Global Sales and Services Technology Contact Center and Salesforce projects·         Project Management - Objective to support a number of Global salesforce projects.·         Provides clear and concise project communication; both written and verbal.·         Facilitates/manages project communications and stakeholder, client and project team expectations.·         Single point of contact for GIO, IT, BCP/DR, Finance, and other relevant groups at FD.·         Defines and manages project scope, budgeting, issues, and timelines. Responsibilities:·         Provide Project Management leadership and guidance for a number of Salesforce and Contact Center initiatives, from inception to delivery.·         Ensures project methodologies, project delivery processes, and implementation management processes are followed. This includes managing and driving.Project Schedule Risk and Issue Management Scope Change Management ·         Manages the project budget. This includes cost variance tracking, and managing project resources effectively in clarity.·         Provides clear and concise project communication; both written and verbal.·         Facilitates/manages project communications and stakeholder, client and project team expectations.·         Create project plan.·         Conduct Status meetings.·         Develop or facilitate delivery of progress reports, requirements documentation.·         Direct and Manage Project execution end to end.·         Define project success criteria and disseminate to involved parties throughout project life cycle.·         Manage change to the scope of the project and devise contingency plans.·         Estimation of project size and managing the project budget. Required Qualifications:·         Minimum of 7 years Project Management Experience. Demonstrated experience with SDLC and Agile Project methodologies. Preferred Qualifications:·         Familiarity and experience with Salesforce and Service Cloud.·         Familiarity with contact center applications and IVR.·         Familiarity and experience with Project Tracking tools such as Clarity and MS Project.·         Experience with Contact Centers and Financial products - Billing, Payments, Settlements experience. If you are interested further, then please reach out to Pravin Rajpurohit at 732-960-2128 or pravinr@aptask.com",Monster,,"Industry:            Financial/ Information & TechnologyJob Title:           Project ManagerJob Location:    Jersey City, NJ - 07302Duration:           1 Year Contract with possibility of extension Job Description:Project Manager for Global Sales and Services Technology Contact Center and Salesforce projects·         Project Management - Objective to support a number of Global salesforce projects.·         Provides clear and concise project communication; both written and verbal.·         Facilitates/manages project communications and stakeholder, client and project team expectations.·         Single point of contact for GIO, IT, BCP/DR, Finance, and other relevant groups at FD.·         Defines and manages project scope, budgeting, issues, and timelines. Responsibilities:·         Provide Project Management leadership and guidance for a number of Salesforce and Contact Center initiatives, from inception to delivery.·         Ensures project methodologies, project delivery processes, and implementation management processes are followed. This includes managing and driving.Project Schedule Risk and Issue Management Scope Change Management ·         Manages the project budget. This includes cost variance tracking, and managing project resources effectively in clarity.·         Provides clear and concise project communication; both written and verbal.·         Facilitates/manages project communications and stakeholder, client and project team expectations.·         Create project plan.·         Conduct Status meetings.·         Develop or facilitate delivery of progress reports, requirements documentation.·         Direct and Manage Project execution end to end.·         Define project success criteria and disseminate to involved parties throughout project life cycle.·         Manage change to the scope of the project and devise contingency plans.·         Estimation of project size and managing the project budget. Required Qualifications:·         Minimum of 7 years Project Management Experience. Demonstrated experience with SDLC and Agile Project methodologies. Preferred Qualifications:·         Familiarity and experience with Salesforce and Service Cloud.·         Familiarity with contact center applications and IVR.·         Familiarity and experience with Project Tracking tools such as Clarity and MS Project.·         Experience with Contact Centers and Financial products - Billing, Payments, Settlements experience. If you are interested further, then please reach out to Pravin Rajpurohit at 732-960-2128 or pravinr@aptask.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-jersey-city-nj-us-167268107.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,,bcc38444a0420c22be3f174a61de4ee4
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:04:40:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you an Automation Tester in Omaha, Nebraska looking for a new and exciting opportunity? Modis is seeking an Automation Tester for an amazing client of ours here in Omaha. This person will be joining a brand new department and will be the first in house Quality Assurance tester for this company! This person will need to have a passion for testing and be able to provide input and ideas for building a new team! This is a great company, casual environment that really values work/life balance. There's a ton of opportunity to get in with a new department and help dictate the direction! If this sounds like fun to you, please see below! Position Type: Direct Hire/PermanentPosition Requirements: 3+ years of automated testing experience2+ years of experience writing test scripts from scratch Selenium is a + but is not requiredExperience creating test cases, test plans and scenarios. Experience with HTML, JavaScript, .Net is a + but not a requirement  If you have a passion for testing and are looking to grow your career in an exciting direction, please apply for this Automation Testing role in Omaha, Nebraska to be considered!",Quality Assurance Automation Engineer Job in La Vista,"Full Time, Employee","La Vista, NE 68128",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-automation-engineer-job-la-vista-ne-us-167754922.aspx?mescoid=1500137001001&jobPosition=5,,Quality Assurance/Safety,314a44321e26c78565105c173cd54f88
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:03:44:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Norfolk, NEDescription: Nice leadership opportunity for a world wide food processing company!  Responsibilities:• Implementing and monitoring the QA Program;• Assisting the leadership team to drive culture change;• Establishing quality specifications for incoming raw materials and finished products;• Recruiting, coaching and supervising all QA personnel and establishing education and development programs including SOPs, quality, safety, and job expectations;• Preparing and managing the lab budget;• Maintaining FDA compliance, HACCP and GMP programs;• Ensuring all regulatory compliance;• Coordinating pest control services. Experience: • 5+ years of food processing QA Management experience;• Strong knowledge of laboratory testing procedures and computer software applications;• FDA, HACCP, GMP program experience;• Excellent analytical and organizational skills;• SQF certification is a plus.Salary: $60-78K + Bonus EligibleEducation: 4-year degree required; Life Science or related disciplines preferred.  Masters degree is a plus.R",Monster,,"Location: Norfolk, NEDescription: Nice leadership opportunity for a world wide food processing company!  Responsibilities:• Implementing and monitoring the QA Program;• Assisting the leadership team to drive culture change;• Establishing quality specifications for incoming raw materials and finished products;• Recruiting, coaching and supervising all QA personnel and establishing education and development programs including SOPs, quality, safety, and job expectations;• Preparing and managing the lab budget;• Maintaining FDA compliance, HACCP and GMP programs;• Ensuring all regulatory compliance;• Coordinating pest control services. Experience: • 5+ years of food processing QA Management experience;• Strong knowledge of laboratory testing procedures and computer software applications;• FDA, HACCP, GMP program experience;• Excellent analytical and organizational skills;• SQF certification is a plus.Salary: $60-78K + Bonus EligibleEducation: 4-year degree required; Life Science or related disciplines preferred.  Masters degree is a plus.R",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-manager-job-norfolk-ne-us-167263888.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=16,,,5a45930f69749d459e593f2c722065e3
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:03:43:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Analyst need for growing telecommunications company located in Broward County.You will be responsible for supporting the expansion of the business through successful planning and execution of Projects. You will be responsible for achieving milestones to ensure that all project goals and expectations are accomplished within the contracted time frame and funding parameters.Responsibilities will include:• Assist in developing project Plan of Work, specifying goals, staffing, scheduling, identification and mitigation of risks, contingency plans, and allocation of available resources.• Determine project scope, including goals, time frame, funding/budget constraints, and procedures for accomplishing project, staffing requirements, and assignment of resources.• Identifies, maps and schedules project deliverables, milestones, and required tasks: Following up to ensure deadlines are met• Assist in vendor and contract management for all applicable projects.• Establishes standards and procedures for project reporting and documentation.• Reviews status reports prepared by project personnel and modifies or realigns schedules and plans as required.Qualifications: • Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Technology or Business Administration, or equivalent, from an accredited institution with coursework and training supporting a strong business foundation. MBA is a plus.• 3-5 years of experience in project management. Telecommunication experience is a plus.• Fluency in English and Spanish; Portuguese is a plus.• Self-motivated with good ability to work in team, either as a leader or collaborator• Results driven; Highly detail oriented with ability to manage large volumes of data• Excellent organizational, written and verbal skills• Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists• Capability to think out of the box and devise innovative ideas and solutions• Strategic thinker who can collect and analyze data to make appropriate process decisions/recommendations.• Ability to work under pressure on multiple projects simultaneously while meeting deadlines with frequent interruptions and redefined priorities.• Exceptional ability to prioritize and apply problem solving skills.• Effective communicator at all levels of the organization ranging from front-line employees to enterprise officers.• Excellent organization and time management skills.• Results oriented, strong sense of urgency, collaborative, proactive and flexible.• Resource Management.• Budgetary responsibilities.• MS Office, MS Project, MS Visio, ARIS, SalesForce.com, SAP, BPM Tools",Project Analyst Job in Boca Raton,Full Time Employee,"Boca Raton, FL 33486",All,http://jobview.monster.com/project-analyst-job-boca-raton-fl-us-167357849.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=6,"90,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Project/Program Management,541518b679abaf4a392c06b858db690d
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:02:45:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  61225 # Positions  1 State  NC City  Durham Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  11404 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience: This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience: This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Overnight Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-overnight-job-camphill-pa-us-167907231.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=19,,Project/Program Management,3002cac21acf07b0e7f998ab1bef9b1a
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:02:44:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Barnard Construction Company, Inc., based in Bozeman, Montana, is a heavy-civil construction company with projects underway across North America. Barnard is ranked by Engineering News-Record, a leading construction industry periodical, as one of the nation’s Top 400 civil contractors. We specialize in dam construction and rehabilitation, power transmission and distribution, tunneling, inland marine, oil, gas, utility, and sewer and water pipeline projects. We offer competitive salaries, profit sharing, 401(k)s, a generous health plan, annual bonuses, and challenging career opportunities with a financially solid company. Barnard’s people are the reason for the success of the company. Our reputation attracts the highest quality personnel, people who are committed to producing projects that set a standard for excellence. At Barnard, we build the riskiest, most difficult, complex jobs we can find and we hire people who thrive on tough work and demanding opportunities.                          Qualifications·      Graduate Civil Engineer with 2 years Geotechnical experience or Individual with 5 years of project/field Geotechnical experience. ·       Previous experience on heavy civil construction projects·       Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite·       Must be well organized and able to read construction plans and specifications·       The ability to work independently as well as part of a team.·       The ability to freely access all points of a construction site in wide-ranging climates and      environment. Responsibilities·         Coordination with Quality Control testing personal for soils and aggregate·       Soils Identification and Classification·         Writing Reports·         QC Inspections·         Interface with the Owner on QC matters This position will initially be assigned to a project in Indiantown, FL. EOE, E-Verify Employer",QC Inspector Job in Indiantown,Full Time,"Indiantown, FL 34956",,http://jobview.monster.com/qc-inspector-job-indiantown-fl-us-167706076.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c2e053848a744f98bbd2e1d5143d56a1
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:02:04:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"The St. Louis Contact Center for Enterprise Holdings EAN Services, LLC is excited to announce it currently has an opening for a Project Leader for our Telecom department! The Project Leader is responsible for directing, coordinating, and monitoring activities of project teams involved in the analysis, design, development, and implementation of IT initiatives. This position assists with the definition of project scope and objectives, assists with developing detailed work plans, and provides project status. The Project Leader also conducts post project reviews and quality assurance audits. In addition, this position identifies project issues and risks. The starting pay is $59,000. Assists with the definition of project scope and objectives; assists with developing project work plans; modifies work plans to reflect approved scope changesAssists with the request of project resources and determination of time requirementsManages and tracks change requestsIdentifies project issues and risksFollows quality standards, processes, and procedures; conducts quality assurance auditsCreates status reports for project sponsors and IT end-users that include key indicators of project progress, risk, and successConducts post-project reviewsMonitors task automation and implements process improvements; recommends enhancements that result in increased quality, efficiencies, and overall value to the IT organizationMonitors the effectiveness of established service level agreements to manage customer expectations and quality standards; assists with defining new service level agreements in response to changing needsPrepares and delivers informal and formal presentations to own team, department, other IT teams, and business partnersAdditional duties and responsibilities as assigned by managerKnowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to maintain confidential informationStrong time management and organizational skillsExceptional communication skills both verbal and writtenStrong presentation skillsComfortable working independently or in a teamStrong sense of initiative, requiring little direct supervisionAbility to exercise sound judgment to make decisions toward the objective of satisfying all brandsAbility to quickly adapt to changes in direction and prioritiesAbility to define problems and collect data to support valid conclusions Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledMust be authorized to work in the United States and not require work authorization sponsorship by our company for this position now or in the futureMust be at least 18 years of age4 year degree required Minimum of 1 year continuous work experience at same employerAt least 2 years of project leadership/project management experience requiredAdvanced experience with Microsoft Office products requiredExperience with Microsoft Project and Visio preferredAbility to lift objects up to 10 poundsMust be able to work a Monday-Friday scheduleMust be able to work 40 hours per week",Project Leader- Telecom Job in St. Louis,,"St. Louis, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-leader-telecom-job-st.-louis-mo-us-166751795.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=15,,IT Project ManagementGeneral/Other: Project/Program ManagementProject Management,1b94f729db7cc7a747acd38969b3fc2c
United States of America,US,04/Jul/2016:02:03:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job descriptionKP LLC helps companies accomplish more with their print and electronic communication programs. Our value is to provide ways to work smarter and lower costs. Customers such as Nordstrom, Starbucks, and Microsoft trust KP to design, implement and measure complex marketing and communications programs. We are currently recruiting for a Client Services Specialist to join our West Sacramento team.  We are looking for someone who is professional, proactive and able to handle multiple priorities in a fast-paced environment.Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Gather client specifications for print, mail, fulfillment, and/or technology-based solutions, coordinate with internal resources and proactively communicate with customers to provide accurate estimates and proposals.Compare customer specifications to operational instructions, work orders, change orders and invoicing to ensure that all elements and necessary documents are accurate, complete and in accordance with customer agreements.Prepare and provide accurate reports and analytics to the client and/or sales and proactively communicate key milestones and status before, during and after jobs, projects and programs.Maintain active, timely and effective communications between sales, operations, and the customer by:  participating in meetings, business reviews and conference calls, follow-up on all customer and sales inquiries; and compiling reports and metrics as necessary.Schedule and coordinate with suppliers to ensure delivery dates are met.Collaborate proactively with team members to back-up and adequately distribute work load to ensure client deadlines are met. Experience, Skills and AbilitiesAssociates degree (A.A) from two-year College; plus one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and/or 2 years Customer Service experience.2 years experience in print, mail, fulfillment, marketing a plus.Intermediate level knowledge of Microsoft Office products including Word, Excel and Outlook.Experience with direct mail and Dynamics AX experience is a BIG plus!!Please apply through our website at: www.kpcorp.com",Client Services Specialist Job in West Sacramento,Full Time,"West Sacramento, CA",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/client-services-specialist-job-west-sacramento-ca-us-167070152.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dda3436554fa939c2497e6b1c9e1bc4d
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:14:44:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is Your Opportunity to Join One of the Fastest Growing Healthcare Staffing Companies in the Industry. Get the career growth opportunities and independence you deserve with Parallon. As one of the nation's first and largest providers of healthcare services we work with you to reach your goals both personally and professionally. We are committed to the care and improvement of human lives and strive daily to deliver top talent so as to uphold that very high level of commitment. GENERAL SUMMARY OF DUTIES: The Director of the Business Intelligence team plays an important tactical and strategic role within Parallon Workforce Management Solutions (PWMS). From a tactical perspective, this role provides day-to-day development and support for widely-used 3rd-party software deployed throughout the enterprise for analysis and reporting. This role will manage a BI team that provides expert support for thousands of business people within PWMS and its client organizations. It will also plan and execute release upgrades; maintains product availability and performance within SLA parameters; conducts advanced tool training; researches and tests extensions of the various product lines supported; and maintains ownership of the access provisioning process, code migration and version control of all metadata. This department will be responsible for reporting from many disparate systems (StaffRx, Facility Scheduler, etc.). This will entail managing TB's of data in a reporting environment. This position will be conversant in many different areas of healthcare and staff productivity knowledge, in order to meet different business community's unique needs (financial, recruiting, Master Staffing Agency, Facility Scheduler, productivity, etc.) From a strategic standpoint, the leader of this team provides guidance in the application of the toolset to fit business requirements and in the analysis of new and/or competing technologies. They will also oversee the implementation of this new technology. The incumbent needs good communication and interpersonal skills, and will be interfacing with a number of people at many levels of the organization throughout IT&S and will be a representative of PWMS to external clients. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO: The Director of the Business Intelligence team will lead his team in the following areas:To provide technology-specific expertise for business intelligence tools to the rest of the IT&S organization. Provision of this expertise takes a number of forms, including: engaging in consultative work and joint-development with various application development teams, providing second-level support to customers, creating and maintaining standards and procedures, developing and delivering in-depth technical training & certification programs, and leading problem analysis & resolution.Improve upon current reporting standards by providing new functionality. This will include canned reports, dashboards, predictive analysis, emailed reports, a new BI portal, and Microsoft add-ins; Also releasing new mobile reporting capability to clientele. To present reporting capabilities with PWMS sales team to prospective clients.To create a stable information technology infrastructure by maintaining a consistent release policy; planning, testing, and executing release upgrades with the necessary breadth of participation on the part of development personnel and business users; identifying, reporting, and fixing, with vendor assistance, material bugs and deficiencies in the tools; and setting and achieving SLAs that deliver high levels of availability, reliability, and security.To leverage HCA's importance as a major client for our many software vendors to influence 3rd-party product development, obtain timely fixes for product deficiencies, and realize substantial price discounts and beneficial contract terms and conditions.To provide assistance for performance monitoring & tuning and for capacity planning.To manage the daily working of a team of up to 12 people at varying locations. This team will be highly skilled and technical professionals comprising millions of dollars annually in human resources. This will include onshore and offshore resources. This will include employing six sigma, lean, and scrum methodologies.To provide and implement a disaster recovery for the reporting solutionsKNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, & ABILITIES - This position requires the following minimal requirements:More than 7 YEARS OF EXPERIENCE REQUIREDExcellent oral and written communication skillsAbility to multi-task and prioritizeAbility to work well within a team environment and independentlyAbility to develop detailed user requirements, system specifications and use casesExperience using office productivity software tools like Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel, Microsoft PowerPoint, Outlook, Visio and Project.MICROSTRATEGY experience preferred",Director of Business Intelligence Job in Sunrise,Full Time Employee,"Sunrise, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-business-intelligence-job-sunrise-fl-us-172055697.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=12,,Business/Strategic Management,5d41fedbf766a13838cf330fee70220d
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:18:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"TruGreen is committed to providing personalized attention for our associates. We focus on developing our people by building proud, dynamic teams while helping associates reach their personal and professional goals. We continuously strive to make TruGreen an employer of choice and ""a great place to work!""Position OverviewProvides quality and timely service to the customer through the recruitment, training and supervision of a team of lawn care specialists. Provides effective coaching and development of field staff so that they may positively impact customer retention through exceeding customer expectations.Responsibilities1. Evaluates quality of service provided to customers and develops procedures to minimize customer complaints. Ensures diplomacy concerning customer service-related concerns.2. Coaches and develops lawn specialists and trainees. Works with other managers to identify ways to reduce customer cancellations.3. Recruits, interviews and selects personnel needed to efficiently staff the service function. Evaluates performance, makes salary recommendations and administers disciplinary actions consistent with company policy.4. Plans and conducts new hire and on-going training for service personnel in customer service skills, technical skills, safety policies and procedures.5. Supervises a team of technicians to ensure service (production and sales) goals are met. Maintains positive morale among personnel and actively promotes teamwork.6. Examines associate work for accuracy, neatness and conformance to best practices as well as company policies and procedures.7. Determines work procedures issuing oral and written instructions. Expedites workflow by coordinating the sharing of information between customer and field technician. Prepares work schedules and assigns and monitors duties to service personnel for efficiency.8. Prepares composite reports from individual reports of subordinates. Conducts daily and weekly management meetings.9. Ensures that a safe workplace is provided for all associates by ongoing training and adherence to company policies.10. Maintains Department of Transportation Pre/Post Trip Inspection and Drive Qualification files. Ensures current licensing is maintained by all associates as required by company policy/state and/or federal law.Education and Experience Requirements• Associate’s degree in a business-related discipline and two (2) or more years of related experience in lawn/horticulture/agronomy/lawn care services required, or an equivalent combination of education and experience.• 2 years of supervisory management experience required• Certificates, licenses and registrations as required by federal and state law• Bachelor’s degree and sales experience preferred• Valid, permanent driver’s license from state of residence and a clean driving record per company standards are required. Current liability auto insurance required. Must be 21 years of age by date of hire.Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities• Excellent verbal and written communication skills• Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of leadership and with front line staff• Excellent leadership skills in team building, selecting talent, training, mentoring and developing a sales team, executing goals• Excellent time management skills• Practical knowledge of service industry and experience in developing and executing sales plans• Business process analysis skills• Computer skills with Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Physical Demands & Working ConditionsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Physical DemandsRegularly required to:• Sit or stand• Walk on uneven surfaces or climb stairs for an extended period of time• Use hands and arms to handle, feel or reach• Speak and hear• Use vision abilities for close, distance, color, peripheral, depth and focus• Lift up to 50 lbs independently• Push and pull equipmentOccasionally required to:• Stoop, kneel, crouch or crawlWorking ConditionsNoise level• Moderate to loudAdverse Conditions• Subject to outdoor weather conditions which may include extreme cold, extreme heat or wet conditions• Subject to exposure to animals and insects• Regularly exposed to chemicals using appropriate safety equipment• Occasionally work near mechanical or moving partsTruGreen is committed to Diversity and Inclusion.  We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position.We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer - Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesTo learn more copy and paste this URL into your browser: http://www.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/poster_screen_reader_optimized.pdfTruGreen performs pre-employment testing.DisclaimerThe above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",Service Manager  Job in Mooresville,Full Time Employee,"Mooresville, NC",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/service-manager-101140-job-mooresville-nc-us-171751838.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Business/Strategic Management,6b5dcd0a19de17d4e033cce11f2fef27
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:18:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you ready to become a key member of a stable company’s Corporate Finance Team?  Through successful relationship building and business partnering with all levels of the organization, the Financial Analyst job in Kansas City, MO will provide forecasting, reporting, analysis and decision support for business and corporate finance units.  Financial Analyst Job Responsibilities: Influence business decisions.Earn the trust of the key business stakeholders.Execute the monthly forecast process and all its deliverables. Monthly & Quarterly performance analysis, Budget & ForecastResponsible for budget process and timely execution of the deliverables.Support month-end and quarter end closes with Accrual entries  Qualifications: BA or BS degree in Finance, Business, or Economics required. CMA or MBA a plusMinimum 1+ years of financial analysis experienceWorking knowledge of GAAP.Strong Excel spreadsheets and PowerPoint skills.Good written and verbal communication skills are essential.  If you are qualified and interested in learning more about this position, please submit your resume directly to lindsey.price@parkerlynch.com.",Financial Analyst Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, MO 64106",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-job-kansas-city-mo-us-171955167.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=19,,Business/Strategic Management,2d423cb357d72c1611301532186e5d17
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:18:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"AC Transit is actively recruiting for qualified candidates for the position of Buyer. Under general supervision, this position performs purchasing activities of a Centralized Purchasing System to purchase and expedite a variety of materials, supplies, equipment and services for regular and non-routine use in the operation of the District. This is an excellent opportunity to work in Purchasing at one of the largest bus agencies in California. In addition to working with some of the best in the business, AC Transit also has an excellent benefits package that includes pension, medical, dental and vision coverage, flexible spending and a 457 savings plan. .",Senior Buyer Job in Oakland,Full Time Employee,"Oakland, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-buyer-job-oakland-ca-us-172050856.aspx?mescoid=1300068001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2f4ed44ae1dfba5cdc75859db8d8252f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:22:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:This position has direct responsibility for managing, supporting and ensuring intended service offerings in a timely and complete manner for/with distributors, customers and business partners. This position will have responsibility for analyzing, creating and presenting dashboards and data management to include analysis of large amounts of data related to freight charges and claims.Principal Duties and Responsibilities:•Analyze and manipulate large, complex data sets.•Understand field operations•Develop reporting and utilize current system for implementing dashboard •Manage projects to drive transportation and inventory demand efficiency•Customer facing issue management•Driving financial resolution•Track all claims Expected Areas of Competence:•Strong analytical, data management, SQL and data base management •Proven solution oriented thinking and problem solving•Strong customer focus with ability to influence through creating dashboards•Desire to learn database management tracking•Focus on timely deliverables Education/Experience Requirements:Bachelor's degree in business management, finance, information technology or other related field.2 to 5 years experience required with proven experience in an analyst role required.Travel Requirements:Up to 10%Equal opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected veteran/Disabled.",Business Intelligence Analyst (Transportation) () Job in Warsaw,Full Time Employee,"Warsaw, IN",,http://jobview.monster.com/business-intelligence-analyst-transportation-547432-job-warsaw-in-us-172021327.aspx?mescoid=1500144001001&jobPosition=9,,Business/Strategic Management,76d098970160929fe81bcacff9c37e4b
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:22:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are interested in applying for this job opportunity, please email your resume in Word format to sarah.ayala@parkerlynch.com and put “CIO/CFO” in the subject line. Emailed resumes will have priority consideration over online applications.  Our client, a rapidly growing venture capital firm is seeking an experienced Chief Investment Officer! The position will be part of the executive team and will help drive growth.  The ideal candidate will have a minimum of 10+ years of experience.  Excellent benefits with 4+ weeks of PTOLow-cost health premiumsStart-up tech organizationCompetitive Base Salary  Responsibilities:The Chief Investment Officer will report to the managing partners and have oversight over finance and investments. Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business AdministrationMasters or MBA from a top school requiredInvestment/capital management experience required10+ years of in-house financial management experienceExperiencing in raising funds or gaining investors for a growing businessCFA a plusPE or VC backed firm experience preferredHealthcare or Technology company experience a plus   For immediate consideration, please email your resume in Word format to Sarah.Ayala@ParkerLynch.com with “CIO/CFO” in the subject heading Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",Chief Investment Officer Job in Loop (Downtown Chicago),Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL 60603",,http://jobview.monster.com/chief-investment-officer-job-in-loop-downtown-chicago-il-job-chicago-il-us-171624845.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,Business/Strategic Management,a3c1481f94fb0b6d24b12d5265132f59
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:26:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Operations Implementation Manager is responsible for leading the execution of implementation plans developed as a result of the Operations Performance Improvement team project findings. Participate in the development of implementation plans. Responsible for partnering with field Management and delivering training as necessary to implement developed plans. SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES 20% Support performance improvement opportunitiesProvide feedback on operational improvement plans and gauge if opportunities are actionable Recommend conclusions and support decision makingDevelop strong relationships with field leadership as a gateway to additional opportunities80% Oversee the execution of implementation plansUse industry knowledge and experience to facilitate relationships and credibility with operational and market leadership Partner with field leadership on execution of implementation plansAchieve implementation plans desired resultsEducation:Bachelor's degree in a related field Experience:Five (5) years of funeral industry experience Five (5) years of location management experienceKnowledge, Skills & Abilities:Knowledge of computer technology and Microsoft Word, Excel, and Outlook Understanding of financial statements and business driversAbility to think strategically about business issuesCommunication and team building skillsWho we are. What we do. We're more than North America's largest provider of funeral, cremation and cemetery services. We are mothers, fathers, sisters, brothers, sons and daughters who are devoted to the communities where we live and work. We are more than 20,000 dedicated individuals who provide caring assistance to families in need, honor veterans and public servants and deliver lifesaving programs to help keep children and seniors safe. We operate under the umbrella of the Dignity Memorial network of 1,800 funeral homes and cemeteries. Dignity Memorial providers care for more than 300,000 families each year and understand the importance of thoughtful, personalized arrangements. We believe creating meaningful ways to pay tribute to a loved one begins with compassion and is shaped by the understanding that each life is truly unique. For us, there is no greater responsibility than honoring and preserving the story of one's life. Benefits Options:Health benefits (medical, dental, vision, life)401K Retirement Savings Plan with company matchVacation and sick timeTuition reimbursementFuneral discounts, and moreSCI offers advanced on-line training resources, career advancement opportunities in the largest organization in the industry, attractive benefits, and a wonderful community to serve with plenty of culture and personality. For additional information regarding our company, please visit our corporate site at www.sci-corp.com. As used herein, “SCI” refers to Service Corporation International and its affiliated companies. Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/VPI95305922",Operations Implementation Manager Job in Houston,Full Time Employee,"Houston, TX 77019",Business Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-implementation-manager-job-houston-tx-us-172046201.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=20,,Business/Strategic Management,992b5be8273d5109a5426d00e7fc24b4
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:29:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Business Manager As member of Admin Team, this individual reports directly to Supt. & Asst. Supt. Enrollment 4,383. Min. req. include: B.A. in accounting, business, or finance; MBA and/ or CPA with prior exp working in public school preferred; familiarity with PA & Federal systems of acounting & financial reporting, budgeting, audits, bids, taxation, public sector negotiations, bond issues, investments, & insurance preferred; excellent analytical, interpersonal, organizational, & communication skills in working w/all constituents. Salary & benefits pkg competitive with Allegheny County school district market. Send letter of interest & resume along with 3 signed ref letters from previous employers, copies of current Acts 34, 114, 151, & 126 clearances, undergraduate/ graduate transcripts, & supporting documents to: Human Resources (Business Mgr), Fox Chapel Area School District, 611 Field Club Road, Pittsburgh, PA 15238. Deadline: 9/30/16 EOE",BUSINESS MANAGER Job in Pittsburgh  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Pittsburgh 15238,Education,http://jobview.monster.com/business-manager-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-172085385.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=15,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),83d648978f3d3ead12eccbfc4726583f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:42:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"the brands of everyday life.™ **Retail Store Manager** Want to work with a product you love? Yankee Candle is seeking individuals who are passionate about home décor and fragrance. We are an energetic, innovative and engaged team, who values their people and their development. Not to mention, we offer a generous 50% off employee discount on most products. We characterize our team as a band of avid retail and brand enthusiasts who care deeply about their work, and work hard to get the best possible results. This position is perfect for someone who enjoys an organization that moves swiftly, is open to change, and for someone who really cares about providing and demonstrating exceptional guest service—and can correlate that behavior with driving sales. **Job Summary:** As a Retail Store Manager, you will be responsible for the management and leadership of a Yankee Candle Store. This includes overseeing a staff of 4-10+ employees (depending on store volume) to achieve sales, organization, guest engagement, and profitability goals. **Details:** The Retail Store Manager is responsible for maintaining service and operational standards; supervising, coaching, counseling and training staff on the YCC sales program; ensuring adequate staffing through consistent recruiting and networking efforts; ensures visual merchandising/presentation and operational standards; providing superior guest service and engagement; maintaining store facilities; ensuring safety and security for guests and staff; effectively managing the store inventory (control and processing); preparing cash reports and merchandise orders; and other similar duties pertaining to the management of a retail store. The Retail Store Manager’s expectations of which they will be reviewed upon are statistical measures called KPOs or Key Performance Objectives, specific job responsibilities (such as those listed above), and leadership competencies that have been recognized as essential leadership skills for success in Yankee Candle management roles. Those leadership competencies include: self-awareness, effective communication, learning, flexibility, model uncompromising ethics, align the team, drive for results, and executes flawlessly. **Minimum Requirements:** + 3+ years; supervisory/management experience in a retail sales environment or similar fast paced, guest service environment, preferred. + Previous experience in a retail sales environment with increasing levels of responsibility and strong business acumen in general retail practices and procedures. + Ability to use a computer terminal to process information and transactions required. + Demonstrated ability to effectively lead/direct, coach and train others in a retail setting, and the ability to relate well using communication, interpersonal, diplomacy and related skills required. + Experience in a specialty retail environment required. **Hours:** Flexibility in work schedule is required including the ability to work extended hours, weekends, and holidays as operational need may require. Ability to travel and work shifts in other stores in the district as necessary is desired **Salary Structure:** This position offers a competitive salary & excellent benefits package. **We are an e-Verify employer.** All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status **About Yankee Candle** Yankee Candle is a leading designer, manufacturer, wholesaler and retailer of premium scented candles, based on sales. Yankee Candle participates in the $25 billion global candle and home fragrance market. Yankee Candle has a 46-year history of offering distinctive products and marketing them as affordable luxuries and consumable gifts. Yankee Candle sells its products through a North American wholesale guest network of approximately 35,000 store locations, a growing base of Yankee Candle owned and operated retail stores, direct mail catalogs, and its Internet website (www.yankeecandle.com). Outside of North America, Yankee Candle sells its products primarily through an international wholesale guest network of over 6,000 store locations and distributors covering over 50 countries on a combined basis. **Yankee Candle is subsidiary of Newell Brands** Yankee Candle is part of Newell Brands, a global consumer goods company with a strong portfolio of well-known brands, including Paper Mate®, Sharpie®, Dymo®, EXPO®, Parker®, Elmer’s®, Coleman®, Jostens®, Marmot®, Rawlings®, Irwin®, Lenox®, Oster®, Sunbeam®, FoodSaver®, Mr. Coffee®, Rubbermaid Commercial Products®, Graco®, Baby Jogger®, NUK®, Calphalon®, Rubbermaid®, Contigo®, First Alert®, Waddington and Yankee Candle®. Driven by a sharp focus on the consumer, leading investment in innovation and brands, and a performance-driven culture, Newell Brands helps consumers achieve more where they live, learn, work and play. www.newellbrands.com MON16 **COMPANY:** The Yankee Candle Company, Inc # Requisition Id: _109194_ # Location: _NJ - North Brunswick_",FT Store Manager - Yankee Candle (North Brunswick,Full Time Employee,"the brands of everyday life.™ **Retail Store Manager** Want to work with a product you love? Yankee Candle is seeking individuals who are passionate about home décor and fragrance. We are an energetic, innovative and engaged team, who values their people and their development. Not to mention, we offer a generous 50% off employee discount on most products. We characterize our team as a band of avid retail and brand enthusiasts who care deeply about their work, and work hard to get the best possible results. This position is perfect for someone who enjoys an organization that moves swiftly, is open to change, and for someone who really cares about providing and demonstrating exceptional guest service—and can correlate that behavior with driving sales. **Job Summary:** As a Retail Store Manager, you will be responsible for the management and leadership of a Yankee Candle Store. This includes overseeing a staff of 4-10+ employees (depending on store volume) to achieve sales, organization, guest engagement, and profitability goals. **Details:** The Retail Store Manager is responsible for maintaining service and operational standards; supervising, coaching, counseling and training staff on the YCC sales program; ensuring adequate staffing through consistent recruiting and networking efforts; ensures visual merchandising/presentation and operational standards; providing superior guest service and engagement; maintaining store facilities; ensuring safety and security for guests and staff; effectively managing the store inventory (control and processing); preparing cash reports and merchandise orders; and other similar duties pertaining to the management of a retail store. The Retail Store Manager’s expectations of which they will be reviewed upon are statistical measures called KPOs or Key Performance Objectives, specific job responsibilities (such as those listed above), and leadership competencies that have been recognized as essential leadership skills for success in Yankee Candle management roles. Those leadership competencies include: self-awareness, effective communication, learning, flexibility, model uncompromising ethics, align the team, drive for results, and executes flawlessly. **Minimum Requirements:** + 3+ years; supervisory/management experience in a retail sales environment or similar fast paced, guest service environment, preferred. + Previous experience in a retail sales environment with increasing levels of responsibility and strong business acumen in general retail practices and procedures. + Ability to use a computer terminal to process information and transactions required. + Demonstrated ability to effectively lead/direct, coach and train others in a retail setting, and the ability to relate well using communication, interpersonal, diplomacy and related skills required. + Experience in a specialty retail environment required. **Hours:** Flexibility in work schedule is required including the ability to work extended hours, weekends, and holidays as operational need may require. Ability to travel and work shifts in other stores in the district as necessary is desired **Salary Structure:** This position offers a competitive salary & excellent benefits package. **We are an e-Verify employer.** All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status **About Yankee Candle** Yankee Candle is a leading designer, manufacturer, wholesaler and retailer of premium scented candles, based on sales. Yankee Candle participates in the $25 billion global candle and home fragrance market. Yankee Candle has a 46-year history of offering distinctive products and marketing them as affordable luxuries and consumable gifts. Yankee Candle sells its products through a North American wholesale guest network of approximately 35,000 store locations, a growing base of Yankee Candle owned and operated retail stores, direct mail catalogs, and its Internet website (www.yankeecandle.com). Outside of North America, Yankee Candle sells its products primarily through an international wholesale guest network of over 6,000 store locations and distributors covering over 50 countries on a combined basis. **Yankee Candle is subsidiary of Newell Brands** Yankee Candle is part of Newell Brands, a global consumer goods company with a strong portfolio of well-known brands, including Paper Mate®, Sharpie®, Dymo®, EXPO®, Parker®, Elmer’s®, Coleman®, Jostens®, Marmot®, Rawlings®, Irwin®, Lenox®, Oster®, Sunbeam®, FoodSaver®, Mr. Coffee®, Rubbermaid Commercial Products®, Graco®, Baby Jogger®, NUK®, Calphalon®, Rubbermaid®, Contigo®, First Alert®, Waddington and Yankee Candle®. Driven by a sharp focus on the consumer, leading investment in innovation and brands, and a performance-driven culture, Newell Brands helps consumers achieve more where they live, learn, work and play. www.newellbrands.com MON16 **COMPANY:** The Yankee Candle Company, Inc # Requisition Id: _109194_ # Location: _NJ - North Brunswick_",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/ft-store-manager-yankee-candle-north-brunswick-nj-job-north-brunswick-nj-us-172022177.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=5,,Business/Strategic Management,cc12feef8c135e64f0448ca2e02b962d
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:15:43:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  690001Position: FX BAProject (how does this affect the company/why open?): Our client is looking for a Business Analyst to join the fast paced Alternate Solutions Group for their Capital Markets products specifically focused on FX. This team builds products and services for new FX technologies that the bank wants to bring to market.This team functions more like a start-up within a bank environment and their time to market for new products is often only 3-6 months. The team often partners with Fintechs or start-ups to create new products and services. For example, this team developed the Global Money Transfer project that provides foreign currency exchanges for 45 countries for no cost to the customer and they partnered with a Fintech to do this.Responsibilities:  This candidate will serve as a Business Analyst for this team and will be responsible for the BRDs and SRDs for the new products.This is a 50/50 business/technology BA role and the candidate must have similar experience in prior roles.This BA will also be expected to be the team SME on the new products and work with the Solution Designers, Developers, and UAT from end-to-end to bring this product to market on short timelines.This candidate should also be UX focused in that they should be considering the entire user experience of how a customer will use these new products.Requirements:7+ years Senior Business Analyst experience writing BRDs and SRDsWould like candidates that have varied experience between banks and fintechs/start-ups but MUST have worked within at least one enterprise environmentExperience within strategy or product development groups requiredScrum/Agile is a big plusTop 5 bank experience requiredExperience with capital markets/FX is big plus and if not then retail products experienceSoft skills:  Soft skills are most important! This person MUST be creative, innovative, energetic, sharp, and someone who can think of the products end-to-end and provide solutions! Must be a very strong problem solver.Please email khardin@apexsystemsinc.com to applyEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",FX Business Analyst Job in Toronto body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Toronto,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/fx-business-analyst-job-toronto-ks-us-172024062.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e72e1c521da6309fde5c1ecd035b8982
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:16:35:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: TellerJob ID Number: 5269155-1Location: Rock Springs,WYJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. Tellers are the face of our company and represent Wells Fargo in the community. A Teller position with our team offers an opportunity to be part of one of America s greatest companies. You'll have exposure to a variety of responsibilities, people and experiences in a professional work environment - that's part of the fun! We value what’s right for our customers in everything we do. Everything we do, we do to protect the customer and the bank. Our teller’s role is to warmly welcome customers to our store, efficiently process the customer’s request, and build trust that Wells Fargo can help them with all of their financial needs. We want them to know about all of our innovative services, financial education information, as well as take advantage of the relationships we provide as Wells Fargo team members. Every teller is part of a team that is rated first, and most importantly, on the customers’ experience with the teams’ service. Every teller has her/his own scorecard with performance goals. Our best tellers constantly go the extra mile to greet customers and provide exceptional customer service, make them feel welcome and also engage them to learn about their financial goals. Reliable attendance is essential for success in this role. Your exciting role includes: Going the extra mile to greet customers, show them that we care, and make them feel welcome Asking questions to learn about their financial needs and, when the customer sees the value, introducing them to other Wells Fargo team members. Setting performance goals and working with your manager to increase your customer advocacy effectiveness through feedback and coaching Processing between 20-25 customer transactions each hour with no mistakes through patience, attention to detail, and the ability to follow procedures. Accurately maintaining and balancing a cash drawer. Delivering upon customer needs for products such as safe deposit boxes, merchant/vault, ATM processing, bonds and coupons, foreign currency and night drop. A happy, satisfied customer starts with you! At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others without being asked. We want team members who are committed to the success of the team. Tellers develop and improve their skills through training programs and regular feedback discussions with supervisors, to help them improve in their current role and further their professional development. Many of our managers and senior leaders started their career as a teller. With an organization the size of Wells Fargo, there are multiple opportunities to learn and grow and explore career options over time. Our vision and values supports developing and engaging our team members. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsCustomer service focus with the ability to stay positive in interactions with customers and team membersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience achieving individual and team goalsCash handling experienceExperience selling products and servicesExperience working in a fast-paced environment Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduled Street Address WY-Rock Springs: 1400 Dewar Dr - Rock Springs, WYDisclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Teller Job in Rock Springs,Full Time Employee,"Rock Springs, WY",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/teller-job-rock-springs-wy-us-171284510.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ab44ad71be843fa83480e69be2ca40b6
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:16:42:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Overview:CHS Aligned Solutions is partnering with a large member cooperative to hire an Agronomy and Grain Assistant Location Manager approximately a half hour north of Mount Vernon, IL. This position is designed to work with and mentor under the current location manager until his upcoming retirement in a few years.  This position will be responsible for assisting in leading the location staff, running a high-performing, profitable location, as well as marketing the organization’s products and services.  Responsibilities:Serve as a liaison between suppliers, vendors, and distributors to sales staff, management and employees. Achieve satisfactory profit/loss ratio & market share in relation to preset standards & industry & economic trends. Assist in operations of the branch. Includes: Administration, employees, facilities, rolling stock, sales, safety & regulatory Analyze branch work flow and employee job duties Review reports of operational performance Maintain company focus on exceptional customer serviceResearch, analyze, and monitor financial, technological, and demographic factors to capitalize on market opportunities and minimize effects of competitive activity. Assist location manager with interviewing, hiring, and training employees. Planning, assigning, and directing work; evaluating performance, addressing complaints and resolving problems. Source and market sales leads. Establish and maintain relationships with key industry and strategic community partners.  Qualifications: Must have previous experience in agronomy/grain retail (ideally 5+ years). Experience working with P&L statements, budgeting and financial forecasting. Must be detail oriented, effectively analytical and have the ability to motivate a team. Prefer a 4-Year degree in Agronomy or Agriculturally related major.(6-10 years related job experience may substitute for education)Our ideal candidate will be an outgoing person who has a genuine interest in providing solutions for clients and meeting company's needs.  Additional Details:This position is designed as a mid-level career opportunity and comes with excellent pay and benefits.  In addition, there is career advancement opportunities to grow within the company.  The company is an equal opportunity employer.  All interested applicants should apply online. If assistance is required, please send email inquiry to Danielle.heeren@chsinc.com",Agronomy and Grain Assistant Location Manager Job in Mount Vernon,Full Time Employee,"Mount Vernon, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/agronomy-grain-assistant-location-manager-job-mount-vernon-il-us-172063928.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=18,,Business/Strategic Management,e2b2d0c370f4cb17ca47de7243ae2f3b
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:16:43:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description  Who We Are Banana Republic Brand Ambassador: We are team players who are engaging, sociable, team oriented and stylish. We are passionate about fashion and trend and always do what is right for our customers. We create a customer centric environment and are relentless about exceeding goals. We are curious, honest and kind; we bring joy to everyone. Engaging: We are inviting, easily connecting with others. We are passionate, approachable and in service to our customers. We recognize others successes. Sociable: We actively seek new experiences, information, and knowledge. We proactively solicit feedback from our internal and external customers, responding quickly to feedback. We are digitally connected and socially conscious. Team Oriented: We work together to achieve our goals. We are supportive, respectful and caring. We remain resilient in difficult situations. Stylish: We are enthusiastic and knowledgeable about product and trend. Our style is relevant and chic. What We Do Primary Responsibilities: As a member of the Banana Republic leadership team, the General Manager is responsible for creating the conditions for success in all aspects of the store’s business, including: sourcing, selecting and developing all team members; executing store strategy to deliver annual field priorities; and achieving key business goals. The General Manager shares the vision for the store, communicating in a way that each employee is clear on their contribution to the store’s success. Business Results: Consistently inspires team to achieve results and perform at a high level. Knows the competition and market trends to positively impact business. Drives productivity of the team. Monitors labor to maximize productivity, optimize traffic and achieve sales goals. Leads implementation of product placement, marketing and promotional strategies. Creates strategies and processes that deliver results. Customer Centric: Exceeds the expectations of internal and external customers. Establishes effective relationships to build brand loyalty. Fosters a healthy and productive environment where employees can maximize their potential. Ensures the team executes operational excellence through a customer centric mindset. Ambassador: Represents the brand, understands the competitors and drives excellent tenant and community relationships. Promotes store involvement with our Community in Action programs. Upholds high quality store experiences for the internal and external customer. Builds effective cross brand and store center partnerships. Builds Highly Productive Teams: Sources, selects and develops high potential talent, effectively assessing for skill and cultural fit. Accountable for team performance through, coaching and feedback. Teaches and trains leaders to build skill. Passionate: Knowledgeable and passionate about Banana Republic, our customer and our product. Accountable: Holds team and self-accountable to all Gap Inc. standards of performance. Leads efforts to reduce in store shrink activity through education and awareness. Ensures compliance to all Federal, Provincial, State and Gap Inc. employment requirements.Qualifications Key Qualifications: 3-5 years of retail management experience Customer focused Demonstrated ability to deliver results Basic business acumen skills Established time management skills Strong planning and prioritization skills Communicates effectively Tech savvy Requirements: College Degree preferred Ability to maneuver around sales floor, stockroom and office Travel between stores and outside the state/province, if necessary Open availability to meet the needs of the business, including evenings and weekends",General Manager - Banana Republic - Fashion Place Job in Murray,"Full Time, Employee","Murray, UT 84107",,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-banana-republic-fashion-place-job-murray-ut-us-172007409.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=11,,,f64f5a0d972ed70c55c7cbfc32bd92ae
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:17:11:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Management: Entry Level PositionsWe are a dynamic group of young business professionals! We operate the same way athletes do on a competitive sports team--our core values being leadership, integrity, team work, and accountability.As a business, we highlight customer focus. Our team is trained daily on customer service techniques and retention. Building a strong rapport with the customers in our territories is the very thing that makes our company and our clients achieve success.Responsibilities: Receives and Processes customer purchase orders Enters orders received via telephone or on a provided tabletEnters electronic, paper and manual orders online Verifies & Confirms customer orders and delivery expectations. Quotes prices according to uniform pricing strategy and current market pricing. Tracks order exceptions and maintains as needed.Sales with Preferred CustomersDirect Customer Service with new and current customersTeamwork: collaborates with team members Seeks good communication and cooperation within Trademark's organization Coordinates all routine aspects of customer orders, requests, and inquiries Identifies and uses internal resources as needed to complete tasks Supports team goals Is receptive/flexible/adaptable to change Understands, generally, about competitors and their servicesRequirementsQualifications: Customer service, customer solutions and/or sales experience. Leadership role without formal authorityEffective decision makingDisplays effective interpersonal & communication skills (internal/external) Delivers timely and accurate information to customers & internal business partners both verbally and in writing. Achieves mutual understanding by summarizing & reviewing agreements Actively listens. Demonstrates understanding of our clients products and services Recognizes and responds to new/additional opportunities at existing customers Education/Training: Bachelor’s degree preferred Customer Service experience preferred People from all backgrounds seeking part time or full time opportunities in the following areas are encouraged to inquire about our program: sales, customer service, sales representative, internships, part time, manager, management, purchasing, part time, restaurant, assistant, hotel, supervisor, general, advertising, communications, sales manager, project management, editor, hospitality, professional, bartender, call center, inventory, photography, bilingual, sports, cashier, clerk, distribution, sales management, shipping, waiter, waitress.  Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, management, administrative, business development, business, internship, advertising, entry level, retail, insurance, education, outside sales, strategy-planning, project manager, part-time, server, summer  employment, promotions, pr, customer service, full-time, restaurant, quality control, assistant, secretary, public relations, summer, salesman, hotel, safety, executive assistant, summer work, communications, training, human resources, office manager, media, general, social services, sales manager, pharmaceutical sales, food services, jobs, summer, recruiter, sales, bartender, general business,  project management, hospitality, server, collections, bookkeeper, intern, management trainee, purchasing, full time, part time, bilingual, inventory, recruiter, counselor, travel, teaching, trainer, media, professional, trainee, data entry, internship, administration, new graduate, hostess, executive assistant, hostess, sales management, coordinator, cashier,  medical sales, distribution, financial, manager, sports, entertainment, international, consultant, real estate, telecommunications, general, retail, business, sports, entertainment, marketing, sports marketing, customer service",Entry Level Management - College Grads Welcome! Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time Employee,"Pittsburgh, PA 15220",Telecommunications Services Advertising and PR Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-management-college-grads-welcome!-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-172079311.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,Business/Strategic Management,6084e402ce5d12cc9b32a728e1fcb470
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:17:11:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Who We Are:As an emerging front-runner in the marketing and advertising industry, we are dedicated to helping our clients establish, build and manager their local market presence for specialized goods and services.  Through progressive campaigns managed by innovative executives, we see to expand our client’s vision and impact of the brand through continuous customer engagement and elevation of the brand experience.  The past year has been once of tremendous growth, and now we are seeking new top talent as we roll out or next wave of extraordinary campaigns. The Role:The Assistant Operations Manager Trainee will follow the Management Development Program in order to gain an overall understanding of the industry, our business and the operations functions of the firm.  This dynamic role will initially be responsible for learning the key components of our product knowledge, business and communications techniques, and cross train with all team members.  As the individual gains experience and expertise in the role, he or she would be expected to increase personal impact on the assigned campaign. The main purpose of the Management Development Program is to prepare an individual to take a lead role in location management upon completion in the first year. All Assistant Operations Managers are leaders, trainers, and customer service specialists.  They value their team members and are expert collaborators in managing marketing promotions and brand experiences for consumers.  Key Responsibilities:Assist in the development of marketing and sales strategies to achieve defined business objectives and leverage global brand positioning and solidify the company's superiority through our customers Partner with marketing team to deliver compelling in-person marketing programs that drive salesWork closely with Market Managers, and Sales to develop Go To Market Strategy for existing and new customer service initiatives to drive sales Responsible for management and monitoring of marketing budget and initiatives execution and metrics Create and Align all customer communication, presentations, and collateral. Train and educate Sales Team on how to deploy to join in customer presentations.Proactively create selling opportunities based on Seasonality and Roll OutsRequirementsPreferred Qualifications:Strong communications (verbal and written); and excellent customer service skillsSuccessful candidate should have Bachelor’s degree1-2 years in customer service, sales, or marketingMust have win/win attitude with high-energy leadership abilitiesAbility to analyze data and follow through on action plansDemonstrated ability to embrace and/or facilitate change.Experience with AS400 a plus.Ability to assume additional responsibilities including people management after successful performance in the Operations Management Trainee position.Occasional overnight travel required; ability to independently travel as needed, without restriction, by all modes of transportation, including car, plane, or train for training or meetings.Ability to relocate preferred.",Assistant Operations Manager Trainee - Entry Level Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time , Employee","Philadelphia, PA 19115",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-operations-manager-trainee-entry-level-job-philadelphia-pa-us-172086332.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=1,,Business/Strategic Management,14ed9182b0bb0629b5de2d4c86fcca01
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:17:44:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Major Manufacturing Company based in Bergen County is seeking a Logistics Manager to join their team.. The right candidate must have 5 + years experience in ensuring  that materials, goods, and labor are delivered in good order at an optimum time and cost, this professional must be from a manufacturing environment and able to travel both international and domestically. If this is the right match, please contact us immediately.",Logistics Job in Paramus,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Paramus, NJ 07652",,http://jobview.monster.com/logistics-job-paramus-nj-us-172004228.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=6,,Business/Strategic Management,ed3e0eee0d2ee05147a19e94f96cd03f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:17:45:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:DESCRIPTION:? Monitors and evaluates, via a variety of call recording and scoring tools, the quality and content of inbound and/or outbound telephone calls and provides feedback.? Provides continual feedback and information data to management for improvement of call handling skills across multiple products and clients. Maintains thorough and complete performance service level reports, provides QC reports weekly and monthly, provides updates to the operations team, and maintains and verifies the consistency of quality standards. Conduct monthly audit processes to remain compliant ? language line/Florida Relay.? Coordinates call calibration for Team Leads, Supervisors, and Managers once a month or bi-monthly. Assist Sales Managers or Team Leads in providing real time coaching.? Assist with creating, defining and implementing areas of opportunity for continual refresher training throughout the call center.? Position also involves assisting with creating and presenting training materials in a one-on-one and/or classroom style setting to new and existing employees. ? Perform other duties as assigned REQUIREMENTS:? Communication skills are critical. Candidate must be able to effectively and appropriately read, write, and speak English and Spanish. Must be able to handle multiple tasks while working independently, without direct supervision ? Position involves the ability to work at a desk while using a telephone/headset and computer to talk and correspond with employees, Management, corporate contacts as well as customers and clients. ? Must possess strong analytical, organizational, and time-management skills. ? Must be able to maintain a very high level of confidentiality and professionalism in working with both new and existing staff. ? Computer fluency is required, including knowledge of call center software, Microsoft Office and the Internet is essential. ? Must possess a strong desire to provide superior customer experience ? Knowledge of product or client compliance procedures We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1070988 Years of Experience Required:",Quality Analyst needed - Job in Jacksonville,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Jacksonville, FL 32202",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-analyst-needed-job-jacksonville-fl-us-172013505.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),31921dd683ba035c90445291b40f170f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:18:04:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"the brands of everyday life.™ # Retail Store Manager **Job Summary:** As a Retail Store Manager, you will be responsible for the management and leadership of a Yankee Candle Store; overseeing and driving daily sales performance; maintain service and operational standards; supervising, coaching, counseling and training staff on sales program; ensuring adequate staffing; providing superior customer service; maintaining store facilities; ensuring safety and security for guests and staff; preparing cash reports and merchandise orders; and other similar duties pertaining to the management of a retail store. # Scope: The Retail Store Manager provides direction and leadership to a Yankee Candle Retail Store; drives sales & profitability; provides exemplary guest service, ensures visual merchandising/presentation and operational standards; recruits, staffs, coaches and develops store management teams and sales associates as a part of our Succession Plan; meets or exceeds divisional and store sales and profitability goals. # Minimum Requirements: + 3+ years; supervisory/management experience in a retail sales environment or similar fast paced, customer service environment, preferred. + Previous experience in a retail sales environment with increasing levels of responsibility and strong working knowledge of general retail practices and procedures. + Demonstrated ability to effectively lead/direct, coach and train others in a retail setting, and the ability to relate well using communication, interpersonal, diplomacy and related skills required. + Experience in a specialty retail environment required. # Hours: Flexibility in work schedule is required including the ability to work extended hours, weekends, and holidays as operational need may require. # Salary Structure: This position offers a competitive salary & excellent benefits package. # We are an e-Verify employer. **The Yankee Candle Company, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We provide all employees and applicants for employment with equal employment opportunities without regard to race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, citizenship, immigration status, marital status, military status, any covered veteran status, disability status, genetic information, caregiving responsibilities or any other basis prohibited by law.** # Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Disabled/Protected Veterans **About Yankee Candle** Yankee Candle is a leading designer, manufacturer, wholesaler and retailer of premium scented candles, based on sales. Yankee Candle participates in the $25 billion global candle and home fragrance market. Yankee Candle has a 46-year history of offering distinctive products and marketing them as affordable luxuries and consumable gifts. Yankee Candle sells its products through a North American wholesale customer network of approximately 35,000 store locations, a growing base of Yankee Candle owned and operated retail stores, direct mail catalogs, and its Internet website (www.yankeecandle.com). Outside of North America, Yankee Candle sells its products primarily through an international wholesale customer network of over 6,000 store locations and distributors covering over 50 countries on a combined basis. # About _Jarden Corporation_ Jarden Corporation is a leading provider of a diverse range of consumer products with a portfolio of over 120 trusted, quality brands sold globally. Jarden operates in three primary business segments through a number of well recognized brands, including: Outdoor Solutions: Abu Garcia®, Aero®, Berkley®, Campingaz® and Coleman®, ExOfficio®, Fenwick®, Gulp!®, Invicta®, K2®, Marker®, Marmot®, Mitchell®, Penn®, Rawlings®, Shakespeare®, Stearns®, Stren®, Trilene®, Volkl® and Zoot®; Consumer Solutions: Bionaire®, Breville®, Crock-Pot®, FoodSaver®, Health o meter®, Holmes®, Mr. Coffee®, Oster®, Patton®, Rival®, Seal-a-Meal®, Sunbeam®, VillaWare® and White Mountain®; and Branded Consumables: Ball®, Bee®, Bernardin®, Bicycle®, Billy Boy®, Crawford®, Diamond®, Dicon®, Fiona®, First Alert®, First Essentials®, Hoyle®, Kerr®, Lehigh®, Lifoam®, Lillo®, Loew Cornell®, Mapa®, NUK®, Pine Mountain®, Quickie®, Spontex® and Tigex®. Headquartered in Norwalk, CT, Jarden ranks #348 on the Fortune 500 and has over 25,000 employees worldwide. For further information about Jarden, please visit www.jarden.com Normal 0 false false false EN-US X-NONE X-NONE MON16 **COMPANY:** The Yankee Candle Company, Inc # Requisition Id: _107894_ # Location: _FL - Estero_",Mgr- Estero,Full Time Employee,"the brands of everyday life.™ # Retail Store Manager **Job Summary:** As a Retail Store Manager, you will be responsible for the management and leadership of a Yankee Candle Store; overseeing and driving daily sales performance; maintain service and operational standards; supervising, coaching, counseling and training staff on sales program; ensuring adequate staffing; providing superior customer service; maintaining store facilities; ensuring safety and security for guests and staff; preparing cash reports and merchandise orders; and other similar duties pertaining to the management of a retail store. # Scope: The Retail Store Manager provides direction and leadership to a Yankee Candle Retail Store; drives sales & profitability; provides exemplary guest service, ensures visual merchandising/presentation and operational standards; recruits, staffs, coaches and develops store management teams and sales associates as a part of our Succession Plan; meets or exceeds divisional and store sales and profitability goals. # Minimum Requirements: + 3+ years; supervisory/management experience in a retail sales environment or similar fast paced, customer service environment, preferred. + Previous experience in a retail sales environment with increasing levels of responsibility and strong working knowledge of general retail practices and procedures. + Demonstrated ability to effectively lead/direct, coach and train others in a retail setting, and the ability to relate well using communication, interpersonal, diplomacy and related skills required. + Experience in a specialty retail environment required. # Hours: Flexibility in work schedule is required including the ability to work extended hours, weekends, and holidays as operational need may require. # Salary Structure: This position offers a competitive salary & excellent benefits package. # We are an e-Verify employer. **The Yankee Candle Company, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We provide all employees and applicants for employment with equal employment opportunities without regard to race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, citizenship, immigration status, marital status, military status, any covered veteran status, disability status, genetic information, caregiving responsibilities or any other basis prohibited by law.** # Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Disabled/Protected Veterans **About Yankee Candle** Yankee Candle is a leading designer, manufacturer, wholesaler and retailer of premium scented candles, based on sales. Yankee Candle participates in the $25 billion global candle and home fragrance market. Yankee Candle has a 46-year history of offering distinctive products and marketing them as affordable luxuries and consumable gifts. Yankee Candle sells its products through a North American wholesale customer network of approximately 35,000 store locations, a growing base of Yankee Candle owned and operated retail stores, direct mail catalogs, and its Internet website (www.yankeecandle.com). Outside of North America, Yankee Candle sells its products primarily through an international wholesale customer network of over 6,000 store locations and distributors covering over 50 countries on a combined basis. # About _Jarden Corporation_ Jarden Corporation is a leading provider of a diverse range of consumer products with a portfolio of over 120 trusted, quality brands sold globally. Jarden operates in three primary business segments through a number of well recognized brands, including: Outdoor Solutions: Abu Garcia®, Aero®, Berkley®, Campingaz® and Coleman®, ExOfficio®, Fenwick®, Gulp!®, Invicta®, K2®, Marker®, Marmot®, Mitchell®, Penn®, Rawlings®, Shakespeare®, Stearns®, Stren®, Trilene®, Volkl® and Zoot®; Consumer Solutions: Bionaire®, Breville®, Crock-Pot®, FoodSaver®, Health o meter®, Holmes®, Mr. Coffee®, Oster®, Patton®, Rival®, Seal-a-Meal®, Sunbeam®, VillaWare® and White Mountain®; and Branded Consumables: Ball®, Bee®, Bernardin®, Bicycle®, Billy Boy®, Crawford®, Diamond®, Dicon®, Fiona®, First Alert®, First Essentials®, Hoyle®, Kerr®, Lehigh®, Lifoam®, Lillo®, Loew Cornell®, Mapa®, NUK®, Pine Mountain®, Quickie®, Spontex® and Tigex®. Headquartered in Norwalk, CT, Jarden ranks #348 on the Fortune 500 and has over 25,000 employees worldwide. For further information about Jarden, please visit www.jarden.com Normal 0 false false false EN-US X-NONE X-NONE MON16 **COMPANY:** The Yankee Candle Company, Inc # Requisition Id: _107894_ # Location: _FL - Estero_",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/0440-mgr-estero-fl-ft-job-estero-fl-us-172022195.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=4,,Business/Strategic Management,f5ca14d206bf257bbfde8bb961b86f6f
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:18:04:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ajilon is partnering with a Direct-to-Consumer company in searching for an Inventory Planner to join their growing team. This position is located in Mt. Prospect, IL. This is a highly analytical role and ideal for candidates with exposure to inventory and demand planning and ready to take the next step in becoming a Planner reporting to the Supply Chain Manager.  You will be responsible for the following: Demand planning and forecasting analysisInventory control and managementTrend analysis and set procurement plansCollaborate cross-departmentallyManage 2500-3500 SKUS  Ideal candidate would have the following: 1+ year of demand planning, supply chain planning, inventory planning, and forecasting experienceBachelor's degreeWork experience in an analytical role and comfortable with large volume number is a MUSTExperience with 2000 to 3000 SKUS  This is an exciting opportunity with a growing company with over 100 years of establishment. They have a collaborative, relaxed and lay back culture providing competitive compensation and amazing benefits including 401K, flexible work hours, multiple medical insurance options, and generous company gathering outings. Do not miss out on this amazing opportunity and apply TODAY by sending your resume to Leilani Hedstrom at leilani.hedstrom@ajilon.com ***Emailed resumes will take priority over online submissions.*** ",Inventory Planner Job in Mt. Prospect,Full Time Employee,"Mount Prospect, IL 60056",,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-planner-job-in-mt-prospect-il-job-mount-prospect-il-us-172061576.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=7,,Business/Strategic Management,ae797709c2fb3dc4ce3542626f199be2
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:18:15:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Manager Job in San Francisco, CA Do you want to join one of the fastest growing startups in San Francisco? Would you enjoy working for a technical recruiting department? Are you looking for a job opportunity that offers a casual work culture, three meals a day and a barista onsite? If you answered yes, then we have the perfect job for you. A startup in the SOMA area is hiring a high level Project Manager to start immediately. This full-time one year contract has the potential to become permanent. We are seeking an individual who can analyze and scope out projects in a timely manner. If your qualifications meet the description below, please send us your resume for immediate consideration. Job Responsibilities: Work closely with engineering and assist with candidate inventory Responsible for metric reports, improving job postings and supporting hiring needs  Assist with interview process and improve operations development Manage all task timelines, code projects and follow up with stakeholders  Qualifications: Minimum four years of people operations or recruiting experience Bachelor’s degree preferred but not requiredExcellent written and verbal communication skills is a must Proficient in Microsoft Office, Excel, Word and Google Docs Sequel experience is a plus!  Please apply below and submit your resume to Emily at emily.sheffield@ajilon.com with “Project Manager” in the subject line. Check out more opportunities on Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com",Project Manager Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94103",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-171429413.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=18,,Business/Strategic Management,0bb6f08b26a337fd473f4242d5d0532c
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:18:41:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Businesses everywhere are interested in outsourced marketing and sales but few are savvy enough to accomplish the job themselves. Outsourced marketing and sales is the standard, and our service is highly valued. We help Fortune 500 companies within the home improvement industry market new and inventive products business-to-consumer. We are the best in the industry at sales and marketing, which is why we represent such prestigious clients. That being said, endless growth and opportunity exists within our company.  We are looking for intelligent, hard working individuals! This is a chance for new candidates to learn firsthand about sales, marketing, advertising, and communications.  Surge Connections promotes solely from within, which grants unlimited growth and opportunity.    Position Benefits:Sales Commissions paid weekly:  we understand that within a sales industry it’s important to have money in your pocket.  We provide weekly paychecks with base and commission breakdowns. We believe wasted time is wasted opportunity.  Hands on Sales Training:  We offer daily sales seminars as well as hands on training. Sales gets a poor reputation since most organizations don't have the resources to train their employees efficiently. We value the development of our employees! As a society we believe that one must be well educated to perform at a high level within a professional environment. And, most importantly, we make sales education and sales training fun!Qualified Sales leads provided: Our sales management team agrees that cold calling is time consuming, difficult and draining. When our clients are hiring us to drive sales and market their product we request “hot leads."" Community Service: Our team believes that it is important to give back to the community. We have contributed time and monetary donations to numerous local charities and have made many other charitable contributions. Sales is the driving force of our business but our most important sale is giving back to the community that we have taken so much from.Travel Opportunities: We regularly offer many travel opportunities within the United States.   The primary focus of these trips is to learn about different cultures, educate employees at sales seminars, and have some well-deserved rest and relaxation.Time Management & Financial Management: Along with extensive sales seminars, our mentors offer time management and financial management courses. As our employees grow and develop within the company we want to make sure everyone is able to save for the future. Our extensive courses teach our employees firsthand how to save money for an early retirement.Team Building & Recreational Events: After hours we provide great networking events. Company karaoke nights and bowling nights occur weekly. We have a work hard play hard mentality.RequirementsQualifications & Experience:Motivation to be part of our Marketing & Sales Management Training ProgramExceptionally driven with a very strong work ethicExcellent communication skillsHave a strong desire to succeed and advance into managementHave a positive ""Solution Oriented"" attitudeAre competitive, sports mindedPossess an entrepreneurial spiritAre goal orientedHave a student mentalityPossess qualities of a natural leaderBachelor’s DegreeCustomer service or hospitality experienceRetail sales experienceExperience creating and delivering sales presentationsAthletic/sports experience",Entry Level Management Trainee - Immediate Hire Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL 60602",Advertising and PR Services Management Consulting Services Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-management-trainee-immediate-hire-job-chicago-il-us-172079014.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Business/Strategic Management,4b28a156b665b26042dad3b02096f69e
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:18:42:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Office Manager Job in San Francisco, CA Would you enjoy working for a trendy interior design company? Do you have accounting and onboarding experience? Are you a detail-oriented individual with exceptional communication skills? If you answered yes, then we have the job for you! A leading architectural company is hiring a full-time Office Manager in San Francisco, California. This long-term contract position offers training and the opportunity to work with an easy going innovative team. If your qualifications meet the description below, please send us your resume for immediate consideration. Job Responsibilities: Responsible for ADP payroll data, onboarding employees and administrative duties Manage weekly payroll and invoice tracking as needed Assist with answering phones, email responses and benefit inquires Support team with timesheets and outstanding balances Ad hoc duties as assigned  Qualifications: Minimum 3-5 years payroll and administrative experience  Bachelor’s Degree strongly preferred but not requiredExcellent written and verbal communication skillsProficient in Microsoft Office, Excel, Word, ADP and QuickBooks Experience with CRM software is a plus!  Please apply below and submit your resume to Ariane at ariane.wesemael@ajilon.com with “Office Manager” in the subject line. Check out more opportunities on Ajilon Professional Staffing‘s website at www.ajilon.com.  ;",Office Manager Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94111",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-171808033.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=13,,Business/Strategic Management,d161d27bab36735f0a56ec437213baeb
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:18:43:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales/Project Manager/Estimator Northeast Ohio DKI is looking for an experienced Restoration Sales/Project Manager. The successful candidate will have the necessary skills and professionalism to drive sales, close sales, manage the project according to the set scope, and complete an estimate. Must be attentive to detail and must have: strong sales and management skills; working knowledge of residential and commercial mitigation and repairs; be available after hours and weekends for emergency services, be able to scope residential and commercial losses due to water, mold, fire and other insurance associated losses. This individual must be a team player who takes feedback constructively and must be able to communicate clearly, concisely and personably. Experience with restoration estimating software a plus. Send resume to Human Resources, P.O. Box 1003, Ravenna, OH 44266. Source: Akron Beacon Journal",Sales/Project Manager/Estimator Job in Ravenna,Full Time,"Ravenna, OH 44266",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-project-manager-estimator-job-ravenna-oh-us-172078715.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b15b67a82c40eacdaa93e0fbf4141272
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:19:42:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job WE ARE HIRING 4-5 SAVANNAH/POOLER AND 2-3 BLUFFTON/HILTON HEAD/BEAUFORT FULL-TIME EMPLOYEES IMMEDIATELY - THIS IS A SALARY TYPE COMPENSATION POSITION - NOT HOURLY!APPLY VIA MONSTER, FAX YOUR RESUME TO 855.422.2326 OR BRING YOUR RESUME TO OUR POOLER SUPER CENTER - ON POOLER PARKWAY IN FRONT OF POOLER STADIUM CINEMA 12 - ADJACENT TO MELLOW MUSHROOM AND STARBUCKSTHE AVERAGE STORE MANAGER COMPENSATION IN THIS MARKET EXCEEDS $70K/YRMattress Firm has grown to become the largest specialty bedding retailer in the world with billions in revenue and nearly 4,000 retail locations within our national family of stores. As big as we are, we are not done growing yet! We have an aggressive expansion plan and are looking for passionate and dedicated individuals to join our Sales Manager in Training Program.  You may be thinking, “I don’t know the first thing about mattresses, other than I sleep on one!”  Our answer to that is—that’s okay!  Even with very limited sales or management experience or various core you studied in college, you can rest assured that with our Sales Manager in Training Program, Mattress Firm will provide you with the tools you need to improve lives one night at a time. In addition to an extensive four to six week paid training program, Mattress Firm will provide you a career path that will keep this from being just a stop on your resume. If you act quickly you will receive training from one of the premier Store Mangers in our national fleet - Becky at Pooler!  We also have a limited time left with the Mattress Industry's Greatest Coach - Gary!  He is the former CEO of Mattress Firm and has recently retired as the CEO of Serta Bedding (Chicago) and Simmons Bedding (Atlanta).  With the help of Becky, Gary and our entire team - this is the best opportunity ever to see what Mattress Firm can do for your career growth!  We need those who will commit to providing our guests the best experience in the industry!  We've even brought in Terry (from Mattress Firm Corporate in TX) who is the considered the most experienced & popular Warehouse Manager in the nation! Terry and his Assistant Jared are committed to helping our local team make the fulfillment process the best in the biz for our valued customers.  The minimum compensation begins at  $26,400 SALARY BASED NOT HOURLY - the day you begin training and the average annual compensation for store sales managers in this market has been $48 to $72k.  We have had 8 store managers in our local 7 franchise stores earn in excess of $80k annually with 4 of them regularly earning $100k or more.   We are proud to have one of the top Producers out of 4,000 national stores leading up our South Carolina Stores, and his name is Chase!  Think you've got the right stuff - come and roll up your sleeves with Becky or Chase and let's put a razor's edge on your sleep guidance skills.  The right candidates will achieve superior compensation for helping Mattress Firm Guests get the best sleep experience possible!We need 4-5 full time hires for the Savannah/Pooler area and 2-3 for the Beaufort/Bluffton/Hilton Head Area.At Mattress Firm, we promote from within, reward success and foster a culture of fun and friendship. There has never been a better time to see what Mattress Firm can mean to you! Sales Manager (Sales Manager in Training)We are immediately hiring 4-5 candidates for our 5 Savannah/Pooler Locations and 2-3 for Bluffton/Beaufort/Hilton Head Store LocationsJob Responsibilities - As a Sales Manager, you have the opportunity to explore your entrepreneurial side as you are provided the opportunity to lead a multi-million dollar specialty furniture store.Job RequirementsCandidates should possess superior communication and customer service skills. Ideal Sales Managers will have experience with inside sales, marketing, and business development.Results DrivenService OrientedStrong fit within organization’s cultureFast thinker with high self- motivationDemonstrates honesty and integrityEducation/Experience - High School Graduate or equivalent (Bachelor's Preferred) or appropriate Sales, Military or Retail Experience Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","WE ARE HIRING 4-5 SAVANNAH/POOLER AND 2-3 BLUFFTON/HILTON HEAD/BEAUFORT FULL-TIME EMPLOYEES IMMEDIATELY - THIS IS A SALARY TYPE COMPENSATION POSITION - NOT HOURLY!APPLY VIA MONSTER, FAX YOUR RESUME TO 855.422.2326 OR BRING YOUR RESUME TO OUR POOLER SUPER CENTER - ON POOLER PARKWAY IN FRONT OF POOLER STADIUM CINEMA 12 - ADJACENT TO MELLOW MUSHROOM AND STARBUCKSTHE AVERAGE STORE MANAGER COMPENSATION IN THIS MARKET EXCEEDS $70K/YRMattress Firm has grown to become the largest specialty bedding retailer in the world with billions in revenue and nearly 4,000 retail locations within our national family of stores. As big as we are, we are not done growing yet! We have an aggressive expansion plan and are looking for passionate and dedicated individuals to join our Sales Manager in Training Program.  You may be thinking, “I don’t know the first thing about mattresses, other than I sleep on one!”  Our answer to that is—that’s okay!  Even with very limited sales or management experience or various core you studied in college, you can rest assured that with our Sales Manager in Training Program, Mattress Firm will provide you with the tools you need to improve lives one night at a time. In addition to an extensive four to six week paid training program, Mattress Firm will provide you a career path that will keep this from being just a stop on your resume. If you act quickly you will receive training from one of the premier Store Mangers in our national fleet - Becky at Pooler!  We also have a limited time left with the Mattress Industry's Greatest Coach - Gary!  He is the former CEO of Mattress Firm and has recently retired as the CEO of Serta Bedding (Chicago) and Simmons Bedding (Atlanta).  With the help of Becky, Gary and our entire team - this is the best opportunity ever to see what Mattress Firm can do for your career growth!  We need those who will commit to providing our guests the best experience in the industry!  We've even brought in Terry (from Mattress Firm Corporate in TX) who is the considered the most experienced & popular Warehouse Manager in the nation! Terry and his Assistant Jared are committed to helping our local team make the fulfillment process the best in the biz for our valued customers.  The minimum compensation begins at  $26,400 SALARY BASED NOT HOURLY - the day you begin training and the average annual compensation for store sales managers in this market has been $48 to $72k.  We have had 8 store managers in our local 7 franchise stores earn in excess of $80k annually with 4 of them regularly earning $100k or more.   We are proud to have one of the top Producers out of 4,000 national stores leading up our South Carolina Stores, and his name is Chase!  Think you've got the right stuff - come and roll up your sleeves with Becky or Chase and let's put a razor's edge on your sleep guidance skills.  The right candidates will achieve superior compensation for helping Mattress Firm Guests get the best sleep experience possible!We need 4-5 full time hires for the Savannah/Pooler area and 2-3 for the Beaufort/Bluffton/Hilton Head Area.At Mattress Firm, we promote from within, reward success and foster a culture of fun and friendship. There has never been a better time to see what Mattress Firm can mean to you! Sales Manager (Sales Manager in Training)We are immediately hiring 4-5 candidates for our 5 Savannah/Pooler Locations and 2-3 for Bluffton/Beaufort/Hilton Head Store LocationsJob Responsibilities - As a Sales Manager, you have the opportunity to explore your entrepreneurial side as you are provided the opportunity to lead a multi-million dollar specialty furniture store.Job RequirementsCandidates should possess superior communication and customer service skills. Ideal Sales Managers will have experience with inside sales, marketing, and business development.Results DrivenService OrientedStrong fit within organization’s cultureFast thinker with high self- motivationDemonstrates honesty and integrityEducation/Experience - High School Graduate or equivalent (Bachelor's Preferred) or appropriate Sales, Military or Retail Experience",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-manager-in-training-job-savannah-ga-us-163111885.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=12,,,d78f457d6ffbd6a6edaf8b935950e70b
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:19:43:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIRING – OPERATIONS MANAGERA Career That’s Meant to BeAt David’s Bridal, we empower our customers and our employees to stay true to their dreams and find the one, whether that means the wedding dress that matches her personal style—or the career that’s a perfect fit.We’re looking for leaders with diverse backgrounds and fresh ideas to help create a uniquely personal retail experience.Now Accepting Applications for Operations ManagerThe Operations Manager assists the Sales Manager in operating a David's Bridal retail store by focusing primarily on floor management, loss prevention issues, and other duties as necessary. In addition, the Operations Manager performs a Division of Responsibility assigned by the Store Manager and monitors sales performance over this division or a specific function, or both.Our most successful Operations Managers are self-motivated individuals with upbeat, outgoing personalities and excellent communication skills. They’re capable of serving our internal and external customers in a sincere, thoughtful, and encouraging way each and every time.If you would like to be part of a dynamic team; can manage, lead, inspire, and coach a sales oriented team in a positive professional environment, we would love to discuss your future at David’s Bridal.Principal Functions and Responsibilities:Support sales manager in floor management duties to ensure an A+ customer service experienceManage the day-to-day operations of the David’s Bridal store when the store manager and the sales manager are not in the store and become responsible for all store manager responsibilities and sales manager responsibilities for that shiftTrain Customer Service Representatives (CSRs) on flawless execution of welcome desk, customer service and cashiering responsibilities at the direction of the store managerLead the receiving functions and train CSRs in flawless execution of processDrive inventory management, MOS process, ship from store fulfillment and customer communication processesTrain CSRs to accurately prepare and process all incoming and outgoing shipments in accordance with David’s Bridal procedures, including a 100% response rate to Ship from Store requests within 24 hoursMaintain layaway organization and payment complianceSupports the store’s facility maintenance in accordance with David’s Bridal’s guidelines and under the direction of the store managerOther Duties and Responsibilities:Maintain and orders supplies as neededEnsure organization of the cash wrap and welcome desk areasEnsure integrity of the layaway process from beginning to endEnsure all price changes are processed timely and accurateAny other function which the store manager deems essential to the performance of this jobA comprehensive benefits package is available.Professional EnvironmentHealth/Dental/Vision InsuranceA 401K ProgramPaid Vacation & Paid Personal DaysPaid Sick Days & Paid HolidaysGenerous employee discount after 1st pay periodPet BenefitsCompetitive Salary Bonus OpportunityIf you are interested in working in our stores, please note that the online application process will take approximately 30 minutes.Now that we’ve popped the question, please say “I do”.<br />#CJT_jobBodyContent p {<br /> margin: 10px !important;<br /> min-height: 13px !important;<br />}<br />",Operations Manager Job in Colorado Springs,Full Time Employee,"Colorado Springs, CO 80920",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-manager-job-colorado-springs-co-us-172067397.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=9,,Business/Strategic Management,d908e0618976a123ff56c04c61074021
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:20:05:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: Grant Thornton’s Federal Audit Practice focuses on performing financial statement audits, performance audits, service provider audits, examinations and financial management consulting services related to audit readiness and compliance engagements for the Federal Government.  Grant Thornton is continuing to expand its thriving Audit and Assurance practice and is seeking Senior Audit Associates to join its Alexandria Federal Audit practice. Responsibilities: ·         Plan and execute the day-to-day activities of a financial statement audit engagement. ·         Review work performed by other staff and interacting with the Manager on client and team matters on a daily basis. ·         Assist with business development activities, such as proposals, account teams, whitepapers, and/or other thought leadership materials. Qualifications: ·  Prior federal audit experience is desired. ·  Must have at least three years of applicable experience, such as CFO Act Audits, A-123 internal control assessments and federal attestation engagements. ·  Eligible to sit for the CPA. ·  Ability to work in the United States indefinitely. ·  Ability to lead and mentor junior staff members. ·  Ability to travel as necessary. Grant Thornton LLP is the U.S. member firm of Grant Thornton International, one of the six global accounting, tax and business advisory organizations. Grant Thornton’s Global Public Sector, based in Alexandria, VA, is a global management consulting business with the mission of providing responsive and innovative financial, performance management and systems solutions to governments and international organizations. Visit Grant Thornton’s Global Public Sector at www.grantthornton.com/publicsector.  It is Grant Thornton’s policy to promote equal employment opportunities.  All personnel decisions, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, training, promotion, compensation, benefits and termination, are made without regard to race, creed, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, citizenship status, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.",Federal Senior Audit Associate Job in Alexandria,,"Alexandria, VA 22314",,http://jobview.monster.com/federal-senior-audit-associate-job-alexandria-va-us-172002733.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=1,,,ce1052d0834f7d61255f12b304bd71ea
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:20:42:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are looking for a challenging career in a fast paced industry, we are currently hiring for a National Account Representative job in the Akron, OH area.  In order to be considered for this position, you will have at least two years of relevant experience.   Ideally working in the construction industry.    National Account Representative job responsibilities are:- Set-up contracts for assigned customers and execute all functions related to the contract- Will review and pre-edit orders to be submitted to the National Account group- Set-up and maintain all master data records for customers processed - Will exceed customer expectations through delivery performance, responsiveness, communication and order management- Will manage a group of national accounts- Will perform general office support functions as required Qualifications:- High school diploma or higher educational degree required- Must have at least two years of customer service experience, ideally in the construction industry- Must have experience with handling contracts- Intermediate level knowledge of Microsoft Excel and Word- Strong communication skills both written and verbal  If you are interested in hearing more about the National Account Representative job in the Akron, OH area, please click apply below or apply online at www.ajilon.com.",National Account Representative Job in Barberton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Barberton, OH 44203",,http://jobview.monster.com/national-account-representative-job-barberton-oh-us-172055980.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Business/Strategic Management,b7f0682fd17cc4b0e7839f87548cc4c6
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:20:43:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking to start your career in Retail Management? Our Selling Supervisor role is the perfect place to begin! Join our management team of retail experts who share their knowledge of the latest trends, assist customers with selections, and merchandise new product as it arrives. Our Selling Supervisors lead one or more selling areas to achieve store’s sales and profit objectives. They are also responsible for coaching their team to offer customers a “Customer First” experience. Recent successful hires have worked at Kohl's, Macy's, JCPenney, Sears and other similar stores. We’ll value your: Related retail sales experience Strong leadership and merchandising skills Ability to maintain high visibility on the selling floor Desire to grow within the company    This position is compensated at a competitive hourly rate. Schedules include a variety of day, evening and weekend hours. At Bon-Ton, we want to give back to our associates. We offer competitive pay, great associate discount, 401k plan (once eligible) – including potential company match and great volunteer opportunities. ",Selling Supervisor Job in Janesville,Full Time Employee,"Janesville, WI",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/selling-supervisor-job-janesville-wi-us-172016970.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=15,,Business/Strategic Management,1924661d395ce62dd80400117bdab537
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:21:42:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Growing startup company is looking for an IT Support individual to: ?Working knowledge of help desk software, databases and remote control?Strong client-facing and communication skills?Advanced troubleshooting and multi-tasking skills Bilingual is a Plus !!!Our company offers free Friday lunches along with bonus incentives. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1071599 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Help Desk/IT Support - Paying up to $,Full Time Employee,"Glendale, CA 91204",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/help-desk-it-support-paying-up-to-45-000-job-glendale-ca-us-172069996.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b63dabac1bddf9e3a6ad37dda1366e16
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:21:42:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Corporate Strategy & Development Planning Intern About The Company:  COMAC America Corporation is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Commercial Aircraft Corporation of China, Ltd(COMAC). COMAC is the main vehicle to implement large passenger aircraft projects in China. The American subsidiary serves as a platform for internationalization and mainly provides aviation engineering consulting service.  Job Title:Corporate Strategy & Development Planning Intern Job Description: Managing the Development Planning Portfolio:·     Coordinate across functions for compiling and producing the development planning document portfolio, coordinate with COMAC HQ colleagues for reporting and delivery (monthly, semi-annual, and annual work reports, presentations, strategy documents, etc.) ·     Update company-wide introduction presentations for client/supplier/partner meetings, internal reporting, and etc.  Corporate Strategy & Partnership:·     Assist in engaging meaningful analytical tools to produce input for decision-making on company-wide strategic initiatives; Assist in researching and composing relevant thematic reports/presentations as required.·     Assist in managing existing corporate-wide external partnership, including monitoring contract implementation, review and re-negotiation. ·     Perform analysis and assist in identifying and developing new partnerships. Operational/Administrative: ·     Assist in analyzing and establishing good practices and procedures that improve operational efficiency and updating departmental work manual. ·     Assist in team expansion and department development.·     Provide assistance in company-wide supplier or partnership engagement event.   Qualifications: Current student or recent graduate from four-year college. Fluent in Mandarin (written required). Proficient in office applications, proficiency in other statistical/analytical software a plus. Quick learner, ability to adapt quickly to a multi-cultural environment. Results-oriented with ability to multi-task under tight deadlines. Willing to take on additional responsibilities and challenges.Proactive team player, collaborative and constructive in group communication.  Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail. Polished and professional appearance and demeanor at all times.COMAC America Corporation does not provide any type of work-related visa sponsorship for this position.COMAC America Corporation is an “Equal Employment Opportunity Employer” At the time of hire, you will be required to provide genuine documentation establishing your identity and eligibility to be legally employed in the United States. COMAC America Corporation employs only individuals who are legally eligible to work in the United States.COMAC America Corporation offers competitive salary.",Corporate Strategy & Development Planning Intern Job in Newport Beach,Full Time Employee,"Newport Beach, CA 92660",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-strategy-development-planning-intern-job-newport-beach-ca-us-172062741.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=1,,Business/Strategic Management,5729b5e02bb8e14b535bea56c283d82a
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:22:30:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse Supervisor Job-Somerset, NJResponsibilities: • All aspects of shipping finished goods and receiving raw materials including paperwork accuracy, freight scheduling • Inventory movement and Lot control• Warehouse organization and design• Staff training, supervision and scheduling• Warehouse maintenance and safety including forklift, dock doors/levelers, indoor and outdoor cleanliness; • Data entry• Inter-departmental communication• Audit participation• On-going development of areas of improvement  Skill/Qualifications:• Communication with staff and managers• Supervisory and safety management • Computer including MS Outlook, MS Word, MS Excel• Materials/Warehouse Organization• Able to work in a fast paced environment• Bi-lingual a plus• Experience preferred For immediate consideration, please send resumes to curtis.mcneally@ajilon.com",Warehouse Supervisor Job-Somerset,Full Time Employee,"Somerset, NJ 08873",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-supervisor-job-somerset-nj-job-somerset-nj-us-172061181.aspx?mescoid=1100025001001&jobPosition=8,,Business/Strategic Management,8b522a8ee705cd34a04cfa39148ae607
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:22:40:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Director and Operations Counsel, Kindred at Home ( Job Number: 285162 ) Description We are recruiting for a Senior Director and Operations Counsel, Kindred at Home, to join our Law Department in Louisville, KY. Summary: Provides general legal counsel and advice to management and operations personnel of the Kindred at Home Division. Essential Functions: Advises on regulatory compliance, risk management, licensing, survey and accreditation issues. Advises on fraud and abuse laws, False Claims Act, Stark Act, anti-kickback statues, government reimbursement rules and related or similar state laws. Manages internal and external investigations including, allegations of improper billing, reportable incidents involving suspected patient abuse, neglect and/or misappropriation and potential civil or criminal law violations. Identifies legal risks and develops compliance and loss control techniques and recommendations. Manages outside counsel in the handling of litigation of regulatory appeals, civil monetary penalties, administrative fines, professional licensure actions and various civil and criminal investigations. Works with Contract Administration team to review and provide legal analysis regarding a variety of healthcare provider agreements. Provides general commercial legal advice. Provides education and training on legal issues to regional, area, and branch managers and field operators. Develops special programs including resource tools for distribution to management and the field operators. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to triage and prioritize competing demands in a fast-paced, high-pressure environment Superior verbal communication, listening and counseling skills Competent writing, editing and negotiation skills Public speaking skills Computer literacy Legal research skills Knowledge of health care laws and related regulatory issues Approximate percent of time required to travel:   10-20% #MON-CORP Qualifications Education: Juris Doctor degree Licenses/Certification: Admission to State Bar Experience: 6+ years experience providing legal advice to health care practitioners and/or health care related entities. Knowledge of federal and state laws including Medicare, Medicaid and reimbursement rules is desirable. Litigation experience is a plus. Experience providing prospective legal advice to management and operations personnel is preferable, particularly home health, hospice, and community care providers. Depending on candidate’s qualifications, this position may be filled at a different level.  If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee/font>. Job : Legal Primary Location : KY-Louisville-Kindred Healthcare Organization : 4699 - Kindred Healthcare Shift : Day",Senior Director and Operations Counsel,"Full Time, Employee","Senior Director and Operations Counsel, Kindred at Home ( Job Number: 285162 ) Description We are recruiting for a Senior Director and Operations Counsel, Kindred at Home, to join our Law Department in Louisville, KY. Summary: Provides general legal counsel and advice to management and operations personnel of the Kindred at Home Division. Essential Functions: Advises on regulatory compliance, risk management, licensing, survey and accreditation issues. Advises on fraud and abuse laws, False Claims Act, Stark Act, anti-kickback statues, government reimbursement rules and related or similar state laws. Manages internal and external investigations including, allegations of improper billing, reportable incidents involving suspected patient abuse, neglect and/or misappropriation and potential civil or criminal law violations. Identifies legal risks and develops compliance and loss control techniques and recommendations. Manages outside counsel in the handling of litigation of regulatory appeals, civil monetary penalties, administrative fines, professional licensure actions and various civil and criminal investigations. Works with Contract Administration team to review and provide legal analysis regarding a variety of healthcare provider agreements. Provides general commercial legal advice. Provides education and training on legal issues to regional, area, and branch managers and field operators. Develops special programs including resource tools for distribution to management and the field operators. Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: Ability to triage and prioritize competing demands in a fast-paced, high-pressure environment Superior verbal communication, listening and counseling skills Competent writing, editing and negotiation skills Public speaking skills Computer literacy Legal research skills Knowledge of health care laws and related regulatory issues Approximate percent of time required to travel:   10-20% #MON-CORP Qualifications Education: Juris Doctor degree Licenses/Certification: Admission to State Bar Experience: 6+ years experience providing legal advice to health care practitioners and/or health care related entities. Knowledge of federal and state laws including Medicare, Medicaid and reimbursement rules is desirable. Litigation experience is a plus. Experience providing prospective legal advice to management and operations personnel is preferable, particularly home health, hospice, and community care providers. Depending on candidate’s qualifications, this position may be filled at a different level.  If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee/font>. Job : Legal Primary Location : KY-Louisville-Kindred Healthcare Organization : 4699 - Kindred Healthcare Shift : Day",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-director-operations-counsel-kindred-at-home-job-louisville-ky-us-171990684.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=2,,Business/Strategic Management,e93ed3040b18c2a40d161fd078c0d9ca
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:22:40:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: TellerJob ID Number: 5269311-1Location: Orem,UTJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. Tellers are the face of our company and represent Wells Fargo in the community. A Teller position with our team offers an opportunity to be part of one of America s greatest companies. You'll have exposure to a variety of responsibilities, people and experiences in a professional work environment - that's part of the fun! We value what’s right for our customers in everything we do. Everything we do, we do to protect the customer and the bank. Our teller’s role is to warmly welcome customers to our store, efficiently process the customer’s request, and build trust that Wells Fargo can help them with all of their financial needs. We want them to know about all of our innovative services, financial education information, as well as take advantage of the relationships we provide as Wells Fargo team members. Every teller is part of a team that is rated first, and most importantly, on the customers’ experience with the teams’ service. Every teller has her/his own scorecard with performance goals. Our best tellers constantly go the extra mile to greet customers and provide exceptional customer service, make them feel welcome and also engage them to learn about their financial goals. Reliable attendance is essential for success in this role. Your exciting role includes: Going the extra mile to greet customers, show them that we care, and make them feel welcome Asking questions to learn about their financial needs and, when the customer sees the value, introducing them to other Wells Fargo team members. Setting performance goals and working with your manager to increase your customer advocacy effectiveness through feedback and coaching Processing between 20-25 customer transactions each hour with no mistakes through patience, attention to detail, and the ability to follow procedures. Accurately maintaining and balancing a cash drawer. Delivering upon customer needs for products such as safe deposit boxes, merchant/vault, ATM processing, bonds and coupons, foreign currency and night drop. A happy, satisfied customer starts with you! At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others without being asked. We want team members who are committed to the success of the team. Tellers develop and improve their skills through training programs and regular feedback discussions with supervisors, to help them improve in their current role and further their professional development. Many of our managers and senior leaders started their career as a teller. With an organization the size of Wells Fargo, there are multiple opportunities to learn and grow and explore career options over time. Our vision and values supports developing and engaging our team members. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 9AM - 5PM. The schedule(s) for this position is 20 hours and may change based on business need Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsCustomer service focus with the ability to stay positive in interactions with customers and team membersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience achieving individual and team goalsCash handling experienceExperience selling products and servicesExperience working in a fast-paced environment Other Desired Qualifications Multilingual speakers are encouraged to applyJob Expectations Ability to stand for extended periods of timeAbility to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduled Street Address UT-Orem: 1175 S State - Orem, UTDisclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Teller Job in Orem,Full Time Employee,"Orem, UT",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/teller-job-orem-ut-us-171284521.aspx?mescoid=4300704001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),52796e85eb0107ca74d81445a8af138d
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:22:40:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"QA Manager: The Quality Assurance (QA) Manager will be primarily based in Baghdad, Iraq, and serve the Life Support Services contract in support of the State Department. The QA Manager will be responsible for leadership of the quality program, decision making and management of work requirements, utilizing a skilled team in an environment that requires flexibility, adaptability, and responsiveness. This position will report to the Country / Program Manager in the management of multiple geographical sites and functions to support critical client mission activities of this contract. The additional duties and responsibilities listed below are representative of the nature and level of work assigned and are not necessarily all inclusive:Responsible for maintaining a safe workplace and ensuring that safety is the highest priority in the workplace.Comply with all Environmental Health & Safety and Quality Assurance requirements and goals. Provide information and materials to these divisions as necessary to ensure adequate and legal documentation.Manages and maintains Quality Management policies and procedures, the basis being ISO 9001:2008 Standard requirementsDefines inspection procedures for all areas of the program to include: Food Operations, Fire Protection Services, Airfield Operations, Logistics Support, and Security Services, as well as other functional areas listed in the Performance of Work StatementMaintains an audit schedule, and performs audits of procedures, reporting requirements, plans, programs and recordsQuality initiatives and requirements of the program, country-wide from the PMO for maintaining the QAM, developing and revising TO/Site level QCP's and required updates to QAM or QCP's as requiredRecords data and analyzes performance criteria, and reports on compliance to customer contract and QMS standards and requirementsTracks deficiencies and works with management to define corrective action plans and close out deficienciesCollects and analyzes data to determine trendsPrepares and provides reports to managementEnsures quality-related training is provided to PAE employeesImplements and maintains an effective management system for efficient operationsWorks closely with Functional Area Managers and DOS RepresentativesKey responsibilities on contract performance include adherence to company and DOS processes, regulations, and statutes, managing the people leadership of the organization to include direction of work assignments and staffing of positions with qualified personnel, interfacing with client's contracting office leadership, and achievement of key financial measuresAdditional tasks and special projects as assignedHome of Record Driver's License - no restrictions Qualifications: REQUIRED:Citizenship: US CitizenshipEducation: A high school diploma or equivalent education is required, Bachelor's degree in a related field, or fifteen years of related experience and/or educationExperience: Minimum of ten (10) years' experience in Quality Management, five (5) years' experience as a QCM, supporting a DOD or DOS program, at least two (2) years' of international experienceSecurity Vetting: Must possess an active DOD or DOS Secret security clearance, maintaining eligibility for the duration of the contract Medical: Favorable passage of a drug screen and physical examinationLanguage Skills: Expert professional, oral and written English communication skills, to present, facilitate and disseminate informationWork Ethic: Commitment to maintaining a high performance team which delivers customer service excellenceDESIRED:Department of State experienceFive to seven (5-7) years' of international experience in challenging locations, preferably working in the Middle East, with a working knowledge of customs and cultural differencesOTHER KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES:Knowledge of ALL principles and processes involved in Quality Control ManagementSuccessful management of multiple sites in geographically dispersed locationsAbility to collect, analyze and summarize data and to prepare clear and concise reportsExperience in effectively dealing with international and headquarters staff, and sensitivity to other culturesExercise sound judgment and make decisions independentlyExcellent organizational and time management skills, with the ability to handle multiple tasks and administrative details in a fast paced and constantly changing environmentExpert computer skills, specifically in Microsoft Word and ExcelMust have the ability to be innovative and be an agent for changeWillingness and ability to deploy to Iraq for extended periods is required. Position may be located in a war zone in an environment with harsh and dangerous working and living conditions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee may regularly be exposed to extreme and austere desert-like environment - temperatures can reach 120- 130 degrees Fahrenheit/50-55 degrees Celsius during the summer months. Must be willing and able to perform regular job requirements in this austere and extreme environment.Must be willing and able to perform physical activities including but not limited to heavy lifting and moving of items, parts, assemblies and equipment up to the safety regulation maximum; climbing in and out of equipment; crawling; and working outdoors. This includes being able to lift and carry 40 pounds of personal protective equipment for extended periods of time; and being capable of running and 'duck & cover' during emergencies without putting oneself or others at risk. Must successfully complete and pass the medical and dental examinations as required by PAE and our customer for deployment to Iraq. Must maintain physical and dental requirements for duration of deployment.Must be able to work a minimum of 6 days per week and 10 hours per day, some jobs have higher daily and weekly minimums.Must possess satisfactory English proficiency to meet job requirements and to adhere and comply with safety, health and security measures. We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. PAE is a drug free workplace.",QA Manager Job in Arlington,Full Time Employee,"Arlington, VA 22201",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureGovernment and MilitaryConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-manager-job-arlington-va-us-172064519.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=15,,Business/Strategic Management,d51118eb192c05a1fbfe9d96f8d3b58e
United States of America,US,31/Jul/2016:23:46:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is seeking to fill a Finance Coordinator job to assist with the logistics of their finance division in this busy Washington, DC office. If you have exceptional verbal and written communication skills with great attention to detail, then you do not want to pass up on this opportunity to work for a large fast-paced financial company. As a Finance Coordinator you will be responsible for:• Working with a team of finance professionals to assist with scheduling meetings and coordinating interviews• Calling clients to review invoicing and payments and working with our accounts payable department• Compiling reports that you will send directly to senior management for review Requirements: • 2-4 years’ experience with financial coordinating or as an accounting clerk in a large corporate office • BS degree in Finance or related • Advanced Excel skills• Great organizational skills and detail-oriented If you are interested in applying for this Finance Coordinator position, please apply online at www.accountingprincipals.com This might just be the opportunity you have been waiting for. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",Finance Coordinator Job in Washington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Washington, DC 20006",,http://jobview.monster.com/finance-coordinator-job-in-washington-dc-job-washington-dc-us-169825454.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=17,,Business/Strategic Management,2113f1414b808bf80dea0322dec53963
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:23:46:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Alliance Engineering, Ltd., is actively seeking a Civil Engineering Draftsman with some experience in Planning, Civil Engineering, Landscape Design, Water Resources, Land Development, Project Management, and/or Construction Management. A four (4) year civil engineering degree is required, as well as, EIT certification.The candidate must have a minimum of three (3) years experience in civil design, and be proficient with Autodesk Civil 3D 2014 or later software on Windows 8. The candidate must also be proficient in the tracking, development, and writing/pricing of proposals. The candidate will work out of AEL’s Westminster, CO office; however, since AEL provides services in various states, the candidate must be willing to travel if a particular job requires the candidate to do so.·  Four (4) year civil engineering degree; ·  Very experienced and proficient with Autodesk Civil 3D 2014or later software;·  EIT certification; ·  Three (3) years experience in civil design; ·  Proficient in the tracking, development, and writing/pricing of proposals; and, ·  Willing to travel if a particular job requires it.  Location: Westminster, ColoradoSalary: OpenType: Full Time - ExperiencedCategories: Civil - Design, Civil Engineering Alliance Engineering, Ltd. is a civil engineering, design, construction, and land development firm offering services for projects from conception through completion. With over 20+ years of experience in the market, we are able to provide a broad range of quality services, delivered consistently on time at competitive prices. We offer excellent plans and programs for employees. Employees are rewarded with a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package which may include: health benefits with coverage for families and domestic partners, vacation, retirement plans, paid holidays, tuition reimbursement, generous bonuses, and profit sharing. You can experience the excitement of our company-it's the difference between taking a job and starting a career.",Monster,,"Alliance Engineering, Ltd., is actively seeking a Civil Engineering Draftsman with some experience in Planning, Civil Engineering, Landscape Design, Water Resources, Land Development, Project Management, and/or Construction Management. A four (4) year civil engineering degree is required, as well as, EIT certification.The candidate must have a minimum of three (3) years experience in civil design, and be proficient with Autodesk Civil 3D 2014 or later software on Windows 8. The candidate must also be proficient in the tracking, development, and writing/pricing of proposals. The candidate will work out of AEL’s Westminster, CO office; however, since AEL provides services in various states, the candidate must be willing to travel if a particular job requires the candidate to do so.·  Four (4) year civil engineering degree; ·  Very experienced and proficient with Autodesk Civil 3D 2014or later software;·  EIT certification; ·  Three (3) years experience in civil design; ·  Proficient in the tracking, development, and writing/pricing of proposals; and, ·  Willing to travel if a particular job requires it.  Location: Westminster, ColoradoSalary: OpenType: Full Time - ExperiencedCategories: Civil - Design, Civil Engineering Alliance Engineering, Ltd. is a civil engineering, design, construction, and land development firm offering services for projects from conception through completion. With over 20+ years of experience in the market, we are able to provide a broad range of quality services, delivered consistently on time at competitive prices. We offer excellent plans and programs for employees. Employees are rewarded with a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package which may include: health benefits with coverage for families and domestic partners, vacation, retirement plans, paid holidays, tuition reimbursement, generous bonuses, and profit sharing. You can experience the excitement of our company-it's the difference between taking a job and starting a career.",,http://jobview.monster.com/cad-drafter-job-broomfield-co-us-167843335.aspx?mescoid=1700209001001&jobPosition=3,,,2937a9c85ab8eecf00343bd40a0ee0d4
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:23:45:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Health & Welfare Business Analyst - Interface Management Team at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/5/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: At least 5 year(s) Date Posted: 6/5/2016 The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson.The BusinessOur Technology and Administration Solutions business provides benefits administration and outsourcing solutions to many of the world’s leading organizations. Our purpose is to help our clients’ employees realize the full potential of their benefits; helping them be happier, healthier and more secure.Awards & Recognition: The International Association of Outsourcing Professionals (IAOP) has named Willis Towers Watson a leader on the Global Outsourcing 100 since 2011. Everest Research named Willis Towers Watson a Star Performer in the Leaders category in 2014, and has recognized Willis Towers Watson as an industry leader since 2010. Fortune magazine ranked Willis Towers Watson number one in the diversified outsourcing industry on its annual World’s Most Admired Companies list in 2015. Willis Towers Watson has been listed on Fortune magazine’s World’s Most Admired Companies list since 2012. The RoleAs an EDI Business Analyst working with Interface Management Team (IMT) you will serve a key role for our outsourcing business by serving as the link between external clients and vendors, and our internal team of business analysts. You will contribute to the implementation of new services, and ongoing business ensuring file transfers between all parties are running, loading, and transferring according to specified requirements. You will also consult to clients concerning file transfer best practices, provide ongoing technical support, and train client teams.Note that this role will involve some travel to client sites and other Willis Towers Watson offices. A Few Select Responsibilities: Ensure that all Electronic Delivery Interchanges (EDI) adheres to standards; communicate back to base team suggestions for changes or enhancements to standard file exchanges Work with vendor file manager, electronic file manager, and standard health carrier layouts Work with carriers and vendors to ensure HIPPA compliant data transmissions Responsible for developing file requirements documentation. Responsible for creating test plans, and testing system changes and enhancements to ensure completeness and accuracy. Regression testing as necessary based on the nature of the system change/enhancement. Identify reporting needs and requirements. Understand SOW and be responsible for change order identification and assist with providing work and hours necessary to draft the change order. Work closely with client team to ensure project requirements/requests for changes are understood and within standards. Provide guidance to other team members regarding best/standard practices. Provide guidance/assistance to team members where needed to help ensure issues are resolved by assigned due date. Escalate concerns with ability to meet due dates to PM. Maintain and update all requirements documents, ensuring adherence to standards. Research issues and cases to determine root cause and provide impact analysis for ongoing issues and changes and requests for new functionality. Responsible for any carrier file updates and roll backs that may be needed because of an issue not related to carriers.",Health & Welfare Business Analyst  - Interface Management Team at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/health-welfare-business-analyst-interface-management-team-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838004.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),834324f4c573914d69d5cf3ae6ef25fd
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:23:37:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is looking for an Oracle Developer. Please email Josh Freidus at Jfreidus@judge.com for more details.W2 Only - NO C2C or Third PartiesIn this role you will be working with a team of Developers, Engineering and Production Support on the design, development, implementation and on-going support of Oracle based applications in a high growth area of the Banking Technology. This position will play an integral part in project delivery given tight constraints but uncompromising quality for multiple applications and must complete tasks within schedule. You will work with the application project teams to size database efforts, Create and design database tables, design appropriate database objects and satisfy user performance expectations. The ability to develop productive business relationships with internal team members through cooperation, courtesy, and professionalism is an integral part of this position.6-10 years in comparable position Develop new systems or maintain and enhance existing systems. Microsoft Products: VB or ASP, SQL. UNIX Platform: C, Unix Scripting, Perl, SQL, JavaScript, HTML.",Oracle Developer Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/oracle-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168718726.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,075174110784316ad22948af200c8bf7
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:22:21:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer, Fire Response $10.95/hr +--$ Area 3134BR Tennessee 615-331-5201 Job Description Are you on a Volunteer Fire Department and need full-time work? Are you a retired firefighter who is not ready for retirement? Are you a firefighter who needs to work a few extra hours to make ends meet?   Whelan Security has openings inside a local manufacturer for Fire Brigade positions. Officers on our fire brigades are often called in as first responders to emergencies inside the facilities while the Police, Ambulance or Fire Department are on their way or in lieu of needing to call for other assistance. When the fire brigade is not in action on an emergency, they conduct fire inspections, check equipment, and work as security officers to ensure the people and property are protected. Do you have what it takes to do this job? Qualifications Candidates must meet the following expectations: HS diploma or GED 21 years or older Be able to pass a physical agility test Pass an extensive background check required to get a TN State security license Pass aptitude, behavioral and interview screenings for all Whelan employees Education Must have a HS Diploma or GED, if going directly into the Fire Brigade; some fire training (military or civilian) is preferred.  Decherd, TN 37167",Security Officer,Full Time Employee,TN,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-fire-response-10-95-hr-area-job-tn-us-168941370.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=8,,Security/Protective Services,8f57faef0e48b75385dff0b22c4baaec
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:21:48:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Don't look at another job until you check out The Master's Touch. The Master’s Touch has helped over 1,100 people in 11 countries start their own business in a 19 Billion a Year Industry! Will you be next? No experience necessary, we finance, provide complete hands-on training and lifetime technical support. We invented and patented the very first hard surface restoration system utilizing an extractor mechanism back in 2000. This device enables you to clean hard surfaces 10 times faster and 10 times easier than traditional cleaning methods. Find out today why so many people are considering starting their own business with The Master’s Touch as opposed to getting another job. This breakthrough has literally unleashed a business opportunity for people like you to capitalize on the huge tile and hard surface-cleaning trend that has been sweeping the country. We have been putting people in business now for over a decade. Are you ready to take control of your financial future? Click the apply button now to learn more. There is no shortage of customers; everywhere you go there is an opportunity for business. Restaurants, office buildings, malls, stores, schools, gyms, residential homes, apartment buildings... the list is endless! Watch our business presentation and listen to some of our business owners stories. We provide a complete turnkey business system based on our patented technology so you can be in business in less than thirty days. What is unique about this business is that unlike a franchise, there are no ongoing royalties to pay, low start-up investment and you still receive lifetime support at no additional cost! We also provide 5 days of hands-on training to get you started the right way! Our online video presentation will give you a complete overview, just click the apply button below now to see it now, what have you got to lose?",General Manager,,Owning your own business has never been this easy!,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/general-manager-sales-manager-sales-owner-operator-job-dallas-tx-us-151134719.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=10,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e0c43d7547086eae07d31044737199c8
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:21:43:18,No,jobs.monster.com,SNI Companies is seeking a Night-Time Help Desk candidate who will be responsible for competing in a fast paced dynamic environment and providing first-class service via Tier 1 & 2 technical support. The Night-Time Help Desk candidate will be responsible for troubleshooting IT tickets and monitoring support incidents. The Night-Time Help Desk will provide assistance for Windows maintenance. The Night-Time Help Desk candidate will provide top-shelf Customer Service to both company clients and internal staff.,Night-Time Help Desk Job in Cherry Hills Village,Full Time,"Cherry Hills Village, CO",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/night-time-help-desk-job-cherry-hills-village-co-us-168860438.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=19,,,f70909c21ef1a5f56c143d4c9936e81c
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:21:43:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have an eye for detail, have an interest in the area of loss prevention and safety and have leadership skills? If so join our Loss Prevention team! Our Senior Loss Prevention Associate work with the Regional Loss Prevention team and Store Management to improve internal shortage controls, reduce the opportunity for store losses, and ensure the safety of customers and associates. Associates implement and execute store shortage programs, shortage awareness and compliance to company standards. Coordinate all internal investigations while directing the in store training of all of our corporate programs. We’ll value your: Strong leadership skills Ability to make decisions in stressful situations Work with information of sensitive and confidential nature Strong communication and customer service skills Previous retail experience in loss prevention preferred                                                                                                                                                                                                                                          This opportunity is a full time hourly position with flexible scheduling based on the store needs and associate schedule.  At Bon-Ton, we want to give back to our associates. We offer competitive pay, great associate discount, 401k plan (once eligible) – including potential company match and great volunteer opportunities. ",Senior Loss Prevention Associate Job in Holland,Full Time Employee,"Holland, MI",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-loss-prevention-associate-job-holland-mi-us-168830654.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=17,,Security/Protective Services,0524f657e238c68fa880014fa483e75d
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:21:42:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pay rates at this location have recently been increased for this position and there is opportunity for additional pay increases after 6 and 12 months of employment.  XPO Logistics invests in its people to create long-term opportunities and sustainable careers. XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you.  (NYSE: XPO)   Company Overview:   XPO Logistics is the premier provider of reliable, regional, inter-regional and nationwide LTL service to customers large and small across our integrated, single North American network of LTL operating locations.    At XPO Logistics, you will work alongside a top caliber management team that not only understands the transportation industry but the importance of utilizing and developing top talent. If you are looking to build a solid and long-lasting career where you will be recognized and rewarded for your hard work, look to XPO Logistics.  Apply today and find out why thousands of people have made XPO Logistics their employer of choice!   Description of Essential Job Functions: Available to work a variety of shifts, including days, evenings, nights and weekends due to varying freight volumes. Efficiently sort, handle, load and unload palletized and non-palletized freight using appropriate motorized and manual equipment, including pallet jack, forklift and by hand as needed. Utilize mobile hand held devices for tracking shipments. Safely climb in and out of trailers. Lift freight and other objects of various shapes, sizes and weights (up to 50 lbs frequently and greater than 75 lbs occasionally). Secure freight inside trailers using appropriate tools and supplies (e.g. pallets, straps, rope). Safely walk and stand for extended periods of time on a loading dock that is not climate-controlled and may be slippery. Safely walk, reach (including above your head), bend, climb, push, pull, twist, squat and kneel as necessary to perform the job duties. Verify and complete required documentation and reports. Ability to handle hazardous materials. Adhere to company safety policies. Frequent contact with service center personnel; fast-pace and deadline oriented. Safely work in adverse weather conditions. Perform other duties as assigned. Prompt, daily attendance at assigned work location.  Skills & Experience:  Prior dock/warehouse experience in the transportation industry is a plus. Prior forklift experience in a freight / less than truckload environment preferred. Prior experience loading and unloading trailers preferred. At least 18 years of age. Highly motivated individual with attention to detail. Ability to count and perform basic math, with or without a calculator. Basic written and verbal communication skills (documentation, communication with peers, supervisors, etc.) Ability to bend, twist, squat, pushing/pulling freight throughout shift. Ability to follow instructions and complete required training. Ability to work independently and/or as a team member. Must be able to perform the essential functions with or without an accommodation. Pass a company paid Post Offer Pre-Hire screen (physical essential functions) test.   We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Dock Worker (Full-Time) Job in Westminster,"Full Time, Employee","Westminster, CO 80003",,http://jobview.monster.com/dock-worker-full-time-job-westminster-co-us-168455494.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=15,,Business/Strategic Management,7f402573cef4a7d18f7364a2c4d8ed4c
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:21:41:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Event Services Coordinator 3880BR Event Services - Temp Events 651-400-7040 Job Description Whelan Event Services is looking to hire a Event Services Coordinator for our El Paso office! Whelan is an industry leading provider of event staffing and security services to entertainment venues nationwide. Our El Paso office provides services to the University of Texas at El Paso Football games, Men’s and Women’s Basketball, Wrestling, Softball, Concerts and much more. This is a full-time position with a base schedule of Monday to Friday from 8:00am-5:00pm. The position does require the applicant to be available to work nights and weekends. The employee will be responsible for: Recruiting applicants and non-profit groups Completing the hiring process with all new employees Employee Scheduling Answering the phone Maintaining office cleanliness and a positive environment Monitoring and maintaining compliance with all state licensing and company policies Inventory management Employee recognition and disciplinary action Managing employees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Have a clean criminal background Be able to pass a drug screen The ideal candidate is: A hard worker Flexible Timely Detail oriented Computer savvy – specifically with Microsoft Office products Great communication skills Able to work well with minimal supervision Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) - college degree preferred Why Whelan? Be Supported:   Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits, (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more!  Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers.  Be Rewarded:   We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued:  Our company is passionate about our employees - and we recognize that our highly dedicated team of security professionals are the foundation of our past success and future growth.  Apply Now! If you are looking for an outstanding opportunity to work at a family-owned, industry leading organization – APPLY NOW!Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say! El Paso, TX 79901",Event Services Coordinator Job in Missouri US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MO,,http://jobview.monster.com/event-services-coordinator-job-mo-us-168992259.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=5,,Security/Protective Services,a6a528c2fd469263833372b53bfe2890
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:20:53:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"   Position:Scheduler Job Description: Assist professionals in the financial industry by calling reps, scheduling appointments, and entering meetings into a secure calendaring system.This is a Part-Time employment position, working from home, requiring availability Monday through Friday, during regular business hours.We hire only in the following states:  AZ, CA, CO, FL, GA, ID, IL, IN, KS, MA, MI, MO, MN, NV, NJ, NY, NC, OH, SC, TX.  REQUIRED: Excellent customer service skillsStrong interpersonal skills and communication Ability to maintain confidentiality Strong attention to detail Strong organizational skillsAbility to multitaskPositive phone presence Professionalism High School diploma or equivalentBasic computer skills Proficient in Microsoft Office (Outlook, Excel, etc) Proficient typing skills (minimum 35 works per minute) Proficient in mapping tools (googlemaps, etc) and determining drive time Home office environment set-up (personal computer running Windows 7 or higher (Macs are not acceptable), high speed internet, router, current anti-virus software, quiet environment) Dual MonitorsSelf-motivation and initiative Teachability and adaptabilityAbility to be a team playerRECOMMENDED: Prior office experience Experience using Act by Sage, Goldmine, Salesforce, Pivotal, or Ciebol  ",Customer Service Representative Job in Dallas,Part Time,"Dallas, TX",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-dallas-tx-us-168959832.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=15,12.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),a75c411423819caaf383bb84cef9f41b
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:20:42:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer 3392BR Mid-Atlantic 301-459-2533 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the New Castle area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at 301-455-2355. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Arlington, VA 22201",Security Officer Job in Georgia US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,GA,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-ga-us-168941992.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=10,,Security/Protective Services,474c88a00642528d797293cf558fc0d9
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:20:42:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"DELANCO TOWNSHIP SLEO II The Delanco Township Police Department is actively seeking applicants for the position of Special Law Enforcement Of cer Class II (SLEO II) to supplemental night patrols. Applicant requirements: At minimum, Certi cation from the NJ Police Training Commission for the Basic Course for Special Law Enforcement Of cer Class II. Applicants must have one (1) year of law enforcement experience. Reside in Burlington County. Applicants must be available to attend mandatory in-service training. Possess a valid NJ Drivers License. Possess a high school diploma or equivalent. Successfully undergo a background check, drug testing & medical exam. Applications can be obtained from the Delanco Police Department; 770 Coopertown Road, Delanco, NJ 08075 Monday-Friday (9AM-4PM). Applications are to be submitted to Chief Jesse A. DeSanto on or before June 13, 2016. E.O.E./A.D.A",SPECIAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER CLASS II Job in Delran,Full Time,"Delran, NJ 08075",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/special-law-enforcement-officer-class-ii-job-delran-nj-us-167923082.aspx?mescoid=3300588001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4655aaccc55e4210fc24a735b0198173
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:53:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Billing Clerk 3784BR Corporate 314-644-3227 Job Description Billing Clerk The Billing Clerk is an integral part of the Whelan Security corporate accounting and finance department.  Working with our accounting and financial analyst team, the successful candidate will assist with all billing functions. This position requires attention to detail, organization, and the ability to meet daily challenges with an entrepreneurial spirit. Qualifications Primary Functional Responsibilities: Invoice processing Invoice distribution Manage client invoice systems Assist financial analysts in maintaining accurate billing Invoice reconciliations Qualifications: Understanding of basic accounting functions Proven ability to maintain effective working relationships. Strong communication skills Highly organized Strong Attention to detail Education Education: Possess a Bachelors Degree. A degree in Finance or Accounting is preferred. Why Whelan?   Be Supported:   Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits, (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more!  Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program.Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry. Apply Now!  At Whelan, we are passionate about our employees. If you have a passion for people and wish to join a family-owned, industry leading organization  – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say!P456HQJSt. Louis, MO 63144",Billing Clerk Job in Missouri US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MO,,http://jobview.monster.com/billing-clerk-job-mo-us-168941560.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=4,,Security/Protective Services,8b1b22ddd78e5c6a38cb1167c15a1038
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:41:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Weekend John’s Creek Security Officers 3467BR Georgia 404-673-1792 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Currently holds or can successfully pass the state training requirement prior to placement Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Atlanta area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at 404-673-1792. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Atlanta, GA 30339",Weekend John’s Creek Security Officers Job in Georgia US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,GA,,http://jobview.monster.com/weekend-john%E2%80%99s-creek-security-officers-job-ga-us-168941962.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=20,,Security/Protective Services,05eadd839c061ddba12531c473d03908
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:41:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounting Clerk 3785BR Corporate 314-644-3227 Job Description Accounting Clerk The Accounting Clerk is an integral part of the Whelan Security corporate accounting and finance department.  Working with our accounting team and branch office staff, the successful candidate will assist with accounts payable, payroll, and general accounting functions. This position requires proactive thinking and the ability to meet daily challenges with an entrepreneurial spirit. Qualifications Primary Functional Responsibilities: Assisting with Month End Close Reconciliations of General Ledger Accounts Adjusting Journal Entries Assisting with Payroll Payroll Processing Processing direct deposits Managing bank cards Garnishment processing Processing Accounts Payable Assisting with Accounts Receivable Cash Application Qualifications: Understanding of basic accounting functions Proven ability to maintain effective working relationships. Strong communication skills Education Education: Possess a Bachelors Degree.  A degree in Finance or Accounting is preferred. Why Whelan? Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including major medical insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued:  We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now! At Whelan, we are passionate about our employees. If you have a passion for people and wish to join a family-owned, industry leading organization  – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say!P456HQJSt. Louis, MO 63144",Accounting Clerk Job in Missouri US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MO,,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-clerk-job-mo-us-168941566.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=3,,Security/Protective Services,4c13122079edea0017824d1d0a61a1ca
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:09:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is looking for Manager of Information Security If interested and available; kindly send me your updated resume in word format along with desired rate to work on the project.    Title: Manager of Information SecurityLocation:  Dallas, TX 75240Full Time REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, IT/IS or a related field 10+ years of IT security experience with cloud experience preferredExtensive knowledge of MS Active Directory, DNS/DHCP, TCP/IP, Group Policy, MS Windows Server and Desktop OS, Scripting, Hyper-V, VMware (ESXi) /virtualization, Enterprise Antivirus & Data Backup management, SAN, MS Exchange, MS Windows, MS SQL, MS Sharepoint, MS System Center and its components.Project management skills to execute and manage strategic IT Security project plansPossesses a broad range of IT Security understanding and a broad technology exposure to engineering solutions to be able to integrate IT infrastructure and business operations in a secure mannerAbility to communicate effectively within various IT groupsAbility to contribute extra time and energy beyond the regular work week as requiredProfessional certifications such as Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP), Certified Information Security Manager (CISM), Certified Information Systems Auditor (CISA), or similar are preferred Required experience:IT and Cyber Security: 10+ yearsSupervisor and Management experience: 8+ yearsSystem and Network Administration: 4+ yearsOther Skills and AbilitiesMicrosoft Office 365 knowledgeOrganizedTeam orientedSelf-motivatedCISSP and other related certifications   Thanks and Best Regards, Gopinath Grandhi National Systems America, L.P. 5945 Dallas ParkwayPlano, TX 75093972-212-8728 Office972-212-7434 eFax 972-212-8762 Cellgopinath@nsiamerica.comVisit us at www.nsiamerica.com  ",Monster,,"Our client is looking for Manager of Information Security If interested and available; kindly send me your updated resume in word format along with desired rate to work on the project.    Title: Manager of Information SecurityLocation:  Dallas, TX 75240Full Time REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, IT/IS or a related field 10+ years of IT security experience with cloud experience preferredExtensive knowledge of MS Active Directory, DNS/DHCP, TCP/IP, Group Policy, MS Windows Server and Desktop OS, Scripting, Hyper-V, VMware (ESXi) /virtualization, Enterprise Antivirus & Data Backup management, SAN, MS Exchange, MS Windows, MS SQL, MS Sharepoint, MS System Center and its components.Project management skills to execute and manage strategic IT Security project plansPossesses a broad range of IT Security understanding and a broad technology exposure to engineering solutions to be able to integrate IT infrastructure and business operations in a secure mannerAbility to communicate effectively within various IT groupsAbility to contribute extra time and energy beyond the regular work week as requiredProfessional certifications such as Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP), Certified Information Security Manager (CISM), Certified Information Systems Auditor (CISA), or similar are preferred Required experience:IT and Cyber Security: 10+ yearsSupervisor and Management experience: 8+ yearsSystem and Network Administration: 4+ yearsOther Skills and AbilitiesMicrosoft Office 365 knowledgeOrganizedTeam orientedSelf-motivatedCISSP and other related certifications   Thanks and Best Regards, Gopinath Grandhi National Systems America, L.P. 5945 Dallas ParkwayPlano, TX 75093972-212-8728 Office972-212-7434 eFax 972-212-8762 Cellgopinath@nsiamerica.comVisit us at www.nsiamerica.com  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-of-information-security-job-dallas-tx-us-168959668.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=16,,,c0a3c60652bfce98c1f8d464b2d64ca3
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"City of Bowling Green, KY is nowaccepting applications for:FIREFIGHTERSApplication Deadline:Friday, July 15, 2016Interested applicants can apply online www.bgky.org/hr/jobs or at the computers in theHuman Resources Department in City Hall,1001 College Street, Bowling Green, KY.The City of Bowling Green is an Equal OpportunityEmployer and Drug-Free Workplace.This job listing brought to you by The Glasgow Daily Times",Fire Fighters Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,42101,Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/fire-fighters-job-plum-springs-ky-us-169025022.aspx?mescoid=3300571001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b2cfb02f4d9a683f2c13ca487897db54
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Officer - Quincy, Illinois 3000BR St. Louis 217-450-7831 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Quincy, Illinois area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately. For more information, you can also call us at 217-450-7831 . Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Quincy, Il 62301",Security Officer - Quincy,Full Time Employee,MO,,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-quincy-illinois-job-mo-us-168941866.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=9,,Security/Protective Services,dab637928e7628f3be3caca1c7ecdfc6
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver Denver, CO  Our Company Midwest is a leading distributor of sign, screen printing and digital products with a network of the industry’s top manufacturers to bring their customers the highest quality supplies, equipment and services available. Ten locations strong, they serve the Midwest to the West Coast, with branches in California, Colorado, Indiana, Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, Oregon, Utah, Washington and Wisconsin. Midwest is dedicated to serving their customers, employees and manufacturers. They built a tradition of excellence since their founding in 1932, and with that experience and commitment they continue to grow and bring the very best to their customers. Our Opportunity This position is responsible for providing courteous, accurate, on-time deliveries to customers.  This position is also responsible for all general warehouse duties when not assigned to delivery routes. Key Responsibilities: Loads and unloads delivery vehicles and assembles stock onto pallets, warehouse trucks and shelves Drives delivery truck and performs deliveries for 75% of the day and assists with warehouse duties 25% of the day  Reads customer orders and shipping orders to determine items to select for shipment or delivery Selects and moves stock to designated area by hand, forklift, or other equipment Completes appropriate paperwork to assure customer service Packs customer orders Performs shipping and receiving responsibilities Maintains warehouse to ensure warehouse is safe and accessible for employees and/or visitors Performs physical inventory counts Prepares parcels for mailing Performs counter sales responsibilities as backup Sweeps, dusts and mops Education and Experience:  Must be 18 years of age or older, hold a valid driver’s license, and have a high school diploma or equivalent  Key Requirements: 2 years’ or more experience driving a truck for a company strongly preferred  2 years’ or more warehouse experience a plus Commercial Driver’s License (CDL) preferred, but not required Basic computer skills Knowledge of basic reading and math skills Knowledge of warehousing procedures and security regulations Skill in the safe operation of forklifts Strong attention to detail Ability to maintain an insurable driving record Ability to work well with others – team player Ability to work independently, be self-motivated, and dependable Ability to walk and move freely Ability to climb ladders Ability to regularly lift 70+ lbs. of stock​ Share with us your talent, drive and entrepreneurial spirit and we will provide a creative and supportive environment, where your valuable contributions are rewarded and celebrated with professional growth, job satisfaction, and an attractive total compensation program. Join us and become part of our great team! We are excited to partner with the HR Professionals at Instigate, Inc. to manage our recruitment efforts for this opening. All responses will be processed promptly on behalf of our hiring team by Instigate's TalentAssist - Recruitment Process Management Services. Please submit your resumes, applications or questions directly for consideration. (855) 635-3299.  Thank you for your interest in joining our team.  See Job Description",Delivery Driver Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80012",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-driver-job-denver-co-us-168273434.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d3a8193cd6b0893b8783cffb761809f6
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Court Security OfficerShared Time PositionRoswell, NM MVM is a diversified federal contractor with over 30 years of experience supporting mission critical services for government customers. Each day, our 2,000 employees counter the language barriers, physical threats, and technological limitations that impede our nation’s security objectives domestically and abroad. To support this important work, MVM, Inc. is building a pool of qualified part-time Court Security Officers (CSO’s) for anticipated vacanciesin the 10th Judicial Circuit. Standard schedule is working a minimum of 20 hours a week. Position requires being available and flexible to accommodate unplanned security schedules up to 40 hours/week.Job Description The primary role of the CSO is to ensure the safety of all federal courts and court employees against unauthorized, illegal, and potentially life-threatening activities. Duties include:Enforces the District’s entry and identification system that includes operating security screening equipment for prohibited items;Uses security equipment, such as metal detectors and hand-held metal detectors; ensures all equipment is set to USMS standard settings.Manages and tests all alarms and control panels on a monthly basis.Patrols court facilities and grounds of the facility in accordance with applicable post orders.Works stationary posts as assigned and monitors closed circuit television, duress alarm systems and other security equipment, courtrooms, judge chambers, and jury rooms.  (CSO does not monitor cellblocks or handle/escort prisoners.)Provides armed escort services for judges, court personnel, jurors, and other designated individuals.Directs traffic, controls lights on court facility properties, and monitors vehicles and pedestrians as defined in post orders.Provides courtroom security as requested by US Marshal; ensures closed courtrooms are secure.Turns over found “lost” articles to a designated court facility and completed a “Court Facility Incident Report” within 24 hours of the incident.Prepares daily reports and records of labor hours worked, accidents, fire, bomb threats, or unusual incidents or unlawful acts.Provides back-up support to Lead Court Security Officer as needed.  Qualified Candidates will posses the following:Be a citizen of the United States of America.Be at least 21 years of age.Be a high graduate or possess a General Educational Development (GED) certificate.Applicants selected will be subject to a government background investigation and must meet eligibility and suitability requirements which include:A favorable credit checkNo felony conviction or multiple misdemeanor convictionsNo prior drug useBe able to read, write, and speak the English language fluently.Must have at least 3 years within the past 7 years of verifiable full-time experience as a certified law enforcement officer or its military equivalency as verified through the applicant’s DD Form 214, Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty.A waiver may be considered for those candidates with experience that falls outside of the last 7 years’ or those who possess a non-law enforcement background in armed government and access control.  Such experience includes but not limited to: US Coast Guard, armed corrections, US Marine embassy protection and military base entrance post.  This waiver is contingent upon meeting the above qualifications of years of full-time experience.Must have completed or graduated from a certified Federal, state, county, local or military law enforcement training academy or program that provided instruction on the use of police powers in an armed capacity while dealing with the public.  The certificate must be recognized by a Federal, state, county, local or military authority, and eligible for employment as a law enforcement officer.Must not have any felony convictions or any conviction related to a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence.How To Apply:Please apply via our website at www.mvminc.com Click on CareersClick on Job SearchIn the location menu, click on the location of the position of interest (New Mexico) and click SearchClick on the position “Court Security Officer – Roswell”Scroll down, click on “Apply for this position”Complete the online application process with the attachment of your resume***We would like to thank all applicants for their interest in this position, however, only those candidates that meet the qualifications will be contacted.***MVM is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Court Security Officer (Shared Time Position) - Roswell,Part Time,"Roswell, NM",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/court-security-officer-shared-time-position-roswell-nm-job-roswell-nm-us-168816154.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4a83e409d2ce7726b0b79ae99b91c451
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"OVERVIEW:We are currently seeking dynamic, highly-motivated Beauty Artist and Sales Advisor who has a passion for the artistry of cosmetics and the motivation to drive sales in the newest, fast paced, open-sell environment with niche beauty brands. As a Macy's IMPULSE Beauty Artist and Sales Advisor, you will use your artistry, skills of superior product knowledge and passion for make-up and skin care to work in one of our most vibrant and exciting departments. As a Macy's IMPULSE Beauty Artist and Sales Advisor, you will assist customers with the cosmetics artistry through a one-on-one customer relationship demonstrating expertise and passion for some of the most vibrant Cosmetics lines today such as Benefit, Tarte, Smashbox, Bare Escentuals and Urban Decay. Through client development, you will build lasting customer relationships and help you to achieve personal and team selling and productivity goals.ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:- Meet and make a connection with customers; initiate service consultations by asking open-ended questions to learn the customers' preferences and buying/service needs- Take initiative to present and sell merchandise in a professional and proficient manner through artistry, product demonstration focusing on the features and benefits of the product line- Inspire the customer to buy, celebrate the purchase, and create a lasting positive impression of you, Macy's, and the purchase- Drive sales by consistently traffic stopping and demonstrating exceptional Selling Skills, ensuring the customer is always the priority- Develop new business and expand client base through customer ""word of mouth"" fostered by a positive shopping experience- Communicate with Counter Manager and Sales Manager on ways to help drive the business- Demonstrate commitment and ability to build customer relationships and loyalty through personal interaction and maintenance of a client file.- Communicate with the Cosmetic Counter Manager regarding stock needs, customer preferences, and special events- Participate and utilize store and vendor training to elevate product knowledge and application techniques- Ensure that all merchandise, testers, hygiene standards and demonstration stations are maintained and set to company standards- Ensure merchandising and operational standards are upheld and in compliance with Macys Impulse Beauty expectations- Attend and actively participate in vendor meetings, seminars, schools, and other product knowledge and business- driving opportunities- Perform other customer facing duties as needed- Regular, dependable attendance and punctualityQUALIFICATIONS- Education/Experience- Prior Cosmetics sales related experience and/or training- Proven experience in the development and utilization of a client base- Language Skills- Ability to effectively communicate and present information to customers, peers and all levels of management- Demonstrate an energetic and positive attitude, strong communication and interpersonal skills.- Mathematical Skills- Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division.- Able to use a calculator.- Reasoning Ability- Ability to meet or exceed sales, customer service, and loyalty program standards- Goal-driven, with an ability to multi-task- Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision.- Present a professional image consistent with Macy's brand values.- Physical Demands- May occasionally be required to stoop, kneel, crouch, and climb ladders.- May have to reach above eye level- Position involves constant moving and standing. Involves standing for at least two consecutive hours. Involves lifting at least 30 lbs.- Other skills- Embraces change in technology Tech savvy, mobile and new media awareness- Enthusiastic, friendly, positive energy- Exceptional ability to develop relationships solves problems, use good judgment and influence customers/co-workers.- Proven ability to set and achieve goals- Must enjoy working with people in a team environment- Work Hours- Available to work a flexible schedule, which may include mornings, evenings, weekends and holidaysThis Macy's location utilizes an innovative way of planning work schedules, allowing an associate to participate more in managing availability and setting preferences for work times. This enables our associates to address their need for flexibility in meeting both personal and work obligations. Details on My Schedule Plus are available during the interview process.This job description is not all inclusive. In addition, Macy's, Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.",Retail Cosmetics Sales - IMPULSE Beauty Artist and Sales Advisor,Full Time Employee,"Littleton, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-cosmetics-sales-impulse-beauty-artist-sales-advisor-full-time-littleton-co-macy%E2%80%99s-p-job-littleton-co-us-168610248.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=6,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,67cc5e75313451321e391182ea4d7ffd
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeVillage at Lowry, CO 150 Quebec Street Denver, CO 80230 Job #:061024Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management* Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus* One to two years of Assisted living or Skilled nursing preferred* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80230",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-practical-nurse-lpn-job-denver-co-us-168443051.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,b65ae90ef6120d0e74f9936ce1ad748d
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"GSOC Operator ($18-$23/HR!) 3624BR Northern California 408-326-0210 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING GSOC OPERATORS ($18-23/HR)! Is GSOC your specialty? Look no further, we have the perfect opportunity for you! The GSOC Operator is responsible for providing primary and secondary security service support in the area of access control and alarm monitoring, emergency monitoring and routine dispatching of security personnel. The GSOC Operator uses a variety of tools that range from enterprise access control and alarm monitoring systems to various business intelligence sources, open source media, internet, and in-house tools to detect, analyze, and alert personnel regarding any adverse conditions that may affect the client, its employees, facilities, and properties worldwide. These may include extreme weather conditions, political instability, crime, terror, or technical failures. Dispatch and coordinate response to security incidents that occur on client premises or events, using the appropriate communication methodology, including but not limited to, radio, telephone, satellite phone, email, text message, video, third-party relay, and/or pager. Response may be to medical emergencies, burglary, fire, duress alarms, travel emergencies and other events or needs At client's direction, may provide liaison with law enforcement, fire department, or industrial and civil emergency response organizations related to emergencies on client property Receive, evaluate and disseminate incoming information and reports from client Security personnel, security officers in the field, contractors, suppliers, reporting parties, and local agencies Receive and respond to emergency and non-emergency calls from employees, outside vendors, law enforcement, and the security field force via telephone, automated alarm monitoring and radio systems (etc.) Communicate out-of-the-ordinary or abnormal conditions to client Security personnel, client management, client employees, client's Facilities organization, client's Environmental Health and Safety organization, repair companies, and Security Specialists in the field Operate and monitor computer workstations and emergency systems; administer and maintain process control systems and databases used within the control center Assist in coordination of service requests for after hour call transfers, access, additional security officer deployment or re-posting as requested Detect, classify, and record incidents (re: events, activities, incoming information or intelligence) Scan local news and support intelligence analysts by performing basic open source (internet) searches Contribute to ongoing training initiatives Supports other duties and engage in team side projects as assigned Perform other related duties as needed Ability to attend training events that fall outside normal work hours Must be able to effectively disseminate information to the individuals involved, management and other appropriate stakeholders Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Possess a valid California Guard Card Requires at least 3-5 years GSOC Operator Must possess strong customer service skills Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills Must be a strong team player with business maturity, enthusiasm and a positive attitude Must have prior experience with research and analysis Ability to multi-task in a fast paced and demanding work environment Comfortable with high-tech work environment, and constant learning of new tools and innovations Flexibility to work all shifts, and willingness to assist the team with overtime when needed Good working knowledge of Microsoft Office tools and enterprise access control and alarm monitoring systems Self-motivated, curious, knowledgeable about news and current events Law enforcement and military experience are welcome Education Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the San Francisco area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 4 North 2nd Street, Suite 598, San Jose, CA 95113  to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at (408) 326-0210.Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say!California Private Patrol Number 16344San Jose,CA 95113",GSOC Operator ($-$/HR!) Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/gsoc-operator-18-23-hr!-job-ca-us-168941298.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Security/Protective Services,cdd3a7df30f8695345da3905aaa8227a
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimePhysical Therapy PositionGreenwood Village, Roslyn, Denver Tech Center and Tamarac SquareJob #:PTgwvCO060419Home Healthcare and Outpatient in our Beautiful Upscale Living Retirement Communities Some Homecare in Private HomesExcellent Benefits! Paid Mileage and Drive Time!A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Physical Therapist to provide therapy services in the Greenwood Village area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities:* Provide and direct physical therapy services to patients, including assessment, treatment, program planning and implementation* Work in accordance with physicians' orders and adhere to applicable principles and practices of physical therapy, Brookdale policies/procedures, and state regulations* Conduct screenings of patients at regular intervals to determine need for intervention and treatment* Coordinate treatment plan with patient, family and other team members* Develop appropriate home or community programming to maintain and enhance the performance of the patient in his/her own environmentRequired skills and qualifications:* Bachelor's degree in physical therapy from an accredited program* Completion of the National Certification Examination for Registered Physical Therapists* Physical therapy license within the state of practice* One year of physical therapy experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as neededIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!please contact:Mary Franklinmfranklin@brookdale.comBrookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Physical Therapist / PT Job in Greenwood Village,Full Time Employee,"Greenwood Village, CO 80111",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/physical-therapist-pt-job-greenwood-village-co-us-168124122.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,9c9ed2cc24df61df724d2f173d707abe
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Level 1 Security Officer - ABQ Area 3712BR New Mexico 505-247-9400 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Albuquerque area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at (505) 247-9400 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? HP123SOS Albuquerque, NM 87111",Level  Security Officer - ABQ Area Job in New Mexico US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,NM,,http://jobview.monster.com/level-1-security-officer-abq-area-job-nm-us-168941791.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=13,,Security/Protective Services,7ec7e593020496c2aeba2fa39481c3c5
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project is to stabilize the customer's network by standardizing network device configurations at remote sites. Project will include comparing device configurations at the remote sites against the standard configuration, preparing changes needed and then implementing those changes. Required Skills: Experience configuring and troubleshooting Cisco ASA firewalls and Aruba wireless network controllers/APs Tasks: Compare network configurations against the standard configuration, prepare changes to software version and configuration, then implement the changes to bring network devices at remote sites up to the standard. Responsibilities: Provide technology consulting to external customers and internal project teams. Responsible for providing technical support and/or leadership in the creation and delivery of technology solutions designed to meet customers business needs and, consequently, for understanding customers businesses. As trusted advisor create and maintain effective customer relationships so as to insure customer satisfaction. Maintain knowledge of leading edge technologies and industry/market domain knowledge. Actively contribute to HPs solutions portfolio by providing information ranging from technical knowledge to methodologies based on experience gained from customer projects. Shape technical direction and technical strategies within the organization and for external customers. Accountable for consistent and significant chargeability levels (or expense relief for internal project teams) and for assisting in meeting or exceeding revenue and customer satisfaction goals. Contribute to organizations profitability by generating and cultivating new business opportunities and by providing technical support for deal proposal development.Master: Unique mastery and recognized authority on relevant subject matter knowledge including technologies, theories, or techniques. Contributes to the development of innovative principles and ideas. Successfully operates in the most complex disciplines, in which the company must operate to be successful. Provides highly innovated solutions. Routinely exercises independent judgment in developing methods, techniques and criteria for achieving objectives. Develops strategy andleads large, cross-division functional teams or projects the affect the organizations longterm goals and objectives. May participate in cross-division, multi-function teams.12+ years of professional experience and a Master of Arts/Science or equivalent degree in computer science or related area of study; without a Masters degree, three additional years of relevant professional experience (15+ years in total). Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Firewall Engineer Job in Plano,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Firewall Engineer,"Plano, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/firewall-engineer-job-plano-tx-us-168860118.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,745e34e2085e9a93c4588874e2a24929
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:19:00:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security OfficersCape Canaveral, FL FT/PT Positions  JOB SUMMARYObserves and reports activities and incidents at an assigned client site, providing for the security and safety of client property and personnel. Controls access to client site or facility through the admittance process; assists visitors with a legitimate need to gain entry to the facility; screens visitors and client employees in an efficient manner in order to expedite their admittance to the site or facility.  Preserves order and may act to enforce regulations and directives for the site pertaining to personnel, visitors, and premises. A detailed job description is available during the application process when you apply.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: ·         U.S. citizen ·         18 or 21 years of age·         High School Diploma or Equivalent·         Must be able to meet state/county licensing requirements for Security Officer·         Excellent verbal and written communication skills ·         Courteous telephone manner and customer service skills·         Ability to pass a background check, personality assessment and drug screen·         Ability to obtain and maintain a government security clearance·         Military, Security, or Law Enforcement Background preferred  HOW TO APPLYApply Directly Online by following the steps below:1.              Click the “Apply Now” button below2.              Once redirected to the Securitas Critical Infrastructure Services site click the link: “Security Operations Start Application"" 3.              Go to the “Apply to a Location near You” tab. Put in Florida for the state and Cape Canaveral for the city and click the green arrow next to the city. You will then be directed to the current open positions for Florida.4.              Select the title of the position you are interested in and you will be directed to the “Job Description” for that position.5.              Read and confirm the selection and click the “Apply Now button” at the bottom of the page.6.              Complete the application process as instructed. www.SCISjobs.com  EOE/Minorities/Females/Vets/DisabilitiesDCJS LIC.  # 11-2919  ",Security Officer Job in Port Canaveral,Full Time Employee,"Port Canaveral, FL 32920",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/security-officer-job-port-canaveral-fl-us-168807027.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=2,13.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,Security/Protective Services,3b258daa81389ffd7a2d732292f63894
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:18:41:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Not everyone thrives while working for a huge corporate entity where they never meet their upper management or understand the decisions made by the ?powers that be?.Imagine an opportunity to be a part of a small team that works on recognizable, name-brand projects that you can be proud of, without the politics and run-around that comes with working for a large corporation. Imagine the impact you can make for a construction company where you have direct access to the President and owner of a well-networked, highly-regarded local general contractor that runs lean, but thinks big. If honesty and professionalism, as well as pride in your work describes your brand of professionalism, then stop imaging yourself in that role because you?ve found it. Now that you see the big picture you?re wondering about the details right? As a Project Engineer for this established, commercial General Contractor you can expect:? To work on projects ranging from $20-50MM? A focus on hospitality builds in the Denver and Wyoming region? The opportunity to advance to an Assistant PM role and eventually a PM position? Projects both in the office and in the field ? Competitive pay, benefits and bonuses If you have somewhere between 2 - 5 years of experience in commercial Construction as a Project Engineer, then these duties are par for the course. You already understand the role, but want to hear more about the environment and the team you will be joining. Well here?s the nuts and bolts:The owner of this construction company is well-known in the community, brings over 20 years of industry experience to the table and is proud of the people he hires and brings on to his team. Longevity is a key player in their culture.Because of the care taken when hiring, there is no micromanaging from leadership. You can come into work, do the job and do it well, without having to answer for every decision made. This is a team with a true affinity for each other. They respect the qualities that each of them bring to the table.Their biggest project in 2016 is a destination for Denver locals and tourists alike. The range of the projects you can attach your name to are reputable and worth bragging about. Without the politics of a big company, there is a no-nonsense approach to communication. You can communicate directly and openly with the owner of the company and he will do the same for you.This growing construction company is eager to hire soon because 2016 projects are stacking up. Interviews are being scheduled now so that they can have YOU on board by July. If this all fits into your perception of your dream job, then we look forward to seeing you resume (as a Word document). We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1048574 Job Experience:,,, commercial construction, project managerYears of Experience Required:",Project Engineer,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80205",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-construction-services-job-denver-co-us-168913744.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),35a5a16d92e2938338276592be532014
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:18:40:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary: Key responsibilities include but are not limited to the management of the Payor Contract Admin and Payor Implementation functions.  This is a highly visible position and will work closely with Managed Care Contracting and Executive and Field Management to provide research on payor related issues.  Manages payor contracting admin duties including payor applications, contracting cycle (new and amended), and credentialing. Manages Medicaid/Medicare admin duties including the management of provider IDs, taxonomy codes, enrollments, credentialing, maintaining insurance and otherwise understanding, documenting and tracking requirements for these government payors Manages payor notifications distribution, action items and proper storage Manages access and use of payor portals and setup of Electronic Admittance Advice (ERAs) and Electronic Funds Transfers (EFTs) Manages notifications from Amerita to payors such as address changes and location updates to contracts Manages the loading and maintenance of payors and pricing in the billing system (CPR+) Manages CPR+ admin duties including user privileges, popup menus, company and site setup Manages clearing house (Zirmed) admin duties including user privileges, payor setup, payor rejections, patient statements Manages the conversion of acquired locations to the above systems Other duties as assigned Job Requirements: Expert knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite programs Experience working with health insurance organizations both government and commercial and an understanding of healthcare revenue cycle management Ability to communicate and present complex issues in a clear and impactful manner to all levels of management Minimum of two (2) years experience managing processes and/or people in the healthcare space Desired Skills: CPR+ knowledge strongly desired Home Infusion industry experience Required Education (including certifications): Bachelor's Degree required (all fields considered) MBA desired Physical and Environmental Requirements: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk and use hands to finger, handle or feel. The employee is occasionally required to stand and reach with hands and arms. The employee may occasionally be required to lift/or move up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision and the ability to adjust focus. Travel expectations are little to none for this role. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.Division/Department : Billing Skills : Information Technology -> Database SpecialistHealth/Medical -> Accounting/Billing, AdministrativeHuman Resources -> Management",Contract Implementation Manager Job in Centennial,"Full Time, Employee","Centennial, CO 80112",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/contract-implementation-manager-job-centennial-co-us-168878571.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,fb7612a05eb19b42d0285103a813b710
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:17:45:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Arcanum Group is seeking a Senior Telecommunications Engineer on a contingent basis to support a contract for the General Services Administration, Federal Acquisition Service, for their Network Services Programs. The Senior Telecommunications Engineer will be responsible for providing technical expertise to support GSA’s Network Services Programs’ transition from existing telecommunications and network services contracts for use by Federal agencies to replacement contracts, called Enterprise Infrastructure Solutions (EIS).Responsibilities: Perform assessments and inventory analyses of Federal agencies’ existing telecommunication systems, network topology, and services for each location or service environment, using a transition inventory provided by GSA.  Assessments and analyses may include:Voice systems topology & configurationNetwork architectureAudio/video/web conferencingWide Area Network/Local Area Network (WAN/LAN)Wireless and mobile services and devicesSite locations inventory and categorizationEquipment and devices to be replaced or removed (if applicable)Construction that is integral to and not easily severable from the service it enablesWork with GSA and the agencies’ service providers to correct inventory. Assist Project Manager and Contract Specialist in developing Statements of Work (SOW) or Statements of Objectives (SOO) at agencies’ requests. Assist in collecting requirements from the agency’s OCO, TM, telecommunications specialists, project managers, and users as required to understand the functionality of existing services on expiring contracts and the agency’s needs for the transition of those services to EIS as well as any new requirements that can be effectively procured on EIS concurrently with transitioning services.  Qualifications:        Demonstrated government acquisition experience with enterprise-wide telecommunications services       Demonstrated skill in the preparation of all related acquisition documents including acquisition plans, quality assurance surveillance plans, statements of work, statements of objectives, synopses, solicitations, support cost/price analysis, price evaluation documents, and source selection evaluations and recommendations       Knowledge of GSA Telecommunications Programs, including local and wide-area telecommunications services and broadband data network services       Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or a closely related field strongly preferred       Must be willing to travel.  Position will require significant travel.Equal-Opportunity employer. M/F/D/V/M",Senior Telecommunications Engineer Job in Washington,"Full Time, Employee","Washington, DC",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-telecommunications-engineer-job-washington-dc-us-168765437.aspx?mescoid=1500133001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,e51681094bde1f7015696d1c6df1039d
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:17:44:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Women’s and Children’s Registered Nurse, RNDallas, TX  Here's an incredible opportunity for a highly motivated and experienced nurse to take on the role of Director of Women’s and Children’s at a highly respected hospital located in the area.  Director of Women’s and Children’sReports to the CNO and looks over Labor & Delivery, Mother/Baby, Post-Partum, Pediatrics and Newborn Nursery.Must have recent director or nursing management experience looking over the women’s and / or children’s umbrella.BSN Degree required, Masters highly preferred OUR SERVICES ARE ALWAYS FREE!  All applicants must be a registered nurse and the ideal candidate will have recent nursing director experience looking over maternal child services. A strong Nurse Manager will be considered.  PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE!  1-800-995-2673 x 1395 Martin PaeplowPlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1395mpaeplow@coremedicalgroup.comwww.linkedin.com/in/mpaeplow Keywords: women’s services, mother, baby, maternal, child, obstetrics, gyn, labor and delivery, nurse manager, management, supervisor, director, obstetrics, coordinator, clinical leader, emergency department, critical care, emergency services, director, manager, magnet, ER, ED, E.R., E.D, intensive care, nurse manager, CNO, Director of ER, Director of emergency services, emergency room, critical care, icu, ccu    ",Director of Women’s and Children’s – RN – Nurse – $K+ Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-women%E2%80%99s-children%E2%80%99s-%E2%80%93-rn-%E2%80%93-nurse-%E2%80%93-120k-job-dallas-tx-us-168861112.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=18,"100,000.00 - 130,000.00 $ /year",Medical/Health,89e871fb48f800e07482a6ca72f59a99
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:17:27:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client Services Manager-Great Career Opportunity in Minneapolis area! 3815BR Minnesota (651) 628-4010 Job Description Whelan Security is looking for a talented and driven leader to manage client services in the Minneapolis area!  Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture.  The CSM is an operational leader of the company responsible for the personnel in a portfolio of accounts within a branch or geographic market, typically reporting into a GM or an MSS.  The CSM is responsible for the management, employee development and engagement of all personnel in the assigned client sites, as well as operational support for those accounts to include scheduling, payroll, compliance, post order development, performance metrics tracking and employee recruiting, discipline, recognition, training and inspections.  The CSM role is 100% tactical and operational.  The CSM is expected to build upon a culture of employee engagement and set the example for all employees in the assigned accounts of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics: The CSM is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Manage to 2.5% unbilled overtime or less on assigned accounts Year over year improvement in Employee Engagement Scores Minimum 95% annual client retention of assigned accounts to include personal visitation to all assigned client sites weekly or monthly depending on scope Personnel inspections and training of 100% of assigned personnel each month Personnel recruiting to ensure full staffing levels on assigned accounts Personally recruit a minimum of one new manager/staff in your branch annually Develop a minimum of one manager/staff for promotion annually Become proficient in all company software systems (on-boarding, scheduling, financial, CRM) 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics: Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun. Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: A college degree (Associates or greater) is preferred although equivalent experience will be considered Why Whelan? Be Supported: Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged: Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded: We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you are looking for an outstanding opportunity to work at a family-owned, industry leading organization – APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at at 1700 West Highway 36, Suite 420, Roseville, MN 55113 to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at (651) 628-4010.Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say Roseville, MN 55113",Client Services Manager-Great Career Opportunity in Minneapolis area! Job in Minnesota US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MN,,http://jobview.monster.com/client-services-manager-great-career-opportunity-in-minneapolis-area!-job-mn-us-168941406.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=4,,Security/Protective Services,5a11d9d4cec3fb11008a9e13a4de51df
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:17:16:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Role: Mainframe Java Location: Plano, TXDuration: Fulltime and permanent positionSalary: 80k – 100kJob Description:Basic Qualifications:•Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent required from an accredited institution. Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education.• At least 5 years of experience with IT Software Skills.Preferred:•5+ Yrs. Relevant IT software  experience (Technical-Developer) using Mainframe Technologies. •Minimum 3 years of development experience in COBOL, DB2, SQL, JCL, VSAM, CA7, IBM Utilities. •Quick learner and self-starter who requires minimal supervision to excel in  a dynamic environment. •Deep understanding of the software development process. •Strong Written and verbal communication skills"". Thanks & RegardsParitosh Satpute | Bravens Inc. Contact: 703-286-5891Email: paritosh@bravensinc.com",Monster,,"Role: Mainframe Java Location: Plano, TXDuration: Fulltime and permanent positionSalary: 80k – 100kJob Description:Basic Qualifications:•Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent required from an accredited institution. Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education.• At least 5 years of experience with IT Software Skills.Preferred:•5+ Yrs. Relevant IT software  experience (Technical-Developer) using Mainframe Technologies. •Minimum 3 years of development experience in COBOL, DB2, SQL, JCL, VSAM, CA7, IBM Utilities. •Quick learner and self-starter who requires minimal supervision to excel in  a dynamic environment. •Deep understanding of the software development process. •Strong Written and verbal communication skills"". Thanks & RegardsParitosh Satpute | Bravens Inc. Contact: 703-286-5891Email: paritosh@bravensinc.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/mainframe-java-job-plano-tx-us-168390636.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=7,,,41c52645f0d6e7d4673ea4f8f639553a
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:17:16:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"SR. SYSTEMS SOFTWARE ENGINEER – CONTRACT - IRVING, TX-Bachelor's degree in area of specialty and at least 8-10 years of experience in the field or in a related area -8+ years’ experience with Java/J2ee -8 + years’ experience with Application servers, Databases, RDBMS based applications -8+ years front-end integration experience working with development teams on the deployment of web based applications (Java and J2ee) -Experience in network design, operational support, hands-on implementation and configuration of web applications, and enterprise systems. -Strong knowledge and experience in VPN, Firewall, load-balancing, network security, and network management platforms -Experience in configuring and installing technologies such as 2 way ssl, https connections. -Experience in auditing network security compliance -Certified ATG Commerce/java programmer/Developer is preferred -Required Skills: Core Java, J2EE, JAXB, JSP, Servlets, Web services, XML/XSD design, CSS3/Jquery, Ajax, Spring. -Required Skills:- ATG Commerce, strong in fundamentals, 4 to 6 years of hands on with large scale implementations, expert level in Browse and Shop, pricing, cart/catalog, check out modules and hands on various commerce pipelines -Exposure to Mobile Platforms(IOS/Android) is preferred.Follow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://dallas.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Sr. Software Systems Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-software-systems-engineer-job-dallas-tx-us-168963648.aspx?mescoid=1500128001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,d0ae9a44a8ba00c592cc1284addd3660
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:16:46:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Licensed Security Officer--Jackson TN 3235BR Tennessee 615-331-5201 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Nashville area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately.  For more information, you can also call us at (615) 331-5201 . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Nashville,TN 38301",Licensed Security Officer--Jackson TN Job in Tennessee US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,TN,,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-security-officer-jackson-tn-job-tn-us-168992250.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=8,,Security/Protective Services,bc8e25780aa4e9ae961071b86a81d601
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:16:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview We are currently seeking a Bilingual (English/Spanish-speaking) Medical Nurse Case Manager (RN) in the Dallas, TX area.   Responsible for assessment, planning, coordination, implementation and evaluation of injured/disabled individuals involved in the medical case management process. Working as an intermediary between carriers, attorneys, medical care providers, employers and employees, you will closely monitor the progress of the injured worker and report results back to the employer and insurance carrier. This will ensure appropriate and cost-effective healthcare services leading to a medically rehabilitated individual who is ready to return to an optimal level of work and functioning. Responsibilities Main responsibilities will include but are not limited to: Using clinical/nursing skills to help coordinate the individual’s treatment program while maximizing cost containment. Serving as an intermediary to interpret and educate the individual on his/her disability, and the treatment plan established by the case manager, physicians, and therapists. Explaining physician’s and therapists’ instructions, and answers any other questions the claimant may have in an effort to facilitate his/her return to work. Working with the physicians and therapists to set up medical assessments to develop an overall treatment plan that ensures cost containment while meeting state and other regulator’s guidelines. Researching alternative treatment programs such as pain clinics, home health care, and work hardening. Coordinating all aspects of the individual’s enrollment into the programs, and then monitors his/her progress, in an effort to maximize cost containment and minimize time away from work. Working with employers on modifications to job duties based on medical limitations and the employees functional assessment. May provide testimony on litigated cases. Coordinating injured workers’ appointments and arranges and/or personally escorts him/her to the appointments. Documenting and reporting all case activity for accurate case management and billing procedures. Preparing detailed evaluation reports, as per account guidelines, and case recording documenting for each phase of activity as it is completed. Reporting billing hours in accordance with case activity and billing practices. Maintaining phone contact with all parties involved to monitor, update, and advance case activity to ensure the progress of the case. Compiling a case inventory on a monthly basis for submission to the branch manager to allow for proper billing and to calculate hours for bonus purposes. Completing insurance carrier reports on a monthly (or as required) basis, as well as other necessary paperwork for the insurance company, state, or other regulatory bodies. Maintaining the necessary credentials and demonstrates a level of professionalism within the work place and in dealing with injured workers reflects positively on the company as a whole. Acquiring and maintaining knowledge of developments in the medical case management field. Keeping abreast of local workers’ compensation laws and regulations, as well as other issues related to the case management/managed care industry.   Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.   Bilingual (English/Spanish-speaking) skills are required. Diploma, Associate or bachelors degree in nursing or bachelors degree (or higher) in a health or human services related field required. Masters level and/or advanced study in a health-related field desired. Minimum of two (2) years full time equivalent of direct clinical care to consumers required. Case Management and/or Workers’ compensation-related experience strongly preferred. Registered nurse with current, valid state licensure required. Must be eligible to sit for CCM certification and must have a valid driver’s license. Experience in rehabilitation services industry, vocational/ occupational/ industrial nursing preferred. Background in state workers’ compensation law and practices desirable. In the case of an individual in a state that does not require licensure or certification, the individual must have a baccalaureate or graduate degree in social work, or another health or human services field that promotes the physical, psychosocial, and/or vocational well-being of the persons being served, that requires: A degree from an institution that is fully accredited by a nationally recognized educational accreditation organization; The individual must have completed a supervised field experience, in case management, health, or behavioral health as part of the degree requirements; and URAC-recognized certification in case management within four (4) years of hire as a case manager Pursue URAC-recognized certification in case management (CCM, CDMS, CRC, CRRN or COHN) upon eligibility. Excellent interpersonal skills and phone manners. Excellent organizational skills. Must be proficient in Microsoft Office suite with such programs as Word and Excel as well as have experience with internet searches and a comfort level with other software programs. Ability to set priorities and work independently is essential.",Bilingual Field Nurse Case Manager (RN) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-field-nurse-case-manager-rn-job-dallas-tx-us-168837613.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,"To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.   Bilingual (English/Spanish-speaking) skills are required. Diploma, Associate or bachelors degree in nursing or bachelors degree (or higher) in a health or human services related field required. Masters level and/or advanced study in a health-related field desired. Minimum of two (2) years full time equivalent of direct clinical care to consumers required. Case Management and/or Workers’ compensation-related experience strongly preferred. Registered nurse with current, valid state licensure required. Must be eligible to sit for CCM certification and must have a valid driver’s license. Experience in rehabilitation services industry, vocational/ occupational/ industrial nursing preferred. Background in state workers’ compensation law and practices desirable. In the case of an individual in a state that does not require licensure or certification, the individual must have a baccalaureate or graduate degree in social work, or another health or human services field that promotes the physical, psychosocial, and/or vocational well-being of the persons being served, that requires: A degree from an institution that is fully accredited by a nationally recognized educational accreditation organization; The individual must have completed a supervised field experience, in case management, health, or behavioral health as part of the degree requirements; and URAC-recognized certification in case management within four (4) years of hire as a case manager Pursue URAC-recognized certification in case management (CCM, CDMS, CRC, CRRN or COHN) upon eligibility. Excellent interpersonal skills and phone manners. Excellent organizational skills. Must be proficient in Microsoft Office suite with such programs as Word and Excel as well as have experience with internet searches and a comfort level with other software programs. Ability to set priorities and work independently is essential.",b8d37f16771a6a26347c9a6a20b51ea5
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:16:27:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fullstack JavaScript Developer/Front End DeveloperSkills: JavaScript, NodeJS, HTML, CSS, SQL, Oracle, JavaLocation: Plano, TexasSalary: $70,000-$85,000 Our client is a stable company in the travel industry that develops custom software applications for clients to collect and manage logistics for events. They have a great culture that allows for collaboration and independent thinking. In this role, you will be doing full stack JavaScript development using JavaScript and Node daily. You will work on a small team of less than 10 Developers with great, tenured leadership. The days are fasted paced but you will have a great work/life balance- this is not a sweat shop! Experience we’d like to see:2+ years of JavaScript experience- be able to code from scratch!Knowledge or interest in working with NodeJSDesire to continuous learnUnderstanding of Data Structures and AlgorithmsBe able to manage multiple projects at onceDrive to research problems but modesty to know when to ask for advice Why you want to work here:Great opportunity to grow as a DeveloperGreat leadershipAnnual bonusWork from home when neededSolid health benefits ",Front End Developer Job in Plano,Full Time Employee,"Plano, TX",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/front-end-developer-job-plano-tx-us-168459079.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=2,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 /year",IT/Software Development,9de51ea740d55dc4602189b6b0d09f83
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:16:25:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248281-1Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168799497.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bd574882758e889ef8924f0dda7eac18
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:15:44:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Senior Full Stack DeveloperLocation: Dallas, TXJob Type: Full time direct hire  Looking for someone who is a full stack dev, but focuses primarily on backend technologies and database solutions. PHP a must. Must be able to provide back up support for data ingestion and DevOps. Candidate must be versatile to work with many codebases and able to troubleshoot a variety of issues that may come up. What You Will Do ·         Build both front-end and back-end solutions using the latest web technologies·         Participate in all aspects of development (planning, architecture, development and deployment)·         Collaborate with development leads and other developers/engineers to solve problems and complete projects successfully and on time·         Participate in peer code reviews and pair-programming·         Refactor and optimize code·         Share knowledge with and mentor junior developers Qualifications ·         Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or a related field, or significant equivalent experience.·         Strong system architecture experience·         Client development experience building web applications with JavaScript – Node.js, AngularJS, etc.·         Solid understanding of SQL (we use MySQL and PostgreSQL)·         Experience with building and consuming RESTful web services (APIs)·         Comfortable with testing methodologies such as BDD and TDD·         Experience with version control systems such as Git·         Understanding design patterns of object-oriented programming, MVC architecture, concepts of abstraction, etc.·         Experience with cloud based environments such as AWS.·         Some understanding of Build / Task Mangers such as Grunt and Gulp, as well as pre processors like Sass/LESS  Required Skills: ·         HTML/HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, Git, Angular.js, Node.js, MySQL/PostgreSQL, PHPNice-to-have Skills:·         PHP, CoffeeScript, Sass/LESS, NoSQL, Redis, Web Sockets, Vagrant/Docker, AWS, Grunt/Gulp",Monster,,"Job Title:Senior Full Stack DeveloperLocation: Dallas, TXJob Type: Full time direct hire  Looking for someone who is a full stack dev, but focuses primarily on backend technologies and database solutions. PHP a must. Must be able to provide back up support for data ingestion and DevOps. Candidate must be versatile to work with many codebases and able to troubleshoot a variety of issues that may come up. What You Will Do ·         Build both front-end and back-end solutions using the latest web technologies·         Participate in all aspects of development (planning, architecture, development and deployment)·         Collaborate with development leads and other developers/engineers to solve problems and complete projects successfully and on time·         Participate in peer code reviews and pair-programming·         Refactor and optimize code·         Share knowledge with and mentor junior developers Qualifications ·         Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or a related field, or significant equivalent experience.·         Strong system architecture experience·         Client development experience building web applications with JavaScript – Node.js, AngularJS, etc.·         Solid understanding of SQL (we use MySQL and PostgreSQL)·         Experience with building and consuming RESTful web services (APIs)·         Comfortable with testing methodologies such as BDD and TDD·         Experience with version control systems such as Git·         Understanding design patterns of object-oriented programming, MVC architecture, concepts of abstraction, etc.·         Experience with cloud based environments such as AWS.·         Some understanding of Build / Task Mangers such as Grunt and Gulp, as well as pre processors like Sass/LESS  Required Skills: ·         HTML/HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript, Git, Angular.js, Node.js, MySQL/PostgreSQL, PHPNice-to-have Skills:·         PHP, CoffeeScript, Sass/LESS, NoSQL, Redis, Web Sockets, Vagrant/Docker, AWS, Grunt/Gulp",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-full-stack-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168646517.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=17,,,ba73963719bd9b545a80777cbb8076f7
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:15:44:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position reports up to Finance organization supporting DTV Latin America countries in the AT&T Capital Process. The position is responsible for providing leadership in the collaboration with peers and general management to identify, communicate, and shepherd both operational and financial opportunities in our Latin America organizations. It requires a highly analytical, self-motivated, bilingual preferred candidate comfortable with working across multiple organizations as well as skip-level management. The primary duties of this role include actuals/forecast reporting and business case analysis including subscriber metric analysis, associated benefit realization reporting, ad hoc analysis, and Spanish to English translation. In this role, the candidate shall provide technical/functional expertise in identifying, evaluating, and developing business models (financial terms, scope parameters, definitions of assumptions). Additionally, this position will identify partners, manage ongoing relationships, act as a Finance liaison for client across organizations and feel comfortable making suggestions and recommendations. Considering this very critical role, we are most interested in ""Why?"" candidates with an appreciation for positive change and creativity. Experience: Typically requires 5-7 years experience in Financial Analysis, business cases, reporting, and excellent communication skills. Required Skills: Advanced excel and PowerPoint skills. Fluent in Spanish and/or Portuguese a plus. Required Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Science, Engineering, Finance, or a technical related field Five years experience in accounting, financial analysis, or financial reporting Good communication skills. Excellent interpersonal communications and project management/leadership skills Excellent desktop skills (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, MS Access) Desired Qualifications: Five or more years experience in Financial Analysis, modeling and forecasting MBA in Finance",Lead Financial Analyst (Spanish bilingual required) Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-financial-analyst-spanish-bilingual-required-job-dallas-tx-us-168812834.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=19,,,b2095a47a7c135168a0ce0bf9b585c69
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:14:43:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Concierge Security Officer in Chanhassen-1st Shift! 3819BR Minnesota (651) 628-4010 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team! Hours are M-F 6am-2pm$12.25 per hour! Duties include, but are not limited to: Vehicle patrol of exterior areas of assigned locations Foot patrol of interior/exterior areas of assigned locations Observe and report suspicious activities and persons Write detailed narrative reports and maintain daily activity reports (DARs) Enforce rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and respond to emergency situations requiring security assistance Regulate and monitor building systems through surveillance Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at our outstanding client location in the Chanhassen area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 1700 W Highway 36 Roseville, MN to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at (651) 628-4010. Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! At Whelan, we value people and we value relationships.Extraordinary people work at Whelan – are you one? Chanhassen, MN 55317",Concierge Security Officer in Chanhassen-st Shift! Job in Minnesota US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,MN,,http://jobview.monster.com/concierge-security-officer-in-chanhassen-1st-shift!-job-mn-us-168941379.aspx?mescoid=3300595001001&jobPosition=7,,Security/Protective Services,a263b1d23984c6e486a8c7b311b8c083
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:14:43:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Special Response Officer - Georgetown, KY 3577BR Kentucky (502) 759-2424 Job Description Whelan Security is searching for bright and talented professionals who wish to share in the unique culture of our family business – one where people feel inspired, encouraged, and rewarded. We are excited to announce immediate openings in the Georgetown area! Now is your opportunity to join our world-class team as one of the fastest growing contract security companies in the country!  The  Special Response Officer  is responsible for interacting with team members, tenants and the client, as well as ensuring the site is safe and secure. Candidates should be able to pick up shifts Monday through Sunday for first, second or third shift periods, and assist with call-offs or scheduled vacations as needed.  This position is best suited for individuals who can provide customer service to the highest of standards – capable of representing Whelan as the premier provider of security services in the industry. Qualifications Successful candidates should be 18 years of age or older, legally authorized to work in the United States, and possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED). Candidates must demonstrate a stable work history and pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, past employment verification, and a personality profile (behavioral assessment). We are looking for intelligent, courteous individuals with a friendly attitude, professional demeanor, great customer service skills, and the ability to communicate effectively. Previous contract services, hospitality, military, law enforcement or supervisory experience is preferred. Education Why Whelan? Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program. Be Valued:  We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry.  Apply Now!If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at some of our outstanding client locations in the Georgetown area – APPLY NOW!Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 135 1/2 East Main Street, Georgetown, KY to apply in person. For more information, you can also call us at (502) 759-2424.Not convinced?  Listen to what our team members have to say! Georgetown, KY 40324",Special Response Officer - Georgetown,Full Time Employee,KY,,http://jobview.monster.com/special-response-officer-georgetown-ky-job-ky-us-168941915.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,Security/Protective Services,a0d4a281558269e6014eb579a645efda
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:13:42:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking an IT Developer/Engineer in Plano, Texas (TX). Service delivery engineering for the Identity Assurance organization within Cyber Security Identity and Access Management.REQUIREMENTS: Excellent interpersonal skills Must be collaborative and team oriented, with a strong customer focus Excellent oral and written communication skills Ability to work within a change management framework, in a highly regulated production environment Ability to create and maintain engineering documents Ability to work independently and work through ambiguity Work tickets/incidents to completion and participate in root cause determination and problem management Some on call and weekend work is required Active Directory Certificate Services, to support domain joined devices Windows Server 2012R2 PowerShell Certutil PKI services- support of certificates for user, server, and application RedHat RHEL 5, PERL, and PHP skills are nice to have Cyber Security IAM Identity Assurance PKI/Certificates - Service Delivery Contractor",IT Developer / Engineer Job in Plano,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Plano, TX 75023",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-developer-engineer-job-plano-tx-us-168926951.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d617c88d720bc5d22c282227f1fbcb38
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:13:41:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have an eye for detail and have an interest in the area of loss prevention and safety? If so join our Loss Prevention team! Loss Prevention Associates work with the Regional Loss Prevention team and Store Management to improve internal shortage controls, reduce the opportunity for store losses, and ensure the safety of customers and associates. Associates implement and execute store shortage programs, shortage awareness and compliance to company standards. We’ll value your: Ability to make decisions in stressful situations Work with information of sensitive and confidential nature Strong communication skills Previous retail experience in loss prevention preferred Schedules include a variety of day, evening and weekend hours. At Bon-Ton, we want to give back to our associates. We offer competitive pay, great associate discount, 401k plan (once eligible) – including potential company match and great volunteer opportunities. ",Loss Prevention Associate Job in West Des Moines,Full Time Employee,"West Des Moines, IA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/loss-prevention-associate-job-west-des-moines-ia-us-168876184.aspx?mescoid=3300600001001&jobPosition=5,,Security/Protective Services,431a1f7b5d3ce7f24def4d6dd4bd61c1
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:13:30:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Sr Sys Engineer - EG03 Job #:  671292Senior Systems EngineerDallas, TX 7523518 month contract Respond to environment problems and implement resolution efforts across technology areas. Provides Unparalleled Customer Service in one of four focus areas: • System Engineer – Platforms Evaluate, develop, customize, install, implement and maintain computer systems, and system architecture components, according to Customer/system requirements.• System Engineer – software Evaluate, develop, customize, install, implement and maintain key system software components, according to Customer/system requirements. Areas of focus are system monitoring, point-to-point and publish/subscribe messaging, middle-ware, and web services.• System Engineer – Security Evaluate, develop, customize, install, implement and maintain Security solutions, policies, and procedures, according to Customer/system requirements.• System Engineer – Network•     Evaluate, develop, customize, install, implement and maintain network systems (telecom or data network, dependent on specific role), according to Customer/system requirements. Job Functions: Customer/Business Orientation• Focus on internal and external Customer requirements.• Develop understanding of business process being supported by assigned system(s). Project Management• Participate in developing time estimates for project schedules.• Support the organization’s project management policy, practice and methodology.• Provide timely and accurate progress information to project status reports• Must have familiarity with the basic PC software utilized to perform their daily duties, i.e. Word, Excel, Visio, etc…• Must have basic experience in project management and vendor relations• Must have good written and verbal skills. Platform Engineering• Assist in installation, customization, development, implementation and maintenance of systems developed internally and/or in conjunction with an outside vendor.• Assist in evaluating and recommending emerging technologies• Assist project team/business Customers in evaluating, developing, implementing and supporting system architecture components.• Beginning knowledge of hardware components, operation systems and networking issues.• Introductory background and some practical experience with hardware and operation system technologies.• Beginning knowledge and application of patch and upgrade procedures for hardware and operating systems• Performs backup and recovery operation System Engineering Software• Assist in installation, customization, development, implementation and maintenance of systems software developed internally and/or in conjunction with an outside vendor.• Beginning experience and basic understanding of concepts of system software. Includes system monitoring, middle-ware, publish/subscribe messaging and web services.• Assist in evaluating and recommending emerging technologies.• Assist project teams/business Customers in evaluating, developing, implementing and supporting system architecture components.• Beginning knowledge and application of patch and upgrade procedures for system software System Engineering – SecuritySecurity Awareness• Participates in Security Awareness programs, makes contributions to documentation Policy and Program Management• Able to understand, articulate, and maintain existing policies and programs.System Security• Monitors and maintains elements of system security. Includes Intrusion Detection, Identify management, ID Provisioning, and other key system security infrastructure. Software Security• Monitors and maintains elements of software security.Networking Engineering• Assist in installation, customization, development, implementation and maintenance of network systems developed internally and/or in conjunction with an outside vendor• Assist in evaluating and recommending emerging networking technologies.• Assist project teams/business Customers in evaluating, developing, implementing and supporting network architecture components.• Beginning knowledge of network cabling, print-outs and equipment specifications• Introductory background and some practical experience with networking technologies.• Design cost effective network solutions that support business needs.• Help manage the relationships with the network providers and vendors. Data Network• Design, implement and provide second level support for the WAN, routed network and LAN• Manage the IP addressing and DNS Telecom• Design, implement and provide second level support for the telecom network, Call management and Call accounting systems, and the Reservations ACD systems for SWA.Firewall• Design, implement and provide second level support for the firewall network at SWA.• Design, implement and provide second level support for host load-balancing solutions at SWA. Testing/Deliverable Quality• Participate in component and system testing as it relates to hardware and operating system components.• Test and implement hardware and operating systems components using techniques that preserve system integrity. Production Support• Will be required to carry / respond promptly to an on-call pager on a rotating basis with other System Engineers.• Responsible for immediate response to system software problems.• Needs a basic understanding of root cause analysis procedures.• Provide technical problem resolution for less complex problems without assistance.• Must be able to travel on a limited basis to install or troubleshoot equipment at end user locations. Travelling could be heavier during project implementations.Financial Accountability: Assists in preparation of budgetary plans for project proposals. Education: AAS, Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, and / or equivalent formal training or work experience.  Skills Category Name Required Experience   Troubleshooting Yes 6 Years   MS Windows Yes 6 Years   UNIX Yes 6 Yea        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Sr Sys Engineer - EG Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-sys-engineer-eg03-job-dallas-tx-us-168836454.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),731aabcad5fa96495d6e3d8c64c142d6
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:12:58:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"1515 E Magnolia Ave # 401, Knoxville, TN 37917 DUTY OFFICERNo Experience Required! Enjoy Great Benefits!$14/hr. - (Time and ½ for Overtime) Come Join Our Team! Apply online today! MIDWAY REHAB CENTER has an immediate opening for a Duty Officer at Federal Half-Way House. The successful candidate must be prepared to work when needed on a rotating shift schedule. Duty Officer - Job Description: The Duty Officer will be responsible for tracking and direct supervision of Federal inmates. Duty officers must maintain order and daily operations of the facility and are responsible for the care, custody, and control of inmates. Duty Officer - Job Responsibilities: An officer must be alert and aware of any and all movement taking place inside the facility. Duty officers also must take full concern for the health and safety of the facility. Officers must screen all incoming and outgoing mail as well as all visitors. Duty officers also must assist in transportation responsibilities that may include transfers to other facilities, medical appointments, court appearances, and other approved locations. Duty Officer - Requirements: High School Diploma or GED requiredMust have no prior criminal arrest or historyMust have a valid Driver's License Job Benefits: We provide a positive, professional work environment with the best training in the industry. We believe in employee development through training and advancement from within. Our team members enjoy terrific benefits which include: $14/hr. - (time and ½ for Overtime)Health, Dental, and Life Insurance10 paid holidays per yearS&P Retirement Benefit100% Paid Sick Leave2 weeks Paid Vacation - Increases to 4 weeks. We are a Drug and Smoke-Free facility and an Equal Opportunity Employer. (E.O.E.) Duty officer; correction officer; prison officer; duty officer half-way house; duty officer rehab center",DUTY OFFICER - $/HOUR + OVERTIME,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/duty-officer-14-hour-overtime-no-experience-required-great-benefits!-full-time-see-details!-job-knoxville-tn-us-168866743.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,,Entry Level,2f26997183ea6f2b76427bbbf848020a
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:12:58:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Premier Security Specialist (Daly City) 3728BR Northern California 408-326-0210 Job Description WHELAN SECURITY IS NOW HIRING We are searching for bright and talented professionals to join our world-class security team in Daly City, CA! Our security positions are ideal for: Former, transitioning and military reserve personnel Former and future law enforcement officers Hospitality and customer service professionals College students Retirees Qualifications Successful candidates must meet the following requirements: Legally authorized to work in the United States At least 21 years of age or older as required by applicable law or contractual requirements Demonstrate a stable work history Pass an extensive background screening which includes, but is not limited to, criminal background checks (local, state and federal), drug test, aptitude tests, skills assessment, interviews, and personality profile (behavioral assessment) Have at least (1) year security related experience Ability to obtain a valid California Guard Card Education Candidates must meet the following educational requirements: Possess at least a high school education or equivalent (GED) Apply Now! If you have an interest in joining a leader in the contract security industry and would like to work at one or more of our outstanding client locations in the Daly City area – APPLY NOW! Click “Apply” to begin the application process immediately; or if you wish to expedite your application, we encourage you to visit our local branch office located at 4 North 2nd Street, Suite 598, San Jose, CA 95113 to apply in person.  For more information, you can also call us at (408-326-0210) . Not convinced?   Listen to what our team members have to say! California Private Patrol Operator License Number 16344 Daly City, CA  94014",Premier Security Specialist (Daly City) Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/premier-security-specialist-daly-city-job-ca-us-168941314.aspx?mescoid=1300095001001&jobPosition=19,,Security/Protective Services,6eb220bd41684a38d20900b876466de4
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:12:44:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title #720 Plano Retail Co-Manager Auto req ID 1473BR Address 1 6320 W. Plano Pkwy City Plano State/Province Texas Zip Code 75093 Job Description - Overview ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A COMPANY THAT VALUES PEOPLE? Hobby Lobby’s success begins with our people, and that beginning could start with you! Our company is growing and we only promote from within. You will have the opportunity to establish yourself while surrounded by proven leaders. We are searching for managers that have successfully built trained and motivated teams to achieve high standards in customer service, store operations and financial goals.A Co-Manager is the first step to becoming a  Hobby Lobby Store Manager . As a successful Co-Manager, you will be expected to achieve the following bench marks within the first year: Gain working and managerial knowledge of day to day store operations Partner with the Store Manager to meet and exceed all financial goals for assigned store. Successfully operate the seasonal department with consistent detailed operations while exhibiting strong merchandise presentation. Participate and lead projects within your store, district and region.     Job Description - Requirements Relocation is preferred. Must have previous retail Store Management experience.  Demonstrate leadership and work ethic in a fast-paced environment. Regional and district travel will be expected for participation in various store projects. EOE - Drug/Alcohol testing compliant with applicable statutes. For reasonable accommodation of disability during the hiring process call (877)303-4547.Follow Hobby Lobby Careers on Facebook: www.facebook.com/hobbylobbyjobs",# Plano Retail Co-Manager Job in Plano,Full Time Employee,"Plano, TX 75093",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/720-plano-retail-co-manager-job-plano-tx-us-168219982.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=6,,Retail,000d6b27ca3019e5a8c36e021fd6a188
United States of America,US,01/Jul/2016:12:43:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resource Manager 3486BR Southern California (951) 710-3150 Job Description Human Resource Manager  Whelan Security is looking for a talented and driven leader to manage our Human Resources in Southern California!Whelan Security is a performance-based company that cares deeply about maintaining our conservative business culture. The Human Resources Manager is responsible for providing H.R. direction and counsel to managers, streamlining hiring processes to ensure consistent, effective and efficient hiring, and ensuring compliance with federal, state and local laws. The HRM role is 10% strategic and 90% tactical. The strategic portion consists of driving business results through solid people strategy and leadership, which includes the following four leadership principles – 1) hire great people, 2) set clear expectations, 3) provide the tools they need to succeed, 4) hold them accountable. The tactical portion requires a willingness to dig in and manage the “weeds” of the business to include risk management (workers compensation/unemployment), recruiting and hiring, employee relations, employee engagement, benefits administration, progressive discipline, compliance with regulatory or collective bargaining requirements (where applicable), and compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements while building upon a culture of employee engagement and setting the example for all employees in the branch/region of servant leadership and personal commitment to the Whelan Values. Qualifications Performance Metrics: The HRM is expected to achieve the following metrics within Whelan’s performance-based business environment: Manage to 2.5% unbilled overtime or less in the branch/region Year over year improvement in Employee Engagement scores in the branch/region Year over year improvement in SUTA rates Year over year improvement in Workers Compensation/Safety performance Ongoing recruiting to ensure branch/region has employee candidates to staff to 110% level of branch and account staffing needs Personally recruit a minimum of one new manager/staff in your branch annually 100% compliance to the Whelan Mandatory Requirements Lead by example of living up to the Whelan Values Personal Characteristics: Company-Wide Culture - High Integrity (Character Beyond Reproach), Servant Leader (Never Asking Anyone to Do What You Aren’t Willing to Do), Hands-On Leader, Financially Prudent, Detail-Oriented, Thick-Skinned, Fun.  Position-Specific - Fiercely Competitive (Hates to Lose), Comfortable Dealing with Ambiguity Education Why Whelan?  Be Supported:  Whelan employees enjoy a comprehensive benefits package including health insurance, supplemental benefits, (including dental, vision, short term disability, life insurance, and legal assistance plans), 401(k) retirement plan, employee assistance program, prescription discount cards, paid vacations, and more! Be Challenged:  Our extensive training program and career progression opportunities create an environment where employees can thrive, succeed, and enhance their careers. Be Rewarded:  We are proud to acknowledge and reward exceptional employees who make a difference to customers, the team, and the organization through our comprehensive Employee Recognition Program.Be Valued: We are more than a team – we are a family! The distinctive culture of our family business sets us apart from every other contract security company in the industry. Apply Now! At Whelan, we are passionate about our employees. If you have a passion for people and wish to join a family-owned, industry leading organization – APPLY NOW!Not convinced? Listen to what our team members have to say!Riverside, CA 92505 P456HQJ",Human Resource Manager Job in California US body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,CA,,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-manager-job-ca-us-168941946.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=4,,Security/Protective Services,d661e24bb05fd7eac9480bc312e17f33
